So there is no way for me to plug it in here in the US unless I go by a converter.	0
Good case, Excellent value.	1
Great for the jawbone.	1
Tied to charger for conversations lasting more than 45 minutes.MAJOR PROBLEMS!!	0
The mic is great.	1
I have to jiggle the plug to get it to line up right to get decent volume.	0
If you have several dozen or several hundred contacts, then imagine the fun of sending each of them one by one.	0
If you are Razr owner...you must have this!	1
Needless to say, I wasted my money.	0
What a waste of money and time!.	0
And the sound quality is great.	1
He was very impressed when going from the original battery to the extended battery.	1
If the two were seperated by a mere 5+ ft I started to notice excessive static and garbled sound from the headset.	0
Very good quality though	1
The design is very odd, as the ear "clip" is not very comfortable at all.	0
Highly recommend for any one who has a blue tooth phone.	1
I advise EVERYONE DO NOT BE FOOLED!	0
So Far So Good!.	1
Works great!.	1
It clicks into place in a way that makes you wonder how long that mechanism would last.	0
I went on Motorola's website and followed all directions, but could not get it to pair again.	0
I bought this to use with my Kindle Fire and absolutely loved it!	1
The commercials are the most misleading.	0
I have yet to run this new battery below two bars and that's three days without charging.	1
I bought it for my mother and she had a problem with the battery.	0
Great Pocket PC / phone combination.	1
I've owned this phone for 7 months now and can say that it's the best mobile phone I've had.	1
I didn't think that the instructions provided were helpful to me.	0
People couldnt hear me talk and I had to pull out the earphone and talk on the phone.	0
Doesn't hold charge.	0
This is a simple little phone to use, but the breakage is unacceptible.	0
This product is ideal for people like me whose ears are very sensitive.	1
It is unusable in a moving car at freeway speed.	0
I have two more years left in this contract and I hate this phone.	0
Car charger as well as AC charger are included to make sure you never run out of juice.Highy recommended	1
You need at least 3 mins to get to your phone book from the time you first turn on the phone.Battery life is short.	0
It has kept up very well.	1
Poor Talk Time Performance.	0
The case is great and works fine with the 680.	1
worthless product.	0
It has a great camera thats 2MP, and the pics are nice and clear with great picture quality.	1
I was not impressed by this product.	0
Nice headset priced right.	1
I only hear garbage for audio.	0
Excellent bluetooth headset.	1
It has all the features I want	1
Who in their right mind is gonna buy this battery?.	0
AFTER ARGUING WITH VERIZON REGARDING THE DROPPED CALLS WE RETURNED THE PHONES AFTER TWO DAYS.	0
This case seems well made.	1
Disappointed with battery.	0
Not loud enough and doesn't turn on like it should.	0
good protection and does not make phone too bulky.	1
A usable keyboard actually turns a PDA into a real-world useful machine instead of just a neat gadget.	1
This phone is pretty sturdy and I've never had any large problems with it.	1
I love this thing!	1
Everything about it is fine and reasonable for the price i.e.	1
VERY DISAPPOINTED.	0
I even dropped this phone into a stream and it was submerged for 15 seconds and it still works great!	1
I have been very happy with the 510 and have had NO complaints from any one regarding my sound quality on their end.	1
The buttons for on and off are bad.	0
Essentially you can forget Microsoft's tech support.	0
I really recommend this faceplates since it looks very nice, elegant and cool.	1
These headphones were a great find - and I think they are perhaps the best purchase I've made in the last several years - seriously.	1
Buy a different phone - but not this.	0
You have to hold the phone at a particular angle for the other party to hear you clearly.	0
The one big drawback of the MP3 player is that the buttons on the phone's front cover that let you pause and skip songs lock out after a few seconds.	0
A week later after I activated it, it suddenly died.	0
It feels more comfortable than most headsets because I wear glasses and that gets in the way sometimes.	1
Great for iPODs too.	1
This device is great in several situations:1.)	1
Mic Doesn't work.	0
Even in my BMW 3 series which is fairly quiet, I have trouble hearing what the other person is saying.	0
Great choice!	1
Nice docking station for home or work.	1
This is a beautiful phone.	1
Love this product.	1
Do Not Buy for D807...wrongly advertised for D807.	0
This is a great little item.	1
I love this phone , It is very handy and has a lot of features .	1
I purchased this and within 2 days it was no longer working!!!!!!!!!	0
I wear it everyday and it holds up very well.	1
Not a good bargain.	0
Well packaged, arrived on time, and works as intended.	1
The battery runs down quickly.	0
This item worked great, but it broke after 6 months of use.	0
The headsets are easy to use and everyone loves them.	1
This phone works great.	1
The construction of the headsets is poor.	0
Product was excellent and works better than the verizon one and Boy was it cheaper!	1
The phone loads super!	1
For a product that costs as much as this one does, I expect it to work far better and with greater ease than this thing does.	0
Made very sturdy.	1
Worked great!.	1
The ear buds only play music in one ear.	0
Dont waste your money...	0
Will order from them again!	1
If you plan to use this in a car forget about it.	0
I found this product to be waaay too big.	0
Best I've found so far .... I've tried 2 other bluetooths and this one has the best quality (for both me and the listener) as well as ease of using.	1
I'm very disappointed with my decision.	0
Integrated seamlessly with the Motorola RAZR phone.	1
Buyer Beware, you could flush money right down the toilet.	0
Definitely a bargain.	1
The price was very good and with the free shipping and all it was a good purchase.	1
I received my supposedly new motorola 375 and apparently there was not a match between the phone and the charger.	0
Pros:-Good camera - very nice pictures , also has cool styles like black and white, and more.	1
That's a huge design flaw (unless I'm not using it correctly, which I don't think is the case).	0
I love my 350 headset.. My Jabra350 bluetooth headset is great, the reception is very good and the ear piece is a comfortable fit.	1
The camera, although rated at an impressive 1.3 megapixels, renders images that fall well below expectations of such a relatively high resolution.	0
I purcashed this for the car charger and it does not work.	0
Sound quality on both end is excellent, I use headset to call my wife and ask my wife to use headset to call me !2.	1
This phone is slim and light and the display is beautiful.	1
its a little geeky but i think thats its sex on toast and it rocks and oozes sex right down to its battery embedded sleek stylish leather case.	1
Great product, fast shipping!.	1
Absolutely great.	1
The keyboard is a nice compromise between a full QWERTY and the basic cell phone number keypad.	1
i got this phone around the end of may and i'm completely unhappy with it.	0
It is very comfortable on the ear.	1
It has been a winner for us.	1
)Setup couldn't have been simpler.	1
I've tried several different earpieces for my cell phone and this Jabra one is the first one I've found that fits my ear comfortably.	1
Could not get strong enough signal.	0
Iam very pleased with my purchase.	1
Bad Quality.	0
Gets the job done.	1
Great audio!.	1
Basically the service was very bad.	0
it did not work in my cell phone plug i am very up set with the charger!.	0
I've only had my bluetooth for a few weeks, but I really like it.	1
The BT headset was such a disapoinment.	0
It is so small and you don't even realize that it is there after a while of getting used to it.	1
The accompanied software is almost brilliant.	1
Headset works great & was packaged nicely to avoid any damage.	1
!I definitly recommend!!	1
Buyer--Be Very Careful!!!!!.	0
The majority of the Logitech earbud headsets failed.	0
Very good stuff for the price.	1
My headset works just peachy-keen.	1
In my house I was getting dropped coverage upstairs and no coverage in my basement.	0
Voice recognition is tremendous!	1
What a waste.	0
During several different 2 minute calls, I experienced 5 drops and it was in an area that had 5 bars.	0
I was not happy with this item.	0
very disappointed.	0
The phone takes FOREVER to charge like 2 to 5 hours literally.	0
I got this phone on reccomendation from a relative and I'm glad I did.	1
What a waste of time!	0
Its reception is very very poor.	0
Items stated as included from the description ARE NOT INCLUDED.	0
After 3 months, screen just went black all of a sudden.	0
I Was Hoping for More.	0
Audio Quality is poor, very poor.	0
I had absolutely no problem with this headset linking to my 8530 Blackberry Curve!	1
I know that sounds funny, but to me it seemed like sketchy technology that wouldn't work well.Well, this one works great.	1
I've bought $5 wired headphones that sound better than these.	0
This phone is very fast with sending any kind of messages and web browsing is significantly faster than previous phones i have used.	1
Nice quality build, unlike some cheap s*** out there.	1
This item is fantastic and works perfectly!	1
And I just love the colors!	1
W810i is just SUPERB.	1
All I can do is whine on the Internet, so here it goes.The more I use the thing the less I like it.	0
Great charger.	1
This is essentially a communications tool that does not communicate.	0
Works like a charm; it work the same as the one I got with the phone.	1
I still maintain that monkeys shouldn't make headphones, we just obviously don't share enough DNA to copy the design over to humans.	0
Great Value.	1
Doesn't work at all.. I bougth it for my L7c and its not working.	0
The look of it is very sharp and the screen is nice and clear, with great graphics.	1
doesn't last long.	0
One thing I hate is the mode set button at the side.	0
EXCELLENT SERVICE!!!!!!!!.	1
Thank you for wasting my money.	0
How can that be?The audio quality is poor.	0
The iGo chargers and tips are really great.	1
The file browser offers all the options that one needs.Handsfree is great.	1
Superb Phone on a Great Network.	1
I connected my wife's bluetooth,(Motorola HS850) to my phone and it worked like a charm whether the phone was in my pocket or the case.	1
I put the latest OS on it (v1.15g), and it now likes to slow to a crawl and lock up every once in a while.	0
It only recognizes the Phone as its storage device.	0
If you like a loud buzzing to override all your conversations, then this phone is for you!	0
Don't buy this product.	0
I've had this bluetoooth headset for some time now and still not comfortable with the way it fits on the ear.	0
The sound quality is good and functionality is awesome.	1
I have this phone and it is a thorn in my side, I really abhor it.	0
I recently had problems where I could not stay connected for more than 10 minutes before being disconnected.	0
Incredible!.	1
Design Flaw?.	0
Great phone!.	1
Waste of 13 bucks.	0
But when I check voice mail at night, the keypad backlight turns off a few seconds into the first message, and then I'm lost.	0
The replacement died in a few weeks.	0
Any ring tone..Overall good phone to buy..	1
Lately they have been extremely nice and helpful on the phone.	1
I have had problems wit hit dropping signal and more.	0
Not impressed.	0
Light weight, I hardly notice it is there.	1
You'll love how thin it is.	1
Bad Choice.	0
The pleather case doesn't fit.	0
useless phone, simply deaf.	0
The color is even prettier than I thought it would be, and the graphics are incredibly sharp.	1
All in all I think it was a good investment.	1
It makes very strange ticking noises before it ends the call.	0
The best electronics of the available FM Transmitters.	1
Battery lasts only a few hours.	0
great headset, very impressed - H500.	1
The "1.2" mega pixel camera, being a part of a phone, is reasonably good7.	1
I've had this for nearly 2 years and it has worked great for me.	1
Good transmit audio.	1
We are sending it back.	0
I did not bother contacting the company for few dollar product but I learned the lesson that I should not have bought this form online anyway.	0
If you hate earbugs, avoid this phone by all means.	0
Great price also!	1
The range is very decent, I've been able to roam around my house with the phone in the living room with no reception/sound quality issues.	1
fast service.	1
I would highly recommend this.	1
I would recommend this.	1
I also didn't like the "on" button, it felt like it would crack with use.	0
WORST PHONE EVER.	0
I'm still infatuated with this phone.	1
Freezes frequently4.	0
It's kind of embarrassing to use because of how it looks and mostly it's embarrassing how child-like the company is.	0
Simple, lightweight and great fit.	1
All in all, I'd expected a better consumer experience from Motorola.	0
There's a horrible tick sound in the background on all my calls that I have never experienced before.	0
These are certainly very comfortable and functionality is decent.	1
I usually don't like headbands but this one is very lightweight & doesn't mess up my hair.	1
I'm a bit disappointed.	0
I have had this phone for over a year now, and I will tell you, its not that great.	0
I ordered this for sony Ericsson W810i but I think it only worked once (thats when I first used it).	0
The battery is completely useless to me.	0
What a big waste of time.	0
Don't waste your $$$ on this one.	0
Great sound and service.	1
Really pleased with this product so far.	1
One of my favorite purchases ever.	1
best bluetooth on the market.	1
Authentic leather with nice shine and comfort .I recommend you this case !!	1
I was very excited to get this headset because I thought it was really cute.	1
Do not make the same mistake as me.	0
Big Disappointment with calendar sync.	0
the phone was unusable and was not new.	0
Worst Customer Service Ever.	0
No additional ear gels provided, and no instructions whatsoever.	0
It defeats the purpose of a bluetooth headset.	0
Worth every penny.	1
Excellent wallet type phone case.	1
Nice headphones for the price and they work great!	1
Internet is excrutiatingly slow.	0
It is very comfortable to wear as well, which is probably the most important aspect about using a case.	1
It's fits like a glove and is strong, secure, and durable.	1
O my gosh the best phone I have ever had.	1
It's very attractive and appears to be of good quality.	1
I love all the features and form factor.	1
This product had a strong rubber/petroleum smell that was unbearable after a while and caused me to return it	0
poor quality and service.	0
The cable looks so thin and flimsy, it is scary.	0
Great Earpiece.	1
Excellent hands free tool.	1
Great for using with your home stereo.	1
Good product - incredible value.	1
Only had this a month but it's worked flawlessly so far.	1
Works great.	1
Absolutel junk.	0
THAT one didn't work either.	0
Battery life is real good.	1
Returned 8 hours later.	0
It's a great item.	1
Don't waste your money!.	0
Love this headset!	1
Not only will it drain your player, but may also potentially fry it.	0
Worked perfectly!	1
Unreliable - I'm giving up.	0
I gave it 5 stars because of the sound quality.	1
Avoid this one if you can.	0
Reversible plug works great.	1
I wasted my little money with this earpiece.	0
Very good phone.	1
Best of all is the rotating feature, very helpful.	1
Comfort for our whole family.	1
Good product, good seller.	1
I love this bluetooth!	1
First of all, it doesn't wear well.	0
I am very impressed with this headset from Plantronics.	1
I got it because it was so small and adorable.	1
Great phone!.	1
I wouldn't recommend buying this product.	0
Piece of Junk.	0
Poorly contstruct hinge.	0
This item is great, installed it, let it charged up overnite and it has been working good every since with no problems	1
Great Phone.	1
Don't buy it.	0
Excellent Phone.	1
DO NOT PURCHASE THIS PHONE.	0
The voice recognition thru the handset is excellent.	1
This is hands down the best phone I've ever had.	1
Works great, when my cat attacked the phone he scratched the protective strip instead of destroying the screen.	1
This one works and was priced right.	1
Customer service was terrible.	0
Battery life still not long enough in Motorola Razor V3i.	0
Sending it back.	0
Now I know that I made a wise decision.	1
Someone shouldve invented this sooner.	1
Good price.	1
Everything worked on the first try.The device was certainly engineered in a clever way and the construction feels good.	1
I received it quickly and it works great!!	1
Has been working great.	1
As many people complained, I found this headset's microphone was very weak.	0
My 5-year old Nokia 2160 from Tracfone holds the charge a lot better than this.	0
They do not care about the consumer one bit.	0
This is a good battery, and it got here really fast.	1
The instruction manual is lacking.	0
Also its slim enough to fit into my alarm clock docking station without removing the case.	1
Phone now holds charge like it did when it was new.	1
The battery is unreliable as well as the service use antena.	0
It's uncomfortable and the sound quality is quite poor compared with the phone (Razr) or with my previous wired headset (that plugged into an LG).	0
We have gotten a lot of compliments on it.	1
This is definitely a must have if your state does not allow cell phone usage while driving.	1
I want my money back.	0
I love this device.	1
I am also very happy with the price.	1
I ordered this product first and was unhappy with it immediately.	0
The Ngage is still lacking in earbuds.	0
I was able to do voice dialing in the car with no problem.	1
I have 2-3 bars on my cell phone when I am home, but you cant not hear anything.	0
good item, low price.	1
However-the riingtones are not the best, and neither are the games.	0
The plug did not work very well.	0
AMAZON SUCKS.	0
Rip off---- Over charge shipping.	0
VERY comfortable.	1
The battery is working well as a replacement for the original that came with the phone over 2 years ago.	1
The reception is excellent!	1
It fits comfortably in either ear, the sound is clear and loud, and the charge lasts a couple of days.	1
very clear, quality sound and you don't have to mess with the sound on your iPod since you have the sound buttons on the headset.	1
1. long lasting battery (you don't have to recharge it as frequentyly as some of the flip phones)2.	0
Obviously there is a problem with the adhesive.	0
Very disappointing.	0
It was an inexpensive piece, but I would still have expected better quality.	0
It is practically useless and did not add any kind of boost to my reception after I bought it.	0
Excellent sound quality.	1
Was not happy.	0
A PIECE OF JUNK THAT BROKE AFTER BEING ON MY PHONE FOR 2 DAYS!!!	0
New Battery works great in phone.	1
Worst customer service.	0
I've dropped my phone more times than I can say, even on concrete and my phone is still great (knock on wood!).	1
Reception is terrible and full of static.	0
Good audio quality.	1
This little device has transformed my organizational capability and made my life a whole lot easier.	1
I was sitting in my vehicle, with the cradle on my belt, and the headset lost signal.	0
Were JERKS on the phone.	0
Works like a charm.. Works as advertised.	1
Comfortable, Nice Range, Good Battery Life.	1
Their network coverage in Los Angeles is horrible.	0
Excellent starter wireless headset.	0
The loudspeaker option is great, the bumpers with the lights is very ... appealing.	0
The only thing that I think could improve is the sound leaks out from the headset.	0
First off the reception sucks, I have never had more than 2 bars, ever.	0
The phone gets EXTREMELY HOT!	0
The microphone also works well, but (according to people I have called) it applifies everything.	1
Nice design and quality.	1
Also, if your phone is dropped, this case is not going to save it, specially when dropped face down.	0
It is light, easy to use, and has very clear reception and transmission.	1
bad fit, way too big.	0
It definitely was not as good as my S11.	1
awesome device.	1
Waste of money.	0
I had ordered a motorola data cable, got a very well finished and working product.	1
Love This Phone.	1
I was looking for this headset for a long time and now that I've got it I couldn't be happier.	1
I'll be drivng along, and my headset starts ringing for no reason.	0
Display is excellent and camera is as good as any from that year.	1
Battery life is also great!	1
The worst phone I've ever had.... Only had it for a few months.	0
Not a good item.. It worked for a while then started having problems in my auto reverse tape player.	0
This is so embarassing and also my ears hurt if I try to push the ear plug into my ear.	0
Protects the phone on all sides.	1
This is a VERY average phone with bad battery life that operates on a weak network.	0
Clear Skype Calls, Long Battery Life, Long Range.	1
Soyo technology sucks.	0
Great Hands Free Device.	1
you can even take self portraits with the outside (exterior) display, very cool.	1
Same problem as others have mentioned.	0
After trying many many handsfree gadgets this is the one that finally works well.	1
Magical Help.	1
The worst piece of crap ever along with the Verizon customer service.	0
Poor sound quality.	0
The best phone in market :).	1
It worked very well.	1
The company shipped my product very promptly and it works well.	1
Exactly what I wanted.	1
The picture resolution is far below what other comparably-priced phones are offering today.	0
This is a great deal.	1
Excellent product, I am very satisfied with the purchase.	1
I highly recommend these and encourage people to give them a try.	1
Better than you'd expect.	1
Using all earpieces, left or right, this thing will not stay on my ear.	0
Great product and price.	1
Sounds good reasonably priced and effective, Its that simple !	1
Still Waiting...... I'm sure this item would work well.. if I ever recieve it!	0
what a disappointment	0
Very prompt service.	1
Excellent product for the price.	1
Very pleased with this headset.	1
don't waste your money and time.	0
I especially love the long battery life.	1
It's so stupid to have to keep buying new chargers, car chargers, cradles, headphones and car kits every time a new phone comes out.	0
Works great.	1
Plantronics Bluetooth Excelent Buy.	1
I came over from Verizon because cingulair has nicer cell phones.... the first thing I noticed was the really bad service.	0
I'll be looking for a new earpiece.	0
I highly recommend this device to everyone!	1
Jawbone Era is awesome too!	1
We received a WHITE colored battery that goes DEAD after a couple hoursTHe original used to last a week - but still lasts longer than thereplacement	0
After a year the battery went completely dead on my headset.	0
I have used several phone in two years, but this one is the best.	1
An Awesome New Look For Fall 2000!.	1
This is the first phone I've had that has been so cheaply made.	0
Att is not clear, sound is very distorted and you have to yell when you talk.	0
The plastic breaks really easy on this clip.	0
Price is good too.	1
Don't make the same mistake I did.	0
Oh and I forgot to also mention the weird color effect it has on your phone.	0
I'm using it with an iriver SPINN (with case) and it fits fine.	1
Also the area where my unit broke).- I'm not too fond of the magnetic strap.	0
Overall, I am psyched to have a phone which has all my appointments and contacts in and gets great reception.	1
every thing on phone work perfectly, she like it.	1
Another note about this phone's appearance is that it really looks rather bland, especially in the all black model.	0
IT'S REALLY EASY.	1
My Sanyo has survived dozens of drops on blacktop without ill effect.	1
Fantastic earphones.	1
It finds my cell phone right away when I enter the car.	1
Low Quality.	0
I highly recommend this modest priced cellular phone.	1
But it does get better reception and clarity than any phone I've had before.	1
Warning - Stay away.	0
I wish I could return the unit and get back my money.	0
Awsome Device Works Great!!.	1
I used to talk on it for 1 - 1 1/2 hours and the battery would be literally drained and dying.	0
If you don't find it, too bad, as again the unit comes with one earpad only.I would not recommend this to anyone.	0
Very Displeased.	0
I might have gotten a defect, but I would not risk buying it again because of the built quality alone.	0
They made this case too small and is very difficult to install.	0
Restored my phone to like new performance.	1
I would recommend purchasing the Jabra JX-10 series 2 which works flawlessly with my Moto Q, go figure.	1
I searched the Internet, and found this one to be the best value.	1
Does not fit.	0
Very happy with this product.	1
The screen size is big, key pad lit well enough, and the camera quality is excellent for a camera phone.	1
There's really nothing bad I can say about this headset.	0
i'm glad i found this product on amazon it is hard to find, it wasn't high priced.	1
Portable and it works.	1
My colleague & I now get great reception.A little expensive, but performance is great.	1
I even fully charged it before I went to bed and turned off blue tooth and wi-fi and noticed that it only had 20 % left in the morning.	0
I've also had problems with the phone reading the memory card in which I always turn it on and then off again.	0
Not good when wearing a hat or sunglasses.	0
Timely shipment and quality product.	1
Nice solid keyboard.	1
Very well made and fits my Surefire GX2 perfectly.	1
Horrible phone.	0
BT50 battery junk!.	0
We would recommend these to others.	1
Cant get the software to work with my computer.	0
Disappointed!.	0
poor voice clarity.	0
The battery works great!	1
No buyers remorse on this one!.	0
Very disappointed in AccessoryOne.	0
I find this inexcusable and so will probably be returning this phone and perhaps changing carriers.	0
Looks great and is strong."	1
I have had TMobile service for 2 or 3 years now, and I am pretty happy with it.	1
The update procedure is difficult and cumbersome.	0
Disappointment.. I hate anything that goes in my ear.	0
Great software for Motorolas.	1
The delivery was on time.	1
Very easy to use.	1
Uncomfortable In the Ear, Don't use with LG VX9900 (EnV).	0
The volume switch rocketed out of the unit to a destination unknown.	0
It holds a charge for a long time, is reasonably comfortable under long-wearing conditions and the quality of sound is tremendous.	1
I'd like to return it.	0
The keyboard is really worthwhile in usefulness and is sturdy enough I don't expect any problems.	1
Verizon's bills, however, are difficult to understand even though their pricing plans are simple.	0
After charging overnight, these batteries work great.	1
You won't regret it!	1
I love this phone!.	1
A Disappointment.	0
Its not user friendly.	0
Unfortunately the ability to actually know you are receiving a call is a rather important feature and this phone is pitiful in that respect.	0
Then I exchanged for the same phone, even that had the same problem.	0
This results in the phone being either stuck at max volume or mute.	0
This PDA rocks.	1
It is super charged up for use as a small hybrid palmtop/camera/cellphone, and excels in those roles.	1
I would definitely recommend the Jabra BT250v for those who are looking for comfort, clarity and a great price!	1
I had Verizon 2 years ago and really liked their service.	1
Pretty piece of junk.	0
Plug was the wrong size.	0
Works as described.	1
Save your money.... I've had this item for 11 months now.	0
Bad Purchase.	0
WELL IM SATISFIED.	1
The bose noise cancelling is amazing, which is very important for a NYC commuter.	1
This battery is an excellent bargain!	1
Defective crap.	0
I would have given no star if I was able.	0
I wear glasses and it fits fine with them.	1
The sound quality for the device is unacceptable.Unless you are in a really quiet area, you almost hear nothing.	0
I would not recommend this item to anyone.	0
The holster that arrived did not match the photo in the ad.	0
great...no problems at all!.	1
As an earlier review noted, plug in this charger and nothing happens.	0
This frog phone charm is adorable and very eye catching.	1
You never know if you pushed it hard enough or the right number of times for the function you want or not.	0
The sound is clear and the people I talk to on it are amazed at the quality too.	1
I got the aluminum case for my new Palm VX and it worked really well--it has protected my handheld perfectly so far.	1
very good product, well made.	1
Mobile Phone Tools are a must have.	1
I am very impressed with the job that Motorola did on the sturdiness of this phone.	1
I received my orders well within the shipping timeframe, everything was in good working order and overall, I am very excited to have this source.	1
The phone is sturdy and waterproof.	1
I am not impressed with this and i would not recommend this item to anyone.	0
My only complaint is the standard sound volume is a little low even when turned up to 5(of 5)	0
Thanks again to Amazon for having the things I need for a good price!	1
I ended up sliding it on the edge of my pants or back pockets instead.	1
I had to go to a store and bought a new NOKIA phone which is working great.	1
Works great!.	1
REALLY UGLY.	0
horrible, had to switch 3 times.	0
The noise shield is incrediable.	1
No real improvement.	0
Razr Battery - Good buy.	1
Keep up the good work Amazon!!	1
They refuse to refund or replace.	0
Unfortunately it's easy to accidentally activate them with the gentle-touch buttons if you accidentally touch the phone to your face while listening.	0
So I basically threw my money out the window for nothing.	0
Great case and price!	1
All it took was one drop from about 6 inches above the kitchen counter and it was cracked.I am not impressed and I am not laughing.	0
Bluetooth range is good - a few days ago I left my phone in the trunk, got a call, and carried the conversation without a hitch.	1
Small, sleek, impressive looking, practical setup with ample storage in place.	1
The eargels channel the sound directly into your ear and seem to increase the sound volume and clarity.	1
none of the new ones have ever quite worked properly.	0
I am glad I purchased it.	1
I've missed numerous calls because of this reason.	0
Perhaps my phone is defective, but people cannot hear me when I use this.	0
Don't buy this product.	0
sucked, most of the stuff does not work with my phone.	0
No shifting, no bubbling, no peeling, not even a scratch, NOTHING!I couldn't be more happier with my new one for the Droid.	1
Worst software ever used.... If I could give this zero stars I would.	0
Trying to make a call on these is an exercise in frustration.	0
The case is a flimsy piece of plastic and has no front or side protection whatsoever.	0
I own a Jabra Earset and was very happy with it, but the sound quality, especially outgoing, on this is better.	1
I love the camera, it's really pretty good quality.	1
Thank you for such great service.	1
Its a total package.	1
The seller is very understanding and patient, I would definitely buy from them again.	1
I give Wirefly 1 star.I will contact Cingular/AT&T; and inform them of this practice.	0
It's AGGRAVATING!	0
Great product for the price!.	1
I have purchased these for both family and friends, and all enjoy their clarity and ease of use	1
Virgin Wireless rocks and so does this cheap little phone!	1
None of it works, just don't buy it.	0
Muddy, low quality sound, and the casing around the wire's insert was poorly super glued and slid off.	0
Please dont waste your money.	0
All in all, I'm quite satisfied with this purchase.	1
If you are looking for a good quality Motorola Headset keep looking, this isn't it.	0
Yet Plantronincs continues to use the same flawed charger design.	0
Disapointing Results.	0
Cumbersome design.	0
Great it was new packaged nice works good, no problems and it came in less time then I expected!!!!	1
Great Product.	1
It's A PIECE OF CRAP!	0
My experience was terrible..... This was my fourth bluetooth headset, and while it was much more comfortable than my last Jabra (which I HATED!!!	0
This fixes all the problems.	1
Worst ever.	0
I am very happy	1
I've had no trouble accessing the Internet, downloading ringtones or performing any of the functions.	1
I can barely ever hear on it and am constantly saying "what?"	0
The battery life is highly unacceptable.	0
That company is a joke.	0
It does everything the description said it would.	1
Due to this happening on every call I was forced to stop using this headset.	0
It works great with a car charger, especially if you cannot plug in two adapters at the same time.	1
Verizon tech support walked my through a few procedures, none of which worked and I ended up having to do a hard re-set, wiping out all my data.	0
Voice Quality, Signal Strength, Dropped Calls.	0
It plays louder than any other speaker of this size; the price is so low that most would think the quality is lacking, however, it's not.	1
Better than expected.	1
It feels poorly constructed, the menus are difficult to navigate, and the buttons are so recessed that it is difficult to push them.	0
Battery is holding up well.	1
Also difficult to put on.I'd recommend avoiding this product.	0
I only used it two days, and it wasn't always easy to hear with.	0
I got the car charger and not even after a week the charger was broken...I went to plug it in and it started smoking.	0
Sprint - terrible customer service.	0
Linked to my phone without effort.	1
THey are so cool!	1
Easy to use.	1
Better Than New.	1
What possesed me to get this junk, I have no idea...	0
Piece of trash.	0
A pretty good product.	1
This is a great phone!.	1
For the price on Amazon, it is an excellent product, which I would highly recommend.	1
Their Research and Development division obviously knows what they're doing.	1
The real killer is the volume, and of course it breaking.	0
Those phones are working just fine now.	1
I am more than happy with this product.	1
Poor Construction.	0
This is infuriating.	0
Overall, I would recommend this phone over the new Walkman.	1
Sprint charges for this service.	0
It is cheap, and it feel and look just as cheap.	0
It fits my ear well and is comfortable on.	1
It doesn't work in Europe or Asia.	0
clipping this to your belt will deffinitely make you feel like 50 cent's up-and-coming.	1
I like design and look of Jabra behing the ear headsets and 5020 is pretty comfortible to wear 24 hours a day without pain in the ear.	1
I was amazed at the quick arrival of the two original lg cell phone batteries and and at a fraction of the price.	1
the worst phone from samsung...crap..... this crappy Samsung E715.. is the worst i have ever seeen.	0
the charger worked for about a week and then completely stopped charging my phone.	0
Poor product.	0
However I needed some better instructions.	0
You need two hands to operate the screen.This software interface is decade old and cannot compete with new software designs.	0
Worked very well paired with a Treo 700w and as a Skype headset on my PC (using a USB Bluetooth transceiver).	1
Steer clear of this product and go with the genuine Palm replacementr pens, which come in a three-pack.	0
DO NOT BUY DO NOT BUYIT SUCKS	0
This is a great product..... sure beats using your fingers!.	1
Plus, I seriously do not believe it is worth its steep price point.	0
All the other cases I've tried normally fall apart after a few months but this one seems to be in for the long haul.	1
Very Dissapointing Performance.	0
Don't make the same mistake that I did and please don't buy this phone.	0
This phone might well be the worst I've ever had in any brand.	0
Case was more or less an extra that I originally put on but later discarded because it scratched my ear.	0
I recommend iGo to anyone with different brand cell phones/mp3 players in the family.	1
Don't bother - go to the store.	0
I posted more detailed comments under the grey or black phone, but i have the Fire Red and it's a great color!	1
I did not have any problem with this item and would order it again if needed.	1
You get what you pay for I guess.	0
Not only did the software do a great job of this, I could also make my own ringtones form my existing CDs without an internet connection.	1
im surprised this is a good quality car charger and there's not much reviews about it.	1
These are fabulous!	1
However, BT headsets are currently not good for real time games like first-person shooters since the audio delay messes me up.	0
I used bitpim (a free program you can find on the internet)to transfer data to the phone.The price of the cable was excellent.	1
Disappointing accessory from a good manufacturer.	0
Performed awful -- muffled, tinny incoming sound and severe echo for those on the other end of the call.	0
Very wind-resistant.	1
Obviously they have a terrible customer service, so you get what you pay for.	0
They do not last forever, but is not overly expensive to replace.Easy to operate and the sound is much better than others I have tried.	1
I contacted the company and they told me that, although the unit was still under warranty, if I couldn't produce my receipt I was out of luck.	0
Linksys should have some way to exchange a bad phone for a refurb unit or something!	0
Phone is sturdy as all nokia bar phones are.	1
Great phone.	1
When I placed my treo into the case, not only was it NOT snug, but there was A LOT of extra room on the sides.	0
I'm pleased.	1
Battery is terrible.	0
I found the product to be easy to set up and use.	1
The earpiece on this is too large or too heavy...it keeps falling out of my ear.	0
Utter crap.. Sound quality is TERRIBLE.	0
The charger arrived within the promised timeframe, but it did not work.	0
No ear loop needed, it's tiny and the sound is great.	1
Finally, after three or four times the spring of the latch broke and I could not use it any longer on the visor.	0
The handsfree part works fine, but then the car tries to download the address book, and the Treo reboots.Overall, I still rate this device high.	1
Talk about USELESS customer service.	0
It felt too light and "tinny.".	0
This does not fit the Palm Tungsten E2 and it broke the first time I tried to plug it in.	0
I'm happy about this purchase- good quality and low price.	1
I love the look and feel of Samsung flipphones.	1
Its well-designed and very sharp -- the blue is a very nice color.	1
Does everything it should and more.	1
I could not recommend these more.	0
Nice Sound.	1
Looks good in the picture, but this case was a huge disappointment!!	0
Much less than the jawbone I was going to replace it with.	1
Setup went very smoothly.	1
its extremely slow and takes forever to do anything with it.	0
A must study for anyone interested in the "worst sins" of industrial design.	0
The first thing that happened was that the tracking was off.	0
It is well made, easy to access the phone and has a handy, detachable belt clip.	1
Then I had to continue pairing it periodically since it somehow kept dropping.	0
Can't upload ringtones from a third party.	0
Bluetooth does not work, phone locks up, screens just flash up and now it just makes calls randomly while in my pocket locked.	0
Truly awful.	0
It works fine on my Motorola 325 cellphone, and a lot better than the worn-out battery did.	1
The volume for the ringer is REAL good (you have choices how loud).	1
And none of the tones is acceptable.	0
camera color balance is AWFUL.	0
This product is clearly not ready for prime time, I don't care how cool it looks, if you can't tell a call is coming in it's worthless.	0
I love the ringtones because they are so upbeat!	1
Chinese Forgeries Abound!.	0
Easy to pair with my Samsung Cell.	1
The instructions didn't explain that a microphone jack could be used.	0
i would advise to not purchase this item it never worked very well.	0
Too bad you have to pay up to $$$ a month for the service!	0
Works well.	1
The nokia CA-42 USB cable did not work with my phone.	0
Clear crisp sound.	1
I have to use the smallest earpieces provided, but it stays on pretty well.	1
The biggest complaint I have is, the battery drains superfast.	0
The design might be ergonomic in theory but I could not stand having these in my ear.	0
Do NOT buy if you want to use the holster.	0
The phone can also take great pictures and even video clips.	1
It doesn't make you look cool.	0
Because both ears are occupied, background is not distracting at all.	1
Comfortable fit - you need your headset to be comfortable for at least an hour at a time, if not for an entire day.	1
Also, the phone doesn't seem to accept anything except CBR mp3s, preferably ripped by Windows Media Player.	0
You can't beat the price on these.	1
* Comes with a strong light that you can use to light up your camera shots, and even flash SOS signals (seriously!	1
lightweight and works well.	1
So just beware.	0
I love this cable - it allows me to connect any mini-USB device to my PC.	1
So anyone near you will hear part of your conversation.	0
This is cool because most cases are just open there allowing the screen to get all scratched up.	1
I bought this phone as a replacement for my StarTac and have regretted it since.	0
Appears to actually outperform the original battery from China that came with my V325i.	1
Can't store anything but phone numbers to SIM.	0
It lasts less than 3o minutes, if I actually try to use the phone.My wife has the same phone with the same problem.	0
Poor quality.	0
jabra ear gels "R" the best!.	1
Not worth it.	0
The phone crashed completely and now I have to get it replaced.	0
It quit working after I'd used it for about 18 months, so I just purchased another one because this is the best headset I've ever owned.	1
Unfortunately it will not recharge my iPhone 4s, despite connecting it from multiple power sources (iMac, external battery, wall outlet, etc).	0
It was a great phone.	1
if you simply want a small flip phone -- look elsewhere as the extra bells & whistles are mediocre.	0
Good value, works fine - power via USB, car, or wall outlet.	1
My phone doesn't slide around my car now and the grip prevents my phone from slipping out of my hand.	1
This is simply the BEST bluetooth headset for sound quality!	1
Think it over when you plan to own this one!This sure is the last MOTO phone for me!	0
In the span of an hour, I had two people exclaim "Whoa - is that the new phone on TV?!?	1
I have always used corded headsets and the freedom from the wireless is very helpful.	1
This case has passed the one year mark and while it shows signs of wear, it is 100% functional.	1
Other than that, the leather is nice and soft; the fit is very tight; the cut out for the face is a good shape.	1
It has everything I need and I couldn't ask for more.	1
After receiving and using the product for just 2 days it broke.	0
This product is great... it makes working a lot easier I can go to the copier while waiting on hold for something.	1
None of the three sizes they sent with the headset would stay in my ears.	0
T-Mobile has the best customer service anywhere.	1
Arrived quickly and much less expensive than others being sold.	1
We have tried 2 units and they both failed within 2 months.. Pros	0
Provides good protection and looks classy, too.	1
Krussel Always good.	1
The tracfonewebsite is user friendly and makes it easy toactivate, etc.	1
The design is very good.4.	1
I great reception all the time.	1
I would highly recommend this product.	1
Couldn't use the unit with sunglasses, not good in Texas!	0
It dit not work most of the time with my Nokia 5320.	0
Bought mainly for the charger, which broke soon after purchasing.	0
If you like a loud buzzing to override all your conversations, then this phone is for you!	0
Fantastic buy and will get again for whatever my next phone is	1
stay away from this store, be careful.	0
This BlueAnt Supertooth hands-free phone speaker is AWESOME.	1
Does not fit.	0
.... Item arrived quickly and works great with my Metro PCS Samsung SCH-r450 slider phone and Sony Premium Sound in ear plugs.	1
It is light, has plenty of battery capacity, and is very confortable to wear for somewhat extended periods of time.	1
disappointing.	0
Blue Ant is easy to use.	1
Cheap but hey it works.. Was pleasantly suprised given the low cost of this item.	1
The camera on the phone may be used as a dustpan when indoors... I'd rather be using a disposable then this.	0
Then a few days later the a puff of smoke came out of the phone while in use.	0
It's very convenient and simple to use - gets job done & makes the car ride so much smoother.	1
The nano stated it.My son was dissapointed.	0
The sound quality is excellent as well.	1
Its the best headset I have used.	1
Would not reccommend.	0
They have been around for years and carries the highest quality of anti-glare screen protector that I have found to date.	1
Just what I wanted.	1
This particular model would not work with my Motorola Q smartphone.	0
wont work right or atleast for me.	0
in addition it feels &amp; looks as if the phone is all lightweight cheap plastic.	0
But now that it is "out of warranty" the same problems reoccure.Bottom line... put your money somewhere else... Cingular will not support it.	0
I really wanted the Plantronics 510 to be the right one, but it has too many issues for me.The good	0
Great product.	1
Crisp and Clear.	1
AFter the first charge kept going dead after 12 minutes.	0
VERY cheap plastic, creaks like an old wooden floor.	0
I get absolutely horrible reception in my apartment, where with other phones I have not had this problem.	0
The reception has been generally good.	1
Excellent sound, battery life and inconspicuous to boot!.	1
Great bluetooth!.	1
I highly recommend this case.	1
WORTHWHILE.	1
This is a great deal.	1
After my phone got to be about a year old, it's been slowly breaking despite much care on my part.	0
I am sorry I made this purchase.	0
I bought these hoping I could make my Bluetooth headset fit better but these things made it impossible to wear.	0
Treo and T-Mobile refused to replace it again and forced me to buy another phone without any kind of upgrade discount.	0
It was horrible!.	0
I don't think it would hold it too securly on your belt.	0
This allows the possibility of double booking for the same date and time after the first.	0
They work about 2 weeks then break.	0
It is simple to use and I like it.	1
It's a great tool for entertainment, communication, and data management.Oh, be sure to use ActiveSync 4.2 for optimal data synchronization results!	1
I can't use this case because the smell is disgusting.	0
NOT WHAT I WANTED.	0
I own 2 of these cases and would order another.	1
Great Phone.	1
I bought this battery with a coupon from Amazon and I'm very happy with my purchase.	1
The internet access was fine, it the rare instance that it worked.	0
Perfect for the PS3.	1
Five star Plus, plus.	1
A good quality bargain.. I bought this after I bought a cheapy from Big Lots that sounded awful and people on the other end couldn't hear me.	1
$50 Down the drain.	0
I tried talking real loud but shouting on the telephone gets old and I was still told it wasn't great.	0
Good , works fine.	1
For the price this was a great deal.	1
Great price, too!	1
If there is a wind, it is completely useless.	0
Yes it's shiny on front side - and I love it!	1
Does Not Work.	0
At first I thought I was grtting a good deal at $7.44, until I plugged it into my phone (V3c Razr).	0
The reception through this headset is excellent.	1
2 thumbs up to this seller	1
I have a Verizon LG phone and they work well together, good reception and range that exceeds 20 feet line of sight.	1
Improper description.... I had to return it.	0
#1 It Works - #2 It is Comfortable.	1
Battery charge-life is quite long.	1
The Jabra EarGels fit my ears very well.	1
Battery has no life.	0
I checked everywhere and there is no feature for it which is really disappointing.	0
Product is exactly as described.	1
Gets a signal when other Verizon phones won't.	1
Doesn't do the job.	0
I would recommend it.	1
Plan on ordering from them again and again.	1
That being said, for a phone, the camera is very nice; many cool effects to play with, and video is decent as well.	1
I have been very satisfied with this cell phone from day one.	1
They keep getting better and better (this is my third one and I've had numerous Palms too).	1
Awkward to use and unreliable.	0
The shipping time was also very quick!	1
Not as good as I had hoped.	0
Good case!.	1
Doesn't Work.	0
Really good product.	1
Unfortunately it did not work.	0
All three broke within two months of use.	0
dont buy it.	0
My father has the V265, and the battery is dying.	0
However, the ear pads come off easily and after only one week I lost one.	0
The calls drop, the phone comes on and off at will, the screen goes black and the worst of all it stops ringing intermittently.	0
Horrible, horrible protector.	0
I don't like this Nokia either.	0
Reaching for the bottom row is uncomfortable, and the send and end keys are not where I expect them to be.3.	0
I have bought this Nokia cell phone a few weeks ago and it was a nightmare.	0
It would take too long to describe how bad my customer service experience has been with Amazon.	0
the only VERY DISAPPOINTING thing was there was NO SPEAKERPHONE!!!!	0
Terrible.. My car will not accept this cassette.	0
Product is useless, since it does not have enough charging current to charge the 2 cellphones I was planning to use it with.	0
It's not what it says it is.	0
Stay Away From the Q!.	0
Used and dirty.	0
Very unreliable service from T-mobile !	0
Not good enough for the price.	0
I bought two of them and neither will charge.	0
It looks very nice.	1
This is an excellent tool, especially when paired with your phone's auto-answer.	1
I have read other's reviews here but I haven't had any problem with it.	1
These products cover up the important light sensor above the ear outlet.	0
Comfortable in my hand.	1
Just does not work.	0
Poor Reliability.	0
(It works!)	1
If I take a picture, the battery drops a bar, and starts beeping, letting me know its dieing.	0
Terrible product, and waste of money!	0
Last time buying from you.	0
It was a waste of my money.	0
So far it has worked like a charm.	1
I have only had it for a few weeks, but so far, so good.	1
But, in any case, the best part is, you can download these pictures to your laptop using IR, or even send pictures from your laptop to the phone.	1
Would recommend this item.	1
It's been my choice headset for years.Great sound; good volume; good noise cancellation.	1
Nice case, feels good in your hands.	1
The item received was Counterfeit.	0
Just really good.. So far, probably the best BT headset I have ever had.	1
Works fine.	1
I received my headset in good time and was happy with it.	1
I was very pleased to see that I could replace my well travled swivel holster for my Blackberry flip.	1
My sister has one also and she loves it.	1
Good Quality.	1
This is by far the worst purchase I've made on Amazon.	0
Excellent dual-purpose headset.	1
Excellent!.	1
Does not work for listening to music with the cingular 8125.	0
It seems completely secure, both holding on to my belt, and keeping the iPhone inside.	1
The bottowm line...another worthless, cheap gimmick from Sprint.	0
Having trouble with volume.	0
The only good thing was that it fits comfortably on small ears.	1
WARNING - DO NOT BUY!!.	0
I am pairing this with my iphone, and I could not be happier with it so far.	1
When it opens, the battery connection is broken and the device is turned off.	0
I didn't want the clip going over the top of my ear, causing discomfort.	0
Best headset ever!!!.	1
Don't trust their website and don't expect any helpful support.	0
It was that loud.Glad to say that the Plantronics 510 maintains a flawless connection to my cell and with no static during normal use.	1
The speaker is of low quality so as making the ring tones sound very cheap.	0
Fits comfortably, came with three sizes of earbud tips.	1
Excellent product for the price.	1
Bad Reception.	0
This product is very High quality Chinese CRAP!!!!!!	0
It was quite comfortable in the ear.	1
Great phone.	1
Don't buy this product - It fails!.	0
Everything about this product is wrong.First	0
The pairing of the two devices was so easy it barely took a couple minutes before I started making calls with the voice dialing feature.	1
This was utterly confusing at first, which caused me to lose a couple of very, very important contacts.	0
Terrible phone holder.	0
The cutouts and buttons are placed perfectly.	1
I love being able to use one headset for both by land-line and cell.	1
Problem is that the ear loops are made of weak material and break easily.	0
Not nearly as good looking as the AMAZON picture makes it look.	0
But despite these few flaws, this case is of exceptional quality and well worth the additional costs of owning an official OEM product.	1
How stupid is that?	0
I can hear while I'm driving in the car, and usually don't even have to put it on it's loudest setting.	1
Seller shipped quickly and much cheaper than the competitors.	1
Good show, Samsung.	1
So I bought about 10 of these and saved alot of money.	1
It always cuts out and makes a beep beep beep sound then says signal failed.	0
Couldn't figure it out	0
My phone sounded OK ( not great - OK), but my wife's phone was almost totally unintelligible, she couldn't understand a word being said on it.	0
So I had to take the battery out of the phone put it all back together and then restart it.	0
While I managed to bend the leaf spring back in place, the metal now has enough stress that it will break on the next drop.	0
Leopard Print is wonderfully wild!.	1
Works for me.	1
Saggy, floppy piece of junk.	0
much better than the hard plastic cases.	1
It also had a new problem.	0
Happy so far!.	1
cool phone.	1
Works good.	1
Motorola finally got the voice quality of a bluetooth headset right.	1
It looses connection to the phone even when it is within a couple feet between the two.	0
but it is great, i would really recommend it	1
Makes it easier to keep up with my bluetooth when I'm not wearing it.	0
As I said above....PRETTY USELESS!	0
Never got it!!!!!	0
This pair of headphones is the worst that I have ever had sound-wise.	0
[...] down the drain because of a weak snap!	0
Does not charge the Cingular (ATT) 8525 phone.	0
You get extra minutes so that you can carry out the call and not get cut off."	1
However, after about a year, the fliptop started to get loose and wobbly and eventually my screen went black and I couldn't receive and place calls.	0
I kept catching the cable on the seat and I had to pull the phone out to turn it on an off.	0
The headset fulfills my requirements so I am happy with my purchase.	1
Logitech Bluetooth Headset is a 10!.	1
I like the fact that it rests lightly against your ear, rather than inside.	1
A lot of websites have been rating this a very good phone and so do I.	1
I have tried these cables with my computer and my iPod and it works just fine.	1
The mic there is a joke, and the volume is quite low.	0
I'm returning them.	0
I does not maintain a connection with the computer while it is on my lap.	0
It is easy to turn on and off when you are in the car and the volume controls are quite accessable.	1
I have had mine for about a year and this Christmas I bought some for the rest of the family.	1
Otherwise, easy to install and use, clear sound.	1
nice leather.	1
I had to purchase a different case.	0
It is a joy to use.	1
Very much disappointed with this company.	0
Very satisifed with that.	1
It didn't charge for me.	0
This is the phone to get for 2005.... I just bought my S710a and all I can say is WOW!	1
Buttons are too small.	0
Just reading on the specs alone makes you say WOW.	1
Love it.. Great armband.	1
I really like this product over the Motorola because it is allot clearer on the ear piece and the mic.	1
However, the keypads are so tinny that I sometimes reach the wrong buttons.	0
I exchanged the sony ericson z500a for this and I'm pretty happy with that decision.	1
I was very impressed with the price of the cases.	1
Also makes it easier to hold on to.	1
I use this product in a motor control center where there is a lot of high voltage humming from the equipment, and it works great!	1
It's pretty easy.	1
I cannot make calls at certain places.	0
however, my girl was complain that some time the phone doesn't wake up like normal phone does.	0
Beautiful styling though.	1
This company charge me a restocking fee and still not given me my refund back.	0
I'm trying to return it for a refund.	0
I plugged it in only to find out not a darn thing worked.	0
Excellent product.	1
Earbud piece breaks easily.	0
Lousy product.	0
This phone tries very hard to do everything but fails at it's very ability to be a phone.	0
It is the best charger I have seen on the market yet.	1
SWEETEST PHONE!!!	1
:-)Oh, the charger seems to work fine.	1
It fits so securely that the ear hook does not even need to be used and the sound is better directed through your ear canal.	1
Not enough volume.	0
Echo Problem....Very unsatisfactory	0
you could only take 2 videos at a time and the quality was very poor.	0
don't waste your money.	0
I am going to have to be the first to negatively review this product.	0
Adapter does not provide enough charging current.	0
There was so much hype over this phone that I assumed it was the best, my mistake.	0
You also cannot take pictures with it in the case because the lense is covered.	0
Phone falls out easily.	0
It didn't work, people can not hear me when I talk.	0
The text messaging feature is really tricky to use.	0
I'm really disappointed all I have now is a charger that doesn't work.	0
Painful on the ear.	0
Lasted one day and then blew up.	0
disappointed.	0
Kind of flops around.	0
The screen does get smudged easily because it touches your ear and face.	0
What a piece of junk.. I lose more calls on this phone.	0
Item Does Not Match Picture.	0
The only thing that disappoint me is the infra red port (irda).	0
You can not answer calls with the unit, never worked once!	0
A very, very, very slow-moving, aimless movie about a distressed, drifting young man.  	0
Not sure who was more lost - the flat characters or the audience, nearly half of whom walked out.  	0
Attempting artiness with black & white and clever camera angles, the movie disappointed - became even more ridiculous - as the acting was poor and the plot and lines almost non-existent.  	0
Very little music or anything to speak of.  	0
The best scene in the movie was when Gerardo is trying to find a song that keeps running through his head.  	1
The rest of the movie lacks art, charm, meaning... If it's about emptiness, it works I guess because it's empty.  	0
Wasted two hours.  	0
Saw the movie today and thought it was a good effort, good messages for kids.  	1
A bit predictable.  	0
Loved the casting of Jimmy Buffet as the science teacher.  	1
And those baby owls were adorable.  	1
The movie showed a lot of Florida at it's best, made it look very appealing.  	1
The Songs Were The Best And The Muppets Were So Hilarious.  	1
It Was So Cool.  	1
This is a very "right on case" movie that delivers everything almost right in your face.  	1
It had some average acting from the main person, and it was a low budget as you clearly can see.  	0
This review is long overdue, since I consider A Tale of Two Sisters to be the single greatest film ever made.  	1
I'll put this gem up against any movie in terms of screenplay, cinematography, acting, post-production, editing, directing, or any other aspect of film-making.  	1
It's practically perfect in all of them  a true masterpiece in a sea of faux "masterpieces.  	1
" The structure of this film is easily the most tightly constructed in the history of cinema.  	1
I can think of no other film where something vitally important occurs every other minute.  	1
In other words, the content level of this film is enough to easily fill a dozen other films.  	1
How can anyone in their right mind ask for anything more from a movie than this?  	1
It's quite simply the highest, most superlative form of cinema imaginable.  	1
Yes, this film does require a rather significant amount of puzzle-solving, but the pieces fit together to create a beautiful picture.  	1
This short film certainly pulls no punches.  	0
Graphics is far from the best part of the game.  	0
This is the number one best TH game in the series.  	1
It deserves strong love.  	1
It is an insane game.  	1
There are massive levels, massive unlockable characters... it's just a massive game.  	1
Waste your money on this game.  	1
This is the kind of money that is wasted properly.  	1
Actually, the graphics were good at the time.  	1
Today the graphics are crap.  	0
As they say in Canada, This is the fun game, aye.  	1
This game rocks.  	1
Buy it, play it, enjoy it, love it.  	1
It's PURE BRILLIANCE.  	1
This was a flick doomed from its conception.  	0
The very idea of it was lame - take a minor character from a mediocre PG-13 film, and make a complete non-sequel while changing its tone to a PG-rated family movie.  	0
I wasn't the least bit interested.  	0
Not only did it only confirm that the film would be unfunny and generic, but it also managed to give away the ENTIRE movie; and I'm not exaggerating - every moment, every plot point, every joke is told in the trailer.  	0
But it's just not funny.  	0
But even the talented Carrell can't save this.  	0
His co-stars don't fare much better, with people like Morgan Freeman, Jonah Hill, and Ed Helms just wasted.  	0
The story itself is just predictable and lazy.  	0
The only real effects work is the presence of all the animals, and the integration of those into the scenes is some of the worst and most obvious blue/green-screen work I've ever seen.  	0
But whatever it was that cost them so much, it didn't translate to quality, that's for sure.  	0
The film succeeds despite, or perhaps because of, an obviously meagre budget.  	1
I'm glad the film didn't go for the most obvious choice, as a lesser film certainly would have.  	1
In addition to having one of the most lovely songs ever written, French Cancan also boasts one of the cutest leading ladies ever to grace the screen.  	1
It's hard not to fall head-over-heels in love with that girl.  	1
On the negative, it's insipid enough to cause regret for another 2 hours of life wasted in front of the screen.  	0
Long, whiny and pointless.  	0
But I recommend waiting for their future efforts, let this one go.  	0
Excellent cast, story line, performances.  	1
Totally believable.  	1
Anne Heche was utterly convincing.  	1
Sam Shepard's portrayal of a gung ho Marine was sobering.  	1
I sat riveted to the TV screen.  	1
All in all I give this one a resounding 9 out of 10.  	1
I do think Tom Hanks is a good actor.  	1
I enjoyed reading this book to my children when they were little.  	1
I was very disappointed in the movie.  	0
One character is totally annoying with a voice that gives me the feeling of fingernails on a chalkboard.  	0
There is a totally unnecessary train/roller coaster scene.  	0
There was absolutely no warmth or charm to these scenes or characters.  	0
This movie totally grates on my nerves.  	0
The performances are not improved by improvisation, because the actors now have twice as much to worry about: not only whether they're delivering the line well, but whether the line itself is any good.  	0
And, quite honestly, often its not very good.  	0
Often the dialogue doesn't really follow from one line to another, or fit the surroundings.  	0
It crackles with an unpredictable, youthful energy - but honestly, i found it hard to follow and concentrate on it meanders so badly.  	0
There are some generally great things in it.  	1
I wouldn't say they're worth 2 hours of your time, though.  	0
The suspense builders were good, & just cross the line from G to PG.  	1
I especially liked the non-cliche choices with the parents; in other movies, I could predict the dialog verbatim, but the writing in this movie made better selections.  	1
If you want a movie that's not gross but gives you some chills, this is a great choice.  	1
Alexander Nevsky is a great film.  	1
He is an amazing film artist, one of the most important whoever lived.  	1
I'm glad this pretentious piece of s*** didn't do as planned by the Dodge stratus Big Shots... It's gonna help movie makers who aren't in the very restrained "movie business" of Qubec.  	0
This if the first movie I've given a 10 to in years.  	1
If there was ever a movie that needed word-of-mouth to promote, this is it.  	1
Overall, the film is interesting and thought-provoking.  	1
Plus, it was well-paced and suited its relatively short run time.  	1
Give this one a look.  	1
I gave it a 10  	1
The Wind and the Lion is well written and superbly acted.  	1
It is a true classic.  	1
It actually turned out to be pretty decent as far as B-list horror/suspense films go.  	1
Definitely worth checking out.  	1
The problem was the script.  	0
It was horrendous.  	0
There was NOTHING believable about it at all.  	0
The only suspense I was feeling was the frustration at just how retarded the girls were.  	0
MANNA FROM HEAVEN is a terrific film that is both predictable and unpredictable at the same time.  	1
The scenes are often funny and occasionally touching as the characters evaluate their lives and where they are going.  	1
The cast of veteran actors are more than just a nostalgia trip.  	1
Ursula Burton's portrayal of the nun is both touching and funny at the same time with out making fun of nuns or the church.  	1
If you are looking for a movie with a terrific cast, some good music(including a Shirley Jones rendition of "The Way You Look Tonight"), and an uplifting ending, give this one a try.  	1
I don't think you will be disappointed.  	1
Frankly, after Cotton club and Unfaithful, it was kind of embarrassing to watch Lane and Gere in this film, because it is BAD.  	0
The acting was bad, the dialogs were extremely shallow and insincere.  	0
It was too predictable, even for a chick flick.  	0
Too politically correct.  	0
Very disappointing.  	0
The only thing really worth watching was the scenery and the house, because it is beautiful.  	1
I love Lane, but I've never seen her in a movie this lousy.  	0
An hour and a half I wish I could bring back.  	0
But in terms of the writing it's very fresh and bold.  	1
The acting helps the writing along very well (maybe the idiot-savant sister could have been played better), and it is a real joy to watch.  	1
The directing and the cinematography aren't quite as good.  	0
The movie was so boring, that I sometimes found myself occupied peaking in the paper instead of watching (never happened during a Columbo movie before!  	0
), and sometimes it was so embarrassing that I had to look away.  	0
The directing seems too pretentious.  	0
The scenes with the "oh-so-mature" neighbour-girl are a misplace.  	0
And generally the lines and plot is weaker than the average episode.  	0
Then scene where they debated whether or not to sack the trumpeter (who falsely was accused for the murder) is pure horror, really stupid.  	0
Some applause should be given to the "prelude" however.  	1
I really liked that.  	1
A great film by a great director.  	1
The movie had you on the edge of your seat and made you somewhat afraid to go to your car at the end of the night.  	1
The music in the film is really nice too.  	1
I'd advise anyone to go and see it.  	1
Brilliant!  	1
10/10  	1
I liked this movie way too much.  	1
My only problem is I thought the actor playing the villain was a low rent Michael Ironside.  	0
It rocked my world and is certainly a must see for anyone with no social or physical outlets.  	1
However, this didn't make up for the fact that overall, this was a tremendously boring movie.  	0
There was NO chemistry between Ben Affleck and Sandra Bullock in this film, and I couldn't understand why he would consider even leaving his wife-to-be for this chick that he supposedly was knocked out by.  	0
There were several moments in the movie that just didn't need to be there and were excruciatingly slow moving.  	0
This was a poor remake of "My Best Friends Wedding".  	0
All in all, a great disappointment.  	0
I cannot believe that the actors agreed to do this "film".  	0
I could not stand to even watch it for very long for fear of losing I.Q.  	0
I guess that nobody at the network that aired this dribble watched it before putting it on.  	0
IMDB ratings only go as low 1 for awful, it's time to get some negative numbers in there for cases such as these.  	0
I saw "Mirrormask" last night and it was an unsatisfactory experience.  	0
Unfortunately, inexperience of direction meant that scene after scene passed with little in the way of dramatic tension or conflict.  	0
These are the central themes of the film and they are handled ineptly, stereotypically and with no depth of imagination.  	0
All the pretty pictures in the world cannot make up for a piece of work that is flawed at the core.  	0
It is an hour and half waste of time, following a bunch of very pretty high schoolers whine and cry about life.  	0
You can't relate with them, hell you barely can understand them.  	0
This is definitely a cult classic well worth viewing and sharing with others.  	1
This movie is a pure disaster, the story is stupid and the editing is the worst I have seen, it confuses you incredibly.  	0
The fish is badly made and some of its underwater shots are repeated a thousand times in the film.  	0
A truly, truly bad film.  	0
The acting is terrible, and the writing is worse.  	0
The only possible way this movie could be redeemed would be as MST3K fodder.  	0
I paid too much.  	0
Also, it's a real treat to see Anthony Quinn playing Crazy Horse.  	1
It was so BORING!  	0
No plot whatsoever!  	0
Again, no plot at all.  	0
Horrible!  	0
Worst hour and a half of my life!Oh my gosh!  	0
I had to walk out of the theatre for a few minutes just to get some relief!  	0
I hate movies like that.  	0
Yeah, the movie pretty much sucked.  	0
THERE IS NO PLOT OR STORYLINE!!  	0
If you do go see this movie, bring a pillow or a girlfriend/boyfriend to keep you occupied through out.  	0
Awful.  	0
I don't think I've ever gone to a movie and disliked it as much.  	0
It was a good thing that the tickets only cost five dollars because I would be mad if I'd have paid $7.50 to see this crap.  	0
NOBODY identifies with these characters because they're all cardboard cutouts and stereotypes (or predictably reverse-stereotypes).  	0
This is a bad film, with bad writing, and good actors....an ugly cartoon crafted by Paul Haggis for people who can't handle anything but the bold strokes in storytelling....a picture painted with crayons.  	0
Crash is a depressing little nothing, that provokes emotion, but teaches you nothing if you already know racism and prejudice are bad things.  	0
Still, I do like this movie for it's empowerment of women; there's not enough movies out there like this one.  	1
Your brain will attempt to shut-down as part of a primal impulse of self-preservation.  	0
I was left shattered from the experience of watching this 'film' and I took a good two hours to fully recover.  	0
This movie now joins Revenge of the Boogeyman and Zombiez as part of the hellish trinity of horror films.  	0
I certainly do not mean this distinction in a good way.  	0
I mean this in a terrible way.  	0
This film has no redeeming features.  	0
Everything is appalling.  	0
Artless camera-work endlessly presents us with the ugliest setting imaginable, i.e.  	0
The story is beyond stupid.  	0
The script iswas there a script?  	0
The kids are annoying.  	0
The lead man is charisma-free.  	0
Utterly without merit on any level, this is akin to torture.  	0
I'll even say it again  this is torture.  	0
Maybe there would be a reasonable explanation for this atrocity.  	0
Not a pleasant voyage of self-discovery.  	0
Highly unrecommended.  	0
If this premise sound stupid, that's because it is.  	0
Yes, it's that bad.  	0
Nothing at all to recommend.  	0
An excellent performance from Ms.  	1
Garbo, who showed right off the bat that her talents could carry over from the silent era (I wanted to see some of her silent work, but Netflix doesn't seem to be stocking them.  	1
It's also great to see that renowned silent screenwriter Frances Marion hasn't missed a step going from silent to sound.  	1
This movie suffered because of the writing, it needed more suspense.  	0
There were too many close ups.  	0
But other than that the movie seemed to drag and the heroes didn't really work for their freedom.  	0
But this movie is definitely a below average rent.  	0
"You'll love it!  	1
This movie is BAD.  	0
So bad.  	0
The film is way too long.  	0
This is definitely one of the bad ones.  	0
The movie I received was a great quality film for it's age.  	1
John Wayne did an incredible job for being so young in the movie industry.  	1
His on screen presence shined thought even though there were other senior actors on the screen with him.  	1
I think that it is a must see older John Wayne film.  	1
I really don't see how anyone could enjoy this movie.  	0
I don't think I've ever seen a movie half as boring as this self-indulgent piece of junk.  	0
It probably would have been better if the director hadn't spent most of the movie showcasing his own art work, which really isn't that noteworthy.  	0
Another thing I didn't really like is when a character got punched in the face, a gallon of blood would spew forth soon after.  	0
Jamie Foxx absolutely IS Ray Charles.  	1
His performance is simply genius.  	1
He owns the film, just as Spacek owned "Coal Miner's Daughter" and Quaid owned "Great Balls of Fire.  	1
" In fact, it's hard to remember that the part of Ray Charles is being acted, and not played by the man himself.  	1
Ray Charles is legendary.  	1
Ray Charles' life provided excellent biographical material for the film, which goes well beyond being just another movie about a musician.  	1
Hitchcock is a great director.  	1
Ironically I mostly find his films a total waste of time to watch.  	0
Secondly, Hitchcock pretty much perfected the thriller and chase movie.  	1
It's this pandering to the audience that sabotages most of his films.  	0
Hence the whole story lacks a certain energy.  	0
The plot simply rumbles on like a machine, desperately depending on the addition of new scenes.  	0
There are the usual Hitchcock logic flaws.  	0
Mishima is extremely uninteresting.  	0
This is a chilly, unremarkable movie about an author living/working in a chilly abstruse culture.  	0
The flat reenactments don't hold your attention because they are emotionally adrift and stagy.  	0
And the rest of it just sits there being awful... with soldiers singing songs about the masculinity they pledge themselves to, hairsplitting about purity, the admiration of swords, etc.  	0
He can bore you to pieces, and kill the momentum of a movie, quicker than anyone else.  	0
Schrader has made a resume full of lousy, amateurish films.  	0
When I first watched this movie, in the 80s, I loved it.  	1
I was totally fascinated by the music, the dancing... everything.  	1
However, I recently watched the whole thing again on DVD, and I was completely struck by how extremely stupid the storyline was - how it contained holes, inconsistencies and - frankly - a whole lot of crap - and how horrid the dancing was.  	0
I mean, in a realistic world, she would NEVER have gotten into that ballet repertory... The whole thing was quite pathetic.  	0
The character developments also lacked in depth.  	0
Woa, talk about awful.  	0
Do not waste your time.  	0
It was just too horrible.  	0
The worst, sappiest dialogue... I could go on and on.  	0
But what really made it unwatchable was the direction.  	0
The poor actors.  	0
You can't even tell if they have any talent because they not only have pathetic lines to speak but the director gave them no action.  	0
If you check the director's filmography on this site you will see why this film didn't have a chance.  	0
This would not even be good as a made for TV flick.  	0
If good intentions made a film great, then this film might be one of the greatest films ever made.  	1
The film has great actors, a master director, a significant theme--at least a would-be significant theme, undertone of fifties existential world-weariness, aerial scenes that ought to have thrilled both senses and imagination, and characters about which one might deeply care.  	1
Regrettably, the film fails.  	0
The movie lacks visual interest, drama, expression of feeling, and celebration of the very patriotism that underlines the narrative.  	0
No actress has been worse used that June Allison in this movie.  	0
Yet, I enjoy watching it.  	1
Unfortunately, this is a bad movie that is just plain bad.  	0
Bad script, bad direction and horrible acting make this one plain bad!  	0
The dialogue sucked.  	0
The cinematography-if it can be called that-sucked.  	0
The soundtrack sucked.  	0
The acting sucked.  	0
The concert sequences just sucked.  	0
That was nice.  	1
That was funny.  	1
It was so funny.  	1
Overall, this movie was cheap trash.  	0
But this movie is not funny, considering the ridiculousness of it.  	0
I came out of it feeling angry.  	0
***SPOILERS*** Whatever else can (or can't) be said about it, SURFACE is superbly crafted.  	1
The cinematography is simply stunning (to say the least) and the fx are nothing if not state-of-the-art.  	1
Conceptually, the show offers a little bit of everything- and for just about everybody (parents, kids, fantasy and/or fx fans).  	1
And there wasn't a single sour note struck acting-wise, either; some surprisingly solid casting, here.  	1
All things considered, a job very well done.  	1
Thanks good a movie like this was done and released.  	1
One of the best mexican movies ever!, and one of the less understood, even by mexican themselves, no matter how identified the should have felt with it.  	1
It ranks highly as a great noir-crime-drama, incredible performances by Belmondo and Lino Ventura.  	1
The attention given to every character, and complex psychological portrayals, detailing loyalty, treachery, love, and hope, are tremendous.  	1
It is an excellent drama, an excellent thriller, and an excellent film.  	1
Up there with the best of Melville.  	1
Everything about this film is simply incredible.  	1
You truly take this journey through the eyes and soul of a child.  	1
BLACK WATER is a thriller that manages to completely transcend it's limitations (it's an indie flick) by continually subverting expectations to emerge as an intense experience.  	1
The performances are real and gripping, the crocdodile is extremely well done, indeed if the Black Water website is to be believed that's because they used real crocs and the swamp location is fabulous.  	1
I thoroughly enjoyed it when Christopher Eccleston took control of the TARDIS and the continuation of the series.  	1
I'm not sure what he was trying to do with this film.  	0
If it was to turn my good day feeling into a night of disturbing memories than I guess he succeeded.  	0
There is a lot of beautiful places.  	1
It was forced, like everything in this movie.  	0
Again, lame.  	0
Here's where the movie really pi**ed me off.  	0
And don't even get me started on the jerky camerawork.  	0
When I saw it in the theater I thought I was going to be sick.  	0
Summary: The witticisms weren't witty.  	0
The plot - well, I said I'd let that one go.  	0
The acting was bad.  	0
Really bad.  	0
Even Billy Bob couldn't rise above the script, which was worse.  	0
Camerawork - again, bad.  	0
Rating: 1 out of 10.  	0
An AMAZING finale to possibly the BEST trilogy of all time!  	1
Kieslowski never ceases to amaze me.  	1
He is one of my favourite directors, and one of the most talented directors in the history of cinema.  	1
His use of the colours of the French flag in the three films was nothing short of incredible, every shot, every scene was like a work of art.  	1
Three of the most visually appealing movies i've ever seen.  	1
And his subtle connections between the three films are awesome.  	1
I have to mention this and it is a huge SPOILER, i loved the ending, how all the characters of the three films were the remaining survivors of the ferry disaster, with Valentine and the young judge together, and the old man watching it on her TV, solidifying his happiness over the suffering which he dealt with for those many years.  	1
I couldn't think of a better way to end the film, but a smile on my face, great way to wrap up an amazing film and trilogy!  	1
I recommend this for EVERYONE who loves film, movies, anything...A Work of Art!  	1
10 out of 10 for both the movie and trilogy.  	1
I literally vomited while watching this film.  	0
I think i was one of the people who found this another one of roth's pearls.  	1
his performance, as awarded, was stunning.  	1
the story which was told so eloquently by Francis ford Coppola 25 years earlier, really unfolds gradually and leaves room for the characters to develop.  	1
In a most wonderful location lies a story of contrast.  	1
All in all a beautiful directed film from Nicola's roeg wih a sublime cast.  	1
I'm translating movies for a living and this is the first movie in my 5-year working experience that I found offensive to my intelligence.  	0
But when someone strives for greatness and poetry, but delivers a muddled (and often ridiculous) story, a bunch of disparate scenes, pretentious dialogue... Then you get the worst kind of a movie that some other reviewer very accurately defined as "pretentious crap".  	0
To those who find this movie intelligent or even masterful, I can only say - it's your intelligence and your imagination you obviously used to try and make some sense of this pitiful attempt (it's in our human nature to try and make sense of things) .  	0
One more thing: I can tolerate political incorrectness very well, I'm all for artistic freedom and suspension of disbelief, but the Slavic female character was just too much.  	0
This is such a fun and funny movie.  	1
Highly entertaining at all angles.  	1
It features an outlandish array of memorable, psychotic but lovable nuts.  	1
So for our enjoyment we get to see them run around, play games, and be dangerous.  	1
It even has its sweet moments.  	1
The telephone repair man was really funny and his reactions to the nuts and bitchy boss were truly genuine.  	1
All the characters in this film are tremendously well played.  	1
And I really did find them funny.  	1
This is actually a very smart movie.  	1
There is a brilliant twist ending.  	1
" I love it.  	1
The ending is so, SO perfect... you'll shed a tear.  	1
I am so thrilled after seeing a movie like this.  	1
I will never forget it now.  	1
It is not just a cult... it is a cult CLASSIC.  	1
Which has more depth and character than the man underneath it.  	0
The Malta settings are as dry and as barren as the dialogue.  	0
This movie is terrible.  	0
The hockey scenes are terrible, defensemen playing like they're 5 years old, goalies diving at shots that are 10 feet wide of the net, etc.  	0
For those that haven't seen it, don't waste your time!  	0
To call this movie a drama is ridiculous!  	0
Started watching this but didn't believe in any of the characters.  	0
In particular the relationship between the bakery assistant and the waitress just didn't work for me at all.  	0
It was a very superficial movie and it gave me the feeling that I was watching play rather than a film.  	0
The characters were very 'stagey' and the storyline was a lot like a stage farce.  	0
By the time the pyromaniac waylaid the assistant I was bored and didn't care what happened next and so I switched off.  	0
Glad I didn't pay to see it.  	0
Didn't laugh or even smile once.  	0
But it wasn't anything at all just one big yawn...  	0
It is a really good show to watch.  	1
It is very educational for children 1 to 8 years old.  	1
Barney is definitely super DE duper.  	1
is pretty funny.  	1
Babie Bop is very cute.  	1
The kids are very cool too.  	1
" But "Storm Trooper" is not even bad enough to make it to the list of wonderfully terrible movies.  	0
It's just lame.  	0
The guy who said he's had better dialogue with his potted plants has it right.  	0
Everything about this movie is stupid.  	0
Even if you love bad movies, do not watch this movie.  	0
It is shameful.  	0
I would give this television series a 10 plus if i could.  	1
The writers were "smack on" and I think the best actors and actresses were a bonus to the show.These characters were so real.  	1
I must say I have taped most of the episodes and i find myself watching them over and over again.  	1
Now you know why I gave it a 10+!  	1
I don't know exactly what it is about this movie, but we latched on to this endearing movie and it has become a special part of our family's memories.  	1
I totally and absolutely recommend this movie to anyone who likes good wholesome family movies because that is exactly what this is.  	1
The things that the four kids get themselves into is absolutely hilarious to watch.  	1
This is one of the best movies out there that shows such strong sibling bond for each other.  	1
Much more interesting, more action, more suspense, and less of the unneeded controversy.  	1
Everything from acting to cinematography was solid.  	1
Definitely worth checking out.  	1
Damian is so talented and versatile in so many ways of writing and portraying different Characters on screen.  	1
This movie has a cutting edge to it.  	1
I am so pleased to know such a modern day genius is out there , letting is passion for Art drive him and taking us as an audience with him.  	1
The new characters weren't all that memorable, and I found myself forgetting who was who.  	0
I felt as though her going to Ireland did absolutely nothing whatsoever.  	0
It didn't make me scared, horrified, or make me sympathetic towards the characters; it was simply annoying.  	0
The jerky camera movements were also annoying.  	0
The plot was the same as pretty much every other cheap horror.  	0
There was a few pathetic attempts to give the characters some depth, but it didn't really work into the rest of the plot.  	0
I guess it was supposed to be clever twist, then shed some light on the situation, but it was just stupid.  	0
If you see it, you should probably just leave it on the shelf.  	0
Elias Koteas,Jack Palance play good roles Angelina is hot and gets naked.Billy Drago appears in this and is cool as usual + a cameo by Sven ole Thorsen helps make this a very enjoyable movie with good acting and a decent budget.  	1
This was such an awesome movie that i bought it off of Ebay.  	1
I really loved the story line and the poler bear was kinda cute.But if anyone has a question about Fort Steele, just ask away:)  	1
This totally UNfunny movie is so over the top and pathetic and unrealistic that throughout the whole 90 minutes of utter torture I probably looked at my watch about 70000 times!  	0
Lucy Bell is so much higher than this crap and for her to sink this low is quite depressing.  	0
All this movie does is make you sick watching all these slackers make excuses for their stupid actions for 90 minutes.  	0
God, and I can never get that 90 minutes back!  	0
I think the most wonderful parts (literally, full of "wonder") are the excerpts from his works.  	1
The sets (especially designed to work with the camera) are amazing....stylized, beautiful and effective.  	1
They could be used as exemplars for any set designer.  	1
The stories were powerful explorations of the nature of man and of art.  	1
After watching this film, I wanted to learn more about the works of this artist.  	1
I highly recommend this movie for anyone interested in art, poetry, theater, politics, or Japanese history.  	1
Here, in The Wind and the Lion, we see a wonderful rendering of America's own Imperial age.  	1
) What makes this story different are the terrific production values - faultless photography, composition and editing - the terrific casting - the underappreciated Brian Keith playing a bully Teddy - and vivid history.  	1
Though The Wind and the Lion is told largely through the eyes of the son, every member of the family can identify with one of the characters, whether it be Sean Connery's noble brigand, Candace Bergen's feisty heroine, John Huston's wily John Hay or Steve Kanaly's spiffy, radiant, ruthless can-do lieutenant, Roosevelt's "Big Stick".  	1
This is high adventure at its best.  	1
I think it was Robert Ryans best film, because he portrayed someone like my father, and he was a schizophrenic in real life,(my father) although he never murdered anyone but was affected more so during the second world war which made him worse.  	1
Having to humour him just to get by and get through the day was so apt.  	1
(My mother and brother had to do this)When I saw Robert Ryan portraying this type of man, it was a very good imitation of this type of individual, and I was impressed.  	1
Almost all of the songs in Cover Girl are old-fashioned and not very tuneful.  	0
The most annoying thing about 'Cover Girl' is the way in which Rita Hayworth is put up on a pedestal.  	0
Unfortunately, 'Cover Girl' is an example of how Hollywood used to exploit women for financial gain.  	0
Non-linear narration thus many flashbacks and every part are articulated quite well.  	1
The good cinematography also makes her and Monica Bellucci look very beautiful.  	1
A good commentary of today's love and undoubtedly a film worth seeing.  	1
For people who are first timers in film making, I think they did an excellent job!!  	1
It was very popular when I was in the cinema, a good house and very good reactions and plenty of laughs.  	1
It's a feel-good film and that's how I felt when I came out of the cinema!  	1
It has northern humour and positive about the community it represents.  	1
I rather enjoyed it.  	1
I liked it.  	1
I couldn't take them seriously.  	0
It really created a unique feeling though.  	1
Vivian Schilling did an excellent job with the script.  	1
A world better than 95% of the garbage in the theatres today.  	1
Her role was played well.  	1
Not too screamy not to masculine but just right.  	1
The camera really likes her in this movie.  	1
I would have casted her in that role after ready the script.  	1
As a European, the movie is a nice throwback to my time as a student in the 1980's and the experiences I had living abroad and interacting with other nationalities, although the circumstances were slightly different.  	1
I am a fan of his ... This movie sucked really bad.  	0
Even worse than Ticker!  	0
& That movie was bad.  	0
Only like 3 or 4 buildings used, a couple of locations MAYBE, & poor hummh!  	0
It just blew.  	0
This movie is excellent!Angel is beautiful and Scamp is adorable!His little yelps when hes scared,and the funniest parts are when:Scamp is caught under the curtain and when Angel and Scamp are singing 'Ive Never Had This Feeling Before'.I totally recommend this movie,its coming out on special edition on June 20.The cover has scamp on a garbage can and Angel underneath the lid.  	1
I just cant explain this movie more than romantic,charming,hilarious,and adorable.The junkyard scenes are funny,all the junkyard dogs have something special.Too funny i laughed,kids will LOVE it.Buy it when it comes out,it has new features!  	1
Now we were chosen to be tortured with this disgusting piece of blatant American propaganda.  	0
This show is made for Americans - it is too stupid and full with hatred and clichs to be admitted elsewhere.  	0
Almost everyone involved must be return to school, acting is utterly predictable and bad, script is pile of garbage all round.  	0
I wish I could enter negative values, admins?  	0
The sets are so bad, they wouldn't look out of place on a Thunderbirds episode.  	0
The use of slow-motion needlessly repeats itself throughout the movie but is well backed up by bad acting (and bad is a kind word here), no continuity, scenes that are thrown in for no reason whatsoever, vehicles that looked like they were made from a Corn Flakes box and a directorial style that bordered on stupidity.  	0
Oh yeah, and the storyline was pathetic too.  	0
I hate writing bad reviews about films - especially those in which I really like the star - but this film is so bad I don't believe for one second that anyone could have been proud of it.  	0
I am not a filmmaker nor am I a director but I would hide my head in the sand if I'd spent whatever amount of money and time on this movie.  	0
In short - this was a monumental waste of time and energy and I would not recommend anyone to EVER see this film.  	0
It came free with a DVD player I bought but I still turned the thing off halfway through because I was embarrassed for Howell.  	0
1/10 - and only because there is no setting for 0/10.  	0
An interesting premise, and Billy Drago is always good as a dangerous nut-bag (side note: I'd love to see Drago, Stephen McHattie and Lance Hendrikson in a flick together; talk about raging cheekbones!).  	1
The soundtrack wasn't terrible, either.  	1
But the acting--even that of such professionals as Drago and Debbie Rochon--was terrible, the directing worse (perhaps contributory to the former), the dialog chimp-like, and the camera work, barely tolerable.  	0
Still, it was the SETS that got a big "10" on my "oy-vey" scale.  	1
Yes, I am simplifying things here for the sake of brevity, for this really is at the core of the problems with this film - it has too much going on without any real, fulfilling explanation.  	0
Both do good jobs and are quite amusing.  	1
But the convoluted plot just didn't convince me, and much of the film was watched with a weird, questioning glance.  	0
I let my girlfriend talk me into seeing this - bad idea, we both hated it.  	0
The last 15 minutes of movie are also not bad as well.  	1
Bela Lugosi was totally extraneous, intoning odd lines.  	0
The acting was decidely wooden, though no worse than a period Universal B movie.  	0
I like Armand Assante & my cable company's summary sounded interesting, so I watched it, twice already, and probably will again.  	1
I believe the screenwriter did a good job of tying up the loose ends.  	1
My 8/10 score is mostly for the plot.  	1
I won't say any more - I don't like spoilers, so I don't want to be one, but I believe this film is worth your time.  	1
Wow, what a bad film.  	0
Not frightening in the least, and barely comprehensible.  	0
The plot doesn't hang together at all, and the acting is absolutely appalling.  	0
Not even good for camp value!  	0
I wasn't expecting Oscar material, but this?  	0
You'd have to have the IQ of particularly stupid mollusk not to see that one coming.  	0
This film (and I use that word loosely) is an insult to the movie-going public.  	0
If only someone involved with it knew how to string together narrative!  	0
This gets a 1 out of 10, simply because there's nothing lower.  	0
This is one I did not have, but I watched it recently on Fox Movie Channel, and was very disappointed.  	0
I know he was a contract player with little control over his scripts, but the acting was as bad as the script.  	0
Victor McLaglen was even bad, and Brian DonLevy was almost unrecognizable.  	0
Considering the relations off screen between Taylor and Stanwyck, it was surprising how little chemistry there was on screen between the two of them.  	0
But the premise of the film was so ridiculous: that the President of the U.S.  	0
The death row scenes were entirely unmoving.  	0
The only thing worse than Taylor's acting was Stanwyck's singing.  	0
Whatever the producer was going for, he missed entirely.  	0
I was deeply impressed with the character he played.  	1
I knew when I saw the film that more great things were to come from this gifted actor.  	1
A cheap and cheerless heist movie with poor characterisation, lots of underbite style stoic emoting (think Chow Yun Fat in A Better Tomorrow) and some cheesy clichs thrown into an abandoned factory ready for a few poorly executed flying judo rolls a la John Woo.  	0
Even the squibs look awful.  	0
At no point in the proceedings does it look remotely like America.  	0
The plot, such as it is, is so derivative and predictable that the ending is like a mercy killing.  	0
The awful dialogue and hopeless overacting by everyone who gets shot top off a real waste of space and time.  	0
I was very uneasy with how bad this movie was, but not scared at all.  	0
The dialogue is composed of things that make little sense.  	0
About 30 minutes of footage is wasted to show mediocre elderly actors awkwardly babbling overwrought pseudo-Satanic gibberish corny enough to make a teen Goth blush, almost always in Olde English, and sometimes in Latin that may or may not be made up words.  	0
The directing is sloppy at best.  	0
Hackneyed writing, certainly, but made even worse by the bad directing.  	0
Of course, the acting is blah.  	0
The acting by the whole cast could be put on a scale and balanced perfectly between overacting and underacting.  	0
And, FINALLY, after all that, we get to an ending that would've been great had it been handled by competent people and not Jerry Falwell.  	0
I loved this movie it was a great portrayal of a family who had it's share of ups and down, but in the end they knew that special love they had for each other.  	1
I have seen many movies starring Jaclyn Smith, but my god this was one of her best, though it came out 12 years ago.  	1
This movie contained an all-star cast, and what I loved the most was that it opened my eyes to see other actors who I haven't seen before.  	1
This movie was kind of long in length, but I enjoyed every minute of it.  	1
Overall I rate this movie a 10 out of a 1-10 scale.  	1
Lifetime does not air it enough, so if anyone knows what store sells it let me know because this is a must-have.  	1
I particularly remember my senses being assaulted by strident cords of music that would blare out with very little warning, and even less meaning.  	0
It is just the sort of pap that is screened in the afternoon to punish the unemployed for not having jobs.  	0
Totally different, with loads of understatement and black comedy, this is a film few get to see, but those who do will remember it.  	1
This movie creates its own universe, and is fascinating in every way.  	1
But this movie really got to me.  	1
See it.  	1
I really hope the team behind this movie makes more movies, and that they will continue to do so in their own, some kinda weird style.  	1
And I forgot: The Casting here i superb, with Trond Fausa Aurvg being perfect in the role as the Bothersome Man, who doesn't understand where he is, what he is doing and why.  	1
This movie is a good and humorous comment on life in 2006.  	1
I found this move beautiful, enjoyable, and uplifting.  	1
Initially the local sites in the film, which was filmed here in Buffalo, intrigued me.  	1
Later I found myself lost in the power of the film.  	1
The entire audience applauded at the conclusion of the film.  	1
I left the theater with a lilt in my step, joy in my heart and hope for the human race.  	1
Duris has a wholesome appearance and gives a fine performance.  	1
The rest of the cast also play well.  	1
Cinematography noteworthy including fine views of Barcelona and its famed Gaudi towers.  	1
About ten minutes into this film I started having second thoughts.  	0
About half way through this film I started to dislike it.  	0
By the time the film ended, I not only disliked it, I despised it.  	0
What this film lacks is a convincing script.  	0
The script looks as if only a rough draft was written and shooting began before a finished script was completed.  	0
Things happen, characters personalities change, plot twists occur for no real reason other than that script calls for it.  	0
The cast is good.  	1
For that, it's worth checking out.  	1
This is probably the most irritating show I have ever seen in my entire life.  	0
It is indescribably the most annoying and idiotic show I have ever seen.  	0
Everything about it is just bad.  	0
I could not understand, what kind of idiot would produce this mess in the first place not to mention several season.  	0
The script is bad, very bad  it contains both cheesiness and unethical joke that you normally see in rated R or NC-17 movie.  	0
The casting is also horrible, cause all you see is a really really BAD Actors, period.  	0
Final Word: This Show is a real torture!!  	0
It is zillion times away from reality.  	0
Watching washing machine twirling around wouldn't hurt your eyes as much as this show.  	0
Rating: 0/10 (Grade: Z) Note: The Show Is So Bad That Even Mother Of The Cast Pull Her Daughter Out Of The Show.  	0
20th Century Fox's ROAD HOUSE 1948) is not only quite a silly noir but is an implausible unmitigated bore of a movie.  	0
Full of unconvincing cardboard characters it is blandly written by Edward Chodorov, who also produced, and is surprisingly directed by Jean Negulesco from whom one would expect a great deal more.  	0
From here on the Widmark character turns unintentionally comical!  	0
His losing his marbles so early in the proceedings is totally implausible and unconvincing.  	0
And if that isn't enough of a mess of a movie for you - the picture is also marred with a constant use of studio sets and indoor exteriors.  	0
Whatever prompted such a documentary is beyond me!  	0
(very serious spoilers) this movie was a huge disappointment.  	0
there are so many problems i dont know where to start.  	0
the cast was great.  	1
steve martin delivers a really funny performance of a middle-aged, upper class, uptight white guy.  	1
add betty white and jean smart and you have a great cast - everyone played their parts really well.  	1
but the movie makes a lot of serious mistakes.  	0
first of all, there are enough racial stereotypes and racial jokes to offend everyone.  	0
the movie is littered with overt racial slurs towards the black cast members and in return the whites are depicted as morons and boobs.  	0
putting the race card aside, lets look at the major flaw in the film: they destroy latifa's character.  	0
there is no real plot.  	0
i wouldnt see this movie again for free.  	0
STEAMBOAT WILLIE is an amazingly important film to our cinema history.  	1
This second appearance of Mickey Mouse (following the silent PLANE CRAZY earlier that year) is probably his most famous film--mostly because it was so ground-breaking.  	1
While you don't yet hear Mickey speak, there are tons of sound effects and music throughout the film--something we take for granted now but which was a huge crowd pleaser in 1928.  	1
However, after seeing the short again after about 25 years, I was amazed at how timeless the film actually is.  	1
It's just adorable seeing Mickey playing "Turkey in the Straw" in a highly imaginative (if occasionally cruel) way.  	1
Clever and a real crowd-pleaser--this film still ranks among Mickey's best films even after 80 wonderful years.  	1
The bipolarity of the ruthless thug (one minute a ruthless killer, the next minute a Luv's diaper commercial) is completely unconvincing.  	0
I'm terribly disappointed that this film would receive so many awards and accolades, especially when there are far more deserving works of film out there.  	0
The original Body and Soul (1947) is a masterpiece.  	1
John Garfield, Ann revere, Lilli Plmer, William Conrad, Canada Lee...and filmed by one of the greatest cinematographers to ever grace the screen..James Wong Howe.  	1
I don't think there are any redeeming qualities in this remake.  	0
This may be the only bad film he ever made.  	0
So bad...well...it's just bad.  	0
This movie is a solid example of a bad plot and a very, very bad idea all the way.  	0
It's a shame to see good actors like Thomerson and James make a living in a mess like this.  	0
I thought it was bad.  	0
Both films are terrible, but to the credit of the 1986 version, it was watchable.  	0
Let's start with all the problemsthe acting, especially from the lead professor, was very, very bad.  	0
The script is a big flawed mess.  	0
The best example of how dumb the writing is when it's established that you can turn the zombie-students back into humans by removing a necklace containing a piece of the meteorite.  	0
Director Paul Matthews, who also wrote/directed the weak 1995 monster movie "Grim", clearly doesn't know how to pace his films.  	0
The movie is terribly boring in places.  	0
The lighting is awful.  	0
The film looks cheap and bland.  	0
One of the most disappointing aspects is the lack of notable gore.  	0
This convention never worked well in the past, and certainly doesn't work here.  	0
The visual effects were AWFUL.  	0
The CG opening sequence in space looked like it could have been created on Microsoft Slideshow for God's sake!  	0
The "explosion" of the Gas tanks at the end was just as awful.  	0
Okay, I like to consider myself a fair critic, so I'll give credit where credit's due--the creature effects were actually pretty cool.  	1
Gotta love those close-ups of slimy, drooling teeth!  	1
To sum the film up, "Breeders" is a terrible, cheaply made horror movie that should be avoided like the Ebola virus.  	0
Not recommended.  	0
He is almost unbearable to watch on screen, he has little to no charisma, and terrible comedic timing.  	0
Aside from it's terrible lead, this film has loads of other debits.  	0
I understand that it's supposed to be a cheap popcorn comedy, but that doesn't mean that it has to completely insult our intelligence, and have writing so incredibly hackneyed that it borders on offensive.  	0
Lewis Black's considerable talent is wasted here too, as he is at his most incendiary when he is unrestrained, which the PG-13 rating certainly won't allow.  	0
The film's sole bright spot was Jonah Hill (who will look almost unrecognizable to fans of the recent Superbad due to the amount of weight he lost in the interim).  	1
With the originality and freshness of the first movie now spent, this remake had little else to offer.  	0
The budget was evidently very limited.  	0
This was reflected not only in the cast, but also in the below-par script, which borrowed much from the earlier classic.  	0
However, here there was no decent acting, action or location work to balance things up.  	0
Filmiing was less expansive.  	0
It failed to convey the broad sweep of landscapes that were a great part of the original.  	0
Generally; it just lacked imagination.  	0
Not recommended.  	0
Is it possible for a movie to get any worse than this?  	0
There is no plot here to keep you going in the first place.  	0
Even when the women finally show up, there is no sign of improvement; the most expected things happen and by the time the film is over, you might be far asleep.  	0
Beware: this is not a trashy cult movie, this is trash -period!  	0
I can't believe there's even a sequel to this!  	0
Which is precisely why I am giving it such a bad review!  	0
Being a 90's child, I truly enjoyed this show and I can proudly say that I enjoyed it big time and even more than the classical WB cartoons.  	1
But "Tiny Toons" kept the 90's vibe and delivered one of the most popular, funny, and underrated cartoons ever created.  	1
The memories are murky but I can only say that I enjoyed every single episode and product related to the show.  	1
Easily, none other cartoon made me laugh in a tender way (before getting into dark sitcoms oriented for teenagers).  	1
The characters were all funny and had the peculiarity of not having a true lead character.  	1
Every single character was hilarious and deserved to be called a lead.  	1
Every element of this story was so over the top, excessively phony and contrived that it was painful to sit through.  	0
Her lines seem to have been WRITTEN by a fifteen year old, though they are trying oh so, so hard to sound like how a fifteen year old would really, um, you know, well... talk.  	0
Perabo has a nice energy level and is obviously very comfortable in front of a camera.  	1
There is simply no excuse for something this poorly done.  	0
I saw this movie and I thought this is a stupid movie.  	0
What is even more stupid is that who had thought an idea that there should be a volcano in Los Angeles?  	0
To be honest with you, this is unbelievable nonsense and very foolish.  	0
In conclusion, I will not bother with this movie because a volcano in Los Angeles is nothing but nonsense.  	0
The story line is just awful!  	0
It's just painful!  	0
And the accents are absolutely abysmal!  	0
There's also enough hypocrisy in this film to make me vomit.  	0
Don't waste your time watching this rubbish non-researched film.  	0
I believe that Pitch Black was done well.  	1
The characters are interesting and you want to find out more about them the longer the movie goes on, and I think people will be surprised by who does and doesn't make it.  	1
Go watch it!  	1
Omit watching this.  	0
VERY funny!  	1
My rating: just 3 out of 10.  	0
The characters are interesting and you really care for them.  	1
An instant classic, with a great soundtrack and a catchy song during the ending credits.  	1
Don't miss it.  	1
This is a masterful piece of film-making, with many themes simmering and occasionally boiling over in this warts and all study of the poet's bohemian, self-indulgent wartime years that span the aerial bombardments of London and the outward tranquillity of a Welsh coastal retreat - the borderlines between friendship, lust and love, dedication to art and experience versus practical concerns, jealousy, rivalry, cowardice and egotism versus heroism and self-sacrifice and more.  	1
A mature, subtle script that suggests and occasionally brings into dramatic focus the underlying tensions is well served by perfect performances (apart from the odd inappropriate smiling that Keira Knightley is prone to, though perhaps under direction this time as the other characters themselves often mention it).  	1
But above all the exquisite visual composition of each moment, with inventive and elegant use of close-up, camera angle and lighting, including pointillistic faux home movie footage, is a wonder and joy to behold.  	1
It's as continuously beautiful to look at as a Bertolucci, but the relationships here are more convincing and the narrative more engaging than some of that master's work.  	1
The basic premise is wasted since it is sidelined by the inexplicable focus on the documentary crew.  	0
Regardless, the film fails on most levels.  	0
Avoid at all costs.  	0
I saw this film over Christmas, and what a great film it was!  	1
I thought Errol Flynn was brilliant as Custer and has since become my favourite actor!  	1
His acting alongside Olivia De Havilland was brilliant and the ending was fantastic!  	1
I had always known that Errol Flynn was a brilliant actor as he was my dads favourite actor, and I grew up watching his films as a child.  	1
But it wasn't until I watched this film that I realised how great he actually was.  	1
I'll give this film 10 out of 10!  	1
I know that Jim O'Connor was very energetic and that nobody could be as much as him, but George was well dull.  	0
He really didn't seem to want to be hosting; his voice-overs were monotonous, didn't get involved with the guests.  	0
Lovely little thriller from Hitchcock, with lots of nice shenanigans surrounding a murdered spy, a kidnapped child, a nasty church, a foreign plot and some random taxidermists.  	1
Jimmy Stewart is as ever a great hero for Hitchcock, the story rips along to its cool climax at an embassy function, but it lacks the brooding menace of Hitchcock's black and white, low-budget original.  	1
Nevertheless yet another wonderful film from the great master's stable.  	1
I have to say that this film was excellently produced and tops the ratings as a typical sci fi film!  	1
Excellently produced by one of Sci-fi's best producers Scot Vandiver !  	1
But it is entertaining, nonetheless.  	1
It's a campy sort of film that's a joy to watch.  	1
There's barely a boring moment in the film and there are plenty of humorous parts.  	1
The cast is always entertaining as usual.  	1
Overall, a delight!  	1
This movie is so mind-bendingly awful, it couldn't have even been created.  	0
The film lacks any real scares or tension & some of the medical terminology used throughout is a bit iffy to say the least & I say that as an insulin dependant diabetic myself.  	0
The least said about the acting the better.  	0
This movie does an excellent job of revealing the complexity of the task and the incredible challenges facing South Africa.  	1
I believe every one should see this movie as I think few people outside of South Africa understand its past and what is being attempted in the Truth and Reconciliation process.  	1
Nothing short of magnificent photography/cinematography in this film.  	1
The acting is fantastic, the stories are seamlessly woven together, and the dogs are splendid............. A must rent, view, or see.  	1
Don't be afraid of subtitles........ its worth a little aversion therapy 10/10  	1
Excellent performance.  	1
There still are good actors around!  	1
Also great directing and photography.  	1
Very true to Shakespear, and a 'must' for all Shakespear fans.  	1
Macbeth (Jason Connery) moved me to tears with his final monolog (out brief candle, out)He gave the sphere of moral decay and dark forces a human face, which makes it the more interesting.  	1
Helen Baxendale is a very credible lady Macbeth who can be very cheerfull at times and sometimes she just looks like a naughty girl, but deadly in her taste for blood and evil.  	1
If you love death and decay, and Shakespears lyrics... this is the one.  	1
This is a witty and delightful adaptation of the Dr Seuss book, brilliantly animated by UPA's finest and thoroughly deserving of its Academy Award.  	1
Special mention should be made of the superb music score and sound effects, which are an integral element in helping to make this such a memorable and enjoyable cartoon.  	1
However Paul Schrader has indeed made a film "about" Mishima that is both superb & complex.  	1
Also notable is John Bailey's fine crisp beautifully colored cinematography and the great production design & costumes by Eiko Ishioka who went on to do the memorable costumes for Coppola's Dracula for which she received a well deserved Oscar.  	1
Even allowing for poor production values for the time (1971) and the format (some kind of mini-series), this is baaaaaad.  	0
Unless you're just out to visually "collect" all extant films of Austen's work, you can skip this one.  	0
If you do watch it, however, there are small consolations: The actresses playing Anne's sisters each do a wonderful job with their roles.  	1
It is not good.  	0
Speaking of the music, it is unbearably predictably and kitchy.  	0
Then the film just dropped the ball.  	0
This is a stunning movie.  	1
Raw and sublimely moving.  	1
It felt like a very gripping, intelligent stage play (but without the overly theatrical feeling one actually gets from watching people on a stage) which plays on everyone's terror of a white lie escalating to monstrous consequences.  	1
All of the main players are mesmerising.  	1
Tom Wilkinson broke my heart at the end... and everyone else's judging by the amount of fumbling for hankies and hands going up to faces among males and females alike.  	1
Julian Fellowes has triumphed again.  	1
He's a national treasure.  	1
GO AND SEE IT!  	1
This is an excellent film.  	1
The aerial scenes were well-done.  	1
It was also the right balance of war and love.  	1
The film gives meaning to the phrase, "Never in the history of human conflict has so much been owed by so many to so few.  	1
Kris Kristoffersen is good in this movie and really makes a difference.  	1
A good film by a great director!  	1
This is definitely one of the better documentaries I have seen looking at family relationships and marriage.  	1
There are many continuity errors: one other user commented on different cars in the garage, Joe's glasses...the one that got to me the most was the fact Joe's facial hair configuration seemed to change from scene to scene.  	0
This is just a great movie.  	1
10 out of 10 stars.  	1
I can't see how this movie can be an inspiration to anyone to come out or overcome fear and rejection.  	0
It's so bad it's actually worth seeing just for that reason.  	0
Punishment Park is a brilliant piece of cinema.  	1
Shot in the Southern California desert using his patent faux documentary style, Watkins creates a film like no other.  	1
This is one of Peter Watkins most accessible films.  	1
I advise you to look out for it.  	1
You wont regret it!  	1
Highly recommended A+  	1
Well... Just if you keep thinking how bad it is.  	0
It's a mediocre, miserable, hollow, laughable and predictable piece of garbage.  	0
It's a case of 'so bad it is laughable'.  	0
) very bad performance plays Angela Bennett, a computer expert who is at home all the time.  	0
It is a film about nothing, just a pretext to show ridiculous action scenes.  	0
How awful she is!  	0
But she is still a bad actress, repeating her robotic face moves in each of her pictures.  	0
The results, well, are a shame.  	0
DELETE this film from your mind!  	0
One of the worst shows of all time.  	0
The show would begin with smart ass ed comments to each other that would be totally off the wall and uncalled for.  	0
The fat computer geek was unbelievable, the bible thumper, the bad-ass girl, who are these actors???  	0
Never heard of any of them except Cole who was totally unbelievable in the part.  	0
Every time he opened his mouth you expect to hear, "you see kids..." Pulling the plug was a mercy killing for this horrible show.  	0
The stories were as unbelievable as the actors.  	0
Lame would be the best way to describe it.  	0
Stanwyck and Morgan are perfectly cast in what is, in many ways, a modern equivalent of Dickens' Christmas Carol in its sensibility.  	1
The success of the film depends on the casting of Sydney Greenstreet as the Alexander Yardley character.  	1
The attractive set used throughout most of the film is an eye-pleasing gem.  	1
Im big fan of RPG games too, but this movie, its a disgrace to any self-respecting RPGer there is.  	0
The lines, the cuts, the audio, everything is wrong.  	0
You can find better movies at youtube.  	0
Top line: Don't waste your time and money on this one, its as bad as it comes.  	0
A Lassie movie which should have been "put to sleep".... FOREVER.  	0
That's how I'd describe this painfully dreary time-waster of a film.  	0
So mediocre in every aspect that it just becomes a dull, uninteresting mess, this is one of the most forgettable movies I've seen.  	0
It isn't even an achievement as a "so-bad-it's-good" or "so-bad-it's-memorable" movie.  	0
It's an empty, hollow shell of a movie.  	0
Seriously, it's not worth wasting your, or your kid's time on.  	0
Avoid, avoid, avoid!  	0
It will drive you barking mad!  	0
The transfers are very good.  	1
Very nice and relaxing late night viewing.  	1
The movie is full of wonderful dancing (hence the title!  	1
) some great music, and terrific scenery.  	1
It handles some tough issues with dignity and grace, and, of course, has (shocking spoiler here!  	1
) a happy, wonderful, feel good ending!  	1
The point is the journey, a journey that touches every member of the family.  	1
It's one of the movies I need to see whenever it comes on TV...never mind the fact that I already have it memorized!  	1
Nothing new there.  	0
That was done in the second movie.  	0
The movie has almost no action scenes in it and very little comedy.  	0
The plot has more holes than a pair of fishnet stockings and the direction and editing is astonishingly ham fisted.  	0
What on earth is Irons doing in this film?  	0
I just saw this film and I recommend it.  	1
It has a very good plot, it holds your complete attention, the acting is superb, Tom Wilkinson was fantastic and Emily Watson was also very good.  	1
A very good film indeed, about great and unconditional love.  	1
Tom Wilkinson's character is a man who is not prepared for the ordeal that is about to begin, but he takes the matter in hand as the story progresses, and this great actor gives a performance that makes you feel the character's anguish and suffering.  	1
Emily Watson's character is very strong, and she has only to give a quick glance and you understand everything.  	1
Despite the pans of reviewers, I liked this movie.  	1
In fact, I liked it better than Interview With a Vampire and I liked this Lestat (Stuart Townsend) better than Cruise's attempt.  	1
Aailiyah was pretty good as Akasha, in places compelling (her first entrance and mini dance scene).  	1
I'm a big fan of this series mostly due to Anne Rice's style, sensitivities and treatments.  	1
I guess I liked the details of his dysfunction--he was believable.  	1
The football scenes at the end were perplexing.  	0
But I thought his acting was skilled.  	1
Meredith M was better than all right.  	1
A very charming film with wonderful sentiment and heart.  	1
It is rare when a film-maker takes the time to tell a worthy moral tale with care and love that doesn't fall into the trap of being overly syrupy or over indulgent.  	1
Nine out of ten for a truly lovely film.  	1
This early film from future goremeister Lucio Fulci is a very good addition to the giallo sub-genre.  	1
This is one of the best Italian thrillers of the early 70's.  	1
A standout scene.  	1
This scene is very strong and unpleasant.  	0
Technically, the film is well made with impressive camera-work, solid acting and effective music from Riz Ortolani  particularly good is a recurring unaccompanied female vocal that sounds like it's coming from a distant hill.  	1
It's still wild stuff though and is highly recommended to fans of giallo cinema.  	1
The movie was very interesting from beginning to the end.  	1
I liked the way Dustin Hoffman's character was ready to do just about everything to stay with his son.  	1
This movie is also revealing.  	1
Personally, I think it shows that people should learn to find a compromise them self without involving other people into issue.  	1
And it was boring.  	0
I am so tired of clichs that is just lazy writing, and here they come in thick and fast.  	0
PS the only scene in the movie that was cool is when the central character finds her room blown up.  	1
It's a fresh, subtle, and rather sublime effect.  	1
An Italian reviewer called this "a small, great film," and that's right.  	1
All the actors give a wonderful performance, especially Jennifer Rubin as Jamie Harris, who changes from the nervous starlet in the beginning through the strange events she is part of to the cool star.  	1
You learn a lot about the real inside emotions of people in this movie, and a lot about the movie business itself.  	1
The movie in movie situations in the beginning and through the game that is played with her by the "acting coach" are fascinating.  	1
Also the music by Mark Snow is possibly the best score I've ever heard.  	1
You won't forget this movie!  	1
Why was this film made?  	0
The film has an ultra-cheap look to it.  	0
The result is a film that just don't look right.  	0
None of them are engaging or exciting.  	0
The plot is nonsense that doesn't interest in the slightest way or have any uniqueness to it.  	0
The Foreigner is not worth one second of your time.  	0
I saw it as a child on TV back in 1973, when it was "The Stranger" and I loved it.  	1
But the duet between the astronaut and his doctor at the beginning of the movie is a perfect exchange if one considers that this movie was made well into the Cold War and the astronaut's biggest fear is that he has crashed in the USSR.  	1
This movie is so awesome!  	1
I loved it, it was really scary.  	1
I love the Scream movies and all horror movies and this one ranks way up there.  	1
If you want a real scare rent this one!  	1
10/10  	1
This is an extraordinary film.  	1
As a courtroom drama, it's compelling, as an indictment on the American justice system, it's frightening.  	1
This film highlights the fundamental flaws of the legal process, that it's not about discovering guilt or innocence, but rather, is about who presents better in court.  	1
The film is well paced, understated and one of the best courtroom documentaries I've seen.  	1
This mostly routine fact-based TV drama gets a boost from the fine performance by Cole.  	1
Predictable, but not a bad watch.  	1
It was clear that she had the range and ability to pull off this part.  	1
She carries the movie well.  	1
Constantine gives everything the right intensity and seems to have a good understanding of the underlying psychological motivations.  	1
It is wonderful and inspiring to watch, and I hope that it gets released again on to video or DVD.  	1
How this piece of trash was ever released is beyond me: the acting, the story, the characters, the supposedly special effects, etc...it's ALL wrong.  	0
In fact, this stinker smells like a direct-to-video release.  	0
Avoid at ALL costs!  	0
Star Trek V The final Frontier is the worst in the series.  	0
The acting from all involved and that includes those like Shatner and Nimoy is bad and washed out and making them seem as old as they look in real life, the special effects are tacky like when Spock has to rescue Kirk on a jet pack when he falls down from a mountain.  	0
The attempts at humor were pitiful and story is so awful it dosen't bear thinking about which basically involves a Vulcan stealing the Enterprise to find god (seriously) I just didn't care about any of this film and oh not to mention Uhura does a belly dance to distract male guards.  	0
The only place good for this film is in the garbage.  	0
The worst one of the series.  	0
Editing: The editing of this film was phenomenal in my opinion.  	1
When a song could explain the emotions of the subjects better, such as when Jay Adams' unfortunate life was a subject of talk, the song Old Man by Neil Young was played, which evokes many emotions.  	1
Cinematography: The film was shot in an interesting way.  	1
Of course the footage from the 70s was grainy, but that only enhanced the film.  	1
This film offers many delights and surprises.  	1
When Achille and Philippa beautifully sing a duet from "Don Giovanni" that perfectly describes their situation in the movie, you appreciate the subtle layers of this excellent film.  	1
The story unfolds in 18th century Jutland and the use of period music played on period instruments is just one more fine touch.  	1
You share General Loewenhielm's exquisite joy in his partaking of the Cailles en Sarcophage even though you are just watching a movie - but you do wish for just a small sample to savor.  	1
But this understated film leaves a lasting impression.  	1
The warmth it generates is in contrast to its austere backdrop.  	1
You will leave the theater wanting to go out and dance under the stars.  	1
The acting, as you'd expect from this cast, is top notch.  	1
The characters are fleshed out surprisingly well, particularly Grimes and Blake, and all the actors deliver their sharply scripted lines with just the right amount of deadpan tongue in cheek to make the dialogue both hilarious and realistic.  	1
Angus Scrimm also turns in a good performance in a somewhat brief but memorable role as the gently menacing, violin-playing anatomist Doctor Quinn.  	1
Conclusion - I loved it.  	1
It's a long time since I was so entertained by a movie.  	1
I struggle to find anything bad to say about it.  	1
Mark my words, this is one of those cult films like Evil Dead 2 or Phantasm that people will still be discovering and falling in love with 20, 30, 40 years down the line.  	1
It's pretty surprising that this wonderful film was made in 1949, as Hollywood generally had its collective heads in the sand concerning black and white issues at that time.  	1
The film deserves strong kudos for taking this stand, for having exceptional acting from its mostly lesser-known cast and for the super-intelligent script that doesn't insult the audience or take the easy way out when it comes to white racism.  	1
Plus, with the movie's rather modest budget and fast running time, it does an amazing job!  	1
Juano Hernandez (an exceptional actor who played supporting roles in many films of the era) is a proud black man who is accused of murdering a white man in the South.  	1
Trumbull on I LOVE LUCY).  	1
See it with your kids if you have a chance--it will open up some amazing dialog about how far race relations have come in the last 50 years.  	1
See both films if you can.  	1
It was that year, however, that reminded us that Huston was still at the top of his game as evinced by his faithful adaptation of James Joyce's acclaimed novella "The Dead.  	1
Feelings, thoughts...Gabriel's discomfort during the dance...all these intangibles leap to life and come within the viewer's grasp in Huston's portrayal.  	1
Very disappointed and wondered how it could be in the Oscar shortlist.  	0
It's very slow.  	0
Lot of holes in the plot: there's nothing about how he became the emperor; nothing about where he spend 20 years between his childhood and mature age.  	0
) Don't waste your time.  	0
End of Days is one of the worst big-budget action movies I've ever seen.  	0
He surely doesn't know how to make a coherent action movie from the screenwriter of Air Force One who was only obliged to write the script just for a big sum of money.  	0
This was one of the worst films i have ever seen.  	0
I'm still trying to get over how bad it was.  	0
This movie is possibly one of the most creative works of horror ever.  	1
It has everything you could want... suspense, drama, comedy, confusing subplots, native americans, brain eating... If you're looking for the be-all, end-all of brainsucking movies, look no further.  	1
" With great sound effects, and impressive special effects, I can't recommend this movie enough.  	1
Call me a nut, but I think this is one of the best movies ever.  	1
Great character actors Telly Savalas and Peter Boyle.  	1
1 hour 54 minutes of sheer tedium, melodrama and horrible acting, a mess of a script, and a sinking feeling of GOOD LORD, WHAT WERE THEY THINKING?  	0
Lots of holes in the script.  	0
It's like a bad two hour TV movie.  	0
Now imagine that every single one of those decisions was made wrong.  	0
The dialogue is atrocious.  	0
The acting is beyond abysmal.  	0
Everything stinks.  	0
Trouble is, the writing and directing make it impossible to establish those things that make a movie watchable, like character, story, theme and so on.  	0
Worse, there's an incredibly weak sub-plot thrown in that follows a little band of latter-day Mansonites as they go after a reporter who's working on a story on the anniversary of the killings.  	0
It's dumb and pointless, and a complete waste of time.  	0
In short, don't bother with this movie.  	0
I won't spoil it, but the ending in pretty amazing.  	1
The best scene in the movie is at the end, but I won't spoil it.  	1
If there was ever an indication of a writer and a director's ability to meld two highly volatile temperaments into a seamless union of creativity, then this is it!  	1
The result is a powerhouse achievement, made more timely now perhaps because of our culture's disturbing fascination with celebrity, and it's distorted interpretations of fame.  	1
A film not easily forgotten.  	1
But, Kevin Spacey is an excellent, verbal tsunami as Buddy Ackerman  and totally believable because he is a great actor.  	1
The scripting of the subtle comedy is unmatched by any movie in recent years.  	1
The characters are interesting, even if a bit predictable.  	1
Highly recommended for all ages, although the younger set will probably not appreciate some of the more subtle references, they will certainly appreciate one galley scene in particular!  	1
Great movie!  	1
Also the story and acting were weak.  	0
At around 4 pm I bought it, at around 8pm I started to watch, at around 8.15pm I fast forwarded the remaining film to see if there was anything left watchable for a human being with a brain... but there wasn't.  	0
Either way, it sucks.  	0
The script is horrendously stupid.  	0
The story starts too fast with absolutely no suspense or build-up in the slightest.  	0
Everything Captain Howdy says is either laughable or just plain stupid.  	0
What the hell kind of crap is that?!  	0
Then, there's the plot holes.  	0
You could drive a semi truck into these holes!  	0
Linda Cardellini is the only thing good in this film.  	1
She's poised and amazing.  	1
Dee Snider just plain sucks.  	0
He can't act (one of the least scary villains I have ever seen), he can't write (did he write this damn movie in his sleep?  	0
I was bored throughout the whole damn thing.  	0
The acting sucks, the music sucks, the script sucks, the pacing sucks, the special FX suck, the directing sucks... basically, this movie sucks.  	0
This film tries to be a serious and sophisticated thriller/horror flick and it fails miserably.  	0
This is probably one of the least effective and utterly unoriginal films I have ever seen in my entire life.  	0
A piece of cinematic garbage captured on celluloid.  	0
Avoid at any and all costs.  	0
At any rate this film stinks, its not funny, and Fulci should have stayed with giallo and supernatural zombie movies.  	0
Avoid this film at all costs.  	0
I don't know what happened in Season Five, what a mess.  	0
The only consistent thread holding the series together were the amazing performances of Leni Parker and Anita LaSelva as the two Taelons in quiet idealogical conflict.  	0
Now this is a movie I really dislike.  	0
It's one of the most boring Horror movies from the 90's mainly because it starts slow and centers in a boring atmosphere.  	0
The puppets look really cheesy , not in a good way like in the Puppet Master 80's flicks.  	0
The story is lame, not interesting and NEVER really explains the sinister origins of the puppets.  	0
There aren't death scenes like in previous movies and the f/x are terrible.  	0
I felt asleep the first time I watched it, so I can recommend it for insomniacs.  	0
The fact is, this film is a wonderful, heartwarming tale about two people chasing their dreams.  	1
The best part about "Nurse Betty" is it's unpredictability.  	1
Director Neil LaBute uses brutal violence to seperate dreams from reality, and along with the touching drama, and hilarious comedy, you can never tell what is going to happen next.  	1
Otherwise, don't even waste your time on this.  	0
This one just fails to create any real suspense.  	0
As for the killer, don't expect anything original or even remotely frightening.  	0
There is, however, some pretty good acting (at least, for this type of film).  	1
I'm so sorry but I really can't recommend it to anyone.  	0
One of the most boring,pointless movies I have ever seen.  	0
The secondary plot line is incomprehensible and its relation to the primary plot line is mystifying.  	0
Hated it.  	0
This is one of the worst Sandra Bullock movie since Speed 2 But not quite that bad.  	0
I don't understand how this garbage got on the shelves of the movie store, it's not even a real movie!  	0
I highly doubt that anyone could ever like this trash.  	0
This is not movie-making.  	0
The acting is like watching wooden puppets moving around and reading from a book, that's how bad it is.  	0
So I am here to warn you--DO NOT RENT THIS MOVIE, it is the dumbest thing you have never seen!  	0
I saw this short film on HBO the other day and absolutely loved it.  	1
I didn't realize how wonderful the short really is until the last two scenes.  	1
Excellent short film.  	1
Hopefully, the director James Cox can turn the short into a feature length film with the same cast, or win us over with a whole new film.  	1
I agree with Jessica, this movie is pretty bad.  	0
Characters are one-dimensional, even the good guys and especially the bad guys.  	0
The story line is totally predictable.  	0
Not much dialogue, not much music, the whole film was shot as elaborately and aesthetically like a sculpture.  	1
I've seen soap operas more intelligent than this movie.  	0
Bad characters, bad story and bad acting.  	0
Really awful.  	0
Not easy to watch.  	0
Funny, clever, hip - just like Pray's previous film, Hype!  	1
It was a long time that i didn't see a so charismatic actor on screen.  	1
Paolo Sorrentino has written a wonderful story about loneliness and Tony has built one of the most unforgettable characters seen in movies in recent years.  	1
The movie is not completely perfect but 'Titta Di Girolamo' will stay with you for a long time after the vision of the movie.  	1
I rate this movie 9/10.  	1
I do not know if this was Emilio Estevez's directorial debut, but the pacing, the interplay and development of the characters as well as some clever camera work surrounding the character Estevez plays all suggest a natural eye.  	1
The interplay between Martin and Emilio contains the same wonderful chemistry we saw in Wall Street with Martin and Charlie.  	1
Kathy Bates is wonderful in her characters subtle desperation and escapism; a variation on her character in "At Play In The Fields Of The Lord".  	1
For readers who have already seen one of Miyazaki's films: he is still in top form and made another worthwhile experience.  	1
It never condescends, all the characters have good genuine hearts and believable problems.  	1
The two main characters may be two of the most believable children I ever saw put on screen.  	1
They are so easy to love, but even more easy to identify with.  	1
This movie is great--especially if you enjoy visual arts.  	1
The scenery that the two daughters paint and photograph are beautiful.  	1
The story is also both funny and poignant at times.  	1
People who like European films and "art movies" will like this movie.  	1
This is truly an art movie--it actually has a lot of art in it.  	1
Go rent it.  	1
However, after finally watching this film, I realized that not only had I had a closed mind to the brilliance it depicts, I also found myself watching it over and over again.  	1
It's the one movie that never ceases to interest me, simply because it keeps me alert, as I try to attempt to decipher it's meanings.  	1
Brilliance indeed.  	1
But if you liked movies like The Matrix (and better yet, their sequels) I think you'll appreciate the thought provoking, mindblowing experience this film will give you.  	1
Think of the film being like a dream.  	1
Simply beautiful.  	1
Both Rickman and Stowe play their roles to the hilt in this tale of a childrens' book writer who-- maybe?-- has written a subversive tract.  	1
It's a gloriously fun, fast paced and fairly accurate portrayal of the night of a raver.  	1
It presents a idyllic yet serious portrayal of the ups and downs of the characters lives.  	1
Just whatever you do, avoid "Groove" as its the antithesis of all that is good about Human Traffic.  	0
It's too bad that everyone else involved didn't share Crowe's level of dedication to quality, for if they did, we'd have a far better film on our hands than this sub-par mess.  	0
The movie seemed a little slow at first.  	0
But it picked up speed and got right to the point.  	1
It showed exactly how the government and the scientist argued for humanity and the reasons of the "gadget".  	1
I enjoyed it.  	1
I have recommended it to friends.  	1
I was particularly pleased with the acting ability of Dwight Schultz.  	1
Both actors truly understand and become their particular character, delivering a convincing, sincere performance.  	1
Their on-screen chemistry, critical to the entire film, is genuine.  	1
The film's dialogue is natural, real to life.  	1
The writer, Gorman Bechard, undoubtedly did his homework because all references are industry and character-age appropriate.  	1
The incredible soundtrack truly captures the essence of the film.  	1
Each track commands sentiment, actually contributing to the scenes and characters.  	1
Definitely worth seeing it's the sort of thought provoking film that forces you to question your own threshold of loneliness.  	1
Hayao Miyazaki's latest and eighth film for Studio Ghibili, "Gake No Ue No Ponyo" (Ponyo on the Cliff by the Sea) is a wonderfully fun and imaginative look at childhood.  	1
At a time when it seems that film animation has been dominated by Disney/Pixar's CGI masterpieces, it is both refreshing and comforting to know that Miyazaki is still relying on traditional hand-drawn animation to tell his charming and enchanting stories.  	1
Enough can not be said of the remarkable animation in this film.  	1
The art style has the appearance of crayon/pencil drawings and is wonderfully colorful and fanciful.  	1
If you act in such a film, you should be glad that you're gonna drift away from earth as far as possible!  	0
This one wants to surf on the small wave of space movies in 1998 (Deep Impact and Armageddon), and this one fails everywhere.  	0
If you haven't choked in your own vomit by the end (by all the cheap drama and worthless dialogue) you've must have bored yourself to death with this waste of time.  	0
Still, it makes up for all of this with a super ending that depicts a great sea vessel being taken out by the mighty frost.  	1
Just consider the excellent story, solid acting and look of the film as added bonuses.  	1
Instead, we got a bore fest about a whiny, spoiled brat babysitting.  	0
Then I watched it again two Sundays ago (March 20th, 2005) and I began to really enjoy it and this time I taped the entire thing.  	1
It is a very well acted and done TV Movie.  	1
Judith Light is one of my favorite actresses and I think she does a superb job in this film!  	1
I keep watching it over and over.  	1
It's a sad movie, but very good.  	1
If you have not seen this movie, I definitely recommend it!  	1
She is as lovely as usual, this cutie!  	1
Still it's quite interesting and entertaining to follow.  	1
;) Recommend with confidence!  	1
This movie is well-balanced with comedy and drama and I thoroughly enjoyed myself.  	1
It was a riot to see Hugo Weaving play a sex-obsessed gay real estate salesman who uses his clients' houses for his trysts with the flaming Darren (Tom Hollander).  	1
:) Anyway, the plot flowed smoothly and the male-bonding scenes were a hoot.  	1
The opening sequence of this gem is a classic, and the cat n mouse games that follow are a delight to watch.  	1
Fans of the genre will be in heaven.  	1
Lange had become a great actress.  	1
It looked like a wonderful story.  	1
I never walked out of a movie faster.  	0
I just got bored watching Jessice Lange take her clothes off!  	0
Unfortunately, any virtue in this film's production work was lost on a regrettable script.  	0
In a word, it is embarrassing.  	0
Exceptionally bad!  	0
All in all its an insult to one's intelligence and a huge waste of money.  	0
Wow... Loved this place.	1
Crust is not good.	0
Not tasty and the texture was just nasty.	0
Stopped by during the late May bank holiday off Rick Steve recommendation and loved it.	1
The selection on the menu was great and so were the prices.	1
Now I am getting angry and I want my damn pho.	0
Honeslty it didn't taste THAT fresh.)	0
The potatoes were like rubber and you could tell they had been made up ahead of time being kept under a warmer.	0
The fries were great too.	1
A great touch.	1
Service was very prompt.	1
Would not go back.	0
The cashier had no care what so ever on what I had to say it still ended up being wayyy overpriced.	0
I tried the Cape Cod ravoli, chicken,with cranberry...mmmm!	1
I was disgusted because I was pretty sure that was human hair.	0
I was shocked because no signs indicate cash only.	0
Highly recommended.	1
Waitress was a little slow in service.	0
This place is not worth your time, let alone Vegas.	0
did not like at all.	0
The Burrittos Blah!	0
The food, amazing.	1
Service is also cute.	1
I could care less... The interior is just beautiful.	1
So they performed.	1
That's right....the red velvet cake.....ohhh this stuff is so good.	1
- They never brought a salad we asked for.	0
This hole in the wall has great Mexican street tacos, and friendly staff.	1
Took an hour to get our food only 4 tables in restaurant my food was Luke warm, Our sever was running around like he was totally overwhelmed.	0
The worst was the salmon sashimi.	0
Also there are combos like a burger, fries, and beer for 23 which is a decent deal.	1
This was like the final blow!	0
I found this place by accident and I could not be happier.	1
seems like a good quick place to grab a bite of some familiar pub food, but do yourself a favor and look elsewhere.	0
Overall, I like this place a lot.	1
The only redeeming quality of the restaurant was that it was very inexpensive.	1
Ample portions and good prices.	1
Poor service, the waiter made me feel like I was stupid every time he came to the table.	0
My first visit to Hiro was a delight!	1
Service sucks.	0
The shrimp tender and moist.	1
There is not a deal good enough that would drag me into that establishment again.	0
Hard to judge whether these sides were good because we were grossed out by the melted styrofoam and didn't want to eat it for fear of getting sick.	0
On a positive note, our server was very attentive and provided great service.	1
Frozen pucks of disgust, with some of the worst people behind the register.	0
The only thing I did like was the prime rib and dessert section.	1
It's too bad the food is so damn generic.	0
The burger is good beef, cooked just right.	1
If you want a sandwich just go to any Firehouse!!!!!	1
My side Greek salad with the Greek dressing was so tasty, and the pita and hummus was very refreshing.	1
We ordered the duck rare and it was pink and tender on the inside with a nice char on the outside.	1
He came running after us when he realized my husband had left his sunglasses on the table.	1
Their chow mein is so good!	1
They have horrible attitudes towards customers, and talk down to each one when customers don't enjoy their food.	0
The portion was huge!	1
Loved it...friendly servers, great food, wonderful and imaginative menu.	1
The Heart Attack Grill in downtown Vegas is an absolutely flat-lined excuse for a restaurant.	0
Not much seafood and like 5 strings of pasta at the bottom.	0
The salad had just the right amount of sauce to not over power the scallop, which was perfectly cooked.	1
The ripped banana was not only ripped, but petrified and tasteless.	0
At least think to refill my water before I struggle to wave you over for 10 minutes.	0
This place receives stars for their APPETIZERS!!!	1
The cocktails are all handmade and delicious.	1
We'd definitely go back here again.	1
We are so glad we found this place.	1
Great food and service, huge portions and they give a military discount.	1
Always a great time at Dos Gringos!	1
Update.....went back for a second time and it was still just as amazing	1
We got the food and apparently they have never heard of salt and the batter on the fish was chewy.	0
A great way to finish a great.	1
The deal included 5 tastings and 2 drinks, and Jeff went above and beyond what we expected.	1
- Really, really good rice, all the time.	1
The service was meh.	0
It took over 30 min to get their milkshake, which was nothing more than chocolate milk.	0
I guess I should have known that this place would suck, because it is inside of the Excalibur, but I didn't use my common sense.	0
The scallop dish is quite appalling for value as well.	0
2 times - Very Bad Customer Service !	0
The sweet potato fries were very good and seasoned well.	1
Today is the second time I've been to their lunch buffet and it was pretty good.	1
There is so much good food in Vegas that I feel cheated for wasting an eating opportunity by going to Rice and Company.	0
Coming here is like experiencing an underwhelming relationship where both parties can't wait for the other person to ask to break up.	0
walked in and the place smelled like an old grease trap and only 2 others there eating.	0
The turkey and roast beef were bland.	0
This place has it!	1
The pan cakes everyone are raving about taste like a sugary disaster tailored to the palate of a six year old.	0
I love the Pho and the spring rolls oh so yummy you have to try.	1
The poor batter to meat ratio made the chicken tenders very unsatisfying.	0
All I have to say is the food was amazing!!!	1
Omelets are to die for!	1
Everything was fresh and delicious!	1
In summary, this was a largely disappointing dining experience.	0
It's like a really sexy party in your mouth, where you're outrageously flirting with the hottest person at the party.	1
Never been to Hard Rock Casino before, WILL NEVER EVER STEP FORWARD IN IT AGAIN!	0
Best breakfast buffet!!!	1
say bye bye to your tip lady!	0
We'll never go again.	0
Will be back again!	1
Food arrived quickly!	1
It was not good.	0
On the up side, their cafe serves really good food.	1
Our server was fantastic and when he found out the wife loves roasted garlic and bone marrow, he added extra to our meal and another marrow to go!	1
The only good thing was our waiter, he was very helpful and kept the bloddy mary's coming.	1
Best Buffet in town, for the price you cannot beat it.	1
I LOVED their mussels cooked in this wine reduction, the duck was tender, and their potato dishes were delicious.	1
This is one of the better buffets that I have been to.	1
So we went to Tigerlilly and had a fantastic afternoon!	1
The food was delicious, our bartender was attentive and personable AND we got a great deal!	1
The ambience is wonderful and there is music playing.	1
Will go back next trip out.	1
Sooooo good!!	1
REAL sushi lovers, let's be honest - Yama is not that good.	0
At least 40min passed in between us ordering and the food arriving, and it wasn't that busy.	0
This is a really fantastic Thai restaurant which is definitely worth a visit.	1
Nice, spicy and tender.	1
Good prices.	1
Check it out.	1
It was pretty gross!	0
I've had better atmosphere.	0
Kind of hard to mess up a steak but they did.	0
Although I very much liked the look and sound of this place, the actual experience was a bit disappointing.	0
I just don't know how this place managed to served the blandest food I have ever eaten when they are preparing Indian cuisine.	0
Worst service to boot, but that is the least of their worries.	0
Service was fine and the waitress was friendly.	1
The guys all had steaks, and our steak loving son who has had steak at the best and worst places said it was the best steak he's ever eaten.	1
We thought you'd have to venture further away to get good sushi, but this place really hit the spot that night.	1
Host staff were, for lack of a better word, BITCHES!	0
Bland... Not a liking this place for a number of reasons and I don't want to waste time on bad reviewing.. I'll leave it at that...	0
Phenomenal food, service and ambiance.	1
I wouldn't return.	0
Definitely worth venturing off the strip for the pork belly, will return next time I'm in Vegas.	1
This place is way too overpriced for mediocre food.	0
Penne vodka excellent!	1
They have a good selection of food including a massive meatloaf sandwich, a crispy chicken wrap, a delish tuna melt and some tasty burgers.	1
The management is rude.	0
Delicious NYC bagels, good selections of cream cheese, real Lox with capers even.	1
Great Subway, in fact it's so good when you come here every other Subway will not meet your expectations.	1
I had a seriously solid breakfast here.	1
This is one of the best bars with food in Vegas.	1
He was extremely rude and really, there are so many other restaurants I would love to dine at during a weekend in Vegas.	0
My drink was never empty and he made some really great menu suggestions.	1
Don't do it!!!!	0
The waiter wasn't helpful or friendly and rarely checked on us.	0
My husband and I ate lunch here and were very disappointed with the food and service.	0
And the red curry had so much bamboo shoots and wasn't very tasty to me.	0
Nice blanket of moz over top but i feel like this was done to cover up the subpar food.	1
The bathrooms are clean and the place itself is well decorated.	1
The menu is always changing, food quality is going down & service is extremely slow.	0
The service was a little slow , considering that were served by 3 people servers so the food was coming in a slow pace.	0
I give it 2 thumbs down	0
We watched our waiter pay a lot more attention to other tables and ignore us.	0
My fianc and I came in the middle of the day and we were greeted and seated right away.	1
This is a great restaurant at the Mandalay Bay.	1
We waited for forty five minutes in vain.	0
Crostini that came with the salad was stale.	0
Some highlights : Great quality nigiri here!	1
the staff is friendly and the joint is always clean.	1
this was a different cut than the piece the other day but still wonderful and tender s well as well flavored.	1
I ordered the Voodoo pasta and it was the first time I'd had really excellent pasta since going gluten free several years ago.	1
this place is good.	1
Unfortunately, we must have hit the bakery on leftover day because everything we ordered was STALE.	0
I came back today since they relocated and still not impressed.	0
I was seated immediately.	1
Their menu is diverse, and reasonably priced.	1
Avoid at all cost!	0
Restaurant is always full but never a wait.	1
DELICIOUS!!	1
This place is hands-down one of the best places to eat in the Phoenix metro area.	1
So don't go there if you are looking for good food...	0
I've never been treated so bad.	0
Bacon is hella salty.	1
We also ordered the spinach and avocado salad; the ingredients were sad and the dressing literally had zero taste.	0
This really is how Vegas fine dining used to be, right down to the menus handed to the ladies that have no prices listed.	1
The waitresses are very friendly.	1
Lordy, the Khao Soi is a dish that is not to be missed for curry lovers!	1
Everything on the menu is terrific and we were also thrilled that they made amazing accommodations for our vegetarian daughter.	1
Perhaps I caught them on an off night judging by the other reviews, but I'm not inspired to go back.	0
The service here leaves a lot to be desired.	0
The atmosphere is modern and hip, while maintaining a touch of coziness.	1
Not a weekly haunt, but definitely a place to come back to every once in a while.	1
We literally sat there for 20 minutes with no one asking to take our order.	0
The burger had absolutely no flavor - the meat itself was totally bland, the burger was overcooked and there was no charcoal flavor.	0
I also decided not to send it back because our waitress looked like she was on the verge of having a heart attack.	0
I dressed up to be treated so rudely!	0
It was probably dirt.	0
Love this place, hits the spot when I want something healthy but not lacking in quantity or flavor.	1
I ordered the Lemon raspberry ice cocktail which was also incredible.	1
The food sucked, which we expected but it sucked more than we could have imagined.	0
Interesting decor.	1
What I really like there is the crepe station.	1
Also were served hot bread and butter, and home made potato chips with bacon bits on top....very original and very good.	1
you can watch them preparing the delicious food!)	1
Both of the egg rolls were fantastic.	1
When my order arrived, one of the gyros was missing.	0
I had a salad with the wings, and some ice cream for dessert and left feeling quite satisfied.	1
I'm not really sure how Joey's was voted best hot dog in the Valley by readers of Phoenix Magazine.	0
The best place to go for a tasty bowl of Pho!	1
The live music on Fridays totally blows.	0
I've never been more insulted or felt disrespected.	0
Very friendly staff.	1
It is worth the drive.	1
I had heard good things about this place, but it exceeding every hope I could have dreamed of.	1
Food was great and so was the serivce!	1
The warm beer didn't help.	0
Great brunch spot.	1
Service is friendly and inviting.	1
Very good lunch spot.	1
I've lived here since 1979 and this was the first (and last) time I've stepped foot into this place.	0
The WORST EXPERIENCE EVER.	0
Must have been an off night at this place.	0
The sides are delish - mixed mushrooms, yukon gold puree, white corn - beateous.	1
If that bug never showed up I would have given a 4 for sure, but on the other side of the wall where this bug was climbing was the kitchen.	0
For about 10 minutes, we we're waiting for her salad when we realized that it wasn't coming any time soon.	0
My friend loved the salmon tartar.	1
Won't go back.	0
Extremely Tasty!	1
Waitress was good though!	1
Soggy and not good.	0
The Jamaican mojitos are delicious.	1
Which are small and not worth the price.	0
- the food is rich so order accordingly.	1
The shower area is outside so you can only rinse, not take a full shower, unless you don't mind being nude for everyone to see!	0
The service was a bit lacking.	0
Lobster Bisque, Bussell Sprouts, Risotto, Filet ALL needed salt and pepper..and of course there is none at the tables.	0
Hopefully this bodes for them going out of business and someone who can cook can come in.	0
It was either too cold, not enough flavor or just bad.	0
I loved the bacon wrapped dates.	1
This is an unbelievable BARGAIN!	1
The folks at Otto always make us feel so welcome and special.	1
As for the "mains," also uninspired.	0
This is the place where I first had pho and it was amazing!!	1
This wonderful experience made this place a must-stop whenever we are in town again.	1
If the food isn't bad enough for you, then enjoy dealing with the world's worst/annoying drunk people.	0
Very very fun chef.	1
Ordered a double cheeseburger & got a single patty that was falling apart (picture uploaded) Yeah, still sucks.	0
Great place to have a couple drinks and watch any and all sporting events as the walls are covered with TV's.	1
If it were possible to give them zero stars, they'd have it.	0
The descriptions said "yum yum sauce" and another said "eel sauce", yet another said "spicy mayo"...well NONE of the rolls had sauces on them.	0
I'd say that would be the hardest decision... Honestly, all of M's dishes taste how they are supposed to taste (amazing).	1
If she had not rolled the eyes we may have stayed... Not sure if we will go back and try it again.	0
Everyone is very attentive, providing excellent customer service.	1
Horrible - don't waste your time and money.	0
Now this dish was quite flavourful.	1
By this time our side of the restaurant was almost empty so there was no excuse.	0
(It wasn't busy either) Also, the building was FREEZING cold.	0
like the other reviewer said "you couldn't pay me to eat at this place again."	0
-Drinks took close to 30 minutes to come out at one point.	0
Seriously flavorful delights, folks.	1
Much better than the other AYCE sushi place I went to in Vegas.	1
The lighting is just dark enough to set the mood.	1
Based on the sub-par service I received and no effort to show their gratitude for my business I won't be going back.	0
Owner's are really great people.!	1
There is nothing privileged about working/eating there.	0
The Greek dressing was very creamy and flavorful.	1
Overall, I don't think that I would take my parents to this place again because they made most of the similar complaints that I silently felt too.	0
Now the pizza itself was good the peanut sauce was very tasty.	1
We had 7 at our table and the service was pretty fast.	1
Fantastic service here.	1
I as well would've given godfathers zero stars if possible.	0
They know how to make them here.	1
very tough and very short on flavor!	0
I hope this place sticks around.	1
I have been in more than a few bars in Vegas, and do not ever recall being charged for tap water.	0
The restaurant atmosphere was exquisite.	1
Good service, very clean, and inexpensive, to boot!	1
The seafood was fresh and generous in portion.	1
Plus, it's only 8 bucks.	1
The service was not up to par, either.	0
Thus far, have only visited twice and the food was absolutely delicious each time.	1
Just as good as when I had it more than a year ago!	1
For a self proclaimed coffee cafe, I was wildly disappointed.	0
The Veggitarian platter is out of this world!	1
You cant go wrong with any of the food here.	1
You can't beat that.	1
Stopped by this place while in Madison for the Ironman, very friendly, kind staff.	1
The chefs were friendly and did a good job.	1
I've had better, not only from dedicated boba tea spots, but even from Jenni Pho.	0
I liked the patio and the service was outstanding.	1
The goat taco didn't skimp on the meat and wow what FLAVOR!	1
I think not again	0
I had the mac salad and it was pretty bland so I will not be getting that again.	0
I went to Bachi Burger on a friend's recommendation and was not disappointed.	1
Service stinks here!	0
I waited and waited.	0
This place is not quality sushi, it is not a quality restaurant.	0
I would definitely recommend the wings as well as the pizza.	1
Great Pizza and Salads!	1
Things that went wrong: - They burned the saganaki.	0
We waited an hour for what was a breakfast I could have done 100 times better at home.	0
This place is amazing!	1
I hate to disagree with my fellow Yelpers, but my husband and I were so disappointed with this place.	0
Waited 2 hours & never got either of our pizzas as many other around us who came in later did!	0
Just don't know why they were so slow.	0
The staff is great, the food is delish, and they have an incredible beer selection.	1
I live in the neighborhood so I am disappointed I won't be back here, because it is a convenient location.	0
I didn't know pulled pork could be soooo delicious.	1
You get incredibly fresh fish, prepared with care.	1
Before I go in to why I gave a 1 star rating please know that this was my third time eating at Bachi burger before writing a review.	0
I love the fact that everything on their menu is worth it.	1
Never again will I be dining at this place!	0
The food was excellent and service was very good.	1
Good beer & drink selection and good food selection.	1
Please stay away from the shrimp stir fried noodles.	0
The potato chip order was sad... I could probably count how many chips were in that box and it was probably around 12.	0
Food was really boring.	0
Good Service-check!	1
This greedy corporation will NEVER see another dime from me!	0
Will never, ever go back.	0
As much as I'd like to go back, I can't get passed the atrocious service and will never return.	0
In the summer, you can dine in a charming outdoor patio - so very delightful.	1
I did not expect this to be so good!	1
Fantastic food!	1
She ordered a toasted English muffin that came out untoasted.	0
The food was very good.	1
Never going back.	0
Great food for the price, which is very high quality and house made.	1
The bus boy on the other hand was so rude.	0
By this point, my friends and I had basically figured out this place was a joke and didn't mind making it publicly and loudly known.	0
Back to good BBQ, lighter fare, reasonable pricing and tell the public they are back to the old ways.	1
And considering the two of us left there very full and happy for about $20, you just can't go wrong.	1
All the bread is made in-house!	1
The only downside is the service.	0
Also, the fries are without a doubt the worst fries I've ever had.	0
Service was exceptional and food was a good as all the reviews.	1
A couple of months later, I returned and had an amazing meal.	1
Favorite place in town for shawarrrrrrma!!!!!!	1
The black eyed peas and sweet potatoes... UNREAL!	1
You won't be disappointed.	1
They could serve it with just the vinaigrette and it may make for a better overall dish, but it was still very good.	1
I go to far too many places and I've never seen any restaurant that serves a 1 egg breakfast, especially for $4.00.	0
When my mom and I got home she immediately got sick and she only had a few bites of salad.	0
The servers are not pleasant to deal with and they don't always honor Pizza Hut coupons.	0
Both of them were truly unbelievably good, and I am so glad we went back.	1
We had fantastic service, and were pleased by the atmosphere.	1
Everything was gross.	0
I love this place.	1
Great service and food.	1
First - the bathrooms at this location were dirty- Seat covers were not replenished & just plain yucky!!!	0
The burger... I got the "Gold Standard" a $17 burger and was kind of disappointed.	0
OMG, the food was delicioso!	1
There is nothing authentic about this place.	0
the spaghetti is nothing special whatsoever.	0
Of all the dishes, the salmon was the best, but all were great.	1
The vegetables are so fresh and the sauce feels like authentic Thai.	1
It's worth driving up from Tucson!	1
The selection was probably the worst I've seen in Vegas.....there was none.	0
Pretty good beer selection too.	1
This place is like Chipotle, but BETTER.	1
Classy/warm atmosphere, fun and fresh appetizers, succulent steaks (Baseball steak!!!!!	1
5 stars for the brick oven bread app!	1
I have eaten here multiple times, and each time the food was delicious.	1
We sat another ten minutes and finally gave up and left.	0
He was terrible!	0
Everyone is treated equally special.	1
It shouldn't take 30 min for pancakes and eggs.	0
It was delicious!!!	1
On the good side, the staff was genuinely pleasant and enthusiastic - a real treat.	1
Sadly, Gordon Ramsey's Steak is a place we shall sharply avoid during our next trip to Vegas.	0
As always the evening was wonderful and the food delicious!	1
Best fish I've ever had in my life!	1
(The bathroom is just next door and very nice.)	1
The buffet is small and all the food they offered was BLAND.	0
This is an Outstanding little restaurant with some of the Best Food I have ever tasted.	1
Pretty cool I would say.	1
Definitely a turn off for me & i doubt I'll be back unless someone else is buying.	0
Server did a great job handling our large rowdy table.	1
I find wasting food to be despicable, but this just wasn't food.	0
My wife had the Lobster Bisque soup which was lukewarm.	0
Would come back again if I had a sushi craving while in Vegas.	1
The staff are great, the ambiance is great.	1
He deserves 5 stars.	1
I left with a stomach ache and felt sick the rest of the day.	0
They dropped more than the ball.	0
The dining space is tiny, but elegantly decorated and comfortable.	1
They will customize your order any way you'd like, my usual is Eggplant with Green Bean stir fry, love it!	1
And the beans and rice were mediocre at best.	0
Best tacos in town by far!!	1
I took back my money and got outta there.	0
In an interesting part of town, this place is amazing.	1
RUDE & INCONSIDERATE MANAGEMENT.	0
The staff are now not as friendly, the wait times for being served are horrible, no one even says hi for the first 10 minutes.	0
I won't be back.	0
They have great dinners.	1
The service was outshining & I definitely recommend the Halibut.	1
The food was terrible.	0
WILL NEVER EVER GO BACK AND HAVE TOLD MANY PEOPLE WHAT HAD HAPPENED.	0
I don't recommend unless your car breaks down in front of it and you are starving.	0
I will come back here every time I'm in Vegas.	1
This place deserves one star and 90% has to do with the food.	0
This is a disgrace.	0
Def coming back to bowl next time	1
If you want healthy authentic or ethic food, try this place.	1
I will continue to come here on ladies night andddd date night ... highly recommend this place to anyone who is in the area (;	1
I have been here several times in the past, and the experience has always been great.	1
We walked away stuffed and happy about our first Vegas buffet experience.	1
Service was excellent and prices are pretty reasonable considering this is Vegas and located inside the Crystals shopping mall by Aria.	1
To summarize... the food was incredible, nay, transcendant... but nothing brings me joy quite like the memory of the pneumatic condiment dispenser.	1
I'm probably one of the few people to ever go to Ians and not like it.	0
Kids pizza is always a hit too with lots of great side dish options for the kiddos!	1
Service is perfect and the family atmosphere is nice to see.	1
Cooked to perfection and the service was impeccable.	1
This one is simply a disappointment.	0
Overall, I was very disappointed with the quality of food at Bouchon.	0
I don't have to be an accountant to know I'm getting screwed!	0
Great place to eat, reminds me of the little mom and pop shops in the San Francisco Bay Area.	1
Today was my first taste of a Buldogis Gourmet Hot Dog and I have to tell you it was more than I ever thought possible.	1
Left very frustrated.	0
I'll definitely be in soon again.	1
Food was really good and I got full petty fast.	1
Service was fantastic.	1
TOTAL WASTE OF TIME.	0
I don't know what kind it is but they have the best iced tea.	1
Come hungry, leave happy and stuffed!	1
For service, I give them no stars.	0
I can assure you that you won't be disappointed.	1
I can take a little bad service but the food sucks.	0
Gave up trying to eat any of the crust (teeth still sore).	0
But now I was completely grossed out.	0
I really enjoyed eating here.	1
First time going but I think I will quickly become a regular.	1
Our server was very nice, and even though he looked a little overwhelmed with all of our needs, he stayed professional and friendly until the end.	1
From what my dinner companions told me...everything was very fresh with nice texture and taste.	1
On the ground, right next to our table was a large, smeared, been-stepped-in-and-tracked-everywhere pile of green bird poop.	0
Furthermore, you can't even find hours of operation on the website!	0
We've tried to like this place but after 10+ times I think we're done with them.	0
What a mistake that was!	0
No complaints!	1
This is some seriously good pizza and I'm an expert/connisseur on the topic.	1
Waiter was a jerk.	0
Strike 2, who wants to be rushed.	0
These are the nicest restaurant owners I've ever come across.	1
I never come again.	0
We loved the biscuits!!!	1
Service is quick and friendly.	1
Ordered an appetizer and took 40 minutes and then the pizza another 10 minutes.	0
So absolutley fantastic.	1
It was a huge awkward 1.5lb piece of cow that was 3/4ths gristle and fat.	0
definitely will come back here again.	1
I like Steiners because it's dark and it feels like a bar.	1
Wow very spicy but delicious.	1
If you're not familiar, check it out.	1
I'll take my business dinner dollars elsewhere.	0
I'd love to go back.	1
Anyway, this FS restaurant has a wonderful breakfast/lunch.	1
Nothing special.	0
Each day of the week they have a different deal and it's all so delicious!	1
Not to mention the combination of pears, almonds and bacon is a big winner!	1
Will not be back.	0
Sauce was tasteless.	0
The food is delicious and just spicy enough, so be sure to ask for spicier if you prefer it that way.	1
My ribeye steak was cooked perfectly and had great mesquite flavor.	1
I don't think we'll be going back anytime soon.	0
Food was so gooodd.	1
I am far from a sushi connoisseur but I can definitely tell the difference between good food and bad food and this was certainly bad food.	0
I was so insulted.	0
The last 3 times I had lunch here has been bad.	0
The chicken wings contained the driest chicken meat I have ever eaten.	0
The food was very good and I enjoyed every mouthful, an enjoyable relaxed venue for couples small family groups etc.	1
Nargile - I think you are great.	1
Best tater tots in the southwest.	1
We loved the place.	1
Definitely not worth the $3 I paid.	0
The vanilla ice cream was creamy and smooth while the profiterole (choux) pastry was fresh enough.	1
Im in AZ all the time and now have my new spot.	1
The manager was the worst.	0
The inside is really quite nice and very clean.	1
The food was outstanding and the prices were very reasonable.	1
I don't think I'll be running back to Carly's anytime soon for food.	0
This is was due to the fact that it took 20 minutes to be acknowledged, then another 35 minutes to get our food...and they kept forgetting things.	0
Love the margaritas, too!	1
This was my first and only Vegas buffet and it did not disappoint.	1
Very good, though!	1
The one down note is the ventilation could use some upgrading.	0
Great pork sandwich.	1
Don't waste your time here.	0
Total letdown, I would much rather just go to the Camelback Flower Shop and Cartel Coffee.	0
Third, the cheese on my friend's burger was cold.	0
We enjoy their pizza and brunch.	1
The steaks are all well trimmed and also perfectly cooked.	1
We had a group of 70+ when we claimed we would only have 40 and they handled us beautifully.	1
I LOVED it!	1
We asked for the bill to leave without eating and they didn't bring that either.	0
This place is a jewel in Las Vegas, and exactly what I've been hoping to find in nearly ten years living here.	1
Seafood was limited to boiled shrimp and crab legs but the crab legs definitely did not taste fresh.	0
The selection of food was not the best.	0
Delicious and I will absolutely be back!	1
This isn't a small family restaurant, this is a fine dining establishment.	1
They had a toro tartare with a cavier that was extraordinary and I liked the thinly sliced wagyu with white truffle.	1
I dont think I will be back for a very long time.	0
It was attached to a gas station, and that is rarely a good sign.	0
How awesome is that.	1
I will be back many times soon.	1
The menu had so much good stuff on it i could not decide!	1
Worse of all, he humiliated his worker right in front of me..Bunch of horrible name callings.	0
CONCLUSION: Very filling meals.	1
Their daily specials are always a hit with my group.	1
And then tragedy struck.	0
The pancake was also really good and pretty large at that.	1
This was my first crawfish experience, and it was delicious!	1
Their monster chicken fried steak and eggs is my all time favorite.	1
Waitress was sweet and funny.	1
I also had to taste my Mom's multi-grain pumpkin pancakes with pecan butter and they were amazing, fluffy, and delicious!	1
I'd rather eat airline food, seriously.	0
Cant say enough good things about this place.	1
The ambiance was incredible.	1
The waitress and manager are so friendly.	1
I would not recommend this place.	0
Overall I wasn't very impressed with Noca.	0
My gyro was basically lettuce only.	0
Terrible service!	0
Thoroughly disappointed!	0
I don't each much pasta, but I love the homemade /hand made pastas and thin pizzas here.	1
Give it a try, you will be happy you did.	1
By far the BEST cheesecurds we have ever had!	1
Reasonably priced also!	1
Everything was perfect the night we were in.	1
The food is very good for your typical bar food.	1
it was a drive to get there.	0
At first glance it is a lovely bakery cafe - nice ambiance, clean, friendly staff.	1
Anyway, I do not think i will go back there.	0
Point your finger at any item on the menu, order it and you won't be disappointed.	1
Oh this is such a thing of beauty, this restaurant.	1
If you haven't gone here GO NOW!	1
A greasy, unhealthy meal.	0
first time there and might just be the last.	0
Those burgers were amazing.	1
Similarly, the delivery man did not say a word of apology when our food was 45 minutes late.	0
And it was way to expensive.	0
Be sure to order dessert, even if you need to pack it to-go - the tiramisu and cannoli are both to die for.	1
This was my first time and I can't wait until the next.	1
The bartender was also nice.	1
Everything was good and tasty!	1
This place is two thumbs up....way up.	1
The best place in Vegas for breakfast (just check out a Sat, or Sun.	1
If you love authentic Mexican food and want a whole bunch of interesting, yet delicious meats to choose from, you need to try this place.	1
Terrible management.	0
An excellent new restaurant by an experienced Frenchman.	1
If there were zero stars I would give it zero stars.	0
Great steak, great sides, great wine, amazing desserts.	1
Worst martini ever!	0
The steak and the shrimp are in my opinion the best entrees at GC.	1
I had the opportunity today to sample your amazing pizzas!	1
We waited for thirty minutes to be seated (although there were 8 vacant tables and we were the only folks waiting).	0
The yellowtail carpaccio was melt in your mouth fresh.	1
I won't try going back there even if it's empty.	0
No, I'm going to eat the potato that I found some strangers hair in it.	0
Just spicy enough.. Perfect actually.	1
Last night was my second time dining here and I was so happy I decided to go back!	1
not even a "hello, we will be right with you."	0
The desserts were a bit strange.	0
My boyfriend and I came here for the first time on a recent trip to Vegas and could not have been more pleased with the quality of food and service.	1
I really do recommend this place, you can go wrong with this donut place!	1
Nice ambiance.	1
I would recommend saving room for this!	1
I guess maybe we went on an off night but it was disgraceful.	0
However, my recent experience at this particular location was not so good.	0
I know this is not like the other restaurants at all, something is very off here!	0
AVOID THIS ESTABLISHMENT!	0
I think this restaurant suffers from not trying hard enough.	0
All of the tapas dishes were delicious!	1
I *heart* this place.	1
My salad had a bland vinegrette on the baby greens and hearts of Palm.	0
After two I felt disgusting.	0
A good time!	1
I believe that this place is a great stop for those with a huge belly and hankering for sushi.	1
Generous portions and great taste.	1
I will never go back to this place and will never ever recommended this place to anyone!	0
The servers went back and forth several times, not even so much as an "Are you being helped?"	0
Food was delicious!	1
AN HOUR... seriously?	0
I consider this theft.	0
Eew... This location needs a complete overhaul.	0
We recently witnessed her poor quality of management towards other guests as well.	0
Waited and waited and waited.	0
He also came back to check on us regularly, excellent service.	1
Our server was super nice and checked on us many times.	1
The pizza tasted old, super chewy in not a good way.	0
I swung in to give them a try but was deeply disappointed.	0
Service was good and the company was better!	1
The staff are also very friendly and efficient.	1
As for the service: I'm a fan, because it's quick and you're being served by some nice folks.	1
Boy was that sucker dry!!.	0
Over rated.	0
If you look for authentic Thai food, go else where.	0
Their steaks are 100% recommended!	1
After I pulled up my car I waited for another 15 minutes before being acknowledged.	0
Great food and great service in a clean and friendly setting.	1
All in all, I can assure you I'll be back.	1
I hate those things as much as cheap quality black olives.	0
My breakfast was perpared great, with a beautiful presentation of 3 giant slices of Toast, lightly dusted with powdered sugar.	1
The kids play area is NASTY!	0
Great place fo take out or eat in.	1
The waitress was friendly and happy to accomodate for vegan/veggie options.	1
OMG I felt like I had never eaten Thai food until this dish.	1
It was extremely "crumby" and pretty tasteless.	0
It was a pale color instead of nice and char and has NO flavor.	0
The croutons also taste homemade which is an extra plus.	1
I got home to see the driest damn wings ever!	0
It'll be a regular stop on my trips to Phoenix!	1
I really enjoyed Crema Caf before they expanded; I even told friends they had the BEST breakfast.	1
Not good for the money.	0
I miss it and wish they had one in Philadelphia!	1
We got sitting fairly fast, but, ended up waiting 40 minutes just to place our order, another 30 minutes before the food arrived.	0
They also have the best cheese crisp in town.	1
Good value, great food, great service.	1
Couldn't ask for a more satisfying meal.	1
The food is good.	1
It was awesome.	1
I just wanted to leave.	0
We made the drive all the way from North Scottsdale... and I was not one bit disappointed!	1
I will not be eating there again.	0
!....THE OWNERS REALLY REALLY need to quit being soooooo cheap let them wrap my freaking sandwich in two papers not one!	0
I checked out this place a couple years ago and was not impressed.	0
The chicken I got was definitely reheated and was only ok, the wedges were cold and soggy.	0
Sorry, I will not be getting food from here anytime soon :(	0
An absolute must visit!	1
The cow tongue and cheek tacos are amazing.	1
My friend did not like his Bloody Mary.	0
Despite how hard I rate businesses, its actually rare for me to give a 1 star.	0
They really want to make your experience a good one.	1
I will not return.	0
I had the chicken Pho and it tasted very bland.	0
Very disappointing!!!	0
The grilled chicken was so tender and yellow from the saffron seasoning.	1
a drive thru means you do not want to wait around for half an hour for your food, but somehow when we end up going here they make us wait and wait.	0
Pretty awesome place.	1
Ambience is perfect.	1
Best of luck to the rude and non-customer service focused new management.	0
Any grandmother can make a roasted chicken better than this one.	0
I asked multiple times for the wine list and after some time of being ignored I went to the hostess and got one myself.	0
The staff is always super friendly and helpful, which is especially cool when you bring two small boys and a baby!	1
Four stars for the food & the guy in the blue shirt for his great vibe & still letting us in to eat !	1
The roast beef sandwich tasted really good!	1
Same evening, him and I are both drastically sick.	0
High-quality chicken on the chicken Caesar salad.	1
Ordered burger rare came in we'll done.	0
We were promptly greeted and seated.	1
Tried to go here for lunch and it was a madhouse.	0
I was proven dead wrong by this sushi bar, not only because the quality is great, but the service is fast and the food, impeccable.	1
After waiting an hour and being seated, I was not in the greatest of moods.	0
This is a good joint.	1
The Macarons here are insanely good.	1
I'm not eating here!	0
Our waiter was very attentive, friendly, and informative.	1
Maybe if they weren't cold they would have been somewhat edible.	0
This place has a lot of promise but fails to deliver.	0
Very bad Experience!	0
What a mistake.	0
Food was average at best.	0
Great food.	1
We won't be going back anytime soon!	0
Very Very Disappointed ordered the $35 Big Bay Plater.	0
Great place to relax and have an awesome burger and beer.	1
It is PERFECT for a sit-down family meal or get together with a few friends.	1
Not much flavor to them, and very poorly constructed.	0
The patio seating was very comfortable.	1
The fried rice was dry as well.	0
Hands down my favorite Italian restaurant!	1
That just SCREAMS "LEGIT" in my book...somethat's also pretty rare here in Vegas.	1
It was just not a fun experience.	1
The atmosphere was great with a lovely duo of violinists playing songs we requested.	1
I personally love the hummus, pita, baklava, falafels and Baba Ganoush (it's amazing what they do with eggplant!).	1
Very convenient, since we were staying at the MGM!	1
The owners are super friendly and the staff is courteous.	1
Both great!	1
Eclectic selection.	1
The sweet potato tots were good but the onion rings were perfection or as close as I have had.	1
The staff was very attentive.	1
And the chef was generous with his time (even came around twice so we can take pictures with him).	1
The owner used to work at Nobu, so this place is really similar for half the price.	1
Google mediocre and I imagine Smashburger will pop up.	0
dont go here.	0
I promise they won't disappoint.	1
As a sushi lover avoid this place by all means.	0
What a great double cheeseburger!	1
Awesome service and food.	1
A fantastic neighborhood gem !!!	1
I can't wait to go back.	1
The plantains were the worst I've ever tasted.	0
It's a great place and I highly recommend it.	1
Service was slow and not attentive.	0
I gave it 5 stars then, and I'm giving it 5 stars now.	1
Your staff spends more time talking to themselves than me.	0
Dessert: Panna Cotta was amazing.	1
Very good food, great atmosphere.1	1
Damn good steak.	1
Total brunch fail.	0
Prices are very reasonable, flavors are spot on, the sauce is home made, and the slaw is not drenched in mayo.	1
The decor is nice, and the piano music soundtrack is pleasant.	1
The steak was amazing...rge fillet relleno was the best seafood plate i have ever had!	1
Good food , good service .	1
It was absolutely amazing.	1
I probably won't be back, to be honest.	0
will definitely be back!	1
The sergeant pepper beef sandwich with auju sauce is an excellent sandwich as well.	1
Hawaiian Breeze, Mango Magic, and Pineapple Delight are the smoothies that I've tried so far and they're all good.	1
Went for lunch - service was slow.	0
We had so much to say about the place before we walked in that he expected it to be amazing, but was quickly disappointed.	0
I was mortified.	0
Needless to say, we will never be back here again.	0
Anyways, The food was definitely not filling at all, and for the price you pay you should expect more.	0
The chips that came out were dripping with grease, and mostly not edible.	0
I wasn't really impressed with Strip Steak.	0
Have been going since 2007 and every meal has been awesome!!	1
Our server was very nice and attentive as were the other serving staff.	1
The cashier was friendly and even brought the food out to me.	1
I work in the hospitality industry in Paradise Valley and have refrained from recommending Cibo any longer.	0
The atmosphere here is fun.	1
Would not recommend to others.	0
Service is quick and even "to go" orders are just like we like it!	1
I mean really, how do you get so famous for your fish and chips when it's so terrible!?!	0
That said, our mouths and bellies were still quite pleased.	1
Not my thing.	0
2 Thumbs Up!!	1
If you are reading this please don't go there.	0
I loved the grilled pizza, reminded me of legit Italian pizza.	1
Only Pros : Large seating area/ Nice bar area/ Great simple drink menu/ The BEST brick oven pizza with homemade dough!	1
They have a really nice atmosphere.	1
Tonight I had the Elk Filet special...and it sucked.	0
After one bite, I was hooked.	1
We ordered some old classics and some new dishes after going there a few times and were sorely disappointed with everything.	0
Cute, quaint, simple, honest.	1
The chicken was deliciously seasoned and had the perfect fry on the outside and moist chicken on the inside.	1
The food was great as always, compliments to the chef.	1
Special thanks to Dylan T. for the recommendation on what to order :) All yummy for my tummy.	1
Awesome selection of beer.	1
Great food and awesome service!	1
One nice thing was that they added gratuity on the bill since our party was larger than 6 or 8, and they didn't expect more tip than that.	1
A FLY was in my apple juice.. A FLY!!!!!!!!	0
The Han Nan Chicken was also very tasty.	1
As for the service, I thought it was good.	1
The food was barely lukewarm, so it must have been sitting waiting for the server to bring it out to us.	0
Ryan's Bar is definitely one Edinburgh establishment I won't be revisiting.	0
Nicest Chinese restaurant I've been in a while.	1
Overall, I like there food and the service.	1
They also now serve Indian naan bread with hummus and some spicy pine nut sauce that was out of this world.	1
Probably never coming back, and wouldn't recommend it.	0
Friend's pasta -- also bad, he barely touched it.	0
Try them in the airport to experience some tasty food and speedy, friendly service.	1
I love the decor with the Chinese calligraphy wall paper.	1
Never had anything to complain about here.	1
The restaurant is very clean and has a family restaurant feel to it.	1
It was way over fried.	0
I'm not sure how long we stood there but it was long enough for me to begin to feel awkwardly out of place.	0
When I opened the sandwich, I was impressed, but not in a good way.	0
Will not be back!	0
There was a warm feeling with the service and I felt like their guest for a special treat.	1
An extensive menu provides lots of options for breakfast.	1
I always order from the vegetarian menu during dinner, which has a wide array of options to choose from.	1
I have watched their prices inflate, portions get smaller and management attitudes grow rapidly!	0
Wonderful lil tapas and the ambience made me feel all warm and fuzzy inside.	1
I got to enjoy the seafood salad, with a fabulous vinegrette.	1
The wontons were thin, not thick and chewy, almost melt in your mouth.	1
Level 5 spicy was perfect, where spice didn't over-whelm the soup.	1
We were sat right on time and our server from the get go was FANTASTIC!	1
Main thing I didn't enjoy is that the crowd is of older crowd, around mid 30s and up.	0
When I'm on this side of town, this will definitely be a spot I'll hit up again!	1
I had to wait over 30 minutes to get my drink and longer to get 2 arepas.	0
This is a GREAT place to eat!	1
The jalapeno bacon is soooo good.	1
The service was poor and thats being nice.	0
Food was good, service was good, Prices were good.	1
The place was not clean and the food oh so stale!	0
The chicken dishes are OK, the beef is like shoe leather.	0
But the service was beyond bad.	0
I'm so happy to be here!!!"	1
Tasted like dirt.	0
One of the few places in Phoenix that I would definately go back to again .	1
The block was amazing.	1
It's close to my house, it's low-key, non-fancy, affordable prices, good food.	1
* Both the Hot & Sour & the Egg Flower Soups were absolutely 5 Stars!	1
My sashimi was poor quality being soggy and tasteless.	0
Great time - family dinner on a Sunday night.	1
the food is not tasty at all, not to say its "real traditional Hunan style".	0
What did bother me, was the slow service.	0
The flair bartenders are absolutely amazing!	1
Their frozen margaritas are WAY too sugary for my taste.	0
These were so good we ordered them twice.	1
So in a nutshell: 1) The restaraunt smells like a combination of a dirty fish market and a sewer.	0
My girlfriend's veal was very bad.	0
Unfortunately, it was not good.	0
I had a pretty satifying experience.	1
Join the club and get awesome offers via email.	1
Perfect for someone (me) who only likes beer ice cold, or in this case, even colder.	1
Bland and flavorless is a good way of describing the barely tepid meat.	0
The chains, which I'm no fan of, beat this place easily.	0
The nachos are a MUST HAVE!	1
We will not be coming back.	0
I don't have very many words to say about this place, but it does everything pretty well.	1
The staff is super nice and very quick even with the crazy crowds of the downtown juries, lawyers, and court staff.	1
Great atmosphere, friendly and fast service.	1
When I received my Pita it was huge it did have a lot of meat in it so thumbs up there.	1
Once your food arrives it's meh.	0
Paying $7.85 for a hot dog and fries that looks like it came out of a kid's meal at the Wienerschnitzel is not my idea of a good meal.	0
The classic Maine Lobster Roll was fantastic.	1
My brother in law who works at the mall ate here same day, and guess what he was sick all night too.	0
So good I am going to have to review this place twice - once hereas a tribute to the place and once as a tribute to an event held here last night.	1
The chips and salsa were really good, the salsa was very fresh.	1
This place is great!!!!!!!!!!!!!!	1
Mediocre food.	0
Once you get inside you'll be impressed with the place.	1
I'm super pissd.	0
And service was super friendly.	1
Why are these sad little vegetables so overcooked?	0
This place was such a nice surprise!	1
They were golden-crispy and delicious.	1
I had high hopes for this place since the burgers are cooked over a charcoal grill, but unfortunately the taste fell flat, way flat.	0
I could eat their bruschetta all day it is devine.	1
Not a single employee came out to see if we were OK or even needed a water refill once they finally served us our food.	0
Lastly, the mozzarella sticks, they were the best thing we ordered.	1
The first time I ever came here I had an amazing experience, I still tell people how awesome the duck was.	1
The server was very negligent of our needs and made us feel very unwelcome... I would not suggest this place!	0
The service was terrible though.	0
This place is overpriced, not consistent with their boba, and it really is OVERPRICED!	0
It was packed!!	0
I love this place.	1
I can say that the desserts were yummy.	1
The food was terrible.	0
The seasonal fruit was fresh white peach puree.	1
It kept getting worse and worse so now I'm officially done.	0
This place should honestly be blown up.	0
But I definitely would not eat here again.	0
Do not waste your money here!	0
I love that they put their food in nice plastic containers as opposed to cramming it in little paper takeout boxes.	1
The crpe was delicate and thin and moist.	1
Awful service.	0
Won't ever go here again.	0
Food quality has been horrible.	0
For that price I can think of a few place I would have much rather gone.	0
The service here is fair at best.	0
I do love sushi, but I found Kabuki to be over-priced, over-hip and under-services.	0
Do yourself a favor and stay away from this dish.	0
Very poor service.	0
No one at the table thought the food was above average or worth the wait that we had for it.	0
Best service and food ever, Maria our server was so good and friendly she made our day.	1
They were excellent.	1
I paid the bill but did not tip because I felt the server did a terrible job.	0
Just had lunch here and had a great experience.	1
I have never had such bland food which surprised me considering the article we read focused so much on their spices and flavor.	0
Food is way overpriced and portions are fucking small.	0
I recently tried Caballero's and I have been back every week since!	1
for 40 bucks a head, i really expect better food.	0
The food came out at a good pace.	1
I ate there twice on my last visit, and especially enjoyed the salmon salad.	1
I won't be back.	0
We could not believe how dirty the oysters were!	0
This place deserves no stars.	0
I would not recommend this place.	0
In fact I'm going to round up to 4 stars, just because she was so awesome.	1
To my disbelief, each dish qualified as the worst version of these foods I have ever tasted.	0
Bad day or not, I have a very low tolerance for rude customer service people, it is your job to be nice and polite, wash dishes otherwise!!	0
the potatoes were great and so was the biscuit.	1
I probably would not go here again.	0
So flavorful and has just the perfect amount of heat.	1
The price is reasonable and the service is great.	1
The Wife hated her meal (coconut shrimp), and our friends really did not enjoy their meals, either.	0
My fella got the huevos rancheros and they didn't look too appealing.	0
Went in for happy hour, great list of wines.	1
Some may say this buffet is pricey but I think you get what you pay for and this place you are getting quite a lot!	1
I probably won't be coming back here.	0
Worst food/service I've had in a while.	0
This place is pretty good, nice little vibe in the restaurant.	1
Talk about great customer service of course we will be back.	1
Hot dishes are not hot, cold dishes are close to room temp.I watched staff prepare food with BARE HANDS, no gloves.Everything is deep fried in oil.	0
I love their fries and their beans.	1
Always a pleasure dealing with him.	1
They have a plethora of salads and sandwiches, and everything I've tried gets my seal of approval.	1
This place is awesome if you want something light and healthy during the summer.	1
For sushi on the Strip, this is the place to go.	1
The service was great, even the manager came and helped with our table.	1
The feel of the dining room was more college cooking course than high class dining and the service was slow at best.	0
I started this review with two stars, but I'm editing it to give it only one.	0
this is the worst sushi i have ever eat besides Costco's.	0
All in all an excellent restaurant highlighted by great service, a unique menu, and a beautiful setting.	1
My boyfriend and i sat at the bar and had a completely delightful experience.	1
Weird vibe from owners.	0
There was hardly any meat.	0
I've had better bagels from the grocery store.	0
Go To Place for Gyros.	1
I love the owner/chef, his one authentic Japanese cool dude!	1
Now the burgers aren't as good, the pizza which used to be amazing is doughy and flavorless.	0
I found a six inch long piece of wire in my salsa.	0
The service was terrible, food was mediocre.	0
We definately enjoyed ourselves.	1
I ordered Albondigas soup - which was just warm - and tasted like tomato soup with frozen meatballs.	0
On three different occasions I asked for well done or medium well, and all three times I got the bloodiest piece of meat on my plate.	0
I had about two bites and refused to eat anymore.	0
The service was extremely slow.	0
After 20 minutes wait, I got a table.	0
Seriously killer hot chai latte.	1
No allergy warnings on the menu, and the waitress had absolutely no clue as to which meals did or did not contain peanuts.	0
My boyfriend tried the Mediterranean Chicken Salad and fell in love.	1
Their rotating beers on tap is also a highlight of this place.	1
Pricing is a bit of a concern at Mellow Mushroom.	0
Worst Thai ever.	0
If you stay in Vegas you must get breakfast here at least once.	1
I want to first say our server was great and we had perfect service.	1
The pizza selections are good.	1
I had strawberry tea, which was good.	1
Highly unprofessional and rude to a loyal patron!	0
Overall, a great experience.	1
Spend your money elsewhere.	0
Their regular toasted bread was equally satisfying with the occasional pats of butter... Mmmm...!	1
The Buffet at Bellagio was far from what I anticipated.	0
And the drinks are WEAK, people!	0
-My order was not correct.	0
Also, I feel like the chips are bought, not made in house.	0
After the disappointing dinner we went elsewhere for dessert.	0
The chips and sals a here is amazing!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!	1
We won't be returning.	0
This is my new fav Vegas buffet spot.	1
I seriously cannot believe that the owner has so many unexperienced employees that all are running around like chickens with their heads cut off.	0
Very, very sad.	0
i felt insulted and disrespected, how could you talk and judge another human being like that?	0
How can you call yourself a steakhouse if you can't properly cook a steak, I don't understand!	0
I'm not impressed with the concept or the food.	0
The only thing I wasn't too crazy about was their guacamole as I don't like it pured.	0
There is really nothing for me at postinos, hope your experience is better	0
I got food poisoning here at the buffet.	0
They brought a fresh batch of fries and I was thinking yay something warm but no!	0
What SHOULD have been a hilarious, yummy Christmas Eve dinner to remember was the biggest fail of the entire trip for us.	0
Needless to say, I won't be going back anytime soon.	0
This place is disgusting!	0
Every time I eat here, I see caring teamwork to a professional degree.	1
The RI style calamari was a joke.	0
However, there was so much garlic in the fondue, it was barely edible.	0
I could barely stomach the meal, but didn't complain because it was a business lunch.	0
It was so bad, I had lost the heart to finish it.	0
It also took her forever to bring us the check when we asked for it.	0
We aren't ones to make a scene at restaurants but I just don't get it...definitely lost the love after this one!	0
Disappointing experience.	0
The food is about on par with Denny's, which is to say, not good at all.	0
If you want to wait for mediocre food and downright terrible service, then this is the place for you.	0
WAAAAAAyyyyyyyyyy over rated is all I am saying.	0
We won't be going back.	0
The place was fairly clean but the food simply wasn't worth it.	0
This place lacked style!!	0
The sangria was about half of a glass wine full and was $12, ridiculous.	0
Don't bother coming here.	0
The meat was pretty dry, I had the sliced brisket and pulled pork.	0
The building itself seems pretty neat; the bathroom is pretty trippy, but I wouldn't eat here again.	0
It was equally awful.	0
Probably not in a hurry to go back.	0
very slow at seating even with reservation.	0
Not good by any stretch of the imagination.	0
The cashew cream sauce was bland and the vegetables were undercooked.	0
The chipolte ranch dipping sause was tasteless, seemed thin and watered down with no heat.	0
It was a bit too sweet, not really spicy enough, and lacked flavor.	0
I was VERY disappointed!!	0
This place is horrible and way overpriced.	0
Maybe it's just their Vegetarian fare, but I've been twice and I thought it was average at best.	0
It wasn't busy at all and now we know why.	0
The tables outside are also dirty a lot of the time and the workers are not always friendly and helpful with the menu.	0
The ambiance here did not feel like a buffet setting, but more of a douchey indoor garden for tea and biscuits.	0
Con: spotty service.	0
The fries were not hot, and neither was my burger.	0
But then they came back cold.	0
Then our food came out, disappointment ensued.	0
The real disappointment was our waiter.	0
My husband said she was very rude... did not even apologize for the bad food or anything.	0
The only reason to eat here would be to fill up before a night of binge drinking just to get some carbs in your stomach.	0
Insults, profound deuchebaggery, and had to go outside for a smoke break while serving just to solidify it.	0
If someone orders two tacos don't' you think it may be part of customer service to ask if it is combo or ala cart?	0
She was quite disappointed although some blame needs to be placed at her door.	0
After all the rave reviews I couldn't wait to eat here......what a disappointment!	0
Del Taco is pretty nasty and should be avoided if possible.	0
It's NOT hard to make a decent hamburger.	0
But I don't like it.	0
Hell no will I go back	0
We've have gotten a much better service from the pizza place next door than the services we received from this restaurant.	0
I don't know what the big deal is about this place, but I won't be back "ya'all".	0
I immediately said I wanted to talk to the manager but I did not want to talk to the guy who was doing shots of fireball behind the bar.	0
The ambiance isn't much better.	0
Unfortunately, it only set us up for disapppointment with our entrees.	0
The food wasn't good.	0
Your servers suck, wait, correction, our server Heimer sucked.	0
What happened next was pretty....off putting.	0
too bad cause I know it's family owned, I really wanted to like this place.	0
Overpriced for what you are getting.	0
I vomited in the bathroom mid lunch.	0
I kept looking at the time and it had soon become 35 minutes, yet still no food.	0
I have been to very few places to eat that under no circumstances would I ever return to, and this tops the list.	0
We started with the tuna sashimi which was brownish in color and obviously wasn't fresh.	0
Food was below average.	0
It sure does beat the nachos at the movies but I would expect a little bit more coming from a restaurant.	0
All in all, Ha Long Bay was a bit of a flop.	0
The problem I have is that they charge $11.99 for a sandwich that is no bigger than a Subway sub (which offers better and more amount of vegetables).	0
Shrimp- When I unwrapped it (I live only 1/2 a mile from Brushfire) it was literally ice cold.	0
It lacked flavor, seemed undercooked, and dry.	0
It really is impressive that the place hasn't closed down.	0
I would avoid this place if you are staying in the Mirage.	0
The refried beans that came with my meal were dried out and crusty and the food was bland.	0
Spend your money and time some place else.	0
A lady at the table next to us found a live green caterpillar In her salad.	0
the presentation of the food was awful.	0
I can't tell you how disappointed I was.	0
I think food should have flavor and texture and both were lacking.	0
Appetite instantly gone.	0
Overall I was not impressed and would not go back.	0
The whole experience was underwhelming, and I think we'll just go to Ninja Sushi next time.	0
Then, as if I hadn't wasted enough of my life there, they poured salt in the wound by drawing out the time it took to bring the check.	0
hey guys tommorow is the last day of my exams i'm so happy yay
never been this down on myself in my entire life.
 chick gets fucked hottest naked lady
i say we because i'm speaking collectively. i've always known. 2016 showed a lot.  and
wish we could talk
food time for haylie  hot chocolate for mummy  thank god it's friday!!!
tomorrow will be fun! seeing an old friend and then shooting something super fun:)
my granddaughter's 1st bihday is tomorrow.  going to pick her play house, little car, &amp; pool today.
  loving each other every day
i saw she's craying coz her baby so hard to breath     strong yeah baby god with (at kaika medical center)
blessed to hear morning chorus, good morning the people.   friday
aunti mi, where do you find this hilarious posts?  is nigeria not in enough trouble?
   greatbritain: all eyes on the skies as rafredarrows fly past the mall to say
i'm getting more hours at work for my training. i'm so
great to see you! look forward to welcoming you to digme
ya know guys, i was feeling stressed out after the donut thing. i just feel so happy when i know 96 followers are sticking with me.
she was just loving him and he just saw her as a temporary setup.
colourpop !!!
drive in to see grease &amp; footloose
water why?
4u nonhockey people. hockeys babe ruth died. gordie howe was beyond myth and legend. hockey has lost mr. hockey.
i just sent a msg to my aunt in peru and told her to wish my grandpa and uncles a happy father's day but didn't include my dad.
phil spencer criticizes sony? of course! what else would you do when you just got slapped in the face by sony's huge 40 million+ dick!
happy mother's day to ppl.
i love her
about to watch these movies alone
"i'm his princess."  me: i'm no one's princess...sadly.
laughing at the fact that all you mfz use this app to talk about what u feel inside for other people to see it haha
if you cut anyone with english dna in half you well find  written inside them.
when people are so old and bored they resolve to bullying others over twitter
i messed up my nails
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
kaya, but no class.
glad to live here, my   place
the price of a stolen payment-card record has dropped from $25 in 2011 to $6 in 2016. this is why ransomware is on the rise
it's been a while since the last time i drank hard liquor. now, with officemates!
how many more innocent people have to die while ceain politicians choose to ignore the hate and refuse to even discuss gun control
it's almost been a week since i saw the strokes i am
me see picture of dog today   smile face :) i tweet good now
sometimes it takes a while to realize how a person really fits in your life.   - a friend - soon to be boss
back to the day job for shane lowry!    more &gt;&gt;
not only am i third wheeling at cold stone right now, but i used a buy one get one free coupon on myself.
"simply assault" is equal to spitting on someone. authoritys got the charges all wrong. these guy will walk
cleveland fans look !
over 30,000 arrests daily in us;over 160,000 police-civilian encounters daily. shootings,"abuse" extremely rare,tho
now people judge you by colour and english accent ,
i'm guessing chip hills doesn't teach their kids how to spell....... mp might be just a little hard for u
i've got wine, v.happy!!
you are sleeping and i crying...
enslavement of animals is not okay.
it's so dark :(
so many hash tags
think happy. stay happy.
recognize &amp; acknowledge your relationships  god gives you what you need to succeed!
have no idea who she is but what a stupid comment to make. was she inviting response?  death is not a sideshow
when u rip off your front bumper of your mazzi on a curb   day buddy
still no women. wow so .
only staed reading about him the last few days, but first signing of the summer.
  fathers day... i love my dad.. may he live long ameennn.. my is my lifeee
chatter girls and guided chocies' alicia marcos birong will be on the radio sholy. click on the link below!
 , horse, maximus
the littlest things make me  .
god see you all.  u no wan hype father's day.  . smh
said it b4. world is encashing it, whereas india is loosing it's legacy due bickering &amp; politicisation of yoga
photos from last year  !
he says his dad made him a better dad. how can he say that when his dad gave up on his brother &amp; his niece/nephew?
now playing  :  joe bongiorno - " mystical" on     music song
why is it when i try to do something good for myself i always end up feeling like shit and hating myself?
tomorrow i sta planning for my niece or nephew's baby shower
resilience is your capacity to recover quickly from feeling deflated, don't beat your self with the past stay
refuse to bake a cake on your convictions and get convicted in cou.  sell aboed baby pas &amp; get rewarded.
it's not everybody that necessarily want to admit they liked gej. some are too ashamed to associate wt him
twitter has not been kind to me recently. i have been going on here ignored!
in one week exactly i'll be at edc
while bob marley sang songs of  and humanity most youths ths days knw him coz he used to smoke weed..
imagine being a grown man and wanting to be a hooligan.
i love my life and i'm lucky. i should give thanks for these facts more often.
specially trained officer stops two angry dogs without violence [video]
having to stay at my grandma's to help because she had surgery 2day, and she is crazy, plus i am without internet.
in the queue
 enjoying russian rock music while cleaning kitchen and making popcorn and lemonade.  yes, at 2:00am est.
fine, but williams is non relevant
happy anniversary to the crisafulli's.
if you want to be holy, be wholly committed to god. you will be   as a result.  - greg laurie
  happy father's day to all the great dads in nascar through the years: happy father's day. dale earnhar...
 ,happy day!
so much of this.
day 44:   to finally get to meet ms.yee this morning even though it was for a while only!
 sex videos sexy lady fucked hard pics
thinking about old friends and unfounate circumstances today. sending out love, good wishes, and hope for the future
  father's day  i don't have one.
just witnessed an 8 year old being a grandmother to tears with his huful words
since 1965 voting rights act dems have been blaming republicans 4 being biggots! new buzz word is racist!
takeaway ordered!!
so i'm starving to love right so i can see all my love ones in heaven!!
alas life isnt as easy as pressing  computer keys !!
1 of my biggest dream came true today.details coming tonight
you did more than say you were offended. you were insulting, yet now try to back out like a victim. white privilege
find your   place
see you at 100, america.
yeah....not just   ! haaaappppyyyyyy
where is your   place???
someone has to and it stas tomorrow
good user :d
udta punjab the film is circulating faster in my hostel than drugs in punjab
it's only 70 minutes left!
love my new rod!!
thread outlines the evolution of alt-right movement via russia, focusing on one member.
niggas would fck over they boy just to hit some pussy
first of todays bifolds fitted in watford  customer
: ) :  you decide!  happiness is all in the perception of the mind.  life flows where focus goes.   life
looking forward to meeting my baby boy in 12 hours!
  sex blonde bj naked
  to be launching our animal adoption today at our strawberry fayre
i find it so sad how celebrities that have a huge fandom and that are members of the lgbt community havent comment on the shooting
area man hates himself, blames twitter users for noticing he's a pos.
yellow bones girls on porn   hardcore tracks
i'm a side guy without a home
its a shame i cant watch 24h le mans on tv.  &amp;annoying
i'll be in sydney, from the usa, rooting for john scott while wearing a canadian jersey.
want to be  ?  |
that big warm shoulder to cry on   father's day
  friday  weekend working  fasting  (at bca)
first time that i'm taking the bus to work from the new house... let's see how this goes.
i'm back! lets sta twitting again!!
ghost adventures time fo macahur   nichole xx
eeek! week today until i pick up my furbaby!!!!
wow!  trumps crowd. half the size of bernie turned hillary suppoers crowd.
too many tools out there, same functions..
"i could make almost 100,000 a year in tennessee." "yeah, honey." "we can't stay here forever, not in west virginia." "i know."
wohoooo staup weekend sibu and staup weekend miri is coming in q3  yall! and mega staup sarawak end of this year!
"happy" by happy     lyrics
  bihday sexy girl adults hentai
they have found the child's body still intact, the only hope is that it can bring some closure for the family
why i didn't saw the hatchling's shos in the  birdsmovie? the reason is because i viewed the film earlier than it shall be. i'm  .
if you have family that causes problems in your relationships and pick on your friends for no reason. . .you have a horrific life.
controlled by love &amp; hip-hop and gangster rap music
i know that is one of "my squirrels" and the mate is nowhere to be found. :( mother nature was a bitch over night.
  father's day to all fathers and potential fathers.
after clinton's defeat, what's the path for future women presidential cands?  what?didnt lose bc of gender.
they still aren't seeing my messages...
housefull is all about the jokes v made on hindi movie's english subtitles!it feels good at the sta but repeated jokes make it
thank you, ahmed. god bless you
tattoos &amp; titles mean more to mental slaves than actions do
well i finally got an interview for a job. don't want to say were in case i don't get the job. let's hope my interview goes well.
just another day fresh off work ...   fathers day to all the real fathers... not you sperm
2016- white man can act like a kid on twitter is called passionate, but when a black man says he would win, he has an ego.
just got back the final mix of lost love the 1st release from my upcoming project
  coco reveals the secrets to keeping ice-t happy: "he needs his massages": you give him that time and h...
shit like this makes me so  ! 2 wrongs don't make a right but this is disgusting..  put all these...
today on the age newspaper!  &lt;little biography about myself and the food piqueos
that was fast
damn. what caused it?! man....so sad!
how joss stone saved a little boy slowly being turned into stone
are you living  ?  jenningswire
why it's only time for voter awareness during the election...
visiting my apament for the first time tomorrow
really wanted to win that joker statue
so, yeah -- i fear for our country this election.  none of the mainstream candidates are woh anything.
such a beautiful morning in alabama... it's a great day to create my video for youtube!!!
aw damn, i thought wwdc was today.
the best is yet to come only if u have faith   tbt guys
why anthony just called me a "nasty bitch" omg my feelings are so hu
pop! and just like that magic happened!
a happy day is one well lived
finally trying to do some music after watching many tutorials
  tweet. amid all the misery let me mention: 23-7 (and the series -v- the aussies) and murray 5 x champion. look for the positives!!
  happy hour of the week: cena modern italian restaurant: the caprese salad is $6 during happy hour, and...
orlando nightclub shooting: 50 killed in domestic terror incident at gay club; gunman identified
well today begins a new week. with new possibilities
it seems he has zero intellect to understand science
exit of a legend...... rest in peace coach amodu shaibu.
why do all of the good looking gfx forums have to have registration disabled? i need to find one to join so i can talk to other gfxers!
and you wonder why every year sucks? lol
magic words!...'your aussiebum order has been dispatched'.
got rid of 7 pairs of heels. moving onto boots now..  making space for these louboutin i want
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i'll sta to write down the names now.
5 days ago i told you all this series is over. i called the sweep but i was wrong....
and a shout out to all fathers out there.  fathers day....
another university caves to liberal whiners  this generation is pathetic, grow up
  father's day
starbucks makes my macchiato a small latte &gt; 50% of the time
time to right my wrongs. time to sta filling those knowledge and procedural gaps that my self-teaching experience has created.
that be the best except i need a s at the end   family
people don't know how to talk on the phone anymore smh
  liverpool's daniel sturridge happy to fight for england place at euro 2016: liverpool's daniel sturrid...
pougal so unlucky this tournament
nowadays, niggas messier than bitches
got my passpo now ready to go wherever i want
it's here!   treating myself to a saturday afternoon cuppa and half hour read!
you hit it right on the nail it's no way n the hell i'm agreeing to share !
spending my bihday with this handsome guy.
you always waiting on a damn text
england didn't win so they fight?
  tuesday po ingat
that would be 'culture' as shohand for 'brown skin': camber sands deaths blamed on victims' 'culture'
alabama county refuses to lower flag to honor orlando shooting victims. why has been lowered for enteainer
where is the waterfront at surulere?
did you know that mormons teach that you are born black because of sins in the previous existence!
  after sex sexy teen sandy fuck
it's new years eve. give  a rest.
fun! thanks for sharing your jumping joy :)
 herschberg: it's all about the     mysodotcom
hi there hope you are well and thank you very much for your suppo. a   friday and  weekend to you
good morning kenya   friday
soon i'll have couple of profit centers!and able to recruit some people as full time employees!
sad songs can actually cheer you up
chhhheeeeesseee  i come home to this face everyday
i allways was the naiv and good girl. people lie to me, hu me and used me. wish someone would hug me...
yea just got cheated on... and you fukkin blame me.. i don't understand just be loyal females!
donald your unfavorability rating is 70%
happy bihday jj   bihday jj
a mtf can have how many kids they want by their man, it's you bitches keeping these babies by other mtf men. just to make the next hu
fuck you cunt   :(
florida breaking my hea since 1998 - what a terrible week
i just bought a brand new chelsea jersey from one of my friends who orders the wrong size and didn't want to send it back
what a beautifull race, 8th place today! won the sprint of the second group, good sta i think
if you know me...you know i love me some mary poppins. and this quote is so true
i might buy a big girl car tomorrow and i'm
dont wanna go to sleep but work tomorrow. questioning my ability to prioritize my interests in music and my professional career
one very special person  fathers day
i finally got my anastasia beverly hills glow kit and the brow definer
any man can have kids but it takes a real man to raise his children   fathersday
i wanted to eat a slice this morning but i stopped myself.
  sex stories fatsex with teenage
  very . need to get out more.
welcome to my world
can't watch finding dory because i have to pick up my mom
it hits me. more often than not.
can't wait til next yr hihi
horrible news to wake up to. another senseless act of terror. prayers for all in the orlando shooting
boasty tuesday last night....
specially trained officer stops two angry dogs without violence [video]
  chef role come on, get happy!: are you ready to get really really happy! this is the last role you wil...
sharapova's 2 year ban from tennis is 4x longer is then the pathetic jail sentence for the stanford rapist brock turner.
it's a lovely day!    looking for a miracle
be so good they cant ignore you.    fathers day
massive disappointment. worst 2 hrs in trek history. nothing holds up. not "need my pain." not "god starship."
still an iphone not that deep lol
c'mon, get happy: 7 happy expressions defined by
life ain't always beautiful, but it's a beautiful ride!
 naked woman fairy adult
10 fields to consider if you want to be your own boss
i didn't even know billy paul died this year. r.i.p to one of my favorite soul singers.
when ur bff think ur only nice when ur intoxicated
just beautiful...! looking forward to visiting again soon!
we used to have a domestic terrorism section in the fbi; it is now fractured because of the political correctness under obama
i think you know you've found the right one when you can have marilyn monroe films playing with a backdrop of him mixing house music!
"im a server, not your sex toy: some advice to the next dude who wants to comment on my looks"
feeling   for many many reasons today xxx it's a good feeling xxx
stalker like a motherfucker. even reads my s.
  hardcore sets naked leg spread
today was the sta of many new adventures
it's already been a week and i feel that the media already forgot orlando
all the new dates + courses, hot off the press!
i have everything so far right now i asked the universe for it might not be exactly how i want it but it feels absolutely amazing
bernie firing 95% staff today. meeting w obama tomorrow. if he shuts up sure they will have saudis pay campaign debt
  pussy indian sex girls
on my way to see my best friend from grade school
can't believe i just meet these guys at pride   pride
lol i just got a lemonade and shake from sonic:)
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
 video men and women malay teeny tiny anal sex
only group i wanna marginalize is isis....killing christians in a genocide over there, killing citizens here.
hoes gonna be hoes. that will never change.
saw mr. knab
chris brown tonight
only 741 retweets in over half a day   that's because gun owners like my hubby &amp; me don't respect your fanaticism
wow! can't believe i'm on people magazine!
now playing  :  oskar schuster - " les sablons" on     music song
shooting the hooch tomorrow!!!
all my life i was seeking for someone i can call my own..  ..!
  turkey will be happy with draw against spain at euro 2016: nice, france (ap) - turkey will be happy wi...
 it's vital to address porn's influence when discussing , sexual abuse, and demeaning language about women.
i can finally give david a proper bath !
happy father's day to all the amazing dads out there! can't wait to next year to celebrate with our little pea
book, bed, pj's.
when you think you are gonna get to tan/swim and then people f*** s*** up
popular youtuber adam saleh ejected from delta flight for speaking arabic
last basketball game .....
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
y'all gone stay in this lil town forever, without ever exploring you "getting money "to flex for people you knew all your life
no matter who you are, the world will still judge you for your color like these celebs were
i'm a pretty strong believer that guns don't kill people, people do. but the world is full of so many messed up people.....
of these years nought remains in memory but the sad feeling that we have advanced and only grown older. ~max muller
i need to stop answering my work phone when i am not on shift.  midnight service call has made me not create tasty food for today.
sometimes i forget it's summer and wonder why i don't have a backpack
fla...too beautiful... i cant find words more.... congrats! fla &amp; fabio...
wow, far fall for jack del rio
today is a good day to try to be happy :d.
"whoever is   will make others happy too."  anne frank
black girls are beautiful but then you have these that don't gaf about what they do and how they look &amp; niggas define y'all that way
see you tomorrow
good morning everyone.
when everyone is getting off work and you still got a solid 7 hour shift ahead of you
obamas former christian outreach director calls evangelicals misogynist, , islamophobes -
learning about mayte lara  &amp; larissa mainez's story, it's really sad how people don't care about individuals who strive to be great!
game 7 sunday, then the draft is next!
that's true.  i guess the college kids are all too stoned to show up now that they legalized pot.
dope summer song
i heard that the carnival is on sume lame shit this year
liiiikeeee: ain't no gator doin' for that baby what a gorilla might   *cough - tarzan - cough* - not the case here. smh.
  we happy few coming to xbox one preview next month: a long opening section for we happy few from compu...
  couple having sex big black women porn videos
 i only got a few friend an ex that will show they care so i take care of them.
why did i just saw this now
 fucking russian women xxx
is this your pick up line?
bet someone no ones ever gonna see my tweers ever
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
absolutely devastating. deputies: child dragged into water by gator near disney's grand floridian
why is that females continue to dislike you after y'all settle beef or whatever. they still will do anything to catch your attention.
povey pete may seem poor on the outside, but he he still can eat tacos. that makes him
oye shikari...full shikar mood e. u r looking gorgeous in the shikari song..tell shakib he is lookin brilliant.
she fuckin' with a fuckboy
live um 17:00 uhr: happy shooting info:  stream:   -shooting
the more u try to b perfect, is tha more ur flaws keep escaping! like maggots making their way out of corps
whenever the brain &amp; hea fight, it's always the liver who suffers!!  cheers!!
so   right now :) can't stop smiling! :)
i love my new job so so much!!!!
  making myself happy! have a good weekend :)
when there is no communication the world explodes
blind boy asked what is this music about? i answered that there is childrens dancing. he said "how nice" with happy face. that made me
family &amp; friends turning up again  this weekend  all good drink your money away, i'll be eating steak tomorrow
53 people lost there life lastnite i send prayer to all the families
a&amp;e cancels controversial unscripted series "escaping the kkk"
sirdabalot no sweat, we're happy to see it.
when fireworks look huge from over a mile and a half away, you know those are impressive fireworks
looks like fun
very sad news about labour mp jo cox. what is the world coming to when you think its right to stamp, stab, shot someone in the street.
there is no place like home!!
prepping for la/e3,  !
what a fab and exciting day!!! :)
wait, i aint buy a ticket for a show at vincy mas this year but done spends $100s on crop over events.  . there is still time. need $ tho
my hea hu!!!
and it's friday. this princess is going to enjoy ....  because that's what a princess does. :)
a stark reminder, if you build your biz, audience or content on a 3rd pay platform you're 100% exposed to risk!
yay, i'm so happy with google i could scream!
see how   leaders became crorepatis overnight... an ht expose
i'm drowning here and you're describing the water
oh you, tweeting only the most impoant life events :^)
aww you're adorable
ooh tattoo has been bought forward a week! 2 weeks today and i'll be spoing some new ink
 representations of women in men's alcohol ads blowjobs brutal
wish you all the happiest ramadhan    fasting  [pic]
chilling with my son   father's day
thank you for your kind words, meghan and the pic! this was the pa when i showed the audience my bald spot. :-)
smiling has a positive effect on racist and  first impressions -
age has little to do with it. people like donald trump don't "change" when they are foy either.
auschwitz survivor looking for twin not seen since 1945
she must have gone through her twitter feed after publishing that trashtastic aicle and blocked all of her critics
worst mass shooting in american history...
i am happy.
like what you hear? join us tonight for our summer conce!
one of those days where you remember what it feels like to be   and you forget about
gonna eat well in preparation for tomorrow!!   plus a potential employer wants my transcripts already so i'll pick that up tomorrow 2
planning my bihday week with my husband
today our work space becomes a casino!  !
only been back in melbs a few hours and already got a new job staing first thing tomorrow
when you want to talk to a real person and no one answers!
brian got busted telling his own lies....now he's completely useless as a credible journalist on all levels.
majority of people rather spend their lives promoting something or someone who is chasing their dreams instead of focusing on their own
only 30 days!!! thanks for the reminder!
oh your good!!!
imma be
i'm about to do something terrible.
saying rip makes sense for gordie howe. he was suffering. makes no sense for that christina gal, because she'd rather still be alive
disgusting behaviour. this is 'fun' to these sad bastards.
i'm an immigrant. this is not the usa i read about in history books nor does it rep hard wrkng americans i know.
  today in questionable golf attire: adam scott's happy gilmore-inspired collar: during the morning 18 i...
 this shocked me 2 cause my bar 4 vr wasnt low but my mindset for batmanvr was too much movement(dizzy), now
all in all great day at work! super evening with my dad
"people of color" is another way of saying colored. the leftist democrats never stopped being racist, they just reb
'ing yourself is like laughing at your own jokes
students graduating in 2016 have these 2 bookends to sta &amp; end their schooling: sandy hook as freshman, pride in orlando as seniors.
mfs already peaked lol
pretty sure someone in my neighborhood is playing one of the 24-hr versions of pharrel's "happy" and i am very much not...
holy crap, that cast!!
bxtches so use to being disrespected they don't know how to deal with a man that actually respects them.
wow i lost my earring that i had for over a year
if  pisses you off like it pisses me off, here's something you oughta know... this guy's a racist creep.
the only recent dms i have are between my writer and my rp account
watching the welsh rugby match early tomorrow morning in cardigan rugby club.
launching my new website in less than an hour
why not?
shoprite is tryna move all their soon to expire stock and black people be buying shit they don't even need..  at least it's not booze
hey guys thanks for the follow
back at the dentist. new set of toofy pegs today with any luck. yes i am a bit excited at this..
  pussy blonde bbw pussy
great. now i look like the asshole.
the greatest way to live with happiness is to endeavor to be what you desire to appear.. sada khush raho  aameen.
but nothing about the violent anti-gay jihadi letting loose on them
trump calls senator warren "pocahontas" &amp; i just read the words "indian giver" in someone's tweet. wow, so much everyday racism...
brand new h o m e   o w n e r s
really? would you be so juvenile &amp; crass if your loved one was killed by an automatic weapon wielding nut?
more mental health awareness, is definitely needed.
when i feel   - recognizing, expressing &amp; managing anger. printable activity, color and b&amp;w ver
each moment of a   lover's hour is woh an age of dull and common life. -aphra behn
  father`s day to all father`s and to my father.:)
when the school "forgets" about your child during spos day and he doesn't get to run!! absolutely fuming and so upset for him!!  !
time to sleep now...  viking run tomorrow.
no spoilers!!!!   for teamreal book
a lot of men have a problem with a woman who doesn't need him. they'd rather her be desperately dependent so he feels accomplished.
  antique map of philadelphia pennsylvania 1876 delaware county
  couple having sex hairy pussy geting fucked
the first of my roses this year. in a couple of weeks i will collecting kilos for gulkand making.
  bihdaygs   bihdaygs   bihdaygs   bihdaygs   bihdaygs   bihdaygs
is this the very best you got?
thanks for not texting me back... " national best friends day to you too
trump is now limited to retweet trumpba positive stories as no one else has any.
what's wrong with this world?  why do so many people commit acts of violence, others joke about it &amp; the news makes it all top stories.
  couple having sex hardcore xxx pic
to go from loving someone with all your hea, to damn near hating them.
raining in here this morning.....  sunday
just another day in america...
must be that "thing" soros said if obama doesn't get it done, he'll "get someone who will!" heard it my ears.
i really wanted to have some cereal but there was only strawberry flavored milk.
he just plays one on tv.
deputies: gator dragged toddler into water near disney reso
the way today's world is headed, pretty soon you'll need a body guard to go grocery shopping.
new work + new environment?   haha thank you po for the oppounity.
"you'll not always hear what you wanna hear but what you need to hear"..  no debera de aplicar para sentimientos.
i quit! fuck this!
it's a smile, it's a kiss, it's a sip of wine; its summer time.
staying up for the tony's - yay for being self-employed
so far, this film is excellent. a+!!
i'm so damn ready to see her live on stage
  lover  baby benjaa
  sharapova banned for 2 years over doping..
lol ... over stimulates..
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
worse than that is the fact they didn't even try to fight.  complicit lap dogs for the democrats!  !
can sad music make you feel  ?
that was before the england winner..
american horror story   this is why trump could slither onto the political stage.
first night sleeping without ry in i'm not sure how long and i am   :(
note to self, kat
4 more days!!! then we are finally going on vacation for the first time in 2 years
6 1/2 months  baby d is omost here
for marrying 20 year old guy against her wish! i mean wot is happening to us to the parents nd to the childrens!
best think i've ever heard about nicola sturgeon. so it can't be true.
may god comfo the families of the victims, lost or injured.
can't fucking wait for the new season   is an understatement
got my preorder in!
when a former liberal warrior becomes a sycophantic corporate shill.
a little pre-show homework ahead of first night of mike balett's latest.
niggas be attention whores.. !
i'm so sad that seventh-grade is almost over
lake tommorow w my girl
can't believe what happened in orlando...
you have one life to live. be   ________________________________________
 video men and women in bed without clothes sexy hairy women galleries
  sex blonde best way of having sex
so lfs celebrate parents day only after 5 years and the funny thing was that my parents didn't even turn up because they were too busy.
who lies about being pregnant when someone can't even get pregnant
but then again he wouldn't care if i did, he'd just say "i can just find another girl"
now playing  :  michael gettel - " aspens in january" on     music song
  that people don't know what the night sky looks like.
a $30,000 stock jeep is life goals?
free cherry popping porn   hardcore knight rider
it's so crazy to me that you can give someone so much suppo and love for who they are and what they do, yet never get anything back.
a healthy home, is a   home!
way to go cairo !!
damn straight eating cancer
great win welcome back t rex   days
yey!!!  thank you po^^
"rockin robin, tweet. when your tweets don't match up  "
my sister comes home tmrw which means i won't be seeing this beautiful face anymore
lets just say the hostas hedge is now complete.
so here i am thinking it's going to rain all day after looking at my weather app all week, &amp; now i wake up to the perfect beach day
  bihday sexy girl getting caught having sex in public
i am outrageously fli but not a sexual predator!  stupid  man. he made me feel guilty! im not him! asshole!
with 34 yrs in congress, john mccain, once a gutsy gop rebel, has long exceeded his shelf life.
i agree. i always bring posies!!! to huge arrangements that i design.
always be
2 house viewings booked for tomorrow eve
gonna bake tomorrow~
can't believe a guy was going to shoot this pride parade in long beach
one design has been done by me. (:  .
//here comes the 1000 train!
looking back and seeing all the people i had i middle school vs. now.
so happy about having no chemistry tomorrow
i am feeling the effects this morning but still buzzing
my sentiments exactly ... today is a beautiful day, sat on my balcony soaking the sun then pay tonight.
"be happy for no reason, like a child." ~  deepak chopra
i really don't want my mum to go back home tomorrow
 sex stories free soft core porn
:-)   sunday    young_man
media repo went exceptionally well! should be in print by next tuesday :).
  600 days purfles
all i have to do is submit my background check consent form, and i will have completed my application for my first guide dog ever.
if you're a middle aged man taking selfies in sun glasses wearing your best clobber you need to have a fkin word with yourself
i'm honestly a content little human right now
first real haircut in over 14 months.
&amp; on the note of ranting, the majority of those whom suffer won't mention it but those who use it as a trend just want the attention ..
wondering which type of discussion will be the worst in the upcoming week: islamophobia, homophobia or people clinging to their guns
now to wait till next pay to get my boxes for storage  lol heaps more space im my room now
barring extremely rare accidents,etc police use violence 2 defend themselves, black culture glorifies crime,violenc
i don't know which to choose
it's my last day with my favv, i don't wanna see her leave
staing the day in sacramento and will be in la by tonight. all unchaed territory from here til kansas city.
you don't know if you wanna beef or fwm
  bihday sexy girl boy shower with naked sexy girl
stay busy; age happily!
maybe it's not about the   ending, maybe it's about the story. learn more at
when someone says they love you,  every effo gets noticed therefore should be exploited! im afraid of what im seeing. i love my girl.
give him something to eat and ernie is  .
almost none.not enuf people care about honor, integrity or truth.if they did,we would not have trump v hillary
everyone: omg is it school day yet?!?!? so  !!! me:  me: summer na ba ulit???
  lake erie monsters lw brett gallant is happy to rejoin team: calder cup 2016: gallant is also happy th...
dreading the sound of my alarm in the morning
that moment when you buy some shoes online small size is 5.5 and they don't fit your feet bc they are big...
my father would rather watch the big bang theory reruns than talk to me... and i'm supposed to be the favorite daughter.
summeime make men more asshole's then they already r...
after a long and tiring day, i saw these posts and updates for aldub's movie and meng's song. idk why, but it is so rewarding.
you can retweet your own tweets   i can finally pretend i'm actually funny
i am not american but i can clearly see that donald trump will be the worst decision america will ever make should they vote for him.
5 days down,  4 or 5 more to go!!
flagging because you might be police.
great we're going to have a president who subtweets run this country, cannot wait to be bombed by other countries for a subtweet
  friday &amp; god bless  bill foreman
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
ordered both manny's palette and jeffree's lipstick
do what makes you you   be with who makes you smile, laugh as much as you breathe and love as long as you live.
ppl quick to dick ride a mf that doesnt give 2 fucks about them but cant even suppo their real friends when theyre up &amp; coming
my makeup pre-orders will be arriving this month and next month!!! aaaahhhh!
saturday's may now sta at 6am, but they still contain caoons, chorizo, eggs and coffee.
holiday on sark booked - bring it on!!
found out that i made the b honor roll!
fear of muslims grips nc town that has hardly any  what "registered" w/this country is called being a
sighs. we won't get it right until we focus on the person.
...it was nice to be able to see a good, clear digital picture of what i was ordering, and to get it at a good price (inc. shipping).
france have had 2 recent terrorist attacks. the english "fans" will find the police totally unsympathetic
pretty sure i am going to finish season 4 of oitnb by tonight. my life is
nothing beats hanging with your yoga buddies
behind the most patriotic building in the entire bgc atm.
working hard to finally get a proper ep of some new original music to you guys. it's coming along brilliantly.
mumford and sons!
these niggas be aificial  &amp; these b* be down wit'em  !
sprints to ally's grad pay to see her of course and whitehouse &amp; missed whitehouse
when he's
mature boy sex video  black girl porn
last tweet she posted was a video telling everyone she was back home in orlando. to come out and show love, have a good time.
final exam for term 2 is done!! now final preparations can take place for canada tomorrow
the last two pas of my raleigh ti team restoration are ready to go into place
mark your calendars cause mosaic mississauga  is coming this august!!!!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
  for me and for us of course  but even more for you ....
a bloody german , mp for the home of midlands cricket lecturing us on leaving the eu
the pic of my 9year old that u know who u r thought it would be cute to put a pic of shit on
so you don't think the cavs will win the finals anymore?
actually that's how we all act when we're looking for are phone in the morning!
tomorrow i'll facilitate a team building event with 50 persons.
hey, i saw that u are a workout fan, so i ask u to test my new app, it's known as "mytraining" on apple
we leave in 2 weeks and my mom is already packed for mexico
so tried
 mindsconsole: the biggest challenge in life is finding someone that knows all your flaws, yet loves you with all they have, anyway.
almost that time
u can get more love from yo enemies. then yo own ppl...
awesome isn't it alicia! have a great weekend! :)
because he didn't know he rules about delegates. he invested his time, energy and money in the wrong voters.  !
making some big changes to my house tomorrow:) :)
this time tomorrow night i will be chilling with a bottle of red staing my 21st bihday celebrations off early
tumors .. ummmmm cancer yummy
good morning!
 fyesclexa:   wifey walk of doom
  bdae to this great man i respect and simply love this man
  father day... . i luv my dad
washington post editorial: calling  by its name
first night in the new apament, missing the house and really feeling my mom is gone.
flight is booked
missing my boyfriend.
why is it so easy to blame religion???
stay away from those who can't take responsibility for their actions and make you feel bad for being   at them when they do wrong.
maybe,no matter how much you loved them,they could slip through your fingers like water, and there was nothing you could do about it.
[ ] thank you "carmelia loverink" for the follow !
i choose what i think, and i choose to be
i really dgaf about anyones opinions towards me! im gone do wtf i want and still breathe at the end of the day. aint huing nobody!
playing mix doubles on friday!
when i say i spazz bruh when i get mad anybody can get it
i don't understand y i shld wake up to a sad news. r.i.p keswick
easier to understand when you get older!  sad but true
if the goal is to get everyone to look alike to end , then it would make sense to have them look like best &amp;
what a great year, we've loved having you mr connor!
day off, visitors staying and lionel richie tomorrow    weekend
  chase elliott still happy with pocono finish despite 'a big mistake': chase elliott still happy with p...
very   :( ...
i am looking forward to watching the mysteries of laura on tv tonight.. the sun has just come out here. i am enjoying .  .
a animation by sassy french girl
we're thrilled to see another fairy has found a loving human home! enjoy the magic!
webster's dictionary defines   as "favored by luck or foune"...trust me, luck or foune
if you have been failing a lot and you used to be an awesome student in high school, it could set it off. this could possibly be me.
julia has to walk with her worst enemy
after about a while of being and iphone user and dropping my past iphones and my current iphone so much, my iphone 6 was unlucky today.
looks like a winning team ailsa good luck to you all
god that created us does not even condemn us when we make mistakes. yet we go ahead and crucify ourselves.
long overdue lol i remember finding black pellets in my bed thinking... i havent been on the turf in three weeks!!!
when your stun gun needs to charge
my first tweet lmao
killing me being sat at home while the england lads are taking over marseille. just 24 more hours to wait till i'm on my way!
i need a "work reminder" app smh i be forgetting when i have to work
love all jk's books. so do my children &amp; grandchildren. the tiger who came to tea &amp; mog are our favourites.
*pets the white cat on my shoulder* *scratches the black cat at my feet* prrrr. yes. it is :) thank you!  you too :)
phone's buggy lately and i had to uninstall the twitter app. so i'm only using it on my computer for a bit. sorry for late replies!   :(
if i didn't already have a prohibition against sending one of my kids south for college, i'd blacklist this school
look at that homescreen
congratulations big guy. how has she put up with your moaning for that long
more lmlyd    9months zeuskodawn
this is how politician used suicide for their own benefits
lgtb community do you still suppo the person that suppos your demise. simply because of a campaign donation.
ready for next week to be here already and sta this completely new journey for me and my family
wow it's so amazing,  fathersday
body of 2yr old dragged by alligator found
people gettin real confident nowadays since brexit and trump aye
i swear y'all some bandwagons when something ain't going good for somebody y'all change up
finally can say it's good to be single, not looking back after being with some golddigging ungrateful human being for 2+ years.
amy is working on the new curriculum for single moms! many amazing minds have collaborated on embrace life.
parents of those chn moving into reception in september: look out for a letter coming soon as i'm staing transition preparations!
online young porn  sex videos
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
thank u lord for sparing my life to another fathers day... proud dad,
there are every day more reasons why he is my favorite player &lt;3
wew curry fouled out
gonna be getting nike hurraches
just over 24 hours into one of the greatest football tournaments and it's already been overshadowed my a group of mindless pricks
now a black waiter cannot call another black man, black. what next,  me calling my mother a pensioner, then im labe
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
this is a record breaking year for nba season. can't wait for the next season.
ordering a new product on wednesday and doing my 10 day cleanse again soon as i'm off these meds..
somebody threw the 'bee over the fence.
all this senseless shooting has got to stop dawg.. ppl dyin everyday for no reason
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
missing old friends ...
this world is so backwards we rather love a lie then just listen to the truth what y'all see when y'all look in that mirror my people?
my selfies dont do justice to my natural ugliness.
we all packing up all our belongs  it's so so so
school makes me  !
i'm so excited to hear cmt has grabbed it but i hope they show it in canada, as well as the us. if not gonna be
please welcome to our javanese wedding ceremony. its simple but tasty hahahha
actually, friendship is a powerful antidote to  -
still trolling? keep ignorant of the parade's multi ethnic roots...some ppl have no sense of humor or appreciation
soooo me!!   friday!!! . . life is a: are you working to create a masterpiece?!!
my ex has 2 kids 2baby mothers and talks to neither of them.  pretty sure he calls to check up on me more than he does his kids.
  after sex mafia princess porn
  hardcore events crocks porn
  after sex roxanne west naked
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i am the type of person that sees the best of people and the world, but this is just sickening.
wow!! duh!that's her in both pics?
in just a year after being thrown out of governance, pdp has been on self-destruction mode
u still on the past dude smdh didn't he beat the spurs tht series still i honestly think u hate this man
  news ! nohern irish football suppoer passes away in nice due to a fall !  only 24 years of age !
london tonight with my number one girl!
im set for life
ikr.. god bless their souls
when your good vans turn into your work shoes..
i have a friend that is battling with cancer and despite all of the technology that i own, i can't find her to see how she's doing.
its gonna be so lit!!!!
ew son, that's what the fuck niggas are eating
saturday arvo checking stock. look what 7 1/2 inches in about the same weeks can do with ideal conditions.
it's kinda interesting cause i've only ever seen my cats after they were done i was never there for the process
its writers bihday soon!!!
the rendering from the software i'm using has stuffed up for me
  how to react to this senseless shooting.50 is the size of people in a happy gathering not a number that indicates no. of deaths
3 more sleeps until holiday! wohoo!
exams in less than 24 hours, flight in 18 days!!
and it is an islamic state..
my mom doesn't even give me a dollar lol
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
  double-sided cardstock 12 inch x 12 inch-hip, hip, hooray! 799456075914
tragedies has hit other communities. yeah we are upset and change our profile pics. i will probably forget later this month too.
only two wks until next road trip to my 'spiritual' home usa taking in stunning sedona on route this time
today i became an adult -  i bought a le creuset pan &amp; a vileda magic mop. i also couldn't be happier
  fadaz day 2 all papa
what an exciting friday night, exhausted by 10pm and trying to make new friends on facebook in the place you've lived you're whole life
we all know a guy like this.
he gives me more than i deserve    fathers day
can't wait for her wait for her wedding
which year 9 house will be going on the trip on thursday?   yearned
result!  we know the feeling. see you soon!
  bihday kazuki  bihday  bihday kazuki  bihday  bihday kazuki  bihday
fantastic visit to st. james' primary school to meet our new students joining in sep
ready for my first school formal!
i'm loving the chunty music rn
everyone is either at edc the night market or the dodgers game i am
 black women free chinese porn pictures
 , rock this boat, new kids on the block, nkotb, ecstatic, poptv via giphy
couldn't be any happier than i am with my life,sta new job tomorrow.i have the best other half &amp; can't wait for our little future
shame on america for promoting lgbt suppo! boooo! hiss!
turning young people into assassins   you know, there's no reward for killing people, you go to perpetual hell
 , hbo, monday, frustrated, curb your enthusiasm, larry david, curb via giphy
 in the workplace and family responsibilities add to pressure as they face unequal pay and lack of suppo...
females will say things about you, yet never mention or say it to your face.
you look like a witch. in your profile picture ja ja is it halloween ?fake activist
off to italy on wednesday
how fresh. that was your dads job during his tenure.
meeting the loml in less than 24 hours
want michelle to return to being male. let loose in outback of zimbabwe where she lives in cave w/a gorilla.
athens; santorini; mykonos; crete vacations: $599 -- summer in greece: 5 nights incl. island cruise -  travels
i wanna go back home
so sad... 2016 keep ripping off the greats..
my most popular vine got my account erased :( i had just passed 5k followers and was about to hit 3m loops
nah, i ain't jewish, i just don't dig on swine, that's all
real dads deserve real love.   father's day
what a day for donald.   !
just so beautiful
me looking forward to the ceremony today
waiting for bb to sta
i'm back into writing again and it's almost as if i never stopped
i left my good eyelashes at kianas house
missing my koala is the worst feeling ever
summerfest comes to lucan east today don't forget the mad hair competition and the lollies in the jar
it's funny how months ago i thought life was out to get the worse of me, but the turn out right now is pretty dang good
we work hard to house them give benefits... r own can't get help
 girls in the world girls workout clothes
tags &amp; prompts -   stickers 4"x6"
finally got the weekend off!
  i want to join vanoss and crazy friends so bad
what a tolerant police force.
  sex stories french free porn
ex hates seeing me doin well tuff ur not bringing me down like u have already still on fb talking about us   get a grip women
  cheeky punt: nothing happy about 400 on austria: thursday was euro 2016 eve of course and given that ...
i love pictures. i love memories. kaya i can't delete pictures especially on instagram. taylor swift how to be you po?
life only comes around once so do whatever makes you
this is serious! rip coach amodu shuaibu. this is  , we are yet to come to terms with keshi, and now, this!
awww it one if nigeria's nollywood diva's bihday tontodikeh. wishing her a
so sad to to hear about the massacre in orlando.thoughts and prayers go to all the families involved.get your gun control in order u.s.
my 1st invitation to be keynote speaker.
i need happy thoughts today...   thoughts
my curiosity is going to bomb blast in few hours
i grew interest in a topic, and was promptly told to "shut the fuck up" every time that i decided to show my passion for it.
i wanted to donate my blood today. they dont accept jam ;-;
and it takes place in oahu, hawaii!
girl has pig sex  porno
trump employee instructed to write "c for colored" on housing applications so that person would be denied.
nude lesbian teen videos   new year sex
haven't had a hangover in forever and i go and get one from my lil bro grad pay
  fathers day to my papa ..i love you very much !:)
terrorism works. after jihad attack, anti-jihad accounts are shut down. terrorism works. expect more of it.
our new juttis launch today! they will be available to purchase at  at 5pm ist !  ...
i only have holidays on november
always come to a complete stop at stop signs
i'm in such a great place in life right now
5 ideas to boost morale
$18.99-women's plus size tank tops (2-pack)    wednesday
zavi really have issues just like me , we get it from our father
sharp contrast: a gorrila was shot abroad and it's international news while a woman was beheaded in nigeria and nothing is being done.
tv director sues hotel over the suicide death of his aist husband
yea not sure of your situation. ..i just do my thing ...keep low profile and have fun with it...
now playing  :  laura sullivan - " river to the sea" on     music song
got a   attack inside big lots now i can't move from this lawn chair display. i luv to cry in public places.
  bihday dear friend...
mmm, not so much ... too many americans love barbarism &amp; laud it; they think it's the same as being "strong."
new website almost done!
  fathers day to my self more &gt;&gt;
  wednesdday sushi today!grill special- bleu burger/carmalized onions,blue cheese, lettuce,tomato,secret sauce
fatherhood: nor shall you engage in aberrant social behavior, then call  that resultant disdain that is merely common sense
what a crap daybought my wife a 1500 diamond ring and the stupid cow has only gone and list itshe's not even had it 24 hrs
can't wait to see &amp; dance with so many lovely faces tonight!
some bullshitgoing on in r colleges/universities these racist views are poisoning urkids  speak up b4 its 2late
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
skate right into they life ! preciate it bro
just got home from work to find that my cherry tree finally has cherries!!
been in my zone where nothing bothers me!
what? obama agrees w/hateful un? israel's the only middle east nation that protects*respects christian worshipers?
  mineral co. strikers happy to be back at work: it's been a rough road, but we're happy to sit down and...
another film about down syndrome!
 ! -  just bought these! check out these period-proof underwear by thinx! oh..and get $10 off if you u
ppl are stealing this tweet just for s
when u staying out the way and still being talked about by mfers
 girls in the world naked women for free
appointment today with aist to design book cover for see the city red. hoping the magic happens. then it's back to editing...
i no longer have a phone , so if you need to reach me , add me on snap or messege me on here
when you're just mad because you have a fat girlfriend
love saving new songs to my spotify playlist so i have something to look forward to in the morning/drive to work
hey hmmmmm  morning
looking beautiful mntaka mamam :)))
  dragon porn amanda redman naked
i don't wanna live in this country anymore
theyre holding back in their cereal too i feel your pain man
my baby leaving for the army today and i didn't get to say goodbye. i think she's already gone
how appropriate for god to bring me back here to wareham to say goodbye to where 30 yrs of marriage began now that's it's over.
work and then off to see the stone roses tonight
awesome thursday friends !
  political happy hour: june 15, 2016: here's your ice cold bud light 30-rack of politics, from joshua m...
happy weekend to everyone!!! the sun is finally back after several cold rainy days    weekends
  father's day to all reptile and pet dads thereptilezoofv's photo
likes to bitch and harass women on twitter from his mom's basement...
life is funny isn't it?  it changes so dramatically! painfully evident when you can no longer say "does eaton's bother simpson's?"
sexy lesbo kiss  naked fat girls
it's clear y'all had no good reason to hand the keys over to a goon. but yet...
black people go hard tryna look like money in somebody else eyes .
stua pearce has aged but he is
modern family marathon going on till 10pm.
going to do some shopping tomorrow before heading home!
my dawg    bihday
dude! where's my car???
trump will go, these people will still be here. always are (it's about jobs &amp; disenfranchisement my aunt fanny).
stayed for 2hrs at thee gym but hey i jst grounded ma self :(
one more day of finals and then its my sweet baby summeime
isner/muller stream has reappeared again...
om aswandi and sheila
can't stop watching this
offs men: no fandom is your private fiefdom! ...also, when i ask the point of spo don't you tell me it brings peo
not sure i wholly agree but interesting and necessary interjection
soon :) clock is ticking :) :p
tbh any white person who throws around the word n*gger can get the hell outta my life. if i were built, i woulda thrown punches.
danielle peazer   thank you for all the messages  thank you very much   daniellepeazer   bihday
damn there's a family here in philly suffering the loss of their daughter who was n the orlando nightclub. smh
it's official white privilege robs folks of empathy. this dude is an idiot
years later and you still aint got no eyesbrows lmao
before you tell to other people what is my secret be sure you tell the truth not the ........ wtf
oh em freaking gee 600+ people
nobody wants to hear r&amp;ampb. it's sad. if you want to be on the radio you got to stay young. ~jamie foxx
lots to do, very little time.
1 week until warped tour and a few hours till i get to texas
 porn tube naked oofice girl
people cheat on their corporate step challenges by strapping their fitbits to dogs and hamster wheels
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
there was a moment when your mom and dad put you down and never picked you up again.
so now we are violating each other s rights... all in the name of wanting to be taken seriously in our fighting for service delivery
aww these facebook memories :( one year ago...   still cannot believe your gone...  chyna
this wasn't supposed to happen :(
i was meant to be a cat.
once upon a time
after a long struggle.. today i can say i am  ...!!!!
 pressed over a whole other girl
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
  tree friends sex how to please a women during sex
 office woman real women latin hot sexy
feels good to be completely happy with everything in my life right now!
  national bestfriend day gals
it's 2016 &amp; there are still so many close-minded ppl in this world..
it is really hard not to be completely consumed by hate right now.
visit the florida keys &amp; key west- things to do-   wednesday  travel
airfare deals: southwest airlines $49 &amp; up -- southwest's biggest sale of 2016 (one way)   travels
rooftop pay in the city today.
  father day ...papa u r the best father in the world in my life.  thanks papa.. i love my dear father
now playing  :  alexandre desplat - " gnossienne n1 (erik satie 1866-1925)" on     music song
one step off the plantation and boom! instant annihilation.
trump new york co-chair makes racist 'gorilla' remark about michelle obama &lt; you total tool! fucking moron.
i don't even follow afl or understand the game, yet, saw "mcguire" trending &amp; was still like "oh what has the idiot said this time..."
  national best friend day
how does one explain this to her daughters aged 2&amp;5?words must surely fail her husband;their dad in doing this
i just let my phone die now &amp; don't even rush to charge it
sometimes you can't help wishing you are as emtionally retarded as some of those around you.  ? no, not yet.
ok christine won
  to say it will make no differece
super   to try out this line of products!!! can't wait to see what kind of results they
now playing  :  moon ate the dark - " capsules 11" on     music song
  calvin harris just wants taylor swift to be 'happy' despite her whirlwind romance with tom ...: in fac...
the only person in the store that did anything was the mother, no one else around to help.
why does this make me    |
how is it already race day tomorrow?? going to relax and enjoy it. really live in the moment b4 it's gone  !
this generation is soooo unromantic
saddest thing about the oj trial,mini series &amp; documentary is  its still all about oj..the 2 ppl he brutally murdered are a footnote.
  johnson publishing sells ebony, jet magazines to texas firm - chicago tribune
now playing  :   - " a tale from the past" on     music song
 women over 40 kerala girls fuck
i got to video chat with my babies at home. now, my day is made.
orwellian hunger games.
lol, they've been muted for like 10, 15 minutes on my end. they're still going?
fish is back too!
  bcus i'm regretting taking this college class &amp; spending all my money
   current affairs quiz  march 23 2016
 office woman cherry petite nude
oh chris speaking german again, that happened 10 days ago in gelsenkirchen &amp; its like everybody in stadium except me did understand him
so true! some great info floating around :-) knowledge is power!
 , kim kardashian, crying via giphy
if you haven't noticed yourself karma is something that's very real in your own waking life every single day. blinded by dishonesty.
i feel like famous people are dying so frequently nowadays.
crappy day that turned out good :)
happy bihday soonyoung oppa~  hoshiday
 you funny bra lmfaoooo
having a good hea is not a good thing sometimes.
pll has changed my life. cannot wait for season 7
the dude from bedstuy ny that died in the orlando shooting was down there for the wknd for a bday.. was coming back to sta a new job.
i keep thinking its friday....... it's not......
if your intention is to be  , before making any decision ask yourself "will this make me happy in the long term?"
i couldn't sleep last nite bc i'm so   to sta work. can't do well on 0 hours of sleep so i think it's time for a nap
so what you're saying is you're basically law enforcement. got it.
now playing  :  michael jones - " evening" on     music song
syrian girl thought the photojournalist was holding a weapon, so she "surrendered"
  hardcore tracks power girl fucked
first he's not even old enough to vote. second, taking sides with a white man in a confederate flag shi...
too much death for me to handle lately.
.wishing all fathers in the world    father's day....
i can't get over this either. how did we end up with such a useless media? a lot of newspapers too, stayed too ambi
bob holman: a man who truly walked the walk. a life well lived.   loss more &gt;&gt;
she talking bout some "damn maiya youn have no friends"    can't even argue with that
last day in school
nobody should have to live in fear, but the world is staing to become a place that even i am beginning to become slightly fearful of
thanks for letting us know claire! knowing how we did helps us improve our service for all customers!
  friday. 'bout to get a fresh cut. go jogging and lay up with my new freedom riders book.  and bang this.
in a room of health &amp; edn  professionals fri, i heard of 4 resignations, 1 with cancer, 1 off with stress, 1 having hea problems.
just me that has that one song that always leads me to tears?
 fucking literotica barondesade
screwed.  screwed indeed.  .
another view: calling racism by its name - times herald-record
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
this is a.
so so child girl
counting the days.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
had to leave for school early, 2nd last day = yearbooks!!!!
every day just appears to get better and better
the only good thing of this shtty week is that i'm getting my tattoo tomorrow and i'm really looking forward to it :)
its sad &amp; disgusting that i write ron to see if he at least wants to get his child for father's day &amp; wont even reply back.
as you grow up, you sta learning not to love whole heaedly.
 in women porn star dance
americanteen    hardcore raves
sitting at my therapist office. can't wait to find out how unhappy in life i am by a professional!
i like how my dad can take my brothers to a baseball game, but i have never been on a father daughter date before...
it's crazy hard to find boys to fuck me on camera :/
friends dying &amp; so much shit that's been going on recently makes me too sensitive and  i say &amp; feel things i normally wouldnt.
i'm trying a pitaya bowl for lunch today
  gay still in the closet lindsey graham having another hissy fit?
i haven't read the story yet but the tweet made my hea hu.
and the ones who really understand we'rent allowed to question him in public
i can't do this anymore, i feel so freaking lost!!! i wish everything was easier but it's not, i can't keep holding on! i'm losing it!!
is twitters dying   face
 jokes about women first boy sex
just coz their is a few of these vids, dont mean they are not woh wotching, they are there hilarious, a must watc
rest in peace friend.
bihday exactly 1 week from today.....
game 7 is getting closer...
lmao wish i could of watched the game
sometimes, the moment passes by and you're left feeling disappointed. a seemingly simple thing, left undone, leaves you wondering why!
pretty sure he apologized for that. but i don't think i was any less forceful in my rebuke of him then.
if you fancy a trip to oxford
not to bring up the same thing again, lol amazon opened my package that was cool.
  now that's a happy father's day! josh duhamel is very much the dapper dad in a preppy polo shi ...: ...
fuck yo, im   again
i'm so happy for you!!! i  you!
haha im still a laker fan! i just know ya boy is a fraud &amp; klay thompson givin them fits
2 weeks today i get married
what a day!!!
bob holman: a man who truly walked the walk. a life well lived.   loss more &gt;&gt;
trump suppoers wanted this ad for family guys emmy campaign banned
since only qiurong understand me so here's my profile picture
just feel   but i always get thru it i'm a strong woman i love my life!! we all have problems but we always get thru our struggles!!
get these cunts docked 3 points for the next qualifying campaign. seems half the england fansare only there to cause trouble.
and we would be surprised at this, because ........?
if i said there was a game today, guaranteed i would have a packed house.   but when schedule says workout, the excuses sta pouring n
trying to pretend to be a college student by working at the business school today, but forgot i don't have access to airbear anymore
no one else claims abuse has he snapped? opioid abuse?? (it will turn you mean)
young petite dad sex  porn vids
no he won't and neither will liberal ass kissers. 50 dead and they attack you, wow....their hate is palpable.
i was even more hu when i found out he wasn't a real fox
could have been avoided
now playing  :  lee blaske - " 08 - rebih - pa 2" on     music song
perfect end to the weekend and perfect sta to the week. detox bath at its finest.
i need one of these badly i don't get hugs anymore and i miss them. last hug i got was back in march
i can't believe how angry m mum is at me for no reason.
i'm wondering what you would have said if obama married 3x and michelle posed naked in bed with a woman?
for the next 364 days most good fathers will be labeled "good for nothing"...
ben revere looks so happy to be with this club and that makes me so happy.
exactly...lacy clay is a pos race-baiter career "politician" in st. louis. he's laughing his ass off at the cops in
  people are just healess
  sunday to u all.
my back hus
7. my two june babies were at the table   as i looked through the papers my mother-in-law brought in. they were graded pamphlets or
teal polka-dot ballets from my love
talk about a throwback! counting down the hours!!! i'm so ready!
damn when i come back i wont be in sa or nothing :((
oh my :(
it is two weeks into summer and i am taking the act tomorrow and i am   about it
wow this day is already sucking i'm phoneless i'm car-less parents won't speak to me and i have to work all day
heterosexual or homosexual,,, idgaf what you like if it ain't about my muzikkk   suckadick that izz
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
laps. blissful laps.
hrcp said that so far this year 229 women had been lethal victims of honor killings &amp; this one makes it 230
the moon is watching me through my window
u lameeeee but this cold
hells yeah. .glad she outta my life   days
  fathers day to my dad my most special person in my life thanks dad for giving me too much love suppo..u r my strength thnx for
me and ben will be there again soon and we will announce it on twitter
it's embarrassing saying i'm an england fan.... i am outraged at the behaviour of some so called fans! what an embarrassment you are!
absolutely stunning heels!
to handle yourself use your head, to handle others use your hea...  weekend
happy father's day... a dad's affection has no other alternative   father's day
 jokes for women madona pussy
another father's day without the most impoant person in my life, my dad
book one now at publishers...  as i await the finished aicle. voting done/ haircut had/ ironing &amp; packing to do, then begins pa 2
' still all over it': arrest of black mother disturbs community
act hard with 9 people but won't swing
this world is turning into pure viloence
every piece of my hea misses home
one of us! one of us! one of us!  welcome.
happiest girl iv been in a long time
pregnancy means going from an a cup to a healthy c
daddy.. you know how much i love you.. i miss you forever,,    father's day.. both of you still deep in my hea..
it's jacobs first time camping! &amp; it's going to be so much fun for him!
  bihday to cecilia ,staff in cangzhou shenlong pipe manufacturing co.ltd.may she be happy all the time.
after meeting and closing the deal for real estate website, now got another new client   and for a...
no entiendo porque neighbors no esta en netflix:(
 against women in the workplace skinny hairy teen
the holidays will be better than ever now marijuana unleashed is at ibooks.
lost 3lbs last week. now in my gym gear about to take the dogs for a long walk before my first kickboxing class tonight.
ppl get lonely &amp; sta chilllin' wit the enemy
i'm only going to end and your going to cry and be
working on some pretty cool stuff for mondays workshop. can't wait!
it's so surprising that a person you once held in high esteem can really turn u off and make u wana stay very far away from them...hmm
finally nfc tap to pay system coming to windows 10 mobile.....
orange is the new black this weekend!
  hardcore vinyls polynesian girls fuck
got my tickets for the impractical jokers event. can't wait to watch them with my best friend!
there is absolutely too many people in the world who use and leave the people who love them for complete strangers..
prep done and bags packed ready for coaching training with the sas in shipley tomorrow.
wanna go shopping but i have $0.17 in my account
i'm with jimmy.
 video men and womenmalayalam sex teens fucking
damn i really don't have a boo or nothing
osu launches divided community project
  days porn movie people having sex with no clothes
25 states have legalized marijuana. half of america has legal weed.
 representations of women in men's alcohol ads zane sex chronicles online episodes
on route to cambridge and the forecast is sunny!
 kyra got " " as her name
 isn't a hu feeling. that they got pills, massages, and sin for.  is a raped ife built on top of other raped lives.
"a very good standard &amp; all completed prior to our baby coming home from hospital"
wonderful day!   father's day. we love you!
  kaveney hr solutions:
why diet? enjoy life. eat to your heas content. work out to balance it
when fb, ig and sc are dry, gotta come on here and talk to myself
fucking my teenage daughter  and women
this breaks my hea
victoria's secret has beauty favorites up to 65% off!! just bought quite a few items today..
the world is coming to an end! every day you look up people are being killed!
i got my flight details and i can't wait to see you guys hahaha!
congratulations, well deserved!
for the sad news of losing their baby to the gator attack i'm glad they recovered the body, so the family can have some closure
 ! nibley festival tee shis now available, at goose &amp; gander ltd pop along and see what other lovely...
now we will see politicians using a tragedy to push their own agenda.  do they really care?  if they did then changes would be made.
treated myself to some new lampshades, if you don't treat yourself once in a while who will
managed too play a few rounds of tdm on ue,the new cog skin is seriously dope!...(annnd the power weopon try hards were crazy too).
we must select the illusion that appeals to our temperament and embrace it with passion, if we want to be  . cyril connolly
i don't have enough time to learn about all the things i want to learn about, and all those i had to drop decades ago, like painting.
what ya do for attention
the jewish talmud is the most  body of work ever written.
what a shitshow tonight by phils, highlight goes fan diving for foul ball unsuccessfully knocking glasses off, collides with railing
celebrate life! "my hea is light and joy." laura probe
i've come so far and i'm not quite sure how it happened but i glad i am where i am
that's the point...
  muchthank papa god im not lucky but i am blessed
little old lady just walked up to me at the bus stop and warned me jihad is coming - what fuck is happening to the world?
my skin :')
how i miss my grandmother tonight! she was my only friend i could ever talk to when i was staing to go down my depression hole.
i posted 8 photos on facebook in the album "  fathers day!"
if only trump put a wall infront of our goal :(
you favor one of your children over the other.  ! i feel so bad for the both of them to have you as a "mother".
less than 1 week until swmrs and less than 1 month until blink 182
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
prayers all over orlando!!! my breaks!
one of my besties is coming to visit me in dallas this weekend!
some of these females be real life mad with another bitch behind a nigga that don't want they ass nomo
every club in england has a tiny minority of violent hooligan 'suppoers' &amp; it seems they team up when england play in tournaments.
 , animals, dog, smiling, blinking
makes my hea break
new waterproof speaker has finally arrived can't wait to try it in the shower
done messing around. no more excuses. whole new level.  .
bout to watch warcraft.
bron has no moves!
would've won if you played!
true what they say ... life is what you make of it. i'm making it a   one :)
sometimes i miss being a spooky teen but i'm so lazy to keep up lately
didn't know that there was another hunger games. and everyone that knows me knows i love saw.
one terror event that is overlooked in terms of mass casualties is the  bombing in 95 - 168 dead, 680+ injured.
he only wit you cause i ain't fxcking wit him  situation
one piece naked girls  peruvian women
200 followers... yay yay yay.... thank u ... i know its less compared to all .. bt i am   ..
even more sad that you're worried about being fed pork from a pig with a tumor rather than the negligence alone):
equals, saturday 14:15 pm, with the bff
...just beautiful in the sunshine today  - plantation gardens
  saturday! enjoy the weekend to the best of your abilities!
i saw my new baby when i got home
 comments about women nude mugen download
15 best ferris wheels in the world -   wednesday  travel
my 8 year old brother has more sikker friends than me
the legend of the blue sea starring jun ji-hyun and lee min-ho. it will begin airing on sbs on november 2016.     source: wikipedia
   sbi and sbi associates bank  random facts
  italy fans aren't happy thiago motta has no 10 shi in euro 2016 squad: stephan el shaarawy and feder...
damn you really don't realize how much a person has had an impact on you until you have to leave them  i miss him already lol
i have a lot of homework to do...
licensing and acquisitions are hard. when you find out 2 people you depend on strategically and operationally both leaving this month.
 you shows out
   download daytodaygk mobile app for free
 , a lot of work is needed
hmmm can not wait , very excited , guys vain not rule does not it?
 girls in the world max tube sex
thefashionpoet: at the end of the day, you only have yourself to make  . do what you love and don't worry abo
its been almost a month &amp; still havent heard from tito.
turkey wings with the mac and cheese and cheesy grits  fathers day
really wish i had a life.
back to work for me today after having 3 relaxing days off, not off now till i go on holiday 3 weeks tomorrow
he sounds stoned. enjoy a laugh and what a trump nomination would digress to. he can't fight any1 on policies!
lovely saturday night walking buddy then 2 home visits checking on pippa then oscar &amp; harper
  bihdaysway  bihdaysway  bihdaysway  bihdaysway  bihdaysway
you still believe   that there no drugs in punjab.
do you know that feeling when you are full of happiness?! i don't know how, but i feel great. dont woody ve happy. summer is here
i'm still sad my ig was taken down. i can't live without it!
  blair brown is happy to be sentenced to 'orange' role: another happy coincidence: the role has brought...
work hard:;pay harder    weeknd !!
the face of someone who was supposed to be sitting on the beach this week but had to cancel the trip   lol same
congratulations to the award winners
  silver bullet happy hour: join the silver bullet bus and 91x for happy hour all summer long! plus, 91x...
"my problem" is sadly their own problems that they can't quite project on me. sick but
yep. my head hus from all the mind blowin' crap we've endured. ur right, it's only gonna get worse. g_d help us.
  hour auditions in claremont thu sign up at 5pm, show stas at 6pm
kimi finishing out of top 3
i know goner is a   song but it's actually my favourite in all actual real realness.
system of a down - chop suey! - youtube any time an unarmed american dies by gun violence i think of this song.
today we find out if we have another princess or prince on our hands
taking a break   moments
 coolestlifehack: chinas magic rabbit, the endangered ili pika, photographed for first time in 20 years
theres a more instructive lens through which we can view historythe lens of empire.
iphone autocorrect just changed "tonight" into "i ugly." now i'm
i can never find clothes to buy
we have our annual company excursion today and it's a secret where we are going to
  animatronic showing real instesity with that expression.
nude girls with santa hats  and women
we love the smile on peoples faces when they use our products
just heard   drumpf try to compare bobby knight, ben carson, chris christy as better surrogates then our agressive progressive squad.
real niggaz get treated like shit these days, especially if they don't got money, it's all about the trump suppoers, that's the trend
enjoying my father's day with people i love the most bkfinestisone   fathers day to all
bunch of kids on twitter new to the work force and life think they rule the planet eah lmfao.
so here are the democratic nominees- a 74 year old communist and a woman under federal investigation by the fbi.    sad sad sad sad sad
  national best friend day
  father's day i luv my dad  so much!!!!
sitting way a cheese board and some sour cream crackers   as a pig in shite
  happy father's day: we hope he has what he wants: what all these dads want for father's day, we hope t...
had the most unreal 10 days and to top that holiday off i was offered my first post as a staff nurse! welcome to the real world
we are pleased to announce our fabulous new website has now gone live!
man i had so much fun with that stream, so to recap, ive got all vids covered this week and tommorow a bonus archive of the stream!
  couple having sex hot sexy amazing teen
people do the most to get s
can anyone share any other mascot, for any school and/or spos team that exploits any other race? please submit so
  hardcore smurf theme home reality naked girls
guess the band.
 visit the power of happy website:   embrace your uniqueness...   ...
&amp; niggas still hating
just woke up from by far the best nap i've taken in a lonnnng time, and i'm definitely staing to feel better after a week of pain
i literally forgot &amp; ppl use to say i'm such a fliatious person but not anymore
you could careless about how i'm really doing, you just thinking about you.
wonderful atmosphere at playtime   children
i am sitting in a comfy chair,next to a balcony overlooking central park,finishing a book proposal while covered in maltese terriers.
pano version of last tweet - and although sad to be leaving lopez, our next stop is canada
10 nights in rhodes all booked!
  pussy sex fuck teenage
i'm so deaf i need to listen to movies through finlay's headphones while he listens through the tv at a normal volume
hello, i saw that u are a training lover, so i invite u to see my new app, it's known as "mytraining" on appstore
dark skin girls get no love in real life
new t-shis arrived the other day, really pleased with how they turned out!
~s.r.r~   sunday everyone
it's more to the story ... i pray for orlando &amp; the rest of the world ! it's just not the gay community !
coming home early for exo comeback on music bank!
ok, you win. i lol'd
i was born and grew up on the street. but one day good people found me and bring to their house. now i'm  !
at 11:41 on 6/17/16 i, bismark joseph mora, finished watching all 74 episodes of jersey shore
adultfanfiction stories  intercourse video men and women
jeff sessions is hiding his racist past ahead of attorney general confirmation hearing
another   client! she weighed less than 120 pounds but even though she was thin, she needed
changed the way we sing things
you dont need many things to be  , just appreciate what you have! so be always happy :) s'abaah' el kheer!...
first time watching a nba basketball game so f u
pretty woman s2 s2
prayers ascending for all those impacted by the shooting in orlando  &amp;broken-heaed
when did people become so selfish that they put their own agendas above someone's life.
no way in he'll you're  52
five days till........
thay wluld be culture as shohand for 'brown skin': camber sands deaths blamed on victims' 'culture'
  sex stories skinny brunette amateur
the last hour has been dragging... i just want it to be 6:30!
kayla is going to be here in a few hours and my room is even cleaned!!!
  day my daughter blessed learned how to ride a bike today without training wheels
  birbdayforme :-* :-*
i just realized how fucking long it's been since i smoked
i just couldn't have been any prouder!
the starbucks inside tri county is closing
sit, rest and let our lifts do all the hard work.
only 1 more day to go!
i found my flower clogs at my mom's house...fond memories to many summer vacations in sweden.  ...
hani &amp; lipsync...   :(
when u can't even spend $1.99 on me but i be dropping $ for you
  after sex americangirlsexpic
when mentally ill people get murdered by mentally ill people, it doesn't make them suddenly heroic human perfection, it makes them dead
my new phone is so much better than my old one!
now this... looks like a good game! decisions = different outcomes; step by step.
well this definitely wud be a   day to come. or is it just staed... hmmm
i wanna go to the beach friday but i work    face
soo excited now, happy days
if only my connection could hold starpop steady,,
nba  should  first suspend all their  terrible  inconsistent refs!! worst by far of all the professional spos
hey, that's cool!  -days
agreed. i watched people i had until then respected as friends &amp; professionals descend into the worst kind of intel
these 9 statements represent a contented life
sneak preview of images for my book!
mexico's fans are being sore losers right now. not just talking trash. but throwing it to.
you guys need serious help man.
king of wearing skis and breaking gender roles
i'm with you my friend!
wishes   break fast
how to draw a girl masturbating  boob
phone playing up due to broken screen anyone know how to fix them ??!!
buy sex machines   birday sex xxx
all these weekend plans for the next month are going to make summer fly by! but they are all fun things!
im getting less likes on my posts bc of this instagram update i am
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
when im drunk i soa use the attractiveness of girls im willing to fuck as a barometer to how drunk i am
daddy: "what level is this?" pip: "that level." points to ipad.    birds
mark your calendars now now now!!
keshi is 5th member of class of 94 to depa this world after uche okafor, thompson oliha, rashidi yekini and wifred agbonavbare.
looks all the more sexy
not long now.
  bihday sexy girl demi delia porn star
have a fab day all.
monday music: happy bihday, wrenn
is this real?? otherwise blatantly  as fuck! should be forced to close down!
wow...! returned from my business trip to birmingham today to find this thank you pressie waiting for me
i moved away from really brainless people that their only goals in life is getting drunk everyday
today is such a beautiful, sunny day!
 congrats on your new cards and flyers! it was a pleasure printing for you.
her long belly ass ain't got shit better to do but make fake pages
  father's day
to whomever stole the driver's side mirror from our reverse food truck: we r a charity. the $$ to replace it comes from our food budget.
i literally have like 3 friends who actually give a shit about me. and one of them is my boyfriend.
hug your grandma.
the worst thing happened to russia beauty wise since sanctions, and then the economic crisis is the disappearance of dry shampoos!!!
gonna go legoland tomorrow!
 why is it so hard to find someone who likes both evenings as me?
white pride = fuck everyone not like us.
i got something really nice by mail...
love island is the highlight of me night
usga getting torched once again...they look super rattled
a city imagined by barbara gibson.
got a 2:1 in my final year disseation project
i'm so excited for my smoothie bowl tomorrow morning and i haven't even gone to sleep yet
new macos sierra announced
   dna test can find poaching hot-spots
walking the hills, tunes playing and welly weather doing her thing   :)
nights at the fair make summer so sweet
tomorrow i book tattoo time
tonight is our first show in repub
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
messi &amp; my warriors winning
it's 2016 and still so much hate in this country.
how so many family's will be huing so much for loved ones lost and in hospital. could of been anyone inside.
also   i'm not this dude
gonna upload a new podcast/overwatch match this weekend!! hope you guys like it!
waiting..... then g!  !
bruh they sick af rn.
i don't think going to bed at 10.30 has ever excited me this much! night all, i might get 8 hours sleep tonight!
  fathers day to father's nd potential father's.
it's not a gun control issue. i'm tired of people saying it. open your eyes america.
you are awesome! all of you, thank you for being in my life!    photo credit: timmy d'antonio d'antonio...
"natural order" but those people weren't supposed to die that day. it wasn't that mans job to take their life.
heyy, i saw that you're a workout fan, so i invite you to check my free app, it's called "mytraining" on appstore
camp stas today camp stas today camp stas today
when your ex sends you a dm on here because there's no other way for him to msg you
happy father's day, daddy-boo! i love you!  thank you for being you. hugs and kisses!
relationships and or marriages don't mean shit in 2016
kind of crazy how this country has changed.not in a million years envisioned or thought in school this would be our future
what will i do with my life after love island lol
when random youtubers follow you to get promotion and try to force you to subscribe on their channel.
 girls in the world nepali girls porno
how is this not
nowadays, shootings and massacres are so common that sometimes i wonder whether it will be stopped or not.
but somehow now it's my fault because i'm
his first firework......     [pic]
a tale of woe, all about a bad day -&gt;
rest in peace
  sharon osbourne reveals she's happy to be back on the x factor panel: taking to instagram today, sharo...
may be happy
2016 just got staed and i can already tell it might be the year to break the record for the most homicides in winston
  idefendence day philippine
i was at mcds earlier &amp; they ran out of mcflurry &amp; they offered me frappes. i dont have enough money, i only have $2.75 wdym frappes
these my ex will never kn got me thinking y'all some real fucked up people on god....
i'm still so sickened by the us right now. like i don't want to live in this country anymore.
better question is "what is islamic terrorism doing to us?"
yeah! they called me if i will come next monday on a job interview!
when you find out your best friend isn't coming back to college next year...
japan sex photo  chick gets fucked
let's fly away!
$79-springhill suites orlando at flamingo crossings -  travels
mpho tutu: choosing between the church and being gay -  that god called her to serve his church&amp; they reject the call
  will uber's new moves be enough to keep its drivers happy?: in the wake of two class-action lawsuits a...
hey tweeps check this dude out
sat eating a bowl of fried chicken whilst watching sherlock
the lack of discussion about homophobia in the wake of this tragedy shows our society's lack of interest in dealing with queer issues.
what has happened in orlando is senseless, unexplainable violence to me. i'm sorry for all the ones who are injured and didn't make it!
hubs got to spend sometime with the kids
  father's day...  celebrating father's day
wanting only what you've and you'll be
  'happy endings' could still get happy beginning at hulu; cast trashes abc for not backing them at ...:...
now that is life like! just like a man! takes you almost there then stops! lol! what a let down!!!
these damn bills is keeping me from getting my weave did!!!!!!    feeling aggravated
fighting sexism by calling me pigwoman. but it's ok, he's got his special victim class shield up.
9-in-10 on terror watch list who sought guns were approved in 2015 - cnn
me thinks they would rather even let the thugs go than kill an innocent civilian.
embrace the moment. congratz to all.
be courageous enough to be happy  amidst those who choose to be unhappy. will bowen
i can't even remember ben's voice
  bihdaygs  bihdaygs  bihdaygs
half cookie / half glass milk.
wohooo !! pachhyyy  congratulations
trump real estate buddy carl paladino wishes obama dead of mad cow disease in 2017
i wish i had someone to go to the pool with me :(
i get excited to watch love island so i've saved myself two episodes for tomorrow
you deleted all your subtweets at me.
this is me lol
three days before depaing to blackpool for my exhibition with kevin painter &amp; devon petersen on friday!
today is rainbow day in kc! keep the vicitms in orlando in your thoughts &amp; prayers today! hug your loves ones!
  anal sex gallery adult mother daughter relationships
this man  everything tamia say. lol been dick riding all day
make it a great day!
haven't been to back to the motherland since i arrived to america ...
lasted a whole hr in the gym, spent time with my nana and opa, been to the african oye and now chilling with a vodka and diet coke
my work officially approved my time off. i'm now definitely going to vegas for international fight week. i have tickets for 200!
more fun in the grocery   father's day!
  happy hour roundup: ... * burgess everett and seung min kim repo on some democrats in the senate sei...
next month i'm doing it for!
hms belfast is cancelled due to no electricity so off to whitehall and churchill war rooms.
in other news, i have to wait until after 7pm today to watch oitnb.
you okay bro?
hillary - trump war on twitter! this election is going to be the worst election in the history of the us presidential election.
he's a monkey kept sticking his tongue out   see u i the other side
america is feasting on sensationalizing this tragedy it suppos it's greatest agenda islamic hate and lgbt suppo
  father's day love you daddy . our parents in any work helpfulness and available . without father i'm...
sunday dinner: instant noodle with smoked duck breast, sweet carrot cubes, red spinach &amp; my 3 favs: egg, cilantro &amp; garlic.
  bihday rajesh da
so many repulsive things he said &amp; did should have been his downfall. nothing stuck. and now he moves forward w/any
this just made my day!   dance
guess what came in the post today so immediately watching it!
accidentally killed my pup. they told me and i should have listened.
about to play our first show ever in italy...
oh nooo.  he's not falling like we want.  polls are crashing.  people showing for rallies. oh noooo.
 on that mans  for life
this week i learned an old friend who lives on the other side of the world, who shares a timezone bihday with me, isn't dead.
 only ugly bitches complain about it girls pillow porno photos
football is next.   preseason is only a month and a half away.
i just found out it's not sterling silver and it's gonna turn my finger colors and i am
red lanternchengdu  dragon boat festival
fragrance spotlight: get happy this spring/summer with clinique - latf usa
its hard to take a role up in somebody's life, when you not even pa of the script
you know what?! after all these years of you guys asking me, i'm doin it! i'm auditioning for the next season of american idol!
crazy but it happens because a negative event is considered a step closer to ban. hence gun lovers buy buy buy. .
yay! just ordered my brochures and business cards.
it hit me today that president obama is a .  he has clearly struggled with israel suppo.
  after sex sex mom son free
i found that!!
we all will b banned from fascist book(my account was disabled for being anti muslim)&amp; socialist twitter next
only way to end  is to end races. there is only one race ... the human race.
eeeekkkk is this real life?!?!
as a little girl that beautiful smile and equally  cheerful !!
every dancer or cheerleader i hope you all have a fun camp experience!!
this just happened... loan approved! we'll close the beginning pa of next week!
feeling somewhat   today ..
my hea goes out to all of those affected by this tragedy
can't wait to see everyone's pictures from edc!
what did i do???
omg 4:31 a.m on the clock. 15 ragos kills after last wand and no drop..
huge thank you to john lewis futura park, ipswich, just replaced my laptop due to recurring fault. great service by michael and chris
this beach blast is going to be lit like had to take a comp day friday to get my hair done early
so much to look forward to. london zoo, cousins wedding, harry potter film, harry potter play, holiday to lanzorate
coz it's the concern of 80% population. don't forget povey causes many crimes everyday.
 , rock, oh yeah, rocking, rockin, hell ya via giphy
final exam in 3 day
nude sex model of teen   pussy
tom robinson was found guilty and looking at jem i knew that it was not good
what is it?  another poem updated on wattpad! check it out! link's in my bio.   teens
you hoes be for the moment  .
  i want to join vanoss and his crazy friends
when your co-worker makes fun of you for liking k-pop.
last day at work before my holiday
when you chewin' a piece of meat and the half get stuck in tha throat ,so you have to swallow the whole piece unchewed
good morning and   father's day
just ate a whole pizza by myself
just received my apple cinnamon vanilla candle from charmedaroma!
i wish things would get better soon, as i'm tired of being positive when you're mired in a pigsty of negativity from those around you
vanity costs another life on planet eah
everything i do, i do it for you
  sex stories israeli college girl sex
  hardcore top 100 best ever naked on web cam
 chick gets fucked sexy big naked booty
countdown sta........   :-*
no one, and let me tell you, no one respects women more than me, sweetie.
had to change my pw as some1 (i wonder who?) tried to hack my acct . bit pathetic to stoop that low bcos u can't get a rise or a win
that's crazy yo !!
oh man that singer christina grimmie died such a sad deal and from what i've read she was killed by an ex boyfriend! wtf is wrong w/ppl
putins once-mighty bank for pet projects now on chopping block - bloomberg  !
night sis, sweet dreams, awesome pics xo
1st commercial not for cavs championship gear but for nba.
i am so excited to meet my new classmate in sy:2016-17
wishing the queen who is complaining about the real queen milking her 90th bihday a
  couple having sex couples porn free
it's truly awkward to believe this.. getting isolated from 'dreaming mitchy' day by day. apparently i'm turning into a nerd :(
  father's day to all fathers this is my dadz he has been there for me nuff youth never
off to view venues for the next video
every guy i've attempted to talk to lied to me lol
life's not fair i have no dstv!!  i should just wake up my parents and force them to pay for dstv  !
thank you darling xxx
  bihday john moore
my kids bday ain't till october and i already know what i want their theme to be.....
a wise man once said..
  happy to play the waiting game: happy to play the waiting game. ireland manager will wait until the la...
 sex videos online young porn
all of my friends are leaving me behind to go to college
grand-ma yetta is dead.
  father's daythere is no words to describe your sacrifices.
friday   hours are just plain better. come by after work and grab an icy draft beer and homemade brat!
ppl beefing over child suppo while it's a murder spree going on in orlando
not common knowledge for a nebraska family. i know 1st hand gf doesn't enforce that area even w/workers present
finally a   post!!!
first time using twitter   follow me for more tweets on my growing soccer career
really is pathetic, dave
same to you bro.
gonna go swimming today!..
a win is a win. japan no slouches. need more clinical finishing
oh the feels!
when ex students drop by!
hey friends, come out to my open house today from 2pm-4pm. it's going to be a blast!
funny how everybody want deals but don't even give deals they damn self
great job kylie!
reading trump and hildawg suppoers argue is amusing. it also solidifies my hate for what this countries political process has become.
life is a sweet music.... just play it...  ~unknown   weekend
not nearly as sad as caps fans and their teams predictable 2nd round exits from the playoffs.
when your retarded and don't know anything about basketball
i don't believe it
so i took my cat to take a blood test and she got mad and now i can't plug my laptop anymore
you don't even know. our generation doesn't know how to accept the innocent pas. all they care about is sex.
cant get anything done anymore. can we just fast-forward time to the wwdc keynote so i can get on with my life again?
we've gone from "i regret that i have one life to give..." to "i don't want to get off the couch to help"
madison said shes callin everyday untill her dad answer or he change that number too....
and hopefully sc will resolve soce/cant assume office vis-a-vis will of the electorate.
it's so loud these poor babies must be so scared and overwhelmed ugh please let me take them and keep them
some bear in good company is (almost) all i need to be
orange is the new black. friday!
when jimmy the greek now disappoints you because you've been to greece... and realize that jimmy himself apparently never has been
mickey bout to have to get on the block... them parent about to bankrupt disney world.
also getting to see an old friend today and not study for boards!! tis a good day.
make a promise to yourself that this summer you're going to do something each week that makes you  - make sure you do it no matter what
idk if it's just me, but sma ppl sometimes don't have common sense
what doesn't kill me makes me stronger and with what i've been through, i'm the strongest fucking bitch you will ever meet.
lovely film watched tonight  albeit a bit
   but even at 88, raiford feels hes been cheated out of his life. he wasnt ready to retire or give up his...
all these polaroid photos but i still don't have one with my bae.
this is something that i have to continue to tell myself!
eahlings will always be eahlings
so ah pop pills form!!!....jez bin me  fathers day
after i let you go, every single day. i am alone obsessive and miserable
  kylie and kendall share flashbacks on father's day: and both kendall and kylie took to instagram to wi...
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i watched all my siblings walk the alumni hall stage. some more than once! tomorrow i get to experience it for myself.
searching for a house ain't no joke, shit is a battttle .. but within the month i am going to buy my first house
okay so y'all i didn't take an l on my english regents
 me asssfffff lmfao
'coach annie' battled racism and sexism - now she's got an mbe
are we entering a new age of ? a repoer reflects on the hate crime beat
7 mins to find a 1rm power clean. 130kg with 5 seconds left.
we wish you   father's day... (kapish jewels)
hope everything's going to be alright.
how true is this.
don't rely on others to make you  .
rest in peace julie :-(
hypocrite. traitor to the progressive movement. when a woman can't stand in her firm beliefs &amp; endorses greed!
yaaaay can't wait!
below childish decisions in nairobi, suddenly no passage through some pas of kisumu without an id! does kenya have any leaders today?
  boy  liom abdalla jr
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
made a consultation appointment to design my next tattoo
love this image :-)
can't wait to see dolphins. i've never seen real life dolphins except from on david attenborough's shows.
legit sad! my friends mom has alltimers diease, i can't think of a worse thing than having my mom not recognize me!
regardless to the fact jo cox was an mp she was a mom , a wife , a daughter   sad times we live in
absolutely brilliant booking! loved them last year
heyy, i saw that u are a fitness fan, so i ask u to test my ios app, it's called "my training" on apple store
11 days not smoking and have already knocked 5 mins off 6 mile run
some people   stay like the moon , jus want tek yuh shine  ... ... ...   sunday, new week
i spend most of the week thinking about writing. what i will write, who will i write it for and when tomorrow, ill actually do it.
celebrating my bday by spending the day in biology at mgsu!!!
daddy's break, took all three to malibu beach. happy daddy's day to all dads!!!
smh my dad so happy  ig he got his wish cavs win...   father's day tho
  saturday happy lang
takes country down too. just to feed the ego of the orange clown.
  ramadan to all  mussulmanic twitter friends..blesessing month....n happy. .
the original moto 360 and lg g watch won't be upgraded to android wear 2.0 | the verge
leaving tuesday at 10
tomorrow i sta my new job.
this time 2 weeks today i will be on the wonderful isle of bute
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
now playing  :  eiko yamashita - " the twilight shore" on     music song
lebron is doing nothing but passing. my dad: " this nigga point shavin! you 3 feet frol the basket and passin but u big as hell"
a sunday well spent brings a week of content.   sundae fam!
when i feel   is a children's story about recognizing, expressing and managing sadness. it is par
cute girl and my favourite actress
in the studio.
 girls in the world movie of nude women playing spo
thanks vignesh :)
going to macau today hope all is ok......
writing in "cruz" on my ballot!!
  hardcore tracks j lo porn video
da porn   dragon porn
  hardcore smurf theme naked pitcher girls six
today is a good day!!!
beating the rush on the tube!   days
we're definitely very happy to get that many points against that good of a team. it's hard to explain....
was supposed to be sta my goalie camp tomorrow morning.  thanks to my shitty knees i'm going to work.
i love you sona baby
i think this is the latest i've been up all summer ??
so many weddings and none of them are mine yet
   banking quiz  26
i've got my first vocal lesson today!
  look: lions tweet 'happy bihday' to player on completely wrong day: kyle van noy's bihday got off ...
feel so bad today.
imagining vps for dem, gop &amp; lib paies all from mass....
ct high school bans the word white in decades-old game cheer over sudden fears of
 fathersdaymessage -fathers-day-message.png buy things about "happy fathers day
it's truly sad seeing politicians using a horrible tragedy to fuher their political agenda such as muslim ban and gun control.
for this country!
i love jimmy caer! until barack came along, he was my favorite president.
the new look to wednesday nights staing 7pm tonight - the night for jazz, funk, soul &amp; blues!
 black girl porn singapore scorpio girl porn
so bud and that's 70 show is where i am tonight
guys. i asked this guy i like out to the movies and he said yes!
my dad's in atlanta for his high school guy's reunion, my mom's having a girl's night in tonight and i'll be in my room watching pll.
tell all my people ima rider noboy cry when we die outlaw let my ride!   bihday tupac
news about jo cox is appalling.
  fathersday to all
 video men and women malayalees zoe saldana naked pics
when he's buying you pizza
turns out that i need glasses again.
go cavs  !
was it only 1 person? how can 1 guy take out so many people? he had to trained in order to carry such horrendous attack. isis is here!
southern club girl porno  sex videos
i'm not ready for a new sem yet............ i'll be on hiatus by this week until the end of the year
that moment when you can retweet your own tweets and everyone else can :(
thanks just read it. he had two handguns and a large hunting knife. they have to better security from now on.
in exactly one month i'll be in pittsburgh at a justin bieber conce
hosed teen  representations of women in men's alcohol ads
wow!!!now this is the news driving me crazy thoroughly  can't wait to watch my idol  super
very exciting! we can't wait to find out!
when someone steals your usual username and you have to be the sod with the 2 after their name... honestly who stole 'minigiraffe'! :(
  dragon boat festivalone of this year ,
 , 30 rock, tracy jordan via giphy
sometimes i wish panch was a girl so we could do girl things together
edc is about to be lit tonight  hopefully we find squad
the magic + music all around~just is! created by immoal hands unseen not by flesh and blood
when you work in a mall and you want to die
getting all prepared to sta my new routine and join my new gym!
am an open book,i jus cant be read except someone shows interest in the story.  child
miami in 31 hours: grocery shopping at 12:30 am, sleep, model stuff, tacos, wynwood, nutella ice cream, beach, chilling with friends.
wings event i'm now licensed to take to the sky
great white pay  bihday skunk sue
i wanna give zero fucks about this job so fucking bad
packed a gender reveal for this lady today at gc...she gave me the baby's gender in an envelope so we knew and she didn't and i died
how can they randomly target innocent people we live in a fucked up world
   morning to all ......
rest in peace a coach and player
when i feel   - recognizing, expressing &amp; managing anger. printable activity, color and b&amp;w ver
regardless of the group... it's someone who doesn't like people who is not like them.
 sajjad_irfan: a mother can take care of ten children but sometimes ten children can't take care of mother.
new tv package installed basic package and still get cricket bonus   time
 porn tube porn gallery net
getting back into writing in my journal and its making me
now in bed watching oitnb
 video men and womenmalayalam sex girl ass
nothing impoant happened...
i am a   man
never expected arun shourie to fall so low...
don't call yourself micronesian we don't want you
$99-wall hang or over-the-door jewelry armoire    wednesday
the world is becoming evil! someone shot my cat leo in the face with pellet/bb gun. he has stitches in nose and shrapnel in his head.
in fo bragg, california this weekend. first time i've ever attended a wedding!:d
all i was looking forward to after work today was the beach and now im not going
am i the only person that is okay with the way that i am?? all y'all out there trying to be like someone else
dang i got so many bros
time feels as if it is moving backwards.
just another day in the us
  fathers day!
lmfao my ass still waiting on a text
people these days are trying to do to much. always trying to flip what one says, and the media eats it up.
had a good job interview today, and another in the morning.
through all the tough obstacles in my life i've overcome i'm happy each one happened because they made me the strong women i am today
 , community, angry, what, mad, donald glover, childish gambino, cravetv, freakout, tro
ok (ok!)   this week i saw seals and they. were. adorable. fancy a chuckle? check this out:
our heas break for the families of the victims in orlando.
 ! - the huffington post
so unproductive today
free deep throat porno   tree friends sex
ya girl had kneaders and a chorizo and egg burrito
this is totally
no mention of the bay area, despite the "oakland tribune" twitter account and the east bay times card.
finally comming back to disneyland tomorrow
all that will happen out of this tragedy is politicians yelling at each other; ones that we the people elected. nothing will change
"telling people you're tired when in reality you're just sad."   :(
just go with the vibe,    friday
guns give glitter-guns a bad name.
god hates a halty spirit.  karen hates defeaters of race. defeat you bec of your born race identity.   . i hate racism
one more week in midland. then off to bay city
blessing be upon you all, may love peace be with you..be happy. be positive. coz you can.
just coz their is a few of these vids, dont mean they are not woh wotching, they are there hilarious, a must watc
not sure what bothers me most about these tragedies.. the instant politicizing, or the fact that nothing is done to fix the causes..
this proves it's time to educate our youth &amp; remind them of the impoance of respecting our elders.
  hardcore anthems descargar videos porno
i guess if i'm conservative i can spit in blm drinks &amp; coffee. can i spit in anyones coffee that's not a cop ?
  state of affairs
jo cox mp dead after shooting attack
awww... just. awww...
i have a lost a very dear friend who after many years i met her again just few month ago and today she is gone.
this is really shocking, just days ago, he signed keshi's condolence register, now people will be signing his own today!!!
  father's day hppy father's day dad luh yah a lot
walker and cole left me here for 3 hours by myself
  couple having sex shaving wifes pussy
finding out the davis cup is being played about 10 minutes from where i live, then seeing i'm going to be out of town.
spending time at the park with my angel. i love working from home
the latest titan news!
dad gone and now am traveling through the road for too long with my siblings alone,hope he was here for a helping hands.  fathers day.
if you ever question if racism is still around today, just think of all the people who suppo donald trump
because i miss ball
while tempting 2 dismiss as minor, routine  comments made the women question their talent &amp; success potential
it's so nice knowing that i still feel "first time i watched knuckleball" about my lady and not "12th time i watched knuckleball"
  4th of july
 video men and womenmalayalam hot vip sex pornostar anal
what did the table with the 2 white people say... i bet it it said 2 whites. and the 2 indians? how is this
candles lit, laundry drying, doggies napping...
 livelypics: remember, for everything you have lost, you have gained something else. without the dark, you would never see the stars
final salutes for bretagne, the last 9/11 rescue dog
noh cornwall   :)
every single time there's a mass shooting... this seems to be involved.
and to complement wedding gifts. engraved boards for any time of the year.   fathers day
some people want to sound woke and outraged sooo bad w no idea what they are talking about just repeating tweets and popular posts
this has no tit at all.  i'm very disappointed.
i know it does not make any sense but i'm   because i went to
making time for play will make you more creative, productive,   and connected!
time for my summer playlists to get 1,000x more
my frustration has been building up...this just topped it!
finally ordered my prom dress
i sta to scream as it's supposed to be high speed
no love is greater then moms love and no care is greater then dads care.   father's day to every dad.
  fathers day to a great father, donald trump!
i never knew how stressful putting out merch would be  it shouldn't be this hard to find hq photos and awork done of me, no?
he sure does doing training for work today and all i can think about is last night
  fathers day. dad you are the reason i am here. love u dad.
  dragon porn meet women for sex kingston minnesota
know i've got the euros to keep me occupied but i cannot wait for the bpl to sta and watch lfc defend their title   much
d'awwwww. chance wants to go with!
rang council to repo used syringes near work,they're not even slightly bothered despite being next to a primary&amp;secondary school.
11 habits of supremely   people
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
throw back to tawnee
moto sushi in phoenix is no bueno.
work hard:;pay harder    weeknd !!
just been offered a new job. same employer, different role, but effectively two steps up. go .me.
the beach is my   place
now playing  :  abandoned toys - " within a lilac clutch" on     music song
a confused set of people. they allowed outsiders to judge their case from colonial days till date.
big news in our household. it is confirmed that jeremy and i will be able to sta building our dream house this summer!
one tree hill and ice cream!!
  90th bihday for the queen and  95th bihday for price philip xx
hello! some ya'll girls just can't wait to pop that
latest news -   to be pa of another season of 'the stage': vishal click here...
england footy fans already arrested 4 fighting at euros. our national spo.... basketball can't even get a page in the national press!
feeling  . i hate huing people close to me.
design agency goals...
i have borborygmi,  flatulence or gas and sometimes diarrhea, sometimes nausea. so. im lactose intolerant now?
looking good birmingham!!!
watching old 1d conce videos. no way in hell zayn was having such a horrible time as he says. he looked happy. he looked confident.
such a nice day!
  friday - we are ready for the weekend
an employee says this high end restaurant uses code words for minorities - attn
just woke up &amp; can't stop smiling for no paicular reason, life's just good
y'all really be beefing over niggas
i broke a nail and idk until when i'm gonna get it fixed :(
it's so hot in my room that all my food is melting
yes. it is racist. you and your boss owe an appology to the people of pueo rico
picking strawberries whilst being treated to a fly-by by a b17
didn't want to end facetime
i've seen more rip pictures than graduation pictures
 damn this is so me
  father's day to all the fathers out their
go fuck yourself richie. we like it and it's not going anywhere!
told disabled badge ready to be collected, which you shouldn't have to do anyway if you have mobility issues, and it's not there
wow!! my face in vegas and i'm not even there yet!! lol
 , mad, adventure time, finn, finn the human via giphy
really was in mid city at the dj looking toe up  .
take care of yourself people
when you text everyone to hang, and no one is available.
can't wait till three to leave work
 mindsconsole: stop worrying about someone that isn't worried about you. never leave your key of happiness in someone else's pocket.
can't wait to eat theeese
crazy how cutting one negative person out of your life can make everything so much different
i'm in love with trees, the ocean, and a beautiful woman... what more could i possibly need?
be   today check  explore your beauty blog
  hardcore vinyls watchmen caoon porno
yesterday i spent my bihday close to the sky, with my hea flying high....
islamic terrorist killed them!should he praise them? i live in orlando &amp; i'm scared 2 death of muslims now.
mood someone text me
love you dad   father's day lots of love dad.....
in the brazil show, they had no problem and yet aoi, reita and kai seemed to be in a bad mood.  !
i'm so curious
me?  ? never.
no one wants to hangout   :/
please be hurry, so excited too
girl they know that they just be trying to make they self feel good
always be   !
leaving to dubai tomorrow!!
everything is better when the suns out and the days are long!
when you sta you day with happiness...u usually ends it with happiness... be   if you can...
:-(     my hea also breaks for all the innocent refugees who lost their lives in the see.
  and hunger level just went up
see you soon!
  state of affairs
i just cannot wrap my head around anton yelchin. it just shows how sho life really is and every day should be lived to its fullest.
free sex avi  against women in the workplace
how 6 olympic athletes deal with the pressure
let us pray for orlando.
what on eah motivates anyone to walk into a night club and slaughter innocent people?  world has gone mad!!!   .
it took me a moment lmao
get pumped! if you are free tomorrow, make sure you are on lake dillon around 11 am!
the real problems: i aint got a 3ds to play fire emblem and i'm broke af.
i just got free chipotle
my apps are kinda soa colour soed and it wasn't even intentional.
that moment when ya loan someone some thing knowing they have no money to replace it and then get the phone call saying its destroyed
oh. so you get to lie around the house spouting  while your "broad" does all the work. must be nice being a
this is the legacy of meera sanyal of aap! and yet liberals will say she is right.
this is the shit that's happening in the world.
nowadays your significant others friends and enemies look out for you more than they do.
listening to dance anthems, im now in danger of dancing a little
twenty one pilots is on tour and im miles and miles away
naked raw divas   hardcore forums
 backed by science  "..there are significant genetic differences, which developed rapidly, between the races"
try to make at least one person   every day
i thought working in the recession bar would be great craic but it's not cause i don't know anyone cause they're all 10
if the bible is right somebody got to b wrong
see you tomorow!!!
my christmas tree is still up  ....smh i can be so lazy sometime
progressives anti-jewish sentiment is perpetual..nothing is needed to stir it
men! it's obvious they were provoked! what about women?! for not clever ones: that was black sarcasm...
nba trying to push it to a game 6!!
  bihday tay
 representations of women in men's alcohol ads hot sex galleries
no greater test of a psychologist's abilities than a session with a trump suppoer.
my first meal of the day is at 3:00 pm
im so so hollow , and dissapointed.
 girls in the world natt chanapa nu sex fuck
collectors corner: angry birds
his true colors: he spouts cool ideas, but no solutions. he's not a democrat. he's only for himself. he hides taxes.
nude pics jessica alba   pussy
penultimate week of placement stas tomorrow. can't believe how fast this has all gone and that in 2 weeks i will be leaving
it isn't my love... it isn't....
i hate life and helen and all her stupid antics!! i hate her so much
great session this morning! on way to te halton for sign in wish me luck!!
old man came up to me while i was doing incline weighted pushups &amp; said "hey missy.. that has to be the best push-up i've ever seen!"
am i the only one who wants to kinda hu the people who made the new powerpuff girls
everything is unpredictable.  .
go back to your 2 followers!
mentioned 3rd time in a row on leading newspapers
lovely chilled day.. sun bed .. shower.. fresh bedding , films and gorgeous candles
happy is giving all the girls a wing wing
the excursion is the same when you go looking for your sorrow as when you go looking for your joy. ~eudora welty
i was thinking that myself. i can't believe there are that many unintelligent/racist people out there.
after months of idleness on youtube, finally heading back to filming for a new vid this weekend. :)
this lie, like the immigration one, gets coverage, but the truth?  rarely
dominic lam very soon! :)
just joined a group of hardcore business ladies who are going reignite this firecracker...
hahahaha the question now should be who isn't in this movie?!  ang laki ng cast, guys!
i donated blood today!
your fucking replying skills are as shit as the shittest toilet brush! honestly!
he just killed an old lady with pie i'm
i feel soooooooooooooooo good today     share it you do too
if the thief has any kind of soul he'd give the money earned from selling it as scrap back to the food truck.
osu launches divided community project
walker is up and running
editorial: calling racism by its name - new haven register
nude girls in porn   hardcore techno songs
and just like that, my weekend at my   place is over
spread the energy of happiness
and so it begins?
actually the best bihday ever
 naked woman skye blue porn
good morning sweets. selfie with my mamma. big day for baby sister anitanatalia7
feeling cold and  .
tomorrow i am attending a festival myself. it's been a while!
smaccdub goes live!
no matter how long of a time span spent apa, we come together, and everything can pick right back up where we left off.
9 tweets to my 5,000th  - my speedos are staing to tighten and i sense moisture
that's so sad!!!
be   with who you are...
second day last
  for st lawrence school pta afternoon of fun with a once upon a time theme on today between 12 - 3pm
it's sad my friend :(
especially with someone else who enjoys coffee!
when the fedex man asks if i'm old enough to sign....i imagine myself as a 12 year old girl. i guess he actually sees me that way.
  dragon porn naked woman with big boobs
moms going out so it looks like a me and syd movie night!
mom told me to be careful cause of what happened in orlando, i told her i was at greater risk of this getting my education at a school.
it's all about the    herschberg
coldplay, wembley, amazing!!! big big difference from madrid back in the day!  !
roseanne barr: "we would be so lucky' if trump won. not a joke..she's serious! i just lost all respect for her.
this aicle made quite an impact and stayed with me.
 interview on monday!
kim kardashian's indecent gq photoshoot is trending above a british member of parliament who was stabbed, shot and passed away today
there truly are some narrowed minded people living in america  they refused to  the truth because they rather enteain the lie
voice contestant christina grimmie shot dead at florida conce
yeaaaahhhhh!!!!!!!!! paramore is making a new album!!!!!!!!!!!
i have never understood why someone goes out of their way to be mean to someone
i ruined my bathing suit i'm
women orgasm squi  office woman
so poorly researched on hrc. typical writer vs journalist.
what better way to go to bed than with a smile on your face
so sad.
10 more days till i get to see my family back home.
lovely! i pray that the lord jesus give peace to all the family's.
last weekend on this rust bucket... next two weekends are mine   days
 girl ever free nude lesbian pics
dems play political games in the media spotlight.shows that dems think their lives are more impoant
first time playing a blizzard game. overwatch has some the most toxic people i've ever chatted with. holy fuck. bunch of manchildren.
i was gonna eat my leftover pizza for breakfast then i remembered i left it in david's car
  why rich people aren't as happy as they could be: this is because, as professors elizabeth dunn and mi...
what about spyro? i'm an ungrateful bastard that just loves spyro
blah. i can't get out of this funk.
and hopefully wake up those have 'heads' in sand...the leaders in power refuse to recoginize &amp; act
i will never understand why people in college come back to hang out with ppl in high school
some niggas chillin waiting for blessings to fall out the sky putting in little to no work year after year barely making it  !
sunday love   fathers day to y'all daddies out there
we need to address dehumanisation &amp; stereotyping to tackle the employment gap for people with disabilities
we always enjoy finding out that somebody had a good time with us!
americas schools must have zero tolerance for !!
im so   lemme catch that brock bitch in the streets
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
can't even look him in his eyes..
hell no, he would probably be serving life.
this is not and i repeat not a parody account.......these people spent years at uni getting journalism degrees
fina try to make tuna again lmaoooo
pretty sure if orlando shooter was christian, the left would be blaming religion, but since it was a muslim, religion is not to blame.
this could be my happy place! fill it with books &amp; food.... &amp; maybe a puppy. what more could a person want?
unfounately due to the forecast for this evening we have to cancel the summer  conce series tonight.
sad taking a cue from the bjp to mobilize a trolling army. nothing is going to work for the drug lords this time.
that whole tag is just a way for people to praise light skin men, tbh.
5 ways to be
dumped by the love of my life, used for sex, dumped by new boyfriend, used for sex. all within half a year. i need to stay alone.
talk about your number being up!!   &amp; really freaky...rip
wish you all the best    bihdayjodistamaria
see you guys soon!
our gov.does the same
amature lesbians  magazines
  father's day to all the fathers out there that loves and paicipates
getting no message is also a message
donald trump: congratulations on predicting the alligator revolt against humanity. why will obama not say 'radical reptile'?
do what makes you  !
 fucking my boyfriend sex
thanks brian. looking forward to afternoon tea xx
every 1 giving bih accept me.   face
surely you're not saying the public can't cope with serious issues? that they should be told to keep quiet?
&amp;my new goals... bring on the islands, relaxation, sun, beach, good food, company &amp; drinks yaaaay
hopefully criss will take mindfreak live on tour like he did before so everyone had chance to see it
they did deserve to be loved &amp; we were never blessed with their unconditional love &amp; happiness they bring to us
and ol boy still aint showing you off   .
mission accomplished  haha
i neeed to snap out of this mood!
more scared to go sit in a movie theater,  then to go to see a scary movie in a theater
busy focusing on my own grass to notice if anyone elses is greener   friday  venue
for only two months plus and it came crashing like a pack of badly arranged cards...
i so wanted to go maybe next year
please just educate yourself. do the research you need to back up your statements before you share your damaging/wrong information.
  father 's day
i'm so excited to build a book shelf tomorrow like jumping for joy right now.
tonight it's home made onion rings &amp; home made refried bean (leftovers from the crockpot) burritos for dinner tonight. omg
you realize you are responding to a fake picture!    that's an australian actress.  you should research more!
emos sex   fucking
when i feel   is a children's story about recognizing, expressing and managing sadness. it is par
  for first day of school !!!!
ohhh!! i just found my first track's ableton file. definetaly going to remaster it and soon build another beat upon it. so
exactly! and i see that happening real soon.  !
put on half a stone since october   :(
happy father's day to my papa lemuel love ya ^3^   father's day :)
it's heabreaking to think that there is people out there who are so bothered by being gay , they are willing to take innocent lives
be   with who you are
 women nude anal girls nude sex act
  children little brother all  at me for no resson
already   for the roast
gutted to hear about bob. someone dedicated to social justice for the people of glasgow &amp; the working class.
  independence day!  independence day!  independence day!
will humans please stop huing each other please... too much hate / anger / silliness &amp; pain going on atm...   times
  hardcore tracks fat mom naked
i would drive 20 more hours for you any day
 women nude anal alex knight porn
you will always live   if you live with hea
who you telling si  go a extra mile
specially trained officer stops two angry dogs without violence [video]
amatour   hardcore fantasy
history? or his story?
 you left one out bro... the english was lost here too bro.
some have nothing better to do then hate
maddest tweet ive ever seen
ripsticking and listening to broadway musicals on this sunny day is about the best thing yet
what have we evolved into?
i quit my imaginary gf coz she was taking too much of my office time n getting over possessive..   to be single in my fantasies n real
we always love u
i had heard there was a call for terror attacks in the us during holy month of ramadan.
i'm about to sta a new blog! documenting my new movements!
i get more than 7 hours of sleep tonight
in a few months getting my papers
when u see the world as a small place u take a cool pic to make it better......  youth day somebody.......
there's no more chinese food
you are very welcome.  thanks to you guys for being so awesome!!
now playing  :  mitsuko - " palace in the snow" on     music song
bitches so easy nowadays
says becky fucking white. what a
you can try to feed folks knowledge and let them know things to help them out and they still wont understand.   case
  will u post it when done?
planning an sg trip soon since i have enough friends that i can stay with for at least a week
papa johns j hung up on me :-/(((((
now playing  :  moon ate the dark - " bells jar" on     music song
freeporn ru   pussy
always seems a shame to build something so nice then box it back down again. good to see you all again
staring in a car commercial, filming stas this afternoon
asked my gf for help on my papers and she said no!
do more of what makes you  .
ab fab the movie released soon! i wonder if we've made the cut!?
$75/palms place: massage, hammam &amp; tons of amenities for 50% off -   travels
its amazing dems can highjack the senate, get a controversial law passed &amp; the gop w/majority, can't get kate's law even talked about?
hypepotamus: current mood:   about _gaatlanta 's web developer meet &amp; hire on 6/22.
at this rate i will be done with the entire season in one day
this excellent sho film exposes everyday casual racism.   /
just spent over an hour watching make up tutorials
so happy i've got tickets to see 1975. made my day!
i have a chick fil a coupon but not a ride
always makes my day when someone you don't know wants to talk about 5sos!
 love is the answer
absolutely craving a wagamamas. why is the closest one in edinburgh
expes explain the best way to deal with  friends and family
rip lvl 93 almost 94 shield charger (~20 ex) | had a ~20 second delay, no mobs around me when the lag staed.
i built up a world of magic, because my real life is tragic.
messy females &amp; messy niggas
me either
tyler perry claims 'reverse racism' by critics of his tlc series - thewrap
jus a publicity stunt by that ngo , like faridoon said , nothing else !!
better get up! today's the day to be an usher at a wedding
6 days to go!!!
who makes you   tee shi
a year ago today i got engaged to the person i thought i'd be with forever. it's crazy how much can change in a year.
hoping meatloaf is ok. looked pretty scary. get better meatloaf!
i hate isis!
  slapping porn demi moore nude vid
white: good  dark: bad  its a twisted version of  that makes india racist against its own people!
 video men and women malay teen mirror photos
happiest day for you, no
  fathers day tuh only de mans that a playing the role of father to their families not mans
omg, what is up with the use of the word "broad?" and if people don't agree w/you, they're "triggered??
but inside every pa of me aches. i feel   and numb. i feel like everything is falling apa. and i hate it.
my local newspaper announced gleefully that we 'finally' have a female candidate, as though gender is the only qualification necessary.
first day of special needs summer camp.
fantastic to see, thanks for sharing!
  pussy search site naked women
nice to see things are back to normal in orlando...
here we go again. second game of the day    to so the competition for our red devils
we now have two teens in the house   13th tia!
going on a motorcycle trip to spain tomorrow.
this young man ran when the two bike riders confronted him, he was conscious, he was coherent, he was aware,
how the hell could someone on the fbi watch list be able to buy this gun?
see you in the fall!
book signing, 2 days away!    feeling blessed
i can't believe we leave colorado in 46 days
 girl ever video wisin y yandel sexi movimiento
 women nude anal free porn seduction videos
now in trend!!!
proud of my fellow skokie kid!
  fathers day to my self
there is something about the ocean that gets me every time!   place quote
i cherish my days off when they finally get here; then in a blink of an eye they're gone.
they're finally big enough to leave their holes,but as soon as they leave , someone snatches and kill them. why? let them be free !
if you are not   with your income is because you don't love what you do and you are not adding enough value
unbelievable knobheads trashing the 8th!
baby taeil muachhh
how all my friends  going to be real soon!
this '93 video - '16 when he referred to sen. warren as pocahontas = a stable pattern of  and ignorance.
the latest executive coaching daily!
love u so much papa ji...   father's day  celebrating father's day
moana is looking dope. disney has been killing it with their animation movies recently!
oomf has such a low standards.
to the extra ordinary men who teach their children to love, laugh and follow their dreams.  father's day!
good morning all! last day in the office this week and then back to see the family and friends tomorrow evening!
  father's day folks
heading michigan tommorow afternoon!
my race is the only race that don't give a damn about they life, but quick to judge you on how to live yours!
 aniyadah: suzannelepage1 :)   friday, have a wonderful day...
for the first time in forever i'm be free for this!!
my foot is cut up and swollen from climbing the rocks in the lake
iggy playing w/ a broken back is better than harrison at full strength
i'm gonna follow this bloody degree!
have a   day!
politics is being dominated by whiners &amp; bullies: name calling; cries of foul; my way or no way; cultism; no compromising...
  after sex free ugly porn videos
adorable "mister blue sky" flash mob in ireland will put a smile in your face
i've been selling beats for 400$ and people was buying but when i was doing sale and giving better beats for 75$ nobody bought...
in response to the orlando shootings.  .
a year ago, i'd just got my diss results after one of the best ever nights &amp; was preparing go to parklife. today, i'm sat on the sofa
my only regret right now is i can't choose what cersei chose in the last episode of got
and when something bad happens they ask where all the hatred came from
this lovely claims to be a dem but is voting for jill in nov since bs lost.   welcome 2 the block pay troll
trump the businessman:  phony. fraud. con man. trump the man:  sexist. racist. liar. trump the politician:  gop. presidential. nominee.
janine habeck nude pictures  noud bengali girl fuck
ya mcm ask me to cop him a dutch
whoever is   will make others happy too.
tell people that , you miss them    monday
wow! over 300 twitter followers..thanks so much everyone! there will be more blogging in a couple of weeks
bought a couch on "craig's list"! $450! not bad! only 7months old! picking it up tomorrow!
june 17th : officially repo-free and... orange is the new black new season is coming out
meanwhile australian politicians say the hoax prayer in the australian parliament yet u dont let that loonacy bothe
someone abandoned a poor fish in a cup. i think fishes and tules should not be prizes.!
just a hug and a "everything will be alright" message.
niggas mad cause you makin more then them
they're talking about christina and shooting in orlando on our slovenian tv :(
when the game is rigged, change the game. run indie we can pull 45+% of the vote and pull off a lincon year!
be_perceptive:i am   with my life. i am not happy that most in the world, don't wake up smiling as we all
if donald trump becomes their president then this ll happen on regular basis...
be   today and everyday!
dont worry about nina she is all washed up her career just went down the drain right along with bs bullshit
for evil to triumph, all it takes is good people to stand by &amp; do nothing
3 assignsment to go!!
while walking home, i saw a ballon roll across the road, took a picture, &amp; then saw a car run it over &amp; pop it.
i just remembered that i finished my leftover pasta at 1am
wow. sadly i'm sure this person isn't the only one trying to sell tickets to ali's funeral.
did you catch the   ending to the stolen buggy story?
omg! it is almost school!.only 1 day left for school!.
when you get full from the fries before you even get to the burger
i heard these shos physically.
staing booking things for christmas already
they're more bars on the rez than recreational activities for the youth
agh it's hitting me... im gonna be in new york!!!!
  hardcore raves the naked woman
proms and baby showers the new weddings lmao
  love island host caroline flack sings 'happy bihday' to the queen... kind of: the love island host s...
off on holiday! so far i have added basil to my list of possibles for breakfast hollandaise and taken a photo of the restaurant pass!
 this baby is like medicine to me. i'm   i'm his uncle. he embodies his father's
white supremacy, i'm told, is the water, and we are the fish, unaware of how wet we are. we swim &amp; drink of it
i've gotten one dm in my entire life... i have nothing to slide into
waiting for highlights to take effect can't wait.
that is my wish what i want to watch... politics and censorbord please stay away from this...  huh  ...
kyrie had to play like jordan just for them to get a win
just be yourself...   and contented
people protect what they love  world oceans day!!!!
the us is imploding by its own hand! hate, bigotry &amp; intolerance only display weakness. solidarity is strength, separatism is the enemy
it's father's day and me &amp; my dad only fought like any other day &amp; this time he told me that he doesn't want to talk/ see me lol
flying to greece tomorrow morning.. this is going to be the best summer ive had in 3 years!!
when i feel   is a children's story about recognizing, expressing and managing anger. male and
so we live in a world of rape enablers because a guy can coach football.
very dark clouds on outside my room and heavy rain possible
i'm excited, too
even though i hate his guts for all those roland garros wins against federer, it pains me to see nadal miss grand slams like this..
my love, my breath, my everything, beyond eternity.   father's day to all ya'll.  it's the
need to balance [love of workmates / means to an end / total unutterable sapping of joy and confidence] presently occurring. cannot.
don't forget the chain and the pinky ring.
just remembered i got the act tomorrow.
nice emoji usage have funn loves
swear 2016 is the year of breakups
"i've lost it all; my whole life, my reason for being. what d'you mean, it's just a squeaky ball? to you maybe".
tits bed hot sexy naked   birday sex xxx
ready to move tomorrow to my new central brum pad!
i would middest of keys go on a nice power walk in them.
we were all down after the match so we went to the shop and bought giant apple jelly sweets   again
i want lemon cake
i can't believe cutch is batting .237 on june 14th   and why the fuck does hurdle insist on putting in sean rodriguez at first base
current status:  !
punishment doesn't work with   children. here's what does:
1. black ppl cant be racist 2. have you seen, how a white woman acts like she doesn't get her way. this is a perfec
thinking about the least huful story i can tell willow about today's occasion in the future, when she no doubt asks. drawing blanks.
feeling hot but not really thanks for this weekend
weekend with my girls is much needed
a week till my bihday
thank you john. very thoughtful of you! enjoy your evening!
what one does is what counts. not what one had the intention of doing.
my one tree garden today is a crche holding 4 young house sparrow huddling together and a freshly fledged great tit.   bihday
always going to   no matter what.
  11th monthsary alden and maine
this is not untrue
i love getting new and random job assignments.
out of windhoek this weekend.  that means no skating with dont and no japanese food after our session
hate can not drive out hate, only love can do that.
proud of you
this is just... wow.
mold is beginning at the foundry in utah.    to bring this sculpture to aprize
it's a new day we settled everything last night why is he involving himself now
so neat. we love the idea of live paintings.
how blind we have become to live quality performance
been turning down so many oppounities to go out this week... 6 more weeks to go and by then, no one will ask me to do anything!
if you can't find me tomorrow, i am probably in my room bingeing on orange is the new black
end your week with some quotes that will make you  .
we love   patients. come see what people are saying about us!
what is beauty if the brain is empty...
it is true, these modeling agencies won't want shit to do with you unless you 20k up on followers on ig and twitter. smh
one life.. just one.. &amp; i wanna be incharge of how i feel.. &amp; i chose to be
 paladino joins parade of the s at trump tower
where are the woman rights?  you must l like a man fighting. with a woman you  idiot
but no. all i've got is my phone vibrating during 10 minutes straight bcs of you pervs and a backache.
just shows how cultural christianity has hijacked the very religious freedoms baptists have always espoused.
hiii...friends  i am back... kesse ho aap sab log... after hack my fb profile  i am so   because a'm not...
2016 is living up to its leap year.
summer stas today so now i have my minionz on the weekday! we about to go on so many adventures!!
  after sex sabeetha perera sex video clips
  pussy free porn videos for samsung
counting days...20 days to go. can't wait!
they be pussy pressed!!
it's great to be doing some work in c++ again. been far too many years + its reminding me of some of my original dreams as a coder.
nude gym teacher  black girl porn
uk festivals - check this out
national champ - 110mh happy to see those kids asking questions and taking pictures, made my day! priceless!
wishing all dad's a   father's day. you are a blessing to your children and a pillar to
our very   client getting her balmain hair extensions by our fabulous stylist rain. get in touch with rain...
can't believe the fox is allowing this rally in their theater
2016 - the year in
do what makes you you   be with who makes you smile, laugh as much as you breathe and love as long as you live.
true words bro. miss my dad too
all 5 sharks just turned down inventor who had a great product b/c he refused to send production overseas in order to protect us jobs.
now playing  :  eiko yamashita - " stars" on     music song
oh i love her work
warp tour has a good set list this year and i don't have anyone to with with. my friends don't vibe the same music as i do.
archangel wildout added, ...
grown ass men havin temper tantrums
the bitch yentl really mad cause she cant state facts bitch having kids just to keep a nigga around
 white girl has sex with black guy brother having sex with brother
i lost a lip liner
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
this is racism. also, this explains why ppl w/ college degrees these days are incompetent in the work place
yea perfectly cool.. green isn't lebron and can't back up his trash talk
this country is in trouble!! we are focused on the wrong things!
flew in to a magical oregon sunset.
thank you for listening!!  it's been a very emotional morning...really hard to process what happened!
soon i'll be one!
after 12 years tita johanna.&amp; tito erwin and kuy ej,cj,lj after 4 years we're complete again and tit joy ashley kuay aaron tito son
  hardcore raves rubbing pussy hard
we live in a society where someone won't value you enough to send a text back but will jump at the chance to sleep with you.
(mail online):  obama hits back at trump over aftermath of orlando attack - but..
horrified, condemnation, blame mental health/ religion, do nothing about gun control. gun company shares are more impoant than lives.
turn up the volume, sit back and be  ! happiness is a choice. open you hea to it! enjoy!!
sorry but angry with a ceain espn show right now.
i want to. but im under age hahahaha
the greatest gift i ever had came from god. i call him a dad
i've must have done something very good in a past life for having so much blessings in this one
im going to do this. tomorrow in the afternoon!!!!
some auditions are so awesome - that was one of them. love it when you get to play around and be a big kid! exactly why i'm an actor
key to this cavs win is lebron being
if you find yourself at least once a day thinking "where i am at this exact moment in life is pretty amazing", you're onto something.
please pray that all children and teens of color in 2017 are not living in fear of  in america and afraid of being targeted
  father's day
when ur reminiscing and going threw photos
 intercourse video men and women older nude pic
thanks a lot $15 minimum wage idiots now i have to pay 1.19 for a hot in spicy and the dollar menu doesn't exist
absolutely hate it when the show i'm watching kills off one of my favorite characters
sucks more not going
and yet people still think it's better to have more guns.
two happy ponies this evening.
is friday's shooting death of teen related 2 nearby teen death 2 months ago? {
i tried it, i felt like i was running away from my problems
do people in wheelchairs have sex   sex stories
  alt ways to heal:
when worlds collide and all is said and done. it's the happy moments we hold on dearest.
wow. that was the shoest "moment of silence" i've ever seen. and apparently nba fans are a little unclear on the concept of silence.
my date looks super hot tonight on our 2nd anniversary  off for dinner la boca grande, barcelona
sta bake coklat moist cake ^^ huuu.
when bad things happen to good people
people who can get time off work to go to the euros but haven't need to have a long hard look at them selfs
surgery went well.
going into my first school pitsford school since sylvie was born, fundraising for southam parenting project  !
all the guys i'm into are like 22 graduated n all ugh...i'm a child
nope are role models but one is treated as such!  .
now playing  :  ackroyd poppy - " glass sea" on     music song
  father's day to all good  fathers out there i mean  the responsible  ones .
when you realize your woh and what you actually deserve after belittling yourself and settling for less for an entire two years.
[ ] thank you "battlescan" for the follow !
tristan just got really   when he said i look different today and i told him i wasn't wearing glasses
lol but regardless we still a get it.
i thought the 500 dollar fine was more effective in discouraging people from littering in the higways.
as if orlando needed another shooting after christina grimmie.
poetry for comfo from grief  share your memorial ofa loved one
can't wait for this weekend to celebrate ma'u &amp; bo's big day! first time at a cambodian wedding!!!
going to feed the homeless this weekend
  couple having sex lesbian sex movie clippings of girls through wmp
testing for swc4 screening at podium!!! buy your tickets!
the libs are at their "silencing act" again &amp; getting more aggressive with it. wait till they get silenced by the&gt;
real life living persons actually desire to vote for this vindictive, hate driven, murderous, conniving, liar.
choose to be happy today.
wish i could be there!
sex with reptiles   birday sex xxx
studying in a rainy day
sometimes it's better to be alone, nobody can hu you...
good morning :)
check out the aicle re our as council success -make work as pa of the ocean city festival, plymouth
  couple having sex sock monkey porn
milner is a curse!
no one here but us
a week til wet weekend.
if you making her and her kids happy..you the real mvp..aint my fault..shawty layed with a boy that couldnt step up and be a man
he makes me so
  hardcore raves cousin porn tube
really two no calls for too many men on san jose but now the refs can count!
2016 just got a whole lot brighter for me
from my point of view, my life is already a bundle of many miracles. , peg :-)
today is going to be a great day
where are the boy mates fucked off and left him
  hardcore anthems youtube hard core sex old womam with young man
orange is the new black - the new series.
that episode went by fast but it was
very very serious   footage re i cannot shed a tear! put me in front of a tv as i am now re i'm watching a show about a woman that is
my alignment sucks butt! i've aligned my truck 3 times already in 2 year....
only good stuff happened since morning  ^^
siri reveals what apple will announce at wwdc -- in a way
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i really hate video game addicts.. i'm so fed up...
  father's day to all the amazing dad's out there!
the game a is coming together!
some people can tweet without any grammatical error only when they copy their tweets from an aicle
  witches perform max-hexing of stanford rapist
it's him who taught to be strong enough to face the hard reality....love u immensely but never show that way...  father's day.
my phone won't charge, i think it's broke
  how to lose be
dark archers for ren fest
soap opera journalism!
omg made it to kinder gonna get in the way this weekend lol
oh jesse
so excited for edinburgh and to take a show that i have written and directed my self. gotta some brilliant actors in it as well!
i read hillary's tweets and always say, very presidential. i read trumps and think, really? this is who represents the right?
a son's hero. a daughter's first love.   father's day!
happy weeksary and monthsaryy!!!!! aldub!!!! love u ate meeennggg!!!
i know it sucks!
i don't want no fuck ass relationship
more attacks, more shootings, more deaths...and there are still people voting for trump
something albe would say.    truth
"some of us don't know or dont care about the destruction a wrong information can bring"
attendance at the most recent trump rally
things are looking good at the min, hope it lasts!!
amazing sir very amazing
i truly feel bad for my pals in the states knowing that impact wrestling let alone slammiversary is shown free over here for uk fans
  sex blonde sexy utah girls
the benefits of being a nordstrom customer outweigh the benefits of being an employee
  pop culture happy hour, small batch edition: slate's black film canon: on may 30, slate published a fe...
new week, same god ! ! ! thankful for everything and hopeful for what's to come    new week
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
now playing  :  fariborz lachini - " ghabileye eshgh (solo piano)" on     music song
summer helps your mood///
today, keep passing visual reminders of a fabulous afternoon in the sunshine, on the south bank, last month
been up since 5
princess eugenie caught up in racism row
it's both funny and sad which seem to me to be the two basic ingredients of good comedy. ~tony hancock
happy happy days!!!
my first dollar bill!!
about to watch it
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
that will make you  :
hmm are they finally waking up or was it all those democrats filling the stadiums?
  happy father's day 2016: whatsapp, sms, facebook messages to wish your father on this ...: father's da...
  couple having sex free black pussy downloads
  after sex naked black girls fotos
found the car i want finally  now need to hurry up and get rid of mine before it goes!!
i got my eyebrows done
i'm finally done with my 2nd semester! just had my last exam and i got an a! (or b in eu scale) omg!!!!    ~l.
sad chain of events in orlando between pulse night club and now the alligator situation at disney world...
     tnxss xo xo much dada....
feel sorry for players on teams that are forced to suppo beliefs that they are adamantly against nor suppo.
is trump on pot man sure sounds very paranoid... unless you are a white male....
  bihday celebrations for our queen today! we all had a lovely picnic wearing our red, white and blue!
good evening po !!!
  for hyderabad this saturday...5pm, crossword, inorbit...
do it and enjoy it, be
it wraps around the mall with my sister probably isn't going to end and your going to cry and be
ughhh... that game
ian darke never misses a chance to slag off his homeland.   more &gt;&gt;
little guy is going crazy tonight  best feeling ever being pregnant only 129 days to go until i meet my little guy
when you realize that you accepted them for every single one of their flaws but they couldn't get past just one of yours..
south africans are the friendliest people in the world! -    thursday to all the friendly south africans
it almost happened...
i'll keep my 2yo &amp; 5yo clear of nebulous leftisms like "diversity" &amp; "inclusiveness" until their crap filter's good.
rehearsals are over and i fly to vancouver tomorrow
i tap myself in the shoulder and said "it's okay,don't worry your gonna be alright".feels like i'm going to tears up
sorry abt that. it's one thing some of us experience daily, esp as far-right politics flourish in europe. pure evil!
it has power of your thinking about it///
buying my dvsn ticket
the fn is seeking to rid of its anti-semitic, xenophobic image, but majority of its sympathisers still describe the
getting ready to go back to fo jackson, sc tomorrow
super machi good looking really
strongly condemn vandalism of sikh temple in calgary, canada.
lmaoooo i love it
heyy, i saw that u are a health fan, so i invite you to test my ios app, it's known as "mytraining" on apple store
sad news mate.... great kid
headed up to nac tomorrow and then to my big's wedding on saturday.
the uber driver just made me throw out my ar15
in this case, father's day...
so true
  monday , morning people x
just gonna come out and say it  yeah i do hate immigrants  now
she has been filtering taxpayer money to her daughters, isn't that extoion=lock her up and get that money back
last night was lit but how the fuck did i lose a pre rolled joint.
i would love to post my  poster however i was dragged away before i could even do so   oh
we got 2 videos coming tomorrow,
happy bihday!!!
everyday i wake up   ! i want that for everyone!
love u papa   fathers day
  johnson publishing sells ebony, jet magazines to texas firm - chicago tribune
why do  refer to everyone else as racist. simple, they're projecting their intolerance.
my pofolio is not looking the way i want it to look like. can't get it right.
all set for another himalayan trek next week. this time it is spiti valley.
lost someone today dear to our family
my 3-day old orange chicken is just soggy chicken.
he makes me so, so happy. this world needs jamesy!
just days after honoring the life of muhammad ali, a beloved and peaceful muslim who spread love worldwide, here we are in orlando.
  philip rivers wishes hardcore chargers fan 1st happy father's day and he can't believe this is real: g...
do you think it was the leaking implants you had removed that caused most of your illness?
be free, be ready and be bold. your true self will be extremely
so no lesson learnt from 2012 olympic debacle.i had higher hopes of medal from tennis in rio. not now after rohan bopanna decision.
  she made it
media is literally investing millions just to destroy islams image.
i can't wait to sta this diet and workout in couple of months.
one day i will be surfing
i just shut my automatic 6am weekday alarm and i won't have to turn it back on for two months :')
  fathers day to all the strong,hardworking fathers all over the world!
eah is dying but i'm pretty sure we are going to all kill each other before that happens.
what i did today , for himself ,will make a funny story later, but he said "you're lovely, what are you doing with an old man like me"?
no more ricky,no more tae-oh, no more tae-rin and tae-ra
if you are suffering from   try salmon:
cookingbig feed of roast up for my family on cold nite listening to cold chisel.   days
my little princes in the middle !!!!
it's not just me and you but i'm glad i got to see that beautiful smile of yours   man
over here obama and his gaggle of left wingnuts want to disarm us law abiding americans. prayers to cox family.
it's so nice to drive around and not recognize anyone driving around
i'm camping, a lil high and have reception..
the really bad element for bernie last night - hrc praises him in her speech, to a roaring crowd; bernie suppoers boo her during his.
david bentley ha
some family people piss me off.. huh    huh -_-
when you got the same feeling if someone leave you
  independence day !!!
really want my husband to come home so we can watch the new got episode now instead of tonight
can't believe that was the last day of high school
st coz their is a few of these vids, dont mean they are not woh wotching, they are, all different, there hilariou
did not expect the road to evolution ends at 'murderers' &amp; 'monsters'.
i'm happy tonight.... ask me anything i'll grant! fucking    feeling happy
gotta get back ,back to the past ,samurai jack ,watch out!!! jack is back!!
dang i'm
be positive, be
  neymar happy at barcelona despite interest from three clubs - ribeiro: neymar is attracting interest f...
results prove that i can't write an essay in 4 days. good to note for next year.  still managed to finish 2nd year with a first
are you getting your   on?
amala for lunch in church,   father's day
looks calm and relaxing
i passed my final exams
  after sex beyonce look a like porn
it's that time...  waiting on my precious granddaughter to arrive...
when you've met your ideal man, but he's with someone else :(
man hates himself, blames twitter for noticing he's a pos.
you said the wrong thing, nigga. give me your coordinates, i'm trynna run your fade.
let no one come into contact with you without them leaving better and happier! be that person  happy wednesday
  side dish: new happy hour at torre; taste of kutztown: happy hour is always an escape, but the new sev...
get emotional suppo
praying for big things rn!!!
couples who say they loyal but play eachother....
yeah about time too
that sunday sesh defo escalated quickly.. what a way to finish tt
gods gift to people!
ground 4 sane minds nd voices of peace like mani s ayer (ind), javid ludin (afg) nd asad umer is shrinking to extremists on all 3 sides
love this talented girl!!
they need a good kicking...........
  ending lucy is taking calls at  give her a call before she becomes busy!
you forgot to add "bihday"
having missed new top gear last week, i was hopeful this week. but, it's unbelievably bad. evans is horrific. chemistry is awful.
it really is like finding a unicorn!! nondairy "ice cream" that tastes so good!
google shut down gateway pundit site- they're all working to help hillary
maybe. we need to teach our children and let them lead the way. police need to help the law abiding citizens.
staing narcos again ready for season 2 in september
  hardcore singles naked women spanked
whatever you decide to do, make sure it makes you  .
i don't normally do this,but,and it's a big but,what the hell is going on with this land of ours,when an mp,and a mother gets murdered,
distance relationship
won't be watch got for a solid week. which means i will not be on the internet for a solid week...
profilo basso is the way.
couldn't relate with this more.. vacationing really depends on the company~
last shift at work done, which means annual leave has officially begun. that can only mean one thing. it's time for glastonbury
but it makes me feel old
udta punjab leaked !! say no to piracy !!!
" dem policies give lgbt 'gender neutral' toilets to hide in with policies that allow radical muslims to shoot up other lgbt clubs"
my brother is back from pougal tonight. he hasn't seen molly since christmas.
happy june bihday! sign up to get 500 perks rewards to spend this month. free posh!
it is sad, but not surprising, that our first black president was attacked for everything despite reality
my week's been good. i applied for a masters, got accepted on the masters, got my google analytics ce, and a lot of blog work done!
you don't have to smile. just remember that life is a battle and we can't win every day. we just try again.
was in that meeting for almost 2 hours and all i was thinking about was food.
wait, i follow her
emailed haunted hands to schedule a consult for my first tattoo! eep!
it's mind boggling to hear a blm suppoer repeating obvious lies, yet utterly believes them without question.
20 people who went out to enjoy themselves , now dead ...
i agree with it.
if you want to live a   life, tie it to a goal, not to people or things...
no, god is!  if u were spiritual, religious or had god in ur life u wouldn't have to ask a question like that!
dad served in wwii: if he were alive &amp; i told him today that 2 commies met n white house to discuss usa future, he wud have freaked!
eeekk!! can't wait
dame lost!!!   face
my sister is going to teach me how to drive next week...
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i'm a romantic guy, i love the ballads.  adoro le ballate, che ci posso fare.   song
thank goodness i be off for 5 months in 9 weeks time, got a list a mile long of stuff to do, before op lol all good  xx
and then there were two. :, (
proud to say i will represent ireland at2016world university rowing champ's in women's senior single scull
at the end of the day you gotta be   for you."
you missed off bihday you daft twat
to all the fathers   father's day
yes, but that 53% can't even spell iq. socialist love uneducated non thinking people so they can rule them iron rod.
i j/ want to live in sydney, and take the ferry to work every day, and eat lunch by the street performers, and swim at bondi beach
yr spiel says it all "right wing, anti islam, hate eu". so much hate.
 black girl porn free big tit blonde porn
convinced niggas only wunna fuck me.
i wish i was there too..:"(
new running shoes and gamestop had a sale on doom...
it's amazing how a bit of recognition for ur hard work can put the spring back in your step!
the dog campaign i shared for a friend &amp; the dog she adopted is no longer needed. the dog passed today, 2 days after being rescued.
 office woman cutest girl on eah nude
rip kariithi murimi. you impressed and inspired. your counsel on complex issues will be missed and deeply felt. pole to the family
this has to go down as one of the biggest fails ever. 73 win season for nothing. up 3-1 in the finals and they blow it.
i don't even find this amusing.. imagine if this was your sister
    father's day,here we have a few bargains on this table for 50p today,come along find a treat
so true. they crave the attention because they are narcissistic. for them, there's no such thing as bad press
went to starbucks cause i wanted a cup with 'rachel' for selfie purposes. they didn't ask my name.
when a girl tweets something for attention because she obviously wants attention from people behind a screen
the rantings of a theistic slave..
--------&gt; try our personalized   bihday wishes ! &lt;--------
age shame our poor mbombela didn't make it into the psl
what a stupid healess backhanded compliment to yourself
the lady at moes put a mountain of sour cream on my quesadilla
[e3 2016] crash bandicoot headed to playstation 4 as remastered hd classic  ratchet &amp; clank &amp; now crash!
true parenthood is defined by responsible fathers!    fathers' day.
happy friday boo!
we grew up fucked up its fucked up i'm believing you in a better place but it's fucking me up
my book is set for edit on the 28th!
hoes never have anything else better to do than be a hoe.
nobody likes me
people do anything for fucking attention nowadays
creative bubble got burst  looking forward to the day i never have to see my college tutor again
in life u will grow to learn some pple will work to fuck u over just coz ur life looks n feels better dan there's
when ur the joke ur defensive towards everything
  bihday your majesty
retweet if you agree!
as we all know, essential oils are not made of chemicals.
i have never had a chance to vote for a presidential candidate i was excited about and this cycle looks to be no different.
yup, being a knicks fan is hard, so its easier to just be an nba fan when the playoffs roll around
there is life after social networking. embrace each day. be
the best pa about life is knowing who you are!
a scourge on those playing baroque pieces on piano    beyond belief
you've really hu my feelings :(
i'm sure they are just as happy....    hour
the white establishment can't have blk folx running around loving themselves and promoting our greatness
carrying a gun wouldn't of helped if you can't take it in with you. gun control won't stop the black market! terrorism will get worse!
woohoo!! just over 5 weeks to go!
being in a far away place where you have no family members hus
  couple having sex fat naked japanese girls
there are some truly sick ppl out there.
trump calling on obama to resign over the orlando shootings? the boy has a point. 8 years and all he did was "talk" about change.
going to la tomorrow!!!
one of my beloved long lost cds, now recovered thanks to apple music.  !
50 laps of pool, 10k ride done and picked up a gym membership form
so blessed to have worked with sa's best leading ladies
is kinda   to be among humans again.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
u think like this too? the god who is not coming through for me. the god who is not keeping me  .
after what our country went through this last year to see people bring a "bomb" to the stadium &amp; come here for everything but football
what a self-serving hypocrite! always keep your eye on the bouncing ball with this nimrod president.
it seems like the only place with action here is montreal :(
this really takes the piss. i'm so angry. just goes to show who is valued and who isn't. you complete and utter moron.
"there's a reason why two people stay together, they give each other something nobody else can." hopelly greats day
my friend just got engaged
to the united states of america, from the rest of the world: i think you've proven you don't have the right to own firearms.
if you hold open a door for a woman because she's a woman and not because it's a nice thing to do, that's . don't even try to deny it
already bought my finding dory ticket
 themeowood:   puppy
few more days till who is  ?
who can get the pussy quicker these days
some bitches care more about their eyebrows then how much $$$ they makin at the end of the week
wishing all our clients had baby goats to cuddle!
today is the day to make the change. eliminate negativity and choose to live a positive lifestyle instead.
if you have never lost a loved one to senseless violence you don't get a fucking opinion on the 2nd amendment
i heard him say that, he was trying to lock the shooter in,  but kept other patrons from getting out!
u made us proud i hv been reading ur words &amp;  assured it will b a assoment of petite emotions wish u the best.
what a "huge" crowd for trump.
good god, why?!
it's a firework!! weeheeeee~
i just want to be  . is that too much to ask for?
wouldn't mind robson-kanu at s6. decent player. available on a free transfer too
listen up &gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;
hey, i noticed that u are a training lover, so i ask u to check my free app, it's known as "my training" on apple
nba finals = ambivalent , love steph and thompson, kyrie stinking it up, green is an class a doosh, lebron won't talk to guillermo
i love how i am so mature for my age
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
my little brother has a higher tolerance of alcohol than me!   lol
all pay meeting to tackle a movie which uncovers a problem we don't want the world to know.
some guys too concerned about their twitter "brand" to be honest with their followers.
i hate like 90% of my family.... i was really born into a big ass toxic bomb! mother fuckers don't give a fuck about me cuz i got money
how can food make a family fight mxm
back to the day job for shane lowry!
anas + nimra + farishta + mawia + khushal  960 + 952 + 503 + 484 + 435 = 3334   the number of marks obtained is too damn high   :p
 suppoing family, god, chivalry, tradition, and pride in one's heritage is now controversial.
well i was gonna go see adtr with bae...
11:11   healthy fam
im waiting for a follow since the x factor
my train hasn't moved so i'm binge tweeting
  father's day to all the dads here and the one's that are in heaven
can we talk about the ways in which organizations dehumanize us? and how they're never held accountable?
u can hold a man down for years ...and watch him change on u over some hear say..    no loyalty.. no...
if lewis remains perfect, the rangers announcers are gonna stroke out.
train tickets booked for my opera week in wales
i am saddened that no-one has thought to groom her for the position before asking her opinion on such an issue.
discussing republicans is the same thing as critiquing . we can't ignore the consequences.
got school tomorrow my last integration
actually going fishing today somewhere nice .
how cute, they both look like dolls.
  days porn movie pussy pay pics
rest in peace christina.
those bamas you fool around with might be raising your child. ppl dont think that far in advance. they just see "fun" or whatever
anti racist is a codeword for antiwhite   asia for the asians  africa for the africans  white countries for everyon
i just caught myself eating chocolate sliced bread beside the ref realizing i still didn't eat my dinner.
mitchellrattle mitchell goodson
i've had the ebook for awhile but it's so nice to have the hard copy!!!
perfect moment of the day!!!
 girls in the world sexy mature housewife
excited na me
i got the call yesterday.  mom was diagnosed with stage 3 ovarian cancer.  i'm terrified, she's terrified.  just don't know what to do.
fox new just coming out and saying it bluntly. one of the most  things i've read.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
captain felix at rutland water. the little boat behind is about to go on a very grand adventure....
to quote jeremy corbyn: "here we, here we, here we fucking go!"
 porn vids wwwsmallgirlsexcom
play england vs russia in marseille at 21:00??? what did they expect? high risk game and plenty of time to drink...
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
people be like you already forgot so and so.... nah it's not that it's just new names are made a hashtag on a weekly basis
how to be   ?!.i have the answer
big shock on monday-needed to find new home. yeah! found my dream cottage on tuesday
actually ordered a kylie lip kit
a mother can take care of ten children's but sometime ten children cant take care of their mother ,,,
ima go cry for a few hours brb
  after sex over 40 sex nake women
oh she blocked me.   at least i have love island to look forward to on sunday :)
now playing  :  suzanne ciani - " 4 o'clock in the morning" on     music song
the thing is, no matter how many laws and regulations there are with guns, people will still find a way to get their hands on them.
carolyn cooper | ugly, poor, ignorant and black!
this is so hea wrenching! what would be the state of the mother, when she knows her son is about to die :(
 so sad ones  &gt;&gt;&gt;
will get to see my favorite person tmrrw
hardcore girls videos   birday sex xxx
steph. san kana?? your 3's are badly needed. please
$24.99-mkf collection jasmine and moira crossbody bags    wednesday
let me just say .. i love being me
everytime i wear soccer shis joie fries me and says i look mexican as fuck
so mad that i chose dj snake over zedd at edc
the danger of white liberalism to oveurning  (applies to liberal men and feminism too)
signed up for my first bikram yoga class
my hea prayers are with the orlando victims, their families and the lgbt community.
"to everyone going through any struggle or pain right now, keep your head up, and keep on smiling, you'll get through it." i hope so
i really hate hipocrit politicians which is just about all on all sides... we deserve better as citizens. ..
  bihday sway  bihday sway bihday  bihday
in that moment, she decided she needed more. a switch to control life's response. default.
now playing  :  yiruma - " kiss the rain" on     music song
look at journeys left and right foot stage   !!!!!!
black professor makes assumptions about an entire race whilst speaking for entire race. next week the jews!
i miss the days when my friends played xbox :(
new case and scraggly hair.  !
  bihday sexy girl girls on top of boys naked
boasty tuesday last night boom boom and harry hype say get
outlining my themes for my would-be poems haha
they have been brainwashed by the left who is allowing these terrorist to come into america to kill them.
  friendszxc
4 more days till vacation!
  the secret of a happy marriage is all about finding other people less attractive: and those who repo...
hairy pussy redtube   hardcore tracks
istg this is the best cheese ta but dayum expensive
  ! my bihday weekend ! even better ! xx
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
you know you're getting old when you sta to get 'turned on' looking at poweools in b&amp;q
re: 50 projects 2016---busy hands are happy hands!
finally moving today
lemme find out i have to put on my boiler in the month of june.
my hea goes out to the families of those 50 people killed in the massacre in orlando.
we wish it were!
i once did that gif..did't listen to this song since ages..
how true! home-food is considered a cheap-meal. impressions are made at restaurants!!!
you've got nothing to say, so you assume that?! ahahahahahah
i hate online applications because you don't even get your foot in the door before they tell you no, we don't need you.
nice! any specific pedagogical changes?
"no im not attracted to asian ppl bc im not asian"  what if i tell you no im not attracted to u bc im not (inse race here) hoe
prayers go out to eddie and his family
very   and worrying!
it's the end of an era. amazon finally took down the final fantasy versus xiii entry in their database.
where's his other half??? i want to indulge myself with a lot of yunho esp him dancing keep you head up today!
tried for the same lateral move at the same institution 2 years in a row and failed. lol. 2-3 years experience required. i have 9.
for the fact that you keep watching,  makes it more interesting
last day of normalcy before we star summer camp!  !
vmin makes me so happy but   at the same time. .  i hate it
  fathers day lovvvvvvvveeeeeeee u dear father
next dining with devika date will be announced this week!
football violence, the few spoiling it for the many
reminds me of a tough choice between nigeria and india in 2013. had to choose india for the mental health research
  jumat ma pple....eyan ytinny
binge watching! and i'm off next week too!   lol
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i fixed the washing machine !!!
got a house viewing for a potential house no. 2 on monday.
it's that easy folks.
  fathers day love u papa
if someone over stimulates the internet on how   they're,  i always second guess it, why do u need satisfaction from others?
i might be ugly, but used to be uglier...... true story
lol watched a novela with my parents...
idiot dances on the graves of dead americans and is proud of it.
add my snapchat guys! going on a business trip to texas!
  champions trophy: coach roelant oltmans happy with india's next-gen hockey players: london: india's ho...
be  ...   its one way of being wise... by the way m nickname is also
  after sex amateur callsign lookup
the imprint of the father, remains forever on the life of the child.   fathersday.
i'm letting my piercer decide what my new piercing! so we'll find out friday what new addition i'm adding
another one bites the dust... thank you so much for suppoing us
when you're own mother stands you up for your pre-theatre lunch date
my new car should be ready middle of next week
  after sex sex video free tube
so my manager invited to his wedding
the oprah winfrey show 20th anniversary collection came in today! 17 hours of footage! i can't wait!!
thankful for the life i live and the direction i'm going   14509
woke up at 6am &amp;my entire morning has been nothing but magnificent. so happy to reunite with coach o &amp; meet so many new friends
you're only young once, so stop worrying and be
omg, hope you had fun seeing selena gomez live. if you went. sorry if you didn't go.
i love celebrations.. bihdays, anniversaries of all kinds! 2016 is the beginning of the best vintage era ever dreamed..   anniversary
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
swimming tomorrow!
working on something .
does a love story like this really exist? :(
i think the constitution and amendments should be rewrote.. we still basing our view in the 21st century off of the 1800s..
  friday!  get excited and treat yourself to one of our delicious bagel sandwiches.
  rajo to all..
it's the different eye contact between two guys who care about another one and who's not.
gotta be doing dna tests to know who your baby father is
being a dad, best job i've ever had!!!    fathers day!!!
omg the new orange is the new black season will be on netflix soon! can't wait!
always go with
today in stories that confirm my anxiety disorder -
tell all my people ima rider nobody cry when we die outlaw let me ride   bihday tupac
me and alissa got hit on by more of the 8 year olds at our tourney than the 16 year olds...
the happiest people don't have the best ofeverything, t   is doesn't mean forever cause there sad story when the happy is ending
it's more than sad...
today was my last day of jsms middle school, and i have a bitter sweet feeling of leaving.   happy
the tragic death of british mp joe cox should serve as reminder to to cool down the political rhetoric on all sides = it can be deadly
shot inside a pussy  office woman
now playing  :  philip aaberg - " elegy" on     music song
big g stepping in with the false flags.
   famous founders who remained ceo of their company
wow a give-a-way!
i lost a bet to my friend and now i have to change my picture for a week
dear unborn children of kenya,my humble advice to you, as you form in the essence of your creation, please learn to hustle. debts await
no, i should suppo hillary, after all she loves gays so much she takes donations from countries that kill us. sad!
i see the most prettiest girls on the strip smoking good ass cigarettes to the face smh.
smh i cant take these one sided standards
  father's day.......love u dad ...
when it feels like a friday but it's really thursday ..
being happier by kim serafini
gudmorning phillppines!!! :)     independence day!!!
my hea breaks when i think of how desperate she was in keeping miles, she even bet for lottery...
  our dog blue has congestive failure.  treating her with medicine however there is no way to fix a dogs broken hea.
if there is something i have learn each day is to trust my instinct, " i save to serve "
people just say what you wanna hear.
it's the littlest things that mean the most
hello why not vote
  sex stories ns porn
ready to do the   dance? you will when you can officially say my publisher
sometimes i feel i wanna be a housewife.. but i haven't found the perfect husband yet
missed having cute costa dates;)
strolling now with my friends in this cold night !
orlando with my love ones
get over it, the world keeps spinning .
los amo!!!   bihday
if talking about  makes racism worst, with that logic talking about how talking about racism makes it worst, makes it worst.
fam i got a pay raise
happy is doesn't mean forever because there's a sad sto   is doesn't mean forever cause there sad story when the happy is ending
the storm is calming down and i'm staing to see some colours of the rainbow!!!
got this design ready to go to print for arency and shis ready to be printed on.
the glass and marble saw has just arrived in a box half the size of a car...  .
indeed   fathers day.god bless my dad
   thailand weakest asean economy in 2016  world bank
if i couldn't sleep the night before my bridal shower, how in the world am i going to sleep the day before my wedding?!
illness," he asked.
  couple having sex swimwear free porn
wh is enemy deployed google for illegal manip.in eu they fined bastards $3.5 bill for same manipulation.lawlessness
did the general pull the pin of the grenade and pose for a selfie or what?
i will never understand why some people of color who become wealthy and achieve fame mess up their face with plastic surgery
in one of my depression funks tonight... laid in bed for almost 7 hours listening to heavy metal and spacing out. tired of being sad.
bullshit, he was thrown out for being a muslim
the btch will trick on anybody    do u even kno these hoes fr
  hardcore vinyls the best asian porn site
but to negate my last tweet, i will be   with whatever it is i end up with :)
no way!
now playing  :  yuki murata - " in the morning" on     music song
i'm loving the break i'm on right now!
i wanna be fucked !  my id  13479   meet me here
when you're just   and maybe there isn't a reason, but you just are
what a weekend! dinner fri with one of my oldest, dearest friends. wedding of two amazing people today &amp; bday for baby bro tomorrow!
just got surprise,the chickies are coming, nice surprise announcement.it's pay time  .
it's so sad that people's pets get loose and end up missing.  i really wish pets didn't end up go missing so easily.
i got a lot of awesome today.
  father's day bieeee!! my soulmate...the love of my life! love
  independence day  :) :-)
all you hoes do is hang around the same hoes y'all talk about
one more quaer of basketball left until the olympics
school just ended
getting ready to go see ninja tules in an hour wahoo! excited. $9 ticket for movie of the week today whoop whoop!
back to school.....
i don't want to be alone when my mission stas so i will bring my brother. i need prayers, pray that god will be with the both of us.
yes! i got approved for a one bedroom on queen west in toronto for july!! now can move out of my sketchy neighbourhood
just updated my linkedin profile   :-d
do what makes you  ...
who is excited for tomorrow wwe money in the bank match.
new addition to my little family coming soon!
may be the world needs him not india (read government)
this year was not well received because of the gregorian festival took place in the ramadan, so i don't feel like doing   bihday
john 14:26    sunday
my internet works again! let's record some videos hope that i can also upload a video for tommorrow, thanks for the patience :)
holiday planning for january 3 weeks booked off work
rotakids have arrived at the lancashire conference at lancaster university.
i'm scared of uuu
probably the best person for the job !
18th bihday on saturday
cleaned up my notifications.
finishing the night having a good "catchup" with a guy u have fancied for 7/8years!
now playing  :  naoyuki onda - " temple in the twilight" on     music song
if you look at a problem and the first thing you thing of is color, be it black or white. you're pa of the problem
leaders talk and talk, nothing woh if they do not know how to act right  to prevent genocide and tragedies. leadership is nottvshow.
out of work super early but nowhere to get a drink since it's still so late
just 3 days until i get to see my best friend that i've not seen in 6 months
 names for women fucking hard teen
school is almost finish
ofcourse they'll
 chick gets fucked nude superhero
 sex free sex hotline numbers
playing black ops iii on the easiest mode and i still suck at it.
just some trump suppoers voicing their thoughts on women's suffrage and germany's immigration policy...
you get the street cred for tackling half the menu! we'll be waiting with round two
gonna give some white people a taste of ramadan today
goood  keep going
we absolutely need it! thx u
15 emails.
  boy does 'happy dance' after hearing mom's voice through hearing aid: couesy caitlin orantes(princet...
the song no longer applies to me.
ok i need to think positive i need to sta thinking about good things
what could have been if derrick rose never got hu will always haunt the chicago bulls for many years to come.
back in manchester after visiting nottingham for a few days can't believe what a lovely time i've had!!
one of my favorites episodes so far! spoke to my &lt;3 determined to heal it and share the journey!
these females worry about these no good a  niggaz and take good care of them more den they on kids
people complain about power supply in their area..am happy to say that we enjoy light in my area..kudos to phed...20hrs a day light..
i love all of my friends   nationalbestfriendsday
[ ] thank you "ley de vida" for the follow !
  to be alive  much love to everyone
leaving to go camping in an hour and a half!!!
some people fail to recognize the good things that happen in their lives everyday the sun rises.
  father's day, to my dad who even at his weakest, still remains strong
after months of bad news a hea ache am going to an aunty again to hopefully a little boy ekk, excited for cuddles
stanley cup and conn smythe trophy is in the building and it's not for the sharks i'm
show me your tits, idiot!
cannot wait to move into my own place
  foy arep exigences !
show day
out of anything in the world what would make you more  ?
the highlight of my night is gonna be watching love island
lack of access sposwriters get from teams/schools nowadays will show years from now when elite athletes from this era pass away.
i got the cutest stuff ugh
much luv 4 his gift.
when you lose and get butt hu things didn't go your way!
excellent. final holiday of the year booked for august. riga in latvia! home to best a nouveau architecture.
wenger will bring back sanogo....
just finish doctor who s1, and s2 here i go
rihanna was at libey bridge viewing and i gave away my shift
feeling like a cat on a hot tin roof right now
boards being written up by alina ready for tomorrow with our summer drinks &amp; we have a brand new menu
always be
old man followed me to the store to bitch me out 4 not stopping fully at stop sign and then said he was calling the state sheriff   wah
lol. bc we date people based off their phones now
always the ppl with no lives talking on twitter.
i "hear" a muslim migrant, registered as a democrat and gun owner, killed a club full of gay ppl. this narrative should be interesting.
today is the first sunny day of the year
getting new books tomorrow
  hump day!!! xoxo :)
just ordered my third monitor.
if i really like em who cares what anyone else thinks fuck your opinion!  ..
when angels forget to fly,  when it's 20 below in july, when violets are red, and roses are blue,  that's when i'll stop loving you..
the meps bear that travelled to sandy hook in 2013 with hope that another gun massacre would never occur again.
my saturday: swimming, familia time, deadlifts, shoulder presses &amp; then yummy food!!
now playing  :  various - " 03 impression" on     music song
god is the writer of my life.. and that's it, no fuher questions about it.. thank you lord for making my life story colorful..
that coach should be force fed hot shit with a spoon
watching made in america o.j. simpson..... 30for30.... so far interesting...... what went on during the 60's is still going on in 2016.
the only way for you to stay relevant is to open your mouth, and tell other peoples buisness .
stocking sex sites  chick gets fucked
friends, today, make an effo to take every situtation for what it is, and accept it!!!
at which hour thy uncle sayeth not to disturb the pay
be happy you bought the best.
found my future husband on the plane to marbs and now i'm never gonna see him again    times
 , excited, clapping, unbreakable kimmy schmidt, kimmy schmidt, uks, unbreakable, uks
  nude rear naughty naked school girls
"uk now has the highest average level of student fees in oecd countries."
just saw! i'm really happy you're gaining traction, it's only a matter of time until you hit your goal!
it's tattoo day!!!
when you tell yo bd you leaving his son here while you go to va &amp; all he worried bout is eating the p
jim hoft &amp; gateway pundit have been lighting the way for libey for years...this proves google is the enemy.
good morning. let's drink coffee . . . complications are not needed.  my whole being is happy - psalm 16:9    sunday
  father's day to all the father's. god bless you for bringing us to this world.
finished video for the next single. big thanks for piterpan &amp; walenty konkel for beautiful shots of my hometown! premiere soon
been feeling pretty good about myself the past few days
  sex stories anal fetish tgp
life is so complicated.
why are my friends ignoring me
cherry blossoms and strawberries in benguet. aint that good for tourists?
those stairs leave me tired asf i sweat smh
 chick gets fucked videos of big asses havin sex
  fathers day -have a nice day very spl day to everyone
i want this body but i love to eat
*win* discount ellipticals, treadmills and more:
don't wear makeup on holiday. wrecked from the days activities, posting a natural selfie cause i don't care
c'mon people now, smile on your brother ev'rybody get together try and love one another right now  /madworld
 is the dictionary word for anti-black
i leave for e3 next tuesday there are so many people i want to see while i'm in cali!
how am i supposed to get a 6 pack when i can't stop eating pizza    thoughts
it does not help when a person comments "i don't like obama, but you're out of line!" like duh mf, you knew you were voting same as
magnolia groomingtiny  after grooming
  when game 5 is here and gone. so tired of all the so called expes flapping mouths. that is why we play the game. win or lose
it's ludicrous 2think that this happening especially now..we've come so far but have now taken 2leaps backwards
no ice cream comes close to the goodness that is kilwin's ice cream. i have dreams about that ice cream once a month.
what a great idea!
i have way too much shit to look forward too
not long before i'm no longer a teen   !!
  bihday ragul ji
many noh koreans act like the love their leader, but most are pressured by their military to pretend they do
  senator from florida orlando district instantly uses a crazy person as an excuse for gun control. within the first minute of her talk.
family be more faker and shadier than strangers and don't won't you doing better than them.
  happy bihday tupac shakur  'all eyez on me' trailer drops on iconic rapper's b-day: tupac shakur wo...
today is a beautiful day. time 2 remember i have a beautiful house, loving dogs, and a wonderful husband; both on our way 2 doctor.
  to show -  -
there are high schoolers that only know ice cube from are we there yet and ride along movies.
finding dory in less than 2 hrs.
can't wait to go see finding dori
*works at marylous for 2 years*
'make yourself so   so that when others look at you they become happy too'.
i'm feeling so   these days!! does anyone ever feel like they annoy people with their constant good mood????
with things going the way they are i feel safe in cda for now any way
  bihday sexy girl sister want sex
aaaaand steph still wont get his finals mvp :(
all set for the game...  come on england ..
what to do when one of your closest friends  is moving away
"the education of public servants is a critical pa of the path forward..." so true.
only replies once or twice and think i've had enough.
superb, a fitting riposte to some weirdos who think they can control content. a slap in the face for the   govt.
whatever it is, give it to god and trust him to straighten it out...   father's day to all amazing dad out there!!
just seen the video of england fans singing "no surrender." aren't these morons aware of the decommissioned weapons over a decade ago.
the holidays will be better than ever now marijuana unleashed is at ibooks.
i have sandy feet, beach hair, and a good book.
it's been almost a year since bdon gave me my set of prismacolor pens, and my last one finally gave out today.
last day driving my 9th grader to school.   next year madireis
working on saturday
bitches hate and dislike you, stalk you, but you dont even know they even exist.
a   father's day to the beautiful dads! rest on to my daddy, sonny. til we're together again, i love you. i miss you. always!
ian darke never misses a chance to slag off his homeland.   more &gt;&gt;
 girl get fuck leg fucking
  bihday sexy girl nude swinger pay film
  hardcore vinyls pictures of xxx porn
happy monday folks: be more  ! how to hack your brain to become more confident and less fearful by...
this thread is gold but now i'm   im single
kids out here complaining about the schools that offers them, like do you have any idea how many kids would kill for that juco letter?
im happy with you
he is nt a man talk less of a boy bt a king! yet u're accusin him of wrong doings by d same culture standards
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
some chick just posted a "hot" pic of herself on a lounge chair.  her caption/reason: "cooking on the grill. happy father's day."
woke up to terrorist attack in orlando and bombing in airpo... wtf has the world become
niggas be out here in competition with a bitch
true :/ niggas dont go looking for apaments they go look at shoes and jewelry
this is about to be a great game!!!!
day out in london tommorow meeting up with my beautiful daughter grandaughter son in law sta in borough market see what day brings
when you're excited to go to work so you can get away from homework
wow.....first lamebrain i get to block on twitter is a chick..... .
gs fans stay classy. boo the mvp
'acche din' for flyers: cap on airfares, lower fee on excess baggage pls put a cap first on essential commodities.
this is a good first tweet.
diy essex girl fucked   hardcore tracks
beware the "snowball effect" blackman! pa 2
the happiest life is that which constantly exercises and educates what is best in us   thursday
yes! love
  bihdaysway  bihdaysway  bihdaysway  bihdaysway
filling the void in my hea with back to back conces all july long.
just found out that macbeth has been given the title of thane of cawdor! couldn't be prouder of my brilliant husband.
it's like a pizza in a cone! and all i have is tahini, spinach and crackers.
all the kisses all love
isaac gave everyone except me a button except me
the world's biggest problem is that intelligent people are full of doubts, while stupid people are full of confidence.
if we (pentecostals) were as passionate about lost souls as we are about politics we'd turn the world upside down.
zara is one of the loveliest girls i've met doing pageants, but i do agree with miss gb's decision to strip her title after love island
name the news channel else, shut up.
happiness is seeing your friend trapped in the name of marriage :)
oh, and... and.... and... we have a hotel stay in a month. two nights! yayyy!!!
work out the idea of creating a substantive argument and making a point rather than calling names.
can i be staing withdrawals already  fan
*act. instagram* look who's back home!
he got you two rings, just be
each speech one aft anoth, becomes better, more powerful, more meaningful. she's definitely our next pres!
in nj, we are always at play, but never in play.
2ne1 is ready to comeback but i think yg will release the new gg first hehe
have to postpone mirror of the witch. bc next week there will be shinhye's drama on the list !! &amp; &amp; &amp; uncontrollably fond too !!
i post waaaay to many pictures with my boyfriend but aww well lol
watch first season of scream, on netflix!!!
my "happy things place"  all my scuba stuff is here, from the beginning to now
positive vibes baby...that's all i'm about...
a very exciting meeting later today!!
we think greg is   with his order. don't you?    pls keep voting for
not having a father has made me realise how we should appreciate the fathers that are present in their children's lives   father's day
now playing  :  philip wesley - " dark night of the soul" on     music song
one more shift in work then i'm off till monday!!!!! and off to benidorm tomorrow
but i'm broke now until the 25th
at work.. gonna miss the tony's
hey, i saw that you're a training fan, so i ask you to check my free app, it's known as "my training" on app store
dropped him from my fantasy team last minute. though france would run riot.
damn my knicc boys aint even in the playoffs but somehow melo name gets mentioned smfh
lessons to be learned   why do we...hate?    don't shoot d messenger...just press play ...
orlando massacre: what we need to say - grazia
baby find me on website my id is "sexy404"   ==&gt;
new video shows how  this guy  and how he staed to abuse and humiliated an muslim guy
   general knowledge quiz  set seven
keep your teeth  !
shows that animals are every bit as emotional &amp; capable of emotions as humans.
now playing  :  eiko yamashita - " eternal dream" on     music song
the power to retweet myself = the power to use this photo again and again.
what i do
  ventura: 'happy with italy': giampiero ventura is happy to be italy ct but at my age he can't get ...
hey im bored got nails
during this week's assembly, the principal launches the end of year rewards trip to all students.
shut up rat
a mother can take care of ten children but sometimes ten children can't take care of mother.
only the good stuff: multivitamins for your weekend [06.11.16]
i wasn't aware facebook was a legislature.
looking back at all the people i had in middle school vs. now
first day meeting the cast for one hundred thousand breaths, directed by liam meragh, and i get to write it!
you will fail to succeed ;)
they'll be more positive test results for diseases than weddings and actual commitments.
  whenever i go online it reminds me that i am a shitty human being with no talent and no friends
 , mad, syfy, furious, bar fight, wyonna earp, bobo del ray, michael eklund via giphy
6-4 placement games :))) now it's time for the real grind to begin!
... mentally he maybe 16yrs
nice day at the park for a cookout and then went to a pool pay. now this lavender essential oil is killing me to sleep.
plan to be there for an autographed copy of   endings
so done!! flight delayed by nearly 5hrs!!!!  &amp;frustrated
sorry to hear that, as my mum is 95 years and has been in a care home for last eight months. i have that to come
(cont'd) ...signed to various labels would be   to tell you...i got friends in most of them...that includes game...as far as his...
farahdhukai's video   this is so true yet so
you make me smile
justin &amp; i are officially buying are first home. the sellers accepted our offer!
on the train on the way to london! still can't believe i'm going to google headquaers this morning!   doesn't even cover it!
instead of being   with somone, why not try to figure out what they are here to teach you...they always teach us something!
i. have. reliable. internet. again.
yay it's official today governor herbe signed it into law that if you assault a medical responder it is a felony charge now
  bihday to me
 women nude anal anal t girls
  men's day to all men
more depressing scenes from the euros. don't see the point in football tournaments any more and dread what's in store in russia 2018.
porn blue tube  office woman
  fathers day to all the wonderful dads.
what a time to be alive! momma always said, "don't worry, everything will be okay" and tonights news just proved her right once again
the sellers accepted my offer. and the process begins
"you can't spray a good perfume without getting a little bit of good scent on you"
fo woh, texas, police chief: officer acted 'rude' but not racist in viral video
many upsides to being a cto but going away on business on a sunday on father's days when you kids are on a steam train ride isn't one.
a little saturday read with your coffee and strain of choice.   weekend.
now playing  :  karen marie garrett - " finale of the rose" on     music song
even though i always understood the rules, i continuously fail 2 understand people &amp; why they harm each other.
i just went hambones on some bagels
you're coming to albuquerque?! yes!
so sorry to hear that, you put a lot of hard work.
another sunday feeling gloomy
i like you. .darling
when your boyfriend is moving in &gt;&gt;&gt;&gt; house
just got super worked up and stressed and then i realized that tomorrow is the last day of skool
if you are suffering from   try salmon:
i sta folding all these clothes up and after 2 minutes i be like ok break time
friends with benefits com    in paraguay
yes make every day and minute count for something! happy day to all. happy fathers day!
wants obama to catch mad cow disease after being caught w/herford. dies before trial. buried in cow pasture.
  bihday to me
just listened to savannah guthrie of liberal nbc interviewing trump in the wake of the orlando shooting, mediocre journalism at best.  .
first week of school is a success i though i couldn't do it, but i did!  thank you lord!
england play today!!
now playing  :  craig armstrong - " hymn 3" on     music song
it was a sad night 4 honest women when a lying corrupt espionage murder enabler can b ones nominee 4 highest office in greatest country
  hardcore tracks suedoise teen porn
getting ready 2 lock horns with gullu butts of pmln. don't u know powerful in sohni dhei has no respect 4 law.
how you want be vs how mom want you to be. vs   soul
hey old sharks alumni you never even sniffed a cup here, want to come root for you old team?
got to help a little tule cross the road all because a nice grain truck driver moved out of the way so it didn't get hit, yay!
go veggie -worked for me, 61, fitter, slimmer and more youthful looking than many of my contemporaries.  no really.
i appreciate you, my dudes.
family pictures coming soon..
all types of all kinds of that there
my name often times auto corrects to leukemia
noooooo. a this real?
first day of school
looking forward to the weekend going to flamingo land with my little family
praying for orlando and for all the families involved ....
hey, i saw that you're a fitness fan, so i invite u to test my free app, it's called "my training" on appstore
'coz it's sunday ^_^
about to arrive in the cold rainy english noh, first time back in newcastle  since 2012  !
i was not born in a test tube   father's day
i'm still in a little bit of disbelief that in a couple of months i'm going to be staing my year abroad in the us
  new year sex photo of couple having sex
when i feel   is a children's story about recognizing, expressing and managing anger. male and
yayy!!! that show i definitely on my list of   things!!!
happy new year
im spendig alone the whole weekend and i have 3 exams left :(
mehn what a big lost!  delta is lose two heros! keshi and kosoko wife!
i sweat you thanks babygirl hmu when ur gay xoxo
y'all mamas don't really love y'all    that's why you don't get where i'm coming from
yay! dinner plans at moe's and finding dory tonight with my favs!!
  independence day philippines
these niggas burning &amp; won't let you know &amp; these females burning &amp; won't let you know
thefashionpoet: our purpose is to be   &amp; to make others happy too. share it. in giving, we receive that energ
finally got my furniture paid off!!!!!  !!! babe &amp;&amp; i  paid 2 and a 1/2 months in advance and it's finally mine!!
 do you want to meet me??   -
i won't waste my time on some  sdob that has to plaster color on his profile blm  bacon lettuce maters matter on 2 slices of bread
going to ocharley's, then bae (bestie) is coming over, then andretti's for college night!
i'm sorry, but i think i'm pretty awesome. i just don't get it. why am i always second best?   /confused/sadagaintweet
cordially salute to one who sacrifices everything for happiness of his child..the real hero...world call him papa...  father's day....
  bihday nude girl sexual egyptian nude women chat
dumfries for the weekend then newcastle next week!
 currently available live. clicking on the links   -
now playing  :  sophie hutchings - " seventeen" on     music song
d1wvu hockey shoutout to alumni greg scholtz 1998-02   bihday
things are staing to shift...
just lost all my music on my phone. wtf!!!
was this a  last minute event? this almost reminds me of the rubio and cruz rallies where you knew they were done.
ah w'd rather be happy than  , cuss it all t' tarnation. varejao more &gt;&gt;
today is my first day at my job :) can't wait :p
making my alfredo dinner and going to cry and be
wow that sounds lit mine is engaged and it's not to me
[ 54,23% off ]    happy people - asiento plegable (32 x 32 x 42 cm), color gris
good morning...i'm sincerely  .
the orlando shooting got me thinking got me thinking like damn. why do these things even have to happen. wheres the humanity?
i always tell me people i miss them and they don't say it back  .com
many people in my country listen to folk music. their choice. but some have never even considered that there's another genre out there.
welcome back!
not anymore. i'm getting maccas for dinner
feel good it's friday!
ignoring me will bring you what you really want?
today stas something brand new!!!
going on school trip to work from today till friday.
fuck the cavs...
once my sister moves her stuff to new her house, i can sta on my room &amp; walk-in closet
strongly against the wiggins for love deal. didn't like it then, don't like it now
i was wondering how my 3 month old  is doing, then in 1 day, 2 past customers call me for more!
my last day today at work before i sta my new job next week. its half day and parklife tomorrow!
knossos &amp; akrotiri not included because they aren't unesco world heritage sites.
it's arrested development, preferring live in a fantasy world than face reality.
a dad asked his ~4 y/o daughter "how's the cappuccino?" as she sipped on a cup of foamy steamed milk    daddy
   she was a talented young lady.
the biggest worry i have in life right now is which chacos to wear w the tshi i put on. &amp; im ok w that.  :)
looking forward to the day snapchat gets rid of the dog filter.
come on baby!! we want to meet you!!!
wtf is this.
when older people see this pic their nose remembers the smells. why close down impoant sites like this?
had a good girls night with my two fav's at starbucks tonight
all of you inhumane mfs who are making jokes about what happened in orlando .. im going to pray for y'all, apparently u have no hea .
i'm going home today! no more shit ass hospital food and hourly obs.
no 1 is up
feeling good today
everyday drugstore makeup tutorial  uploading today  1st video
baby says he hates me today
for months guitar player in at&amp;t/direct tv commercial was just some generic washed-up rock &amp; roll star.   is it really jon bon jovi?
because he can't shoot for shit. never could.
when you're only friend is your boyfriend
i could kill someone right now...
mike and i went to see finding dory and it was sold out
i don't do this shit because i got to, i do it because i want to... because i love it! i'll never need permission to do what makes me
ready to go!!!  !
  fathers day   to those people:  jinko faltoo m sab ka  abba,  bane ki adat hoti hai
actually belly chuckled at this.
1. my real bihday was supposed to be on august but i came out a month early from my mother's womb. so here i am, a july baby!
setting up alarm for sahur..it reminded me that i have 4 hours from now to wake up for sahur..and i am still on the bus, home from work
  fathers day guys
just be happy
  sex blonde youtube porn hd
  bihday sexy girl christian vincent nude porn
to my husband, who has earned not just the title of dad, but of daddy too.   fatherless
lets call it a celebration   bday to me
 video men and womenmalayalam girl with dreads porn video
people need to understand that it isn't a joke &amp; that you can't just " walk away " from these kinds of comments
less than 2dayd and then i'm out of here for 7 weeks before moving to leeds
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
usama won't be paicipating in thursday's "kill a jew or christian with a knife" ramadan challenge
late night plans...
by lack of a team present, the dutch media are now analyzing euro 16 referees because one of them is dutch.
happiness is the best of the day. smille    face
these bitches be broke, ugly and pressed. not a good look
randa beat tecia tho.
every man for himself type of generation
  slapping porn big naked women
1. mass shooting  2. discuss 1-5 weeks  3. do nothing  4. unto newer topics..
new york bistro faces shocking accusations: hosts hid minorities at cramped tables out of sight
"your people" would have all died of scurvy their first winter if the first nations hadn't shown them a cute.
what's made you   today?
my hair is hydrated and nice i'm so
it's crazy how once upon a time you looked at somebody with respect &amp; now when u look at them all u see is disappointment &amp; regret.
nothing worse than a politician trying to capitalise on a tragedy.   in so many ways.
ok....srsly....when people don't know what they're talking about, they shouldn't be talking about....
was just cussed out &amp; called a racist on fb over "work attire" thread yep. my comment was dreads wouldnt be safe in ceain jobs.
  af right now
pickle ball time!
had the best week/weekend celebrating dads 50th  now time to chill out get back on the diet and focus on what's to come
we have to make a decision to be   on the inside now, to magnetize a life of happiness on the outside.
is it just me but ariana grande is amazing ... wait i have no follower   life
precisely why the deplorables are up in arms
stop wishing death on mine shafts, basti.
ahh, the old days, when fans weren't entitled, and the student section was the subject of admiration.
so, i'm gonna watch house of cards
i'll never understand folks who waste away their health (&amp; life) using drugs
  buttsex anal trio
these edits tho
finishing at 6pm on my bihday instead of 00h30.
somethings i cared for i don't even care for anymore
  father's day to the most amazing. dad love you xxx
the sad thing after the mass shootings happens it seems like the crime rate goes up afterward. it seems to be true for san bernardino
get   now! there's no time to lose
the sad moment when you walk into a bookstore and see what can't take all the books
while politicians yell about jobs, i actually grow them. i am very proud of that. today was a good day.
i want 2 remind every1 to hold your loved 1s close 2nite! just saw the aftermath of a horrible accident! a young lady lost her life!
i have my bed, food and netflix
mera sayaa ban ke chale mere papa    fathers day  love dad thnku for giving me happy beautifull lyf.....
  25th wedding anniversary!!
that's fab. many feel effects of lack of light  ....clock change in paicular a time of anxiety. you're a star x
in other news, my bro brought home 2 big toblerons, a pack of curly tops and 2 mini kitkats.
thank you daddy    father's day
noon hour   hour!! monday - friday 11:30 a.m. - 1 p.m. get an ice cold draft or 1 oz. liquor for only $3.50
new trending gif on giphy
wait for it guys....
  happy bihday to aim, possibly the world's most successful growth market: is the alternative investme...
be   in this moment , because this moment is your life
thank you!  lol
what's a father's day without your papi?
are you afraid to be  ?
gonna scream my head off on some rollercoasters today
damn, i need to appreciate my life more!
that moment when you need to do something on your phone and you remember that you don't own one anymore. my life though!!!!!!!!
if it makes you  , go for it
you're only young once, so stop worrying and be
it was an error on my pa i agree.  she was an exceptional performer, i was thrown off by an something inconsequen
now playing  :  michael nyman - " nyman: the piano - the hea asks pleasure first" on     music song
about to go crazy..........
  fish-in-a-jelly: trapped or happy to be there?: does a viral photo spell gloom or glory for a fish tha...
  father's day. i can't say how much i love u more than anything dad. thx for everything u have give to me without u am nothing
every time a young person dies am always left with many question like 'what is the role i played in his/her life while still alive?'
never lose an oppounity of seeing anything beautiful, for beauty is god's handwriting.    weekend folks
hefty hefty day doing development work. we have discovered we aren't just a uk first, we're a world first
what time was yours taken, lil buddy.  i saw videos of lines around the block. so where did they go?  what a burger?
2016 was the year white liberals realized how unjust, , and sexist america is
after all this glow up, oomf still won't talk to me
sex games on newgrounds   teen
  hardcore sets black sexy images
wen will south choose dark south heroines. kajal tamanna amy wtf??
  hardcore sets female squiin
this wasn't only an attack on the lgbt community, but america as well.  they may have been isolated/targets, but this affects everyone.
he should turn in his resignation.
like 8 weeks left of work and i'm off for 6 weeks then off to university !!
bout to spend new year's eve playing  the game lol
he knows me y'all!  this is why trump shouldn't win. to pipe down whatever ego boost everyone is getting out of it
her not working with trump should be a good thing
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
the search for the toddler who was grabbed by the alligator at disney has switched from rescue to recovery. so  .
happy bihday my gorgeous thing! today is all about you so soak it up you superstar!
  bihday sexy girl nude mens
"  in the workplace &amp; family responsibilities add to pressure as they face unequal pay &amp; lack of suppo"
i am really
so fuckinn true
 peruvian women nds adult game
the way my dad and boyfriend talk to each other . guess you an say my dad likes my boyfriend.
  heabreaking photo of jo cox as a 'happy and talented' schoolgirl who was 'loved by everyone': the he...
   feeling good
threatening to kill but people in the comment section praise him
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
greek girls having ana sex  black girl porn
luth nurses begin indefinite strike    ...
payday today    friday
  sex blonde naked snowboarding sexy
here at park place junior, we are dedicated to making the dentist a   experience for kids. one dentist in...
  after sex mother porn gallery
fragrance spotlight: get happy this spring/summer with clinique - latf usa
guys in 2 hours and 30 mins i wont have to worry about wasting money on anymore mics lol
love love love being surprised... but i love surprising people even more
  dragon porn sex sorority girls
  hardcore techno songs slim naked women giving blow jobs
half of my likes on ig pics are tinder baddies.
bout to get my first ipsy glam bag
wow .. first yall killing yall own kind , now we killing women come on na ...
just found out that my daughters mom be dropping off my daughter to go fuck niggas just because she wanna feel impoant
bad headache and bad hea palpitations . haven't had any in 3 months now really bad. being on anxiety and todd is out of town ....
to be  , we must not be too concerned with others. ~ albe camus
going to get these covered up hopefully today. mwahahahaha. can't wait.   can't wait to get rid of his name.
can't believe it's news now days that driver stayed at scene. old days it was rare driver left the scene.
let's put a tank in front of every nightclub in america. every school. every theater. every church. bowling alley...
threats from terrorists are becoming real
journalism is what you do ?
mlm ini stay wr;)   -,-
ok that's nasty
i'm rolling with unc tomorrow. we going fishing!!!
ready for next week..
when i say niggas ain't shit smh they aint shit!!!
  48th weeksary and 11th monthsary!aldub.
i've been waiting this feeling of freedom for last 15 weeks this semester was way more difficult than the previous one.
gonna live in aeon soon wtfffff
i don't even know what is/isn't  anymore.
all my dreams are about work.....
i miss you all so much!!
it's one week till spos day!
  fathersday to all
enjoy this majestic feeling of power which makes you so   and proud when you accomplish specific objective in life - s. ali
not that easily!
seen somebody post a pic with a big paragraph under it. the pic was their dads grave and then they had a blunt held up to the pic..
thanks mom to make me feel bad. exactly what i need in a really frustrated and terrible day.
 fathersday -fathers-day-2014-greeting-cards-1024x589 buy things about "happy f
  fathers day all you dads. a special shout out to my dad in heaven. though we sure didn't see eye to eye. i loved you then and now
i can't wait to not bet game 6 tom that's how i roll
the truth is staring us straight in the face! sadly people believe what they see on tv and read in the papers!
if death standing says anything about anything. it's that when you have a norman reedus fetus, you do all you can to make no sense.
  hardcore vinyls italian hardcore sex
florida teen commits suicide over nude snapchat video of her
a productive  day.
now playing  :  joe bongiorno - " into the wind" on     music song
cross check day passed!  next week, on to response driving!
pen just realies that pen love those long arm coon shi so much, they are so cozzy and relaxing( some how)
minutes to broadway's biggest night!!!
 , saturday night live, yay, high five, cecily strong, bobby moynihan, mc donalds,
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
gala week programmes are in the shop now.
fuck the haters!   .
great night tonight. just love a family pay. now for some zzzzzz's.
excited for saturday i'm off to the fake festival for my sister bihday, with my sis,her mates and me and my mate, my mom ( )
  fathers days to all the men who try their best to be there everyday and not just today
so truueee!!! see you be
when u find yourself up watching food videos  i just made myself hungry
fuck u isis/homophobicbiggots/theeu/uefa &amp; russia   at u all today!
i despise . in that hatred of racism, it causes me, and many other black people in
just saw my first firefly of the summer...
the navy comes for the hives looks when they have nothing left to try and drag bey for
you media types just 'shopped it. there was a yuge bigly crowd there..in his mind.
suspected henrico vandal's mother: 'my son isn't racist'
everyone thought i was closer to danger when i moved to dc, turns out the danger was a little closer to home. this needs to stop. now.
"...your stage time and red carpet schedule..."   red carpet in la... if you know what i mean
  to learn one who deserves love in full wonder is served cold emotion &amp; excuse ridden lack of effo from one who declares loving them
think i finally decided on my next tattoo
happy father's day! let's celebrate the great men out there   day fathersday
  hardcore vinyls boca raton teen sexual assault
are you    or  are you really comfoable?  comment below
cannot believe i have completed my occupational therapy course. looking forward to the next chapter!
everyday life for a white south african.
who's going to the 2016 warped tour in cincinnati, ohio????!!!
many, many americans. that's right.
  bday my lovely wife
ronnie enjoying the sunshine and daisy field
rest in peace my name sake..stephen keshi... ..
maybe it's time for conservatives &amp; working class americans to really take a stand.
sorry for my inactivity  i am having a test this week.  but after the test videos are back once again.
  11th year anniversary of michael jackson's vindication!
big screen is up... full menu available for every game... have you booked your table yet?
no, google, no i do *not* want to see video highlights of the gsw vs. cle game. please stop asking.
happy father's day  dad i l o v e u s o m u c h   . .   fathersday [pic]
people that refer to a major nominee of a pay "shillary" make me sick. regardless of opinion of her, have basic human respect. jesus.
  sex blonde online streaming adult
ticket booked for this house with piervld - can't wait to be there  marrakech
vic works a double tomorrow
damn my life is pretty awesome right now... kids are great, bills are paid, about to get married..
dayton's not on the list! keep those smiles coming!
just a shame that chester is  losing you
sounds like a dare...
i miss hawaii so much...
i just saw a kid drop all there stuff outside
and i just don't want to lose the attachment of knot that i made with these few people that i have right now ;&gt;   :]]
but!  i'm also correct whom our enemies are, and whom to ally with; to rid ourselves of , and join together in what we have in common
massachusetts has the worst pizza i've ever had in my life it actually scares me how bad it is
orange is the new black is back on netflix. that's my weekend taken care of along with the tv tennis at queens!
  clinton: i'm 'happy to use' the phrase 'radical islamism': presumptive democratic presidential nominee...
good morning nt and   tuesday to you!
  euro 2016 lovely things: happy spanish mascot, gianluigi buffon still belting out the classics, irish ...
i've had such an amazing senior year filled w fun times, good things, people &amp;accomplishments. wouldn't have wanted it any other way
indianapolis colts black cheerleader hugs boy who used  slur. so. much. class
be   with who you are xx
you know that one client that says zilch the whole process then right when the project is approved, he brings up an offline concern?
 fave
extended hours just to finish discharge summaries so that i can have my leave form signed early. okay lang basta maka pag leave!!!
it's the stone roses day
that's exactly what i'm talking about!
2 days left in work!!
stuck in bed +movies   sunday
please, just stop.
don't cry over the past, it's gone. don't stress yourself over the future, it hasn't arrived . live in the present and enjoy it.
so sad!!
i wake up to a empty phone every morning
this would never happen nowadays
worship has been hard to get into this year at camp. the tech pa of me has gone crazy because it has been distracting/borderline bad.
when both your baes are together and your studying   but damn they fine
priority tou choro koi 2nd option tk ni banata  - with 49 others
hmm definitely something wrong with this picture
guys! i'm out of the house and i don't have a child either strapped to me or beside me!! first time in almost three months
unfounately the show will be cancelled today   but if i manage to settle a new time or date i will let you know
dallas fam i might be coming on up for a visit.
the countdown till these assholes are gone  obama and moron creepy uncle joe! bye bye  scum!
uh oh! that doesn't sound good &amp; can i just say that pic is breaking my hea
like to know why you can't buy pot at the local drug store?  marijuana unleashed at ibooks.
no liberal believes that. we are the pay of inclusivity who believes in equality for all, anywhere. you are a tra
at a loss of words. in the name of faith...   | american pastor makes outrageous comments
still   ::::::: people can't stop talking about how this girl defended her girlfriend on twitter: good ...
add comment here
  after sex real college fucking
beauty inspires  the mind towards positivity
we were just talking about gun violence last night..  50 dead in shooting at gay nightclub in orlando;
today was weigh-in day.
its very sad to see your country posturing for civil war with a wanton disrespect of human rights, by both the government &amp; opposition
if kyra don't get her   assssss on somewhere
i tried to play never have i ever on my (dutch) instagram acc but i only received 1 questions
  fathers day and happy sunda may the good lord bless you all
had a couple of great skype write sessions with jon macdonald!!  songrise city... couple of killer songs!
i was watching justin's new clip and thinking abt my days of famous/rich
  father's day..papa (ken) and joshua (daddy)
everyone's call keeps bein forwarded to an automated voice message
time to order some bathing suits.
(editor's note: shit)
my hea goes out to the family of that little boy killed by the gator in orlando. as a parent...  i can't think of anything worse...
"is there half n' half available?" sorry, just whole milk. *dumps coffee out in front of us* seriously?
for the past 40years, i've watched a steady decline in the number and diversity of waders at okarito.
so when is your next klan meeting?! my wife isn't white &amp; i'm proud of her &amp; our love. we are each others gift from
  prettyboy mca mulan:
mood =
beginning to pack up my room and bit by bit my identity is just disappearing
now playing  :  john r. burr - " for the asking" on     music song
  please be kind and like our page on  . thank you, celebrains
finally my computer is back ;)  .
since finding god things have got better
best decision i've made in quite some time.
is there a cawheel emoji? i needed one for kramer robeson's "return" tweet.
jst the past few weeks a close family frnd was kidnaped,beatten up only found him 2weeks  hope's  death hits home
get   ...$2 well till 5p and happy hour prices till 8
you like funny? you like insane? we got funny and insane! follow these people because that's how we pay them
 , animals, hat, chill, content, bucket, polar bear
happy bihday to the person i'd do anything for to bring back.
wahhhh!!!!!  white ppl arent allowed to do this!!!  .   fuck you rich. we don't care
work without cam around is actual work
good evening everyone...
i'll see my girls again later. jungle theme! pay hard! aw hahaha
you never wish death on anybody! to hear a wife wish death on her husband for a cousin was just wild to me
  father's day. today we honor our eahly father's. how much more should we honor and praise our heavenly father who is the provider
i freakinv love her
thank-you for sharing.....we are very excited!!!
  keeping chickens and consumers happy: when i die, i want to come back as an organic chicken. okay, not...
atk porn pics  representations of women in men's alcohol ads
happy brithday hoshi oppa   hoshi day
"lol, i swear more girls are obsessed with me than guys" uhh lmao i'm sorry for you that you don't realize how self absorbed you are
there use to be this saying, " word is bond" , what happened to the good ol days!!
yeah met dr. winter, the ohopedic surgeon, again for check my hands &amp; -yeehaaaw- i'm completely recovered
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
lelo and stitch
thanku very much baby
flying to greece today!
passed out naked girls   hardcore compilation
i am beyond devastated at today's news. that it should happen absolutely anywhere and at any time in the world, never mind orlando.
can't wait to get my new phone
roll on the 9th july when i get my new semi-permanent eyebrows
now this i've been waiting a damn long time for!!!!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
oh, how we have digressed.
panama is beautiful
made my night hahahha
stamp ? 100,000
let give everyone who died last night in orlando a moment of silence   day
getting ready for 5ps collective workshop.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
please dont fall for someone else. ako lang please.
this changes things.
was just talking about this yesterday. the censorship we are seeing is unreal. our 1a &amp; 2a are under attack.
we are thrilled to offer these superb solutions to our customers in noh america.
what makes me  please let me know!!
i want a teeny tiny tattoo but everyone says that i need to get it bigger and i don't wanna
i'll be online on over 200 music sites
he only has words no depth for action he's a fraud
even after orlando, only 25% agreed with trump's reaction.
toxic gas leaks onboard ins vikramaditya; two dead, two injured.
and since then, no canadian team has won the stanley cup...
  happy zen spirit:
i'm not a lady, bc i have a voice, opinion and i'm not scared to speak my mind! wait.. isn't that  &amp; against
there are people that "don't like me" and dedicating their lives to getting my attention to make me see the shady shit they say ):
you are absolutely positively right!
not work till tuesday
218 claims another. wear your seat belts people. what a shame.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
weird i am making my first trip ever to detroit and gordie passed away. going to visit the joe on the way out of town to pay respects.
  bihday sexy girl hardcore christian gamer
just read about mt. everest for an hour after watching everest. crazy stuff.
why people have so much hatred that they think it's acceptable to kill is beyond me! the worlds gone mad
freedom! destiny finally finished updating!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
krimjiho: cohiarin happy bihday tu yul happy bihday tu yul happy bday happy bday happy bihday tu yul
a sad day in america. our sitting president endorses a liar who is under investigation. lawbreaker given a free pass.   sad day
it's been a   day for many people... &amp; turned up to be personally yu's as well... yu just
  sex stories girl gone wild nude
sunday in family
many who claim to be mature and have a high level of discernment are being manipulated by unbelievers with no track record with god.
  trump backers sing 'happy bihday' to presumptive nominee: toward the end of his speech, trump suppor...
no liberal believes that. we are the pay of inclusivity who believes in equality for all, anywhere. you are train
council staff have been instructed by the anc to go slow and make the da look bad. this was exposed a few weeks ago.
please share!  feel so
emma stone on hollywood : "they've given my jokes away to male co-stars"  via
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
frank and his dad  fathers day
lol must be can't i ask her plenty times while your she sober
be one of us!  and be positive always!  :)     feeling chill
words can't explain how   i am at this moment.
funny how nba will do anything for money.
i think i may have just sent my first tweet.   fathers day
these babies are being brought born in the wrong generation smdh
trump campaign: female judges could be biased, too he must hate women
bitch look at yo favorites and shit
we were indeed   at 10am!  -  yours truly, the kids, teachers and (!) the vicar too.
sorry practicum, but got is more appealing.
  pussy pussy lip photo
have we ever had peotus willing to complain abt his defeated opponent &amp; pay well after election over, and to do s
journalism should be done impaially and without personal bias. unfounately, many seem to lack that capacity
officially 18    bday to me
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
love good news can't wait for the next 3 months, hopefully be a cracker
go go aldub/maichard nation, lapit natin sa 1 yr  aldub11thmonthsary
  flag day!  the chinese flag is full of deeper meaning. the red background represents the communist...
  hardcore fantasy sexy homemade teens
sunglasses are currently at the bottom of a lake
today is the day! let's sta getting ready!  !
when already adolescents, elsa and ana lost their parents in a  shipwrecked
i love my little life.
until two days ago where i was about to break up with her because i didn't want to hu her
can't quite believe that an mp has been murdered on uk streets. not only a tragedy for her family but also an attack on democracy
we are coming for you chuckie cheese    kids
and how do jews plan on doing the work of god without god?  matthew 1:23 "...and they will call him immanuel (whic
my baby had haters before she was even born.
  hardcore vinyls adult adhd add
the internet has helped devalue human life. my prayers go out to the folks in orlando and countless other places.
i can't believe that they don't show blazing saddles on tv any more just because the lead actor is a black man... that's
maybe we've shed some fuckin light on shit in duluth and they can go get the real fuckin shitheads' kids   very
congratulations nicola! see you in october.
yay, more domestic terrorism!
happy new year white people elected a  president who treats women like crap and a biher disrespectful kkk suppoed white devil.
every time i see a replay of dustin johnson's 3 putt from last years u.s. open, i can't help but think if only he had a seemore
is this ok nowadays? is the question on my latest blog. i am not sure how the world thinks anymore
  my books aren't here
white fragility: why its so hard to talk to white people about :
when i was complaint about not having enough friends and now everyone hits me up all the time
when you think it's wednesday...but it's actually still tuesday.
tweeting after a long time.
how you fw dude after yo ole man go off to college   y'all hoes wild
u r so corny we are all sitting at the same table lmaoo
such a great night last night everyone loved it! now time to spend the day celebrating my god daughters 2nd bihday
must be that "thing" soros said if obama doesn't get it done, he'll "get someone who will!" heard it my ears.
 thas it right there
what i thought was real ... was not ...it was aal
who u epp lyrics on go......  moment diz morning
i just realized that yesterday was probably one of the best days i've had this summer!
sad to see what is happening to rayc and chidi benz..... well outlined to the public, drug abuse is such a matter affecting the young!
  hanging out with tucson's happy hour hobblers: a few years ago, manzini and board member alyssa hoyt p...
be   with who you are!
a shitty video driving by lake mono. a unique limestone lake slowly getting drained by l a like most of cali.
finally a cooler breezy day! i'm so  !
here's how to combat violent extremism in 2017. "the white nationalist who came to dinner"
in nh, some cheer a dangerous caricature of a person using words he doesn't understand to try and capitalize on  tragedy for votes
i'm lien cuz i'm not getting up
eeek! the countdpwn is on! 1 more day to go and i'll be on a train down south!
pretty decent game so far
everybody swears their lives are so busy, but they are actually just lazy
i had spaghetti for lunch and tea today
i wish i could buy overwatch but i have no credit card
book is 59000,  i have 58000 , but she/ cashier can't close her eyes and let this pass. i walk out as i came in
i hate being only one at doctor without someone.
my thoughts and prayers go out to the victims in florida.... how can someone have so much hate in their heas?
is officially a working girl again!
today is a good day to have a great one
beach lunch with my girls!!!!
when i feel   - recognizing, expressing &amp; managing anger. printable activity, color and b&amp;w ver
 education turn joke now
u mean?? reveal ur marriage date?
ate! no hashtag po sa "happy" thanks :)   happy 9months zeuskodawn
2 pounds off this week total of 2 stone 5 pounds gone forever! never looking back i'm looking forward
watching a janis joplin documentary.  i really didn't know much about her until now.
   sunday dee dee
if phareel's   was on soultrain
i just found activities for my 3 lesson plans for class!
happy tuesday ! what are we all up to today! we have some exciting developments to finish today in answer to our feedback surveys!
re-read my tweet oh yea good one.... has become   reality
nigga's gossip like bitches, &amp;&amp; bitches fuckin like nigga's.
  pentecost sunday saints, don't come before the lord empty handed. release what is in your hand. he will release what is in his!!
now playing  :  lee blaske - " 15 - through the mirror - pa 2" on     music song
you would struggle to find two nicer people than these two, congratulations from everybody at mtfc! -
it's all about attitude.
finally new phone upgrade
so in less than a year these kids lost both parents! wow! may god give them the strength to go through this
orlando shooter, omar mateen, called a doctor during the attack
again with the dwarf thumb
be passionate~be happy  don't let anyone stop you from doing the things you love
(only) black lives matter also closely affiliated with and suppoed by workers world pay and other communist org
i guess you was just like the rest of em!
to people who know you but are not friends to friends who are there but never with you to those who can never or will be anything to you
  john rosemond: let kids make the decision to be happy: he was talking to an audience about how to be a...
ugh same here
bitch i wish my bestfriend would come back on some funny shit cause i'm in hs
his speeches rate very high with my seo content check app
are you putting off being   ?  why?
lil bro playing ball this year! i'm about to have him swagged out!!
  trans pride everyone
this appears to be endemic. should one wonder why many have lost confidence in our institutions?
these hoes miserable so they go out their way to try to make somebody else miserable
  bihday  balakrishna
its not racist to want to protect our country from people who want to see our country burn. its not fair for the people who were shot.
get rid of it!   ego-less tuesday
rest in peace, stephen keshi.
 factsguide: this photo by kerstin langenberger shows how polar bears are being affected by climate change.
no idea when the day will come
can't wait to go to macedonia next year
i'll place the stars as the world falls down it's falling down it's a repulsive little chap.
this time tomorrow ahhhh
critics threaten boycotts of simon &amp; schuster over milo yiannopoulos book deal | the huffington post
i've spent the morning with my baby and the whole afternoon with horses i am
the blessings of the lord add no sorrow!    fathers day to all the responsible fathers! blessed sunday
live with happiness
i guess i found out about you :/
its funny when mfs always got sum to say bout yo life but ain't got a pot too piss in or a window to threw it out of
came home this    wifehappylife wifehappylife
make a conscious decision to be  .  you can't control the world!  you can control your mood!
well said
today (y)   (y)
stop. just stop.
guess what my mom said were not going to houston i'm bummed then she said oh your on your period can't go maybe next monday
what a piss poor excuse...  !
yoyas market in deming nm did not sell beer to me because i'm white they said they were closed then a hispanic walked in n they sold
now playing  :  abandoned toys - " flickering embrace" on     music song
that's not diversity, you dipshits!
more pro-bernie egg people with zero followers. so this is what the end of the revolution looks like.
quietly humming "all i do is win" on my way to my next meeting. may have dropped a thug tear or two
finally got time for gym
so tonight, spagetti bolognaise and scrabble. dd2 &amp; dd3 came home from work with new books, one for me too.
just read shana m. account of her meeting mj and i cant wait for the entire book to come out. she is an excellent writer.
 those photos you have not seen, go to the site
it's never too late to have a   childhood.  - berke breathed
cant wait to use the home app     oh wait...
i'll follow her anywhere...
laugh as much as you breath and love as long as you live. life is too sho..just be   (:
the problem with trolls is it's always the same old same old. they're never original or witty. there's no spark there. no joie de vivre.
senator warren is one of the best qualified people in 100 years to be a  us senator. when republican nominee calls her goofy pocahontas
there's so much mayhem going on with shootings and bombing, i can barely keep up with it all.
i know - scary, isn't it?
suspected people :3
senseless death...no one shld ever have to die this way.
i tell you he's a gop mole !
aptly named... we have whitesboro in ny with its ndn killing town seal, and whiteland with its mascot
  hardcore sets sex teens bikini
ugh we just moved &amp; da kids really got me in da house by myself already..
free porn all day   2b hardcore 4
unfounately, we're friends no more...
what is funny is that most of the world thinks gays are one happy group looking for equality. so much fighting behind the scenes smdh.
when i see nave girls on here i been feeling so bad for them bcuz y'all really look to this shit for validation and acceptance
i wish i can stop hiding who i am, it's hard for people not to know. it's hard to show them that no matter what, i am still me.
on the bright side thoughh..... wedding dress appt saturday!!!
taking guns away or giving people guns... it honestly doesn't matter because people are gonna still be hateful and do what they want
going to twenty one pilots conce on july 12.
yes! herb alpe under a full moon.
people stop being pedantic and leave ed sheeran alone
hair launch soon can't wait to show case all my wigs!!!!
best of luck to you!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
an act of hate stas a wildfire of more hate. instead of coming together we just hate each other for having different political views.
i just ... gosh.. i hate people... i hate the world and i hate fucking guns  fuck this world.
the last time i went to the mall was on black friday of last year
 video men and women malayalees xxx picturebangladeshi
dare i say think &amp; feel i do words to live by "keep calm &amp; live"
once i give bih to my son, lose weight, sta getting an ass and probably acting like a hoe then i would get some respect from a man
new clothes/accessories
"ebonics": pa of huge con-job blacks &amp; liberals have been running on america for decades. is actually lack of lan
round 3   fathers day
i seriously owe my neighbor a case of beer or a keg! cause this man is amazing. cut my grass again!
barrage of small talk about once-was bestfriend. been months since our fall out. trying to brave a neutral demeanor, but dying inside.
niggas for real trying to bag and sell lean now
  couple having sex www.drunk singapore girl get fuck
got rejected three times tonight
it's plain to see romney misses the news limelight. his rhetoric changes week to week to keep in the spotlight.
  bihday kazuki  bihdaykazuki  bihdaykazuki  bihdaykazuki  bihdaykazuki
we still blocking people cause they got the same parody as you ?
hello there sweetie!  i will be glad to see you here
i'm getting an mri of my little brain
i don't like this story about connie and hayden not returning. if it was just a rumor, someone would have said something already.
'racism w/out races': classifying humans into races the biggest mistake in history of science.  race
it's sad!! our world is turning into a political zoological disaster, will our governments truly ever learn
i have my first day of work tomorrow!!!! yay
i'm home, i have my fluffy dressing gown on and we're having spaghetti bolognese for dinner
can we do one together on never?
i wish i could be out there practicing football. i wish i had one more year left.
i love him !!!
racist old woman is america  oldwoman
a to the men!!! what's your choice?   lovingonme
school seems boring tomorrow.. coz i don't have my happy pills with me..
theoretically i know this. emotionally, i'm not so sure.
hoe already looking for another nigga to fuck
w00t! weekend in the south downs booked for july!
there's almost nothing better than a pile of dryer warm, clean clothes. especially when you're cold.
it's about time ross!! congratulations
back to work, only lost my voice once today.
yep. they want me to preserve energy so they didn't ask me to come because i'd say 'duh' w no hesitation lmao
parents of toddler who drowned in neighbor's pool charged with murder  neglect, not murder...
saving snapchats that tom sent me bc i think they're cute
thomas jefferson, we were not so vigilant
  turkey 0-1 croatia: happy volley for modric: luka modric struck an unbelievable volley to earn croatia...
the anc never prosecute that type of offences against white people. just listen to zuma and malema and you know why.
 , bet awards, bet awards 2015, puff daddy, p diddy via giphy
deep house and garage flavours on  jay jay in the hot seat    bihday dad
what about your dad's tax returns? must be difficult having a racist fraud for a parent.
last minute. summer escapade.
you got escoed out of apple bees
walking out the door knowing you're not gonna see your family again for at least a year is absolutely devastating
wish eddie could sing the right lyrics.
the happiest trails 2 u elizabeth! until we c each other again!
must can't do it i'm ha right mind
bitch i'm crying
today's modern politically correct left is repressive as hell - they are the fahest thing from "liberal" that you can get
  days porn movie pregnant girls in wheelchair having sex
i like your smile :)  bogumday
kyrie got all them handles but couldn't handle his chick kehlani..
  again irrational rage under control
tick tick tick when   sabbath
i'm walking around nyc in my dont be paranoid tee and a random stranger tells me she loves my shi!
  nohern ireland v germany: muller happy with any win over irish: "anyway, you [the media] are never r...
came home to agent hazel in my apament. thought some1 had broken in!   she called at 8:36 last night and i said no. she came anyway
  sex stories sexest nude women
we're over here making plans to go to raging waters and we don't even have friends to invite
a good old fashioned public shaming is in order.
my three favorite people in the world  fathersday2016
so he's still as foolish &amp; delusional as he was at the sta of the campaign?cant teach n old dog, new tricks.
this is where the repressive pc left went so badly wrong-they should be the ones most fighting for reform in the muslim world &amp; culture
this tweet btw
thoughts are with florida today
here we go again, yet no one is going to be held accountable.
god always comes in the clutch!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
directly applicable to trump.
  african child to every child let's keep. god first
so easy to live in bliss if we let ourselves.
never been happier to leave work
play on eve
my hea goes out to the people lives lost in florida and their loved ones
  bts day pay
grandma got me a video game pizza a peach cobbler yeah gym not happening today. lol gotta love gramms
    what you conjure up a smile today?
then it dawned on me that he's not my lil baby brother and eventually he'll be leaving for college.
  baby moose plays with a backyard sprinkler  check out my blog:
sway hbd  i want to meet you     bihdaysway
  adeolu philips mr p:
i just don't want to go back to that house that i once called s home
awful news, some people have no sense or reason. hope the course recovers and the police catch them.
university of wisconsin-madison won't cancel racially biased 'problem of whiteness' course
how you feel about your body has a huge affect on how   you are:
ex-girlfriend text fails. some of them are pretty
looking for 'the love'? i found 'for the love of paws'!
what makes you   ?  it's individual and everyone's right to pursue it, live it and love it to the fullest.
one week till i can go home again!! yay :)
there is so much hatred &amp; stupidity on the internet today, i just want to smash my computer.
all the best ummii...do your best
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
day 2 with matt hudson at encore farm about 2 sta!
ugh! this day. when are things going to feel easier?
great father's day eve today ...the gang here or in touch , village fete and bubbles , what more can you want
my dad's a straight whore
yaaaaaas this is excellent!!!
fuk my netflix doesn't work i am
deliento will be debuting our first stall! we'll be in birmingham at the bcu a &amp; design degree show!
life is better when you're laughing
carl paladino, trump ally, wishes obama dead of mad cow disease in 17
trying to have a conversation with a gamer results in exposing his inner fanboy when more people agree with me.
man!! how can she just go away ?
all my friends whores
just got a new oh new phone.
im so excited to be behind the camera, directing, writing, producing again.. the quality is better than ever!
seriously the justin bieber conce is one the worst i've been to ever in my life. he's coked out of his mind &amp; cant even lip sync.
when people think africa and europe are countries
come on, come on, turn the radio on it's friday night and it won't be long gotta do my hair, put my makeup on it's friday night
vm meet up in 2 days, 20 of us and counting. we'll be spending 3 days together!!
  after sex lube porn
yesterday wade elliott, today hamish marshall. two of the nicest people in local spo announcing their depaures in successive days.
checking everything off the ny bucket list but i'm limiting myself to only posting 1-2 pics a day on insta
why is it christmas eve? why not christmas adam?
keep it coming til i don't remember at all ...
people that post the most selfies tend to be very insecure and constantly need reassurance
sad asfk and idk y
  father's day..
can't believe this is my life
no i don't, wish i did though...
i feel like some of y'all get on twitter just to be messy. dang, y'all don't have anything better to do?
if you're a defense attorney &amp; leading the prosecution's witness *try* &amp; land a punch &amp; to not your client's wallet in billable hours.
all the snowpeople in this movie are white.
if u dont like it stay yo ass home &amp; do the wrk.... mf dont even b wantin to take care of they seed jus wanna collect
trump vs clinton...smdh...america really is a nation of idiots!!!
now that i have a job despite no paychecks i have 2 pay for food now...cuz of my tips i get
aol has 42 stories in its newsfeed and not 1 is who won the stanley cup
because everyone temporary...
but he took out a massive mogage, bought expensive wallpaper &amp; he isn't renting out his rooms enough. i am done with life
 "fox fires spos repoer for derogatory comments " she's almost as bad as trump with her comments.
hold the door.....
finally student finance all in place for september!   days
yes, i invited chris to the graduation pay. look how happy he is lol
it is impossible for you to be   and laugh at the same time.
when it only took 22.10 (exact) years to find a protein shake combo that doesn't make you wanna vom.
  ex. in. cu.:
cruel world brokes a kind soul
just gonna lay in my bed and cry all day
last night's thoughts
despite giving your all, there will always be whispering in the background about what you didn't do.
when you don't wear your retainers......   so just can't do right !!
nooooo end of season 9 big bang theory
false lashes delivered now to wait for my hair extensions then a night on the town is in order! can't wait!
smh no yeezy for me
got this on
black, married and with kids owner lamar tyler.
my gorgeous stunning grandson 5 months old
exactly but people don't get it
father is always bother about our welfare
when my girl comes to visit. to bad i have to teach the 1st day she is here. roast beef will be in the crockpot waiting on her
  anal teen best mom son sex
do you want to be  ?  increase the levels of this hormone
cheer up -
expes explain the best way to deal with  friends &amp; family.
me off to my hometown.  can't wait to do everything.
cant wait
thank you for reminding.!!
why so basic
rainy season and instead of eating pakodas,i am studying for my externals
hey, i saw that you're a fitness fan, so i invite u to see my ios app, it's known as mytraining on apple
bitches sad as hell sleeping by themselves  rolling over and keep checking ig and shit !
why can't there be secular education in haredi life? it existed in 1940-50 brooklyn. why not now?
amazing show wasn't it.
finding dory
now i understand why vegans and vegetarians are such miserable souls...they don't eat bacon!
no way! yaaaaaaaaaass!!!!!!!!!!
the idiocy of feminism.  they actually think microaggressions matter.  here's the proof:
eblast-standby-8jun16 |  cruise deals-   wednesday  travel
welp, getting my blood drawn in like an hour, woo!
  father's day to all people who treasure the daddy's love
whoa, i fkg miss sheila. absolutely no news from her since tt unfounate incident in the group chat. i, her bestfriend got unfollowed
st. mark's cathedral: 'we will name racism, anti-semitism, xenophobia as sins' - komo news
i didn't win the gift card y'all
finally at the point where i have to keep my packed hospital bag in the care. just in case. t-31 days.
 charles paladino's racist comments spark calls for resignation
i still can't work my oven properly and hudson is not home to guide me...
it's crazy how much i've changed from last june to this month of june. happy 1 year anniversary to my new self :)
summer is finally here
content w/ life atm
 , saturday night live, yay, high five, cecily strong, bobby moynihan, mc donalds,
never get discouraged with temporary disappointments, life is in phases.
shops were grrr today. but it is done now i have an evening and enough to get a few drinks xxx
anton yelchin, star trek actor, dies in car accident at age 27
how "christian" of the lt. governor of texas. basically saying the victims of the orlando shooting deserved it
but why skipping colorado??
my wife just left me
i'm pretty sure political correctness has imprisoned many lives, always pretending to believe something you don't just to keep friends
[ ] thank you "laura turner" for the follow !
i'm going to eat pizza today
welcome 2017  touches new heights!
when you see him online~ t.t
relaxing in a comfy chair. little break.
it's ok me too
thank you for the love! good morning thursday.
hey, i saw that you're a fitness fan, so i invite you to see my ios app, it's known as mytraining on app store
when the most exciting season so far in the league is going to end tomorrow.
when you get great news on a sunday morning about one of your pals x.
!!! no-balls to 'own' his  ... 'coward' !!! ///
  couple having sex porntube net
save up to 30%- awaken summer at walt disney world -   wednesday  travel
 boob naked assault
everyone have a  -go-lucky-saturday
what prevents you from being a muslim ?
 black women demonic porn
slowly growing apa
saved a tule today
  after sex free porno movies latinas
i have to be up in 4 and a half hours but i don't even wanna sleep
how can someone look at workers in the eye and tell them he can't pay salaries
women used to be responsible for men's behavior.
read and understand how  berniebros chose sanders over hillary
my baby is sick  breaks my hea to him like this
so   to read about the impact of tech on real life. how it has changed us and what's to come!
i just found an old file with music... especially music from teriyaki boyz
don't be   when someone disappears from your life...it's like the trash taking itself out!
b4 sm we didnt hear this latent  every single day..
  npp should be happy we stole their manifesto ideas  nketia: if indeed there was any truth in their c...
dreamt michael fassbender picked me up in revs, we danced a waltz, fell in love, nd he scouted me 2 be his ballet paner   it's not real
trump, brexit based on misconceptions about race and nationality, says renowned philosopher | cbc radio
because i'm   dog
kevin love was ruined by his dad as a youth
when you want diary queen but remembered it got burnt down.
alot of ppl been actin funny wit me lately. money make'em act funny baby    fuck'em
staing the new job tomorrow so should be able to get a set stream schedule together in the next few days
bless these oppounities. seriously. thank you lord.
i didn't know u could get ice cream flavored chewits
today i'm grateful for life. so much pointless death happening every minute from soulless individuals who don't deserve to see tomorrow
12 months ago today we sadly lost our beautiful boy barkley. we will remember him with lots of puppy cuddles
we need to beat them in cairo. that's the only way we can reply them appropriately.  !!!
finding dory is out today and i dont think i can contain myself.
i stay on twitter most the time because i dont really talk to anyone
be there tomorrow
i think this is my last high school summative forcing on the last night... we've come a long way
i'm on the mood for cut cat pictures. happy caturday.   caturday. sometimes this beats real life.
this picture is hard to forget
came to h.dh and h.a for the first time. feeling
great to see quebec is establishing a provincial inquiry into systemic  &amp;  towards indigenous ppls
find that quiet place inside &amp; open to happy feelings
niggas will be all up in yo cousins inbox lying saying its her.
don't suffer in life seeking to be    just be
my bestfriend is back in piedmont alabama aka usa &amp; i've been good the whole time she was gone
breaking away from the same old, same old.
  bihday your majesty
this wasn't preventable. you can never control animals, you can never control stupid people to read signs
schools almost over.
in the news: from racism to resource development, here are the political stories inuit watched in 2016
image via we hea it    i cant take this
bo3 contracts and blackjack on tuesday, iw/cod 4 reveal on monday, titan fall 2 and battlefield 1, and watch dogs 2 in the fall!!
noh, kim, and kanye were at disneyland yesterday and so was i, and i didn't even know.
who is this guy...
completly silly, stupid, no words anymore!!!
what's wrong with ppl nowadays? i was conducting a sampling the other day &amp; and man said,"of course a mexican would be selling tequila"
  early father's day fathers:) your appreciated!!!
racist assholes! ban one of the sweetest and kindest breed of dogs. when will humans be blamed for pits stigma?
 girls in the world nude yong girl
2 more days!  !  john paul manlulu
  hardcore forums beach adult only
thankful for the life i live and the direction i'm going   26551
props to littles caesar's for still making their pizza look like  on tv.
happy bihday 2pac! thank you for everything    bihday2pac
it takes more than just a good looking body. youve got to have the hea and soul to go with it epictetus
5 more days until i move back home. by 6pm friday i will be back on my beach.
met fella who wants brexit, but couldn't come up with anything apa from "we're 'great' britain &amp; too many migrants"
each &amp; everyone of the england hooligans should have there passpo banned for 10 years &amp; not just to football should be to anywhere!
stamp ? 100,000
well the day is finally here, oitnb! oh wait, i'm in work for the next 4 days
i made my first purchase from istore yday and was very disappointed in the staff service... i won't be believing the hype any time soon
now playing  :  masaji watanabe - " in the garden after the rain" on     music song
3 weeks till interrailing
i just can't believe 50 ppl lost their lives just trying to have a good time at a club. prayers to the families.
sorry to say this, england should be kicked out of the euros because of the fan trouble but more impoantly before we lose to wales
dear cancer i hate you.
only 95 days, 16 hours, 34 minutes &amp; 38 seconds until magaluf
so stop trying to please everyone and focus on making yourself   let them haters hate!
im done this gurl betta get my face
no dancing with my husband tonight.  :-(
nothing like celebrating bihdays with old friends  bihday to us!
with the bih of my son i realized that fatherhood is a form of activism.    father's day
  !! free rpg day stuff has arrived! come and see us tomorrow and get some freebies!
  sex stories brother sister sex free video
are they twins?
who couldn't stand a little more  ?
i quit my dispensary job now i'm back to making regular college kid money
my first shift is a graveyard shift and i can't wait
i pray no one kill themselves but god forbid if that do who ever enteained that shit i want it on their mind its gon eat them up bruh
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
  father's day dadbarkads&lt;3
i don't understand the twitter
give a   childhood to your kids! engage them in a unique and interactive learning experience at yes!...
  prepare for happy tears: 5 times tech improved people's lives: but for andrea diaz, this occasion was ...
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i think we should be more afraid of most of our state politicians than illegal migrants!    but not surprising
still waiting... pa1
  but thankful no lasting injuries
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
yay in a week's time my exams will be over!! then a week later i am off to thailand, malaysia and borneo! ;d
- i learned not to mourn so not woh !!  life is too sho to waste time on trifles !!    :p :) :d
america needs to change the weapon law but instead of doing this they come with excuses and they blame others for their mess ...
this week has been amazing!  reached a couple of business goals, went camping with the fam  had an inspiring talk w/ a friend .
no new hires for police officers. what about all the students that are taking police program in school. where do they go to get jobs?
i walk though the front door... katyyy! the kids shout followed by "i have your tea in the oven..wine?" - mum
 adveisments naked fucking whores
always thank god for what  he has done,    what he's doing         what he's going to do...    sunday /happy...
schools breakfast tomorrow morning at denman public!
it appears to me that i went back four followers. :( i'll offer a bonus tweet if someone can get me back up there. i need those four!
a relieve to see, for a change, that someone has already been found, safe &amp; sound, before i had a chance to  their being lost
rest in peace!! may this terrorism in the end soon! and we all get to live a peaceful life!
today i left my taco bell to go to a different taco bell to get lettuce. i referred to this as an adventure &amp; told my friends about it
productive morning so far
the woman is a walking lie machine, says whatever it takes to get more pr for herself
enjoy yourself bron bron cause when draymond green come back you go into hiding. then blame it on refs, and your teammates.
my ex boyfriend found me and sent me a pm, showing off his six kids, then told me how wohless i was and he hope i die a virgin.
my dad got rid of cable cant watch you guys that much
you've gotta love millennials - micah tyler - youtube   weekend
kaya, but no class.
cpc/pcv module 2. passed.
i finally cut my hair as sho as i could go, like how my family has always wanted and they don't even say anything about it
yooo this bitch needs therapy, dique "i still want you" get tf outta here you still need this foot up ya ass  smdh
don't turn into the hulk every time you get  ! take the 1st step now
im actually glad my parents are back today inshaallah
and fleury seemed to know it when he lifted the cup
because they are just an average team...
yearbook signing is
resiliency for life: why are you  ?
out and about
apparently a nohern ireland fan has died during the match. hope it's not true.   xx
thoughts are with everyone in my old home town of orlando.   day....again
life inside me staing its journey of 9th month. feels so wonderful and full of love. pink skies and rains on my mind all the more.
i don't like vixx but i do love sejong and mina! also nayoung!
finally the weekend tweetheas    weekend
while everyone is staing their weekend, i'm staing my work week plus some over time.
tomorrow is show day!
this guys dating bio is "better looking in person"
just finished packing my case for france. i'll say this for nothing, i am
brethren!  so sick.... please put me in ya prayers, cus i know you'll cry when ah die.     teamshy'boi  tha michaels
guess i didn't make the cut for the dime page  so let me try out for the nickels
vacation booked
good stuff -   double-sided cardstock 12"x12"
never intended to persuade.will fight to the death for your right to be  ur conscious, dude.
couple this with age and a degenerative spinal condition, and we could be looking at the end of david wright.
i am so happy with life right now. i have an awesome family, amazing boyfriend, great friends, cute ass dog, good job etc.
to all tge dad's out there,   father's day
makes a very good point
when anxiety sneaks up on you and maybe changing your zine from 12pt font to 11pt font feels immensely more worrying than it should.
nobody is your friend unless you have a car .
making a song for my stepdad i sadly found passed away. please share in hopes to share my pain! :c &lt;3   ...
when your craving cereal and there's no milk..
the cowboys racist. i'm convince fooh. my nigga got 12 wins and y'all gon swap him for the white boy who ain't did shit.
   general knowledge quiz  set fifty three
 black women free kerala girls sex photos
everything is wrong
new whip coming sunday!!
when i stay out past 10:30, i feel like a rebel...
mommy bought me mcdonald's and my stepdad came home with taco bell
  1 more dub nation we been waiting on the splash brothers
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
nobody clicked the tag to see what was going on, it was  . lol
tickets booked.  .com
damn, was posed to b at my family reunion this weekend smh! never even been to one before smh
this is what trumps ny campaign chair had to say about the sitting president of the united states and the first la
should have recorded when bitches was running from me . but now you all tough onna gram .
 place was all sos of  this afternoon. i'm totally blessed to be in the company of such gorgeous...
ppl hate to give credit when it's due.
some people, especially from noh india, never learn.  .
i miss my girlfriend so much feeling a little depressed today. i need a friend
i have been off work for a week and ain't did shit smh
i'm trying so hard to make your handwritten indirect pretty and you tweet shit like this. shut up
being tucked up in bed has made me
rafa nadal gonna retire in next two years, his body can't cope.
  sex stories sumo wrestlers naked
i didn't pain my nails in like a month
my biggest accomplishments are my snapchat streaks
my 7 &amp; 13yr olds know to freeze where they are when emergency vehicles are near. how do adults not know this?
  pussy naked teen chixs
over privileged black child who's been brainwashed into believing a misconstrued version of america
i prefer tap the home button and then swipe more than tap the home button-wait-tap the home button to get into the home screen. oh well
this world is not such a wonderful place anymore. gun violence  no empathy and a serious disregard for human life is the norm now.
73-9 ain't mean a thing without a ring.
it is really good to be a father. atleast one person can be trained by me to be a good human being.  jai hind :)
why does life need to just give me a good kick when i'm down?
when it used to have elephants
nude sexy amature girls fucked hardly   monkey sex
mariah is so
  father's day to all fathers everywhere!
just put down a reservation for our house!
i officially purchased my ticket to see sia
going back to school for media a and animation!!!
can't wait to see you both september 9th!!!!
when your buddies ignore you
being white muslim, i get accepted by most somalis due to the muslim pa, but lately,been rejected by a lot because of the white pa
you're only one txt away!  ! :)
megaupload porn link  porn video
breaking news: legendary music producer, ojb jezreel said to have given up the ghost   how i wish this isn't true.
it is very sad for the ppl of venezuela
it's 2016 and i can't leave snarky google reviews for famous renaissance paintings. wow.
happy bihday senior basti
these photos of the refugee crisis just won a pulitzer prize  we live in a weird world...
v convinced i'm gunna find my husband at dunkin bc that's the only place men hit on me   :/
and they wonder why we have low voter turnout. people know our 'democracy' is just an illusion.
so many songs, so many aists, so many bands and people just listen to the same songs on the radio everyday
this is happening with a lot of people. i think it's something by yt, not censorship.
the nba these days has to be the most fixed spo i've ever watched.. why can't they let pure athletics and talent decide games anymore.
"turn the other cheek" aka "religious freedom" could've meant responders choose not to respond.  is that right?
blessings all the way!
chill wey it's just a side plate
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
 . another aspiring singer's life taken by a shooter!  so many lives gone that its not breaking news anymore.
see you in augst dj t vengossie
learn to shut your trap so i don't get to laugh when you sta crying again...as always  sunday
my electric forest vacation stas next monday ! im tryna work everyday till then
a load of spam phishing emails from  this morning :(
boom! packed and ready. now i'm gonna try to sleep.
word. concrete action. now.
  friday everyone :)
the greatest gift i ever had came from god i call him dad!
registered for fall classes! hopefully graphic and web goes as well as admin profesh and i make the dean's list each semester!
in pub for the football &amp; my hubby is stressing already
  nigel farage: 'this is not a happy europe': ukip leader nigel farage has suggested that peace in europ...
our fathers are so wonderful and are doing well. so on dis day as we celebrate them,we pray that god be with them.  fathers day.
gonna be doing new content soon
my most successful tweet wasn't even a good joke...
kylo, don't let him get to you. come back.
you deserve it!!! thank you for everything you do and just being you!  now gotta keep voting for voty
there's nothing i love more then a free chic meal
i got a shoutout on instagram !!!     !!!
i wanted to be calm &amp; relaxed for my immunologist apt in a few days. now i get to live with more guilt over something that others did.
my little sister graduates today, and i couldn't be anymore proud
wanna go back and try my new set of watercolour!
and it was my eldest son's bihday on monday! everyone wish him a happy belated bihday!!!
entire family coming for the weekend and vacation stas sunday!
you dont look at me here!
people move to another state and expect to get different results.
feeling overwhelmed by all the tragic events in the last week!
but he took the high-road dave
do you want to be right or do you want to be happy? happy. h a p p y
donald trump (or someone in his camp) is clearly creating dummy twitter accounts to sing his praises since he doesn't have suppoers
went you have an bad day of school you feel so sad and sad    but no one don't care about you
y'all,  is global. we just may have to lose before folks understand.
"excess, excess, excess, distress, distress, distress..."
 porn video smoking porn fetish
'orange' is going to be an anime and will be aired in july!
always nice when you finish work &amp; you get thanked for all the hard work you've put in so far. feeling goooooooooood
the app storehouse will be shutting down on july 15...
  bihday sexy girl nepa girls nude
now playing  :  kevin kern - " pastel reflections" on     music song
be  ! dont just wear your making-the-best-of-it mask. my book shares the path. pre-orders avail!
i got bitches that can't stand me over a nigga ion even gaf about anymore
dull british .
everyone's left/leaving ill be in the house on my own   times
niggas don't even be spitting game at these girls anymore  they just be handing out bottles to them till they give it up lol
why did i go on fb? ppl apparently think their right to own an assault rifle only ment to kill trumps ppl's right to live &amp; love..
you almost sound pleased it's happened so you can point the finger of blame somewhere that suits you !
my honey i'm here on site my nickname is "sexy404"   ==&gt;
  i'm going to the beach on july 20th so, i wish i could go right now!
been telling niggas stop eating that swine
trading rental can for a starship. last minute bits collected for halo's first clients on monday!
i just relived the toilet scene in trainspotting. if you know you, you know.    sunday
i honestly never - never, never, never felt this   in my life. thanks a million!!!
i'm staing my natural journey today  i'm getting really great news
i finally got my book in the mail today!!
what over-rode journalists' integrity was greed and ambition, along with a total absence of courage.
feels good staing to pack away my life in birmingham....ready for the big move and big changes
i guess the doggy filter is enough for me since my parents won't get me a dog lol.
adam levine to pay for christina grimmies funeral -
think about. in this country where hindus are at least 90%.  if figure is wise versa then
see you this christmas hahahhaha
hey, i saw that you're a health lover, so i ask u to test my free app, it's known as "mytraining" on app store
thanks! the restaurant looks amazing too! love the new look
finally got my nando's tho  so good
i know i am supposed to be happy and chirpy... but i feel horrible. i cant provide for myself, let alone my wife to be.... *sigh*
i have this and i've never worn it. smh
very sad news to hear your favorite beverly cleary 100 saoirse ronan leads the way was she who is an expression washes over your face!
gonna be home soon but until then this will have to do
so each year i work on a children's summer camp and i've just found out i'm the group leader for the youngest girls   gunna be so fun
wouldn't this be in queue in high cou as other cases , how come a film can be supreme priority for cou,
ahhh! i've been waiting for this since forever!
to save yourself you must break down other people in the process
have a nice day!
no immigration for 50 years? white nationalist leader unloads 5 of his most horrifying hopes for america
will go to college tomorrow after so many days
and this kind of madness is happening almost every day across the globe. we just don't have all the infos all the time.
  hardcore sets free video of black virgin girl only
washington post editorial: calling racism by its name - salt lake tribune
to say the broadway boot camp students were stoked to meet kristin chenoweth is an understatement.
  bihday sister
liberals are the most intolerant. they accuse conservatives of hate but they are full of hate and intolerance.  !
this.legitimately made.me  ...
i need to step away from twitter...
when u can't afford to go to toulouse
baptize my great nephew max tomorrow.
9 moods to aim for when   just wont cut it
cavs in deep, deep, deep trouble. sorry cleveland
i hope he addresses and attempts to contain the nutty conspiracies  that have been gaslighting some suppoers
  bc my ft calls are getting ignored
it's friday! great week ending off with a great day and a visit to the cove
feeling very pleased with myself. moved into lane 2 at masterswim tonight. definitely feeling stronger
failing 99% of the time makes you regret doing a phd but the 1% of the time you get a breakthrough makes it 99x more satisfying
most remarkable creatures in the ocean! so fascinating we want to see their amazing beauty &amp;size up close but
in other news: dave matthews band is at jiffy lube live and i'm in the middle of nowhere.
facebook is predicting the end of the written word   "stats showed the written word becoming all but obsolete"
some dudes try so hard to give another girl attention, while you have a girl. get out of my messages and show your girl some attention!
being happy is a daily choice.
obviously some people on twitter quick to pick out a mistake! have you nothing better to do with your time
good morning london. off to regent, bond &amp; oxford today :):):)
true.obama's had no answer to fight radical islam instead he still defends them while bashing trump.
i wish i had a picture taken with my father when i was a child ha
la in aug, tennessee in sep., vegas in oct, nov = bday month, tbd.. dominican republic for xmas
smoke out the old year and new year at the same time! marijuana unleashed at ibooks.
sadly, world events is leading us to head in this direction.   smaen up world.
  father's day to the biggest influence as well as the biggest nerd, love you so much and am so thankful
i will never use music streaming for i don't want any "you also might like this" crap and can't stand "remastered" aka corrupted music
i just saw a horrible example of a so-called million $$ woman...makeup &amp; heels &amp; weave don't cover up an ugly personality!
no brainer if gordie howe had half a billion to donate to it
president jimmy caer leaving his religion due to
but i look nice in the middle
only a few more days until the uk has its own checkpoint charlie...
i know potential when i see it. so far i've only seen it in about 3 people.
christmas eve? what about christmas adam? this is  towards men  down with feminism
thats it pigskin pete
switched my pc setup to the other side of the room, other side is too hot in the summer. was so happy to wake up to this!
when people complain about having no money but also complaining about their jobs
that means the beginning for ten more kenyan orphans!! well done andy.
coldplay tomorrow!!!!
  news today - billy bob was an iconic character in a classic movie...
  pussy being a male porn star
update: my free app will be live within 7 days.
my stomach is going ggrrrrr because i  havent eaten breakfast!   tengo ambre!
beliveaueric found the perfect picnic blanket!!! ahhhhh!!! can't wait to use it!
cannot contain my own face. i am so      time to buy 2 tiny pairs of cowboy boots for the
it's such a crazy thought to think that some girls will betray their best friends over a guy that hasn't had their back through shit ...
iiiiiiits show day   -k
no crackdown 3 till next year!!! why?????
  pussy flavor fla porn
grrrr! what do you think you look like when you get super  ? what makes you angry? what helps you calm down?...
getting crazy at the costco in calgary...eating poutine! absolutely nothing like bonding with family.   day 2.
best to avoid google- they spy 4 gov't and are very hard to get rid of...
some come coaches have turned satellite camps into a media spectacle and lost sight of the athlete.  &amp;selfish these kids deserve better
guess where i was this morning...
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
in honor of meg finally leaving for camp for a month! bye!
fuck dude. with the new shift change at work and a busy week ive barely read 20 pages of anything in the past week
those blackmon and cargo plays from last night
the cincinnati gardens torn down? it is where my hubby and i met. so many great memories.
happy bihday aly. you are amazing and i am proud of you.  love daddy   via
gaz says if i pass my driving test i can get a custom controller for xbox......that makes me want to do it now!
politics is great in theory but politicians are all self obsessed point scoring children &amp; idiots take their word as gospel = dangerous
already running the streets
seriously glad i don't live in minnesota and my summer vacation involves coming to an indoor water park and smoke filled casino.
  father's day !
our restaurant in historic downtown myle beach is great for anniversaries!
getting all of my stuff turned in for school in the fall!
loving this conference call that i am on with one of my teammates.big things are happening within our team!
  wala weekend tweeples....
my 2 fave vegetables.
you were so good im in love
hahahaha in your size???
yeah so now my grandma decides she wants to go visit noelia in spain on the 27th...our surprise is now officially non-existent!
have a great evening!
  happy owner of fitbit charge hr: it has been like more than 10 days using my charge hr no problems so ...
i'm never good enough for anything
mass shootings and gun ownership   cancer and smoking   diabetes/obesity and the food industry  capitalism always beats logic methinks.
   what a waste
this is awesome!
all i know is, i'm going to get wasted af tonight
&amp; all these la shoys out here fucking for a bill  !
whoever said long distance/military relationships don't work.. you never really tried.
it rains here a lot, but there's never any thunder, and it's one of the things i miss most from the mn. it just staed thundering.
we watch little tv. horrible that my daughter and i are watching  because of hate, terror and intolerance.
when did we need to sta carrying arms to protect ourselves from our fellow americans?
oh! pole sana...did you forget the boers?
y'all i can't wait to go to college next year
dress for the races has come and fits fab
the memorial for mohammed ali is turning into a hillary clinton rally.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
they never get their own under contrl/ don't belong here, nd 2 b in their own territory where their way o life is ok
  couple having sex bravo hairy
hey, i saw that you're a fitness lover, so i invite u to check my free app, it's known as "mytraining" on apple
let us know what you think!
smile at someone. do a random act of kindness. buy a coffee. hold a door. doesn't take much.
now i fear for my fave aists. hoping they'd be safe everytime, everywhere.
  bihdayjodistamaria go and fly high you kind and beautifull lady  may bless you more
les parents also apparently already bought a new car. which  we have no clue what it is. which is also not meant for us kids.
i also want to "run around the world" msanzi rich is usa middle class
im so happy right now
  hardcore sets naked porn hd
one of my favorite episodes so far! spoke to my &lt;3 determined to heal it and share the journey!
just purchased some essential oils
this is what you get when you request to not communalise! so much anger
hm team celebrating the queen at 90   bihday your majesty!
  jayson weh is happy to talk about another person's age after coming through again: jayson weh gets...
bored enyone want to cheer me up
  day for u. c, best of luck santa ono, you will be missed!!
he be on snap lol
made me laugh too
when bron was in south beach all you miami fans loved him and his crying but since he left y'all y'all wanna bash him smmfh
it's one of those days again.. monday..missing mom a lot..ramadan..can't have coffee.. missing tammy heaps..can't see her face live.
www sexgirl com hk   hardcore eye opener
wait... that's really a priority of yours?
me rn cause school is over soon
going with my dad for his first tattoo!!
a gift from my kids  father's day
i've noticed a lot of this the past few days, must be an organised thing.
ma fb account is hacked
  are those who take life day by day, complain very little, and are thankful for the little things in life ...
islam against racism
i told my parents that i didn't want to go to college right away and how i don't want to be a baker anymore and they took it well
  hardcore anthems g-string arab
  stop using ear piece while walking on road.
over 12mill arrests/60mill police-civilian encounters per yr in us.shootings,accidents,"abuse" extremely rare-thous
for 50 years the only thing cleveland had was a purpose, now it doesn't even have that.
as forecasted, the beautiful waves of raalhugandu has disappeared due to construction of the bridge.&amp; theres no hope of it coming back.
for the first time ever, i was nervous about watching a movie in the city. in a large place like that anything could happen nowadays.
trumps associates are a classy bunch.
now playing  :  various - " 07 reverie" on     music song
yey!...darating si bro from u.s!
vido nude   hardcore tracks
i'm nervous but hopefully i'm going
hip; hip; hooray! -   double-sided cardstock 12"x12"
and miss mckechnie is in the building!!!!!!
still experiencing post even depression..
no, jissus man, why do pple wait for the festive period to upset others. rightfully, we all should be outrage whene
don't bogard that joint, my friend. marijuana unleashed now at ibooks.
just realized i get to come home again for another week in august
libtard- "i can't believe she hate muslims and suppo trump. how can a black woman do that?" me  "because i'm not your damn slave!"
   general knowledge quiz  set sixty eight
we have big news coming! stay tuned everyone!!  !
a couple bitches went left i don't need'em   father's day
i think i am the only one in greece that will get tax return...!!!instead of paying!!!!more drinking money out of the blue..!!!! !!!
hotel soon !
werewolf sex scene   dragon porn
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
family on day 3 of vacation from nebraska. 2 yr old boy dragged in after standing in ankle deep water.
great morning, good day, great night.
are we having our faces on them ??? please please can i be one   !!  cluedo
  hardcore raves srilanka sex porn images
i have been eating mostly vegan, raw amazing food and the unthinkable finally happened. i got tired of avocado.
how did women fair in 2016?
just pre-ordered this. it sounds a really great book
thank you so much for getting us to 22,000 likes
  couple having sex futrama sex
nephew "why your hair look messed up?!" aww lol.
come and work for this lovely pub! :-)
its somewhat frighteningly *positive* direction that at least now a mass shooting at a gay nightclub yields gop prayer statements
going to the lake tomorrow
and now i'm living my life
see, the way my self esteem is set up even though i'll be the fat one at the beach today, i still feel really sorry for her...
amateur spanking vids  against women in the workplace
got hired at my first job
roomie has hit the lowest of the low with terrible communication. didn't tell me the landlord was coming round. waited forever.
let me just tell ya. following boogie on twitter was the best decision i've ever made!
kkd city highst days run ssr (192chandragupta) for heros    bih day to nandamuri balakrishna
new day, new chapter.
saw this from the aeroplane tonight. looks a lot like a stadium to me.
and once again mass shooting in the usa .. can't wait for all the right to bare arms advocates to come forward
stupid phone so i spend two wks writin my first song doin the music  was just lookin for rite person to sing it an phones lost it all
  tampa trump suppoers sing 'happy bihday' to presumptive nominee: republican presidential candidate...
is there a way i can go back to my former life/i miss joy/laughter/love/security/panership and goofiness
god i love getting sweet texts from bae
sore feet....... but loving life  jack
gonna embrace every moment of this trip
rest in peace great keshi
called it. more and more content "available on youtube red". soon reg youtube will only be ads and teasers to get you to pay for red
thank you sara for the unforgettable response to  and appalling comments by the heabroken "doctor"
i was in deep sorrow. he saved me from drowning
aww   bday maj
joyful - grateful - peaceful
only the good stuff: multivitamins for your weekend [06.11.16]
first day of my summer nursing placements tomorrow!   :))))
lammy left and we didn't even say bye
first ever day/night test match in india to be played at eden gardens kolkata ... india vs new zealand!
lame duck and lame dick
best of luck dear for your film
going to tennessee with my family!!!!
all-inclusive holidays are fab and we've had a lovely time, but i can't wait for decent wine and telly - i'm such a pathetic homebody
wondering why they added me.
  after sex nude girls pics from bakersfield
why so   : d
b3 bday today   bihday
go on, give it a go... well woh it!!   wildlife
people use tragedy like this to fuel their hate agenda towards entire groups of people and that's the opposite of helpful
thinks it's   how many of the orlando victims were young people :(
you gonna keep smiling like dah and everybody is gonna keep wondering what you did last night!!!
i'm seeing good reviews and feedback at my timeline from people na nakapanood na ng conjuring 2 today. wannnn watchhhh pero wala upod
2 chocolate puds in fridge for the son's pay. off to paris via eurostar tomorrow
this is deep.
brought 1l of bacardi limon to this pay and i'm almost out
my little cousin that is a 1st grader has more game than you !!
  after sex cute girl with huge dildo
  couple having sex cute busty amateur
going through a major transition in my life. this seems so on point for me. happy sunday all x
last summer all my friends went on holiday and i was stuck at home broken. this year i'm going back to disney
are you   with how your life is going?  do you wish you had more income?  i did! i wanted
get off late, wake up early. i'm going to be delirious!
i don't understand why some people can be so stupid!! if you ask me that's illness...that people should be in prison!!!
wishing all fantastic night as you prepare 4 another day,thanks to sir jah for the big day we had 2day.  fathers day
lots of dc tv news this week! superman, citizen steel, wild dog, and now we get vigilante. keep the news coming!
this breaks my hea for vicky! hu &amp; lied to again! sick of it, if he lied there just r no word's at all
my king k
carnival cruise deals | exclusive carnival deals &amp; cheap last minute discounts on carnival cruises-   travels
when a person is losing the best thing that ever happened to them and they don't even realize it
been to fl many times and i stay away from water; even puddles have gators. i still hope they find him alive.
how can sainsburys have no red stripe??
omg almost all the org kampung wants to attend my workshop... :d
love u dad.....thanks for all the sacrifices u dd fr me and family.....u r d best  father's day
so green is suspended bc lebron decided to walk over him as he was getting up an so happen to get hit in his shit? then wanna complain?
applying for a second job at a bank, volunteering at the sunflower a festival, signed up for gold's gym, got two free yoga classes
the censorship is real people!! &amp; it's out of control!!!
just got balloons from twitter, thankyou! and surprise chocolatters from the old lady with the same bihday as me! sweet
6.19.2016   father's day
i hate my life
  be green! work happy!: wear blue! be green! work happy! 1-800-got-junk? is looking for a diversion ass...
love life and it will love you back
we are sleeping, everybody's sleeping... they are killing!!!
what if michelle obama had done this?
just remember hating bitches ain't happy &amp; happy bitches ain't hating   &amp;blessed
doing that thing where you find an old, forgotten playlist &amp; as each new track plays, you congratulate yourself on your own great taste.
full moon tonight
when the feds find all your loli hentai and furry yiff movies
why does my life have to suck!!! why can't i ever be happy!  /mad
no offense to anybody but of course some of the white ppl i work with doesn't see the impoance of ali outside of the boxing ring.
black and white
  kroos happy to play role of provider for germany: never one to dwell on his own performance, man of th...
it's been a beautiful night sharing my a at the aist in the 6 event in toronto
well sleeping makes me happy so...i can consider this soed then.
worlds age old, colourful cultures ...r being replaced by d " drab, culture less colourless newage islam". ..
jo cox,an advocate for the syrian refugees   news
i wanna go out to buffalo wild wings one night  ain been on a date since december .   lol
why is twitter giving me ads like this?
difference between cavs and gsw ryt now is their hea to win
i sang today everyone loved it except my grandmother
imm sow sad because my cellphone is lowbat :(
  to share my new song with you.  soon will be available on all the digital music stores and streaming services
my tweet of the day!!
there is a future nina and right now you are pretty much throwing yours away.
the absolute worst thing is seeing a really cute guy on instagram and knowing he'll never know how funny and awesome you are...
do you want to be  ?  increase the levels of this hormone
  ellie's beauty box:
no worries... the taxpayers have this covered
sign that i checked a bag at iah. every. single. time.
that moment when you're excited to see the photo uploaded and yet you're not in there.
new hoover &amp; i can't wait to use it  normal right ? when ur in ur 30s
if you're a black woman dating a racist white man it isn't your job to teach him how to not be racist and it won't work either.
awesom beautiful wonderful
hanging at daddy's new school. masons cove elementary.
our next show is monday at the fiddler's elbow in camden. it's looking like it's going to be a huge night!
great. and in addition to all other reasons he shouldn't be potus he can't spell.
victory nascar race 1 brands hatch
 white girl has sex with black guy nude newzeeland porns
when the people you love the most have to let go off you
comes to something when you post u hope your friends are safe out there (euros) more than you do do for those fighting in the forces.
opening to unconditional love lets you connect to being
 porn videos iran fucking girles
perfume lockets, open it up spray your favourite perfume on the pad provided then close
 black girl porn teen virgin sex pictures
there goes my hopes for a storm this evening. ugh.
polling shows straight divide. poorly educated trump voters want to leave eu, but have no clue why.
  hardcore sets asain phone sex
u gotta expect disloyal shit no matter how loyal you are
4.5 hours to showtime.
this is really disheaening ... no humanity    god bless this baby
you know im in your corner
of course. but that's...america.  .
no.     only buraa dhin
 a must watch video circulating in social media. mention corruption and the name nigeria becomes a case study.
when benji doesn't want to take a selfie   face
we always find our way back
never eating bacon again bye
subject breaking star trek actor anton yelchin dies in car crash at age 27:
dz june alone sef ehn..so many peepz v checked out already
 white girl has sex with black guy sexest women nude
cool yaar.
   my pussy is all wet -
$82.99-acer iconia tab 8 16gb android tablet (manufacturer refurbished)    wednesday
are you ever unhappy with your job? here are 15 things you can do to stay happy at work.   -at-work
some people have a problem admitting they're mistaken simply because someone younger than them pointed out the matter.
officially old now i've staed paying my student loan back
  bihday sexy girl wetpanty
 tuesday to you too! :)
  nude female movies rachel bilson nude fake
check
shop link:    street a mouse / hamster (baseball edit)
new destination soon.
don't be the next scarecrow waiting for a brain, brain health stas deteriorating as young as 30.     brains
sunday funday meal: sushi and pho. then back to the goal grind. i don't feel guilty about this weekend. i toure my body.
do what makes you  !
can't believe it's only 13 days til glasto    need to sta preparing
  bihday donald trump from all hindus... all the best for elections.
following some new twits. this should be fun. yea mommie up and feeling well.    father's day.
weekend in chi!!
even if i try, i am not getting what i want.
why do people have kids if they aren't going to love or be with them day by day?
first day of class
real girls posting nude pics of themselves   hardcore music
  please be kind and like our page on  . thank you, celebrains
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
fear is the root of racism. mostly fear of your ego having to acknowledge another human being is no worse or better
i guess they'll go back to just yelling  again.
  couple having sex bigboobsbeachgirls
on another note, me and damu are gonna go to a conce tomorrow night lol   i love conces
stop ating my fathers son
i don't think this kid knows how switches work. -.-
damn orlando
this month i feel really really good...
let the scum-baggery begin.....
then they spoiled me with gifts while enjoying my breakfast...  fathers day
gonna have to sta packing up in a couple months
so... now that it can't be denied it has islamist ties, we must lump christianity in there too...?
it's pretty sad when a group of people get killed and there are people who feel no sympathy for them because they're gay?
looking at a townhome monday
ready to go home,..
for all dads,and those whoe will become dads     father's day
  please be kind and like our page on  . thank you, celebrains
u didnt invite us either
  fathers day :)    papa
coast to coast am really sounds like alex jones more and more...
sharing my love with others is the most addicting thing in my world. but they take my love for granted.
 porn videos sexy latinas vids
y6 llangrannog residential - arrive at school at usual time, put all luggage in the school hall. bus will leave approx. 10 am  !
 sex videos fucking cross
no power means no netflix
i dare to speak for the rest of canada, b/c no one else dares, b/c of this massive racist bullying anyone gets for
a classic trump follower.
y'all hate this dude so much that you to blind to see that you're witnessing greatness
now playing  :  philip wesley - " the unknown" on     music song
give a man health and a course to steer, and he'll never stop to trouble about whether he's   or not.  - george bernard shaw
seriously cannot wait...!!    xxx
full figured mom nude mirror photo   girls naked
my bbe boy i hate waithing too, when i'll meet you ):
bitches be dying for attention smh
tomorrow is going to be the last day of school
24 days left till i leave for the uk
we sure are
hello, i noticed that u are a health fan, so i ask u to check my free app, it's called mytraining on apple
crazy day with internet connection problems....
can't stop the feeling.
my hea breaks for these parents at disney reso but when sign says no swimming that includes wading.
  father's day somebody
she gives me a reason. it's by god grace i love you god   fathers day to our three loving
now playing  :  philip wesley - " leaving the darkness behind" on     music song
this is very sad
what will it take for these parents to understand what they are doing?  their child dying in their arms?
can't wait to attend
wednesday, june 15, 2016
today has been a great day!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
this is a must win series for the tigers and ausmus decides to play the worst lineup possible
enough is enough.
great effo 2nite cavs.
 fucking nude nerd girls naked
it's bad enough not being able to see braydon for weeks at a time, but staing tomorrow i can't even communicate with him for 3 days.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i have all the respect in the world for people that think things through.but, if your going to wait for that person just to argue
what a gift to music and enteainment that this wonderful person is!
yeah u need to carry a gun if in orlando. its not safe in the inner city...
$21.99-mmk by dasein round collection sunglasses    wednesday
i can't understand them for the life of me especially considering what's been happening the last several years.
this is insane if that many russian athletes were using meldonium. 6 months seems right to me. career over.
13:55 'moshpit physics'. york physics day doesn't sound like your average cpd    just over a week until the cern gang are reunited!
also!!!! loooook how beautiful and amazing this is!! i finished the flower pa today!!! yeey
euros kicks off tonight
that's exactly how it is.
just placed our final order, designs agreed and prints are about to sta!
i wish i was just as good as my fellow photographers but i don't have that talent or equipment on my computer
no no can't wait na release now
highlight of the day was my boss yelling "shame on you" to a client cos the client told her 8yr old girl to steal 1 of our umbrellas.
i swear some people are professional haters
just got through graduation last night... off to work and endless hours of free-time a studies!
, no? or perhaps paladino is feeling some "economic anxiety"
  couple having sex naked arabian
i feel like this right now
going to sleep
labour mp jo cox dies after being shot and stabbed    !
  youth day...we out here with my 9girls leadership academy girls at lufhereng primary school to wash all the schools windows...
barely home, work in 4 hours  $unday
last ncis of this series coming up
i can't believe that my antidepressants are working. i didn't know if they were going to work or not.
how time flies, it's 2years today and still counting...
they finally let me out the closet
i live in a beautiful flat with my best friend, i have a rewarding job and i have an incredible man that loves me that i love back.
be hpy n healthy
i'm taking this advice!  !
while we're still trying to get over the shock of keshi's death, shuaibu amodu follows on.
this is the 3rd time i've watched the whole vampire diaries series over again
omg, she'll have to play 3 matches tomorrow. or just 1
  father's day to all fathers in the world
the things some people do just for likes followers or 's show how dead they're lives are off the internet
hatred towards other human beings, for choices in their lives that do not impact your life at all. whatever the excuse, it's hate.
now playing  :  kevin kern - " a gentle whisper" on     music song
wow sept 1 me
the blackberry brand keeps dropping "value wise" every given day, no more facebook, no more paypal now twitter trends are gone.  .
do you knowwwwww how long it took me to remember this damn password
three days to go! we're super  !
sometimes the best moments of the day are surprises.  i just got an email from long lost friend who i thought forgot me.
i know love prayers to the family
congratulations humans! you are slowly, but surely finding a way to eliminate our species. suicide bombers, riots, mass shootings, etc.
10 ways to be  .
  bihday to me .
people still won't give lebron any credit
  friday! well just say +1 to the picture below :-)
  father's to all....
missy elliot for marc jacobs is supa dupa fly and i'm   ab it
happy gloday emani
shoe shine booths are in trend for retail events but they're not being used effectively, this one was quiet.
finally watching pride and prejudice &amp; zombies.
lornell gone ft me with my shi on that's been missing
so many beautiful strikes on goal and nothing came out of them to show for it .
after skype and nokia, microsoft has decided to screw-up (acquire) linkedin
excited to be there
remember last year net neutrality said they would begin enforcing speech control in june. right on schedule.
wait.. there's avatar2? can't wait to watch it!
funniest gamers rage caught on camera || funny compi
off to the science centre glasgow with the local school.     will answer texts,
why does the government allow  behaviour?
  sunday to you out there
that's great to hear   let us know if you have any questions or need anything at all!
siri reveals what apple will announce at wwdc, in a way - cnet
i found out via searching the condition of a local child shot in the head while going to the corner store.
when sum body come up to all hype u have a whole covo with them but forget they name  rd girl ....
no comment but low key
now you see me 2 comes out this friday!!! gotta go see it!
a weekend filled with friends, fun and lots of laughter. what could be better?
rest in peace, stephen keshi.
"sometimes you have to cry in order to smile in the end." i'm definitely smiling.
  phil kessel is so happy he won the stanley cup, and you should be, too: with that full beard, he looke...
our cars broke smh
 is still rooted in our society's attitude towards black women's hair. read more from candide uyanze:
pugs probably hate me....
  fathers day to all fathers out present and not present you are still a father have a blessed day ahead
  hardcore playlist mother sex movie
don't forget the women who are misogynists!
monitor has arrived :3
i accept u r not in my life
because they r little babies running home to mommy. fascist little babies.
love my boys    fathersday mom
the tale of ladies of marriageable age looking for husbands is at an all time high.the economy is not helping us to help them
&amp; i text the majority of 3 ppl in my contacts.
sure is the picture of this election
this is so sad..for a young person period to not comprehend the racism that donald trump represents is terrible.
fans didn't follow me back
lik if u cri everi tim
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i don't appreciate being "randomly" selected by tsa at the airpo this morning. surly is because i was profiled.
looks like sir bob geldof has joined the rich 1% and now sneers at the plebs.
best go see that old hard bastard today ! maybe fight him    daddy day
disney gator attack: 2-year-old boy found dead
i can feel ett i can watch infinite later !!! i can feel ett
thankful for the life i live and the direction i'm going   49287
got all my tickets, i'm going to see main garrix as well as other aist at balaton sound in july.
tonight's moon observation.  tonight i become a member of the astronomy club.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
friends on netflix!!
now playing  :  naoyuki onda - " temple in the twilight" on     music song
this kind of bonhomie is so foreign to today's political climate as to seem in need of translation.
what if flies are just trying to whisper "i love you" in our ears and we're just swatting them away
new classmate :) new rooom &lt;3 new teacher :*
oscar must pay 4 wat he did
 video men and women malay hot super sexy girls
welcome new world!!!
reasons why i love my new job: i get to dress up every day!
i need to look homeless for this routine tomorrow, so i'm going to the thrift store .
wew i only know they are diff couples when i look at the guys.
epic fail 360
713. graduation in a nutshell    linderp
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
ugh! i cant believe tomorrow's the second day of school i wiah time is slower
after tonight, no more basketball or football.
  macho father's day !!!!
it's only been a day i already miss them!!
  trump is coming for your guns !!  the liberal nominee will sta with the muslims &amp; end with the rednecks
someday mccain will have to really answer the question, "when did you completely sell out your integrity?"
do you want to be  ?  increase the levels of this hormone
[ ] thank you "parallax news" for the follow !
tyler perry says backlash over his tlc show is 'reverse racism' - new york daily news
  (standard american diet) is really sad! facing the truth is even sadder...
the world is ending soon
  sex stories girl sleeping nude
 guys want a spectacle?   -
  after sex adult traffic
bitches trying to get the attention from me that my nigga aine giving to them
i've been doing great without the social distractions tho. such false pretenses &amp; lives led here   yet, enteaining
17 years old but it feels like adele says hello
patience is key through hard times, you won't think it's possible, but someone always pops up and makes you feel loved again
in sainsbury's. bruce springsteen the river's on the instore muzac. remembering i heard him sing it live, wonderfully, 2 weeks ago
loyal girls deserve the world but yet we get nothing but being hu.
another shooting after grimmie's incident. 50 dead. orlando, what's good? mas lisud pa guro kuhag drivers license ddto kysa palit baril
be   love your beauty
aw coco came to sleep with me :')
this is society today
gay right-wingers are not acceptable!   toe the prog line. islam loves gays. christianity is the enemy.   2+2=5
have a great night!
yah - it's sunday and we're performing at 2.15pm on the huge stage in trafalgar square! come down &amp; see us
you're defending a woman against "condescension", who was in turn defending a woman that was verbally assailed in f
mpho tutu: choosing between the church and being gay -    that god called her to serve &amp; his church turne
5am yoga tomorrow by the pool at saco spo and fitness
you're the best pharrelwilliams
  w/my beloved husband ever!
  hardcore raves lindsay lohan blowjob movie
  to be in saint lucia with a purpose.
you need to really stfu and stop thinking everything i tweet is about you fr your fucking annoying
"these are times of grave danger,with dissent recast as treason,  unchained and intolerance on the march"&amp;it
so senseless!   rip
aww im a looser i keep loosing followers.
collectors corner: angry birds
red hill is going to be amazing! cannot wait!
proper missing my dog
   south sudan allowed soldiers to rape as wages : un
totally agree. too many incidents now. someone needs to do something
we are ceainly at a 1a tipping point in this country.
   that is all....
this guy is the biggest sleaze bucket i have ever seen
be humble and never think you are better than anyone else........"for dust you are:and unto dust you shall return;genesis 3:19  sunday
all this news in the world is so depressing. i'm tried of crying every day.
i'm not saying all that but okay
yayyyy!!!! bud! so exciting!
i am so incredibly   for this girl!! i love you alyssakorb so much and am so glad i got to
when you the only carry in your team :(
i wish i could get my snapchat working ffs.
seems its escaped your attention that bashing whites isn't winning you any elections - over 1200 dem seats lost 08-
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i just want to see andy ! please rain hold off so i can see him tomorrow
when will ghana stop flooding?
less than one week to rains...:) already feeling  .
do whatever makes you   and never mind what everyone else says because if you're happy people who care about you will be happy for you
deputies: gator drags child into water near disney's grand floridian
hope you and the family have a fabulous day x
sick of feeling down and stupid sorry to everyone i messed up with and sorry for being a weirdo and letting everyone down miss u all
 , excited, syfy, wynonna earp via giphy
xxxpoland   hardcore music
some ppl try to persuade themselves to believe they don't want the finer things in life
i don't even know how bad i wanna kill myself right now, lol
packed all my photo frames
every lactation consultant i've ever met has been a woman. hello? !
i despise hilary and sadly, hearing her speak now i'm telling myself "see trump, that's how a president is supposed to sound".
if only i knew how to sleep
did you smile today?
challenge is people under 45 don't vote so conservative elderly rule | most young feel that politics ignores them
finally bought the bentonite clay for my face &amp; hair
trump real estate buddy carl paladino wishes obama dead of mad cow disease in 2017
lauren keeps telling me she's gonna take me on a date this weekend but she won't tell me what it is!
no alarm set. no place to be.
time to go out!
 , caoon, crying, eating, adventure time, caoon network, sandwich, sub, emotional e
  i try all day to make my s**t work and it syeel a drag
  father's day.  a man's desire for a son is usually nothing but the wish to duplicate himself in order that...
finished my second blog post
i am so n  for this game
well, it blew up 2 laps into the feature. tough weekend, but sometimes it happens...
new york 2017!!
 i'm dying to share some news on fb and got to keep your mouth shut! can't wait 'til tomorrow!!
after a mega wknd we should take a min to remember 50 innocent shot dead in orlando who wer doin the same as us, enjoyin their sat night
my roommate's phone keep ringing, and mine just ring when my arlam is on. sad.
my makeup collection keeps growing nd growing
tmtc  sabbath guys!!!
over-excited man is attacked by cat while opening  present  that cat repping trump yo!
to all fathers be pa of your offspring's development. only knew mine two years back but you are all special   father's day.
you're almost as   as you think you are.
well that hu alot.
  fathers day card hella big we going all the way up
i tell them that i'm
  bts day pay
in my feelings :(
you silly
i'm just say i have a girlfriend and see how savage some of y'all really are . . . cause in 2016 . . . y'all really don't give. . .
  bihday sexy girl anal granny movie
this doesn't feel like a finals elimination game, it more feels like the last game in february leading into the all star break...
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
now playing  :  brian crain - " lantern light" on     music song
 ... such evil acts!
word. relationships now days be jus to show off for social media or to show off for a wack ass ex
face of the shooter
beautiful, incredibly powerful guidance on learning from the pain and heabreak of being human: must-watch video:
i love you for this
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
people be so backwards
when u gotta reset your alarms for 6 again to go on a run
thank you for following jophs
how you feel about your body has a huge affect on how   you are:
i can't wait until season 4 of orange is the new black comes to netflix
bathe in slam's gypsy tears
migraines are the bane of my existence   waste my whole life in bed
rest in peace ronaldo......
both my besties left me within 24 hours
i arbitrarily decided to root for peru and now i am
love this!
do you want to be  ?  increase the levels of this hormone
arrived at wembley!
noticing all this empty prime retail space below chicago's trump tower.
it's so   everywhere you look
censorship of the media.....   in other words, if you don't kiss my ass you don't get the access.
you know things get real when boss is in good mood and even chat you about who your ultimate bias group. heh.
saw my damien and dandy today and got hugs , i'm doing cawheels.
this is f**king disgusting!!!!
it is not the flesh and blood but the hea which makes us father and son love you dad
keep filling up the   side
up dharma down at sgv anniversary!!!!
  fathers day my great &amp; lovely father, late. khuda bux mengal, i miss u baba
ok, the promised rebrand is underway! i've got a new name! so has my blog! it's all happening!
so   bro .....
i'm eager to see what college has to offer for me
why follows me ppl that met justin why why why
great britain..welcome to our world!
hey carl paladino, looks like "you're fired!"
aaa today was my last exam  so   right now!
i'm the worst person
200 followers yassss xd thx guys
lol now you know how i feel :(
sds has lost it!
hey guys... it's been a while........   sunday 2 y'all  feeling blessed
getting my ipsy bag next week and i'm counting down the days!!!!
monday music: happy bihday, wrenn
good morning new york!!! beside myself with excitement! in croton on hudson. the most beautiful house, with beautiful people!
less than an hour till we find out when arsene wenger plays mourinho. and pep. and conte. and klopp.
last thing they did before i blocked and repoed them was retweet me calling them a nazi with no extra commentary.
la tahzan.. innallaha ma'ana... don't be sad, allah always with me...   monday
real problem lies within when common people stas politicizing a matter instead of talking on the issue and injustice to filmmaker.
1 week to go.
a friend i've loved twenty years proved the true, greedy/unempathic essence of himself today, which i can no longer deny or excuse.
the beach is my   place
hot fuss is having a reissue on vinyl tomorrow and i'm so excited and it'll be such an amazing bihday present to myself
yes! it's just that simple. you control you.
  birds the movie catapults you into a cinema-hall with little children to adults, all choling loudly with laughter. what fun!
wtf is with gun control focusing on ownership or sales rather than manufacture. laws and permits wont change the existence of guns
it's so hard to believe that we leave for camp on sunday! this team has truly surprised me    coach
"ima female an ion even understand females  "
 , redneck island, woohoo, pumped, redneck, woo hoo, happy redneck via giphy
new to tweet quite   fr the app :-)
if you want to be  , be.  - leo tolstoy
as you should.
other way around on loosing politically perceived propaganda matter anarchist aap is crying hoarse lost money too
happy father's day dad &amp; grandpa we love you thank you for spoiling us all the time
wanted to post this picture of me actually looking happy. my life is great &amp; i'm surrounded by great friends
excited to get some painting done in my bath &amp; vanity area.  !!!
be sure to remind yourself that you woke up today to be   and appreciative. :) it will change your whole day!
i already feel crabby this morning my ass better go back to sleep ! plus i fly outta florida tonight
attention is the new drug fr
my dad was my best friend and greatest role model. he was an amazing dad, coach, mentor, husband and friend.  father's day.miss u dad..
a real dad is someone who makes his child his best friend nd mentor the child   fathers day to all the fathers
potus lets isis run amok in other countries, possibly infiltrating ours and then blames conservatives and law abiding gun owners.
i needed money for parking but i only have my card so i looked on my car floor and came up w 3$ in change easy . i needa clean my car
got my tickets to see finding dory!!!!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
me watching conjuring 2 buddy. 1st half finished
trump and clinton are leading, its up to the americans to choose the lesser evil.. na-mds si bernie sanders..
im laughing so haaaaard
they are such a healess bunch... !
hello holiday off &amp; vacay
just   from the hill:
put on your big girl panties pandy asses
are you even safe anywhere nowadays these people just went to have a night out and they are gone just like that
joshwin is always like this!  what's wrong with that guy???
back to work tomorrow
  father's day dad. not a day goes by that your voice doesnt
a lie that u now believe and now u allowing this clown to make u look like a clown so now ya both just clowns lmao smh
my instagram basically consists of lots of dog pictures and selfies
just got break up from gf   what to do
some ppl just can't handle the truth -- or a loss!
when you find out your best friend is also running the philadelphia marathon and will be in philly in the same weekend as you!
thank you lord for this day. keep us safe.  .
damn subway just made me the wrong sandwich. probably the last time i'll drive thru
literally going to spend 3 days next week being lost and confused.
don't need that kind of negativity daw... lol but you run out of things to say
really looking forward to watching finding dory later on
a young life &amp; promising career cut way too sho   rip
scream new episode!
never realized how tall you are? nice reverse spinning back kick!
  sex blonde teen ebony orgy
wish i was fishing
now playing  :  dustin o'halloran - " opus 30" on     music song
oitnb comes out tomorrow
huh ... basterd peoples
looking forward to what this filly will do on course for us!!
this heat is really getting it me.
people need to sta working together to create better things out of love together not create division by hate
super depressed for some reason just sitting here petting kitty
8 presidents, same policy on israeli settlements but only obama is slammed as a treacherous anti-semite.
most of my friends live in bonn and we will move to windeck...now would you look at the distance
  father's day to all the single mom's playing both roles"
i can feel the fear in my bones.
 : guy just ask me for some change. after i gave him what was in my pocket he lit a cigarette as i walked off. cigs in aus nearly $1ea
absurdly obnoxious to witness such video which demeans the work of hardworking journalists
nigeria football federation technical director died at 58
  couple having sex cherry potter fucking
am back to watching ouat. it has been a while.
i love mexico.
one whiskey remains
sexy nude persians   girls naked
lucy foleys creation   bihday to the queen !!
you deserve to be  . so, whats holding you back? here are 6 things to evaluate in yourself today:
11 months already!
some of y'all niggas be looking forward to be a side piece
orlando alligator: body of boy seized by alligator found
bc is sounding like more of a sure thing :) 2 1/2 months left in edmonton!!can't wait to get back riding full time with my barn fam
beautiful event on june 25th 2016 in tilburg !
what do you say to someone who lost their mom. idk.
cutsie logic but wrong. if you know construction you can build bridges and walls! give trump a chance! hate is for
stop tweeting. you're a narcissistic piece of trash &amp; trying to use a terrible tragedy to advance your campaign
i miss planet fitness
  fathers day to my daddy in heaven and to the real one thats alwayz stood by me and my kids no matter what happy fathers day love
  so good seeing this sat there
i cried  i need someone
lefties hate uk &amp; everything about it, they prefer swarms of stinky boat people to us!
i miss my friends
going to la &amp; irvine for bihday weekend.
watching the o.j 30 for 30. all i can think about is poor nicole, poor ron.
...lets hope tomorrow is a much happier day.
the ndigbo community lost two of its illustrious sons today christian chukwu keshi and justice chukwu of federal high cou abuja.
i didn't know crowder was such an ass...
 happy friday!
when you haven't been to sushi in forever yet the girl remembers your order including drink.....   hour
my hair is so sho omfg, but all for a good cause.
in 2 weeks ill be moving in with megan in edmonton and there maybe a chance i am staying for good
like this idea!
when they the only mtf huin
great anti aging advice
i don't think ppl that have both parents know how it truly feel when another have to celebrate"fathers day"without them being here..
we all go through changes in life. if something good has gone, don't cry. thank goodness it happened!! =)
donald  - putin's butt buddy and a commie.
suppoing trump makes conservatives act like liberals.
if you're gonna steal my shit, at least have the common couesy to steal it right.
really thought mexico was gonna put more of a fight
females smile in your face but be shady asf when you leave the room
fashion is a bottomless pit of misery and suffering and bank account draining i am   and i hate clothes
recent bathroom renovation in po melbourne using our stunning verona cenere 600x600
why does this make me
thanks for tuning in wendy!
lot of empty seats there.
i award lebron james zero credit for tonight.   he had to bitch and moan to get draymond suspended who owns him.   .
what i get to look forward to when i move there next year
pakabait ka pls.  goodluck and congrats sa new project! so proud of you.
1) starbucks espresso machine broken. no basic girl life for me
coming soon to tms. . . . . 3 more cous . . . . all three should be done by next week!
  orlando pulse nightclubber eddie justice sent texts to his mother is confirmed dead --&gt;
idc anymore..
  hardcore events sex teen malaysia picture
only 4?! that's disgusting. there were dozens involved. u encourage violence when there r no consequences.
  happy bihday donald j. trump  here are some presents: our video team hit the streets to mark the re...
doing more of the things that makes me   !    getting
bestfriend goals  nationalbestfriendday  bestfriendsday
yes, you never get over the loss, you learn to live with it!  miss you pa!
  its free in sa but it's sad living here
  biryhday to me, my biggest one ever!
young people praise alcohol way too much these days.
[ ] thank you "twitfox" for the follow !
clap along if you feel like a room without a roof.
i ride my bike my father let go and i fall    father's day
i've not had a neighbour since i moved in, today is the day i get one &amp; she sounds like a million elephants going up stairs.
islam against racism - press tv
is there a length of time one typically mourns the loss of a good vibrator?  like i feel as tho someone has passed away right now...
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
on the right track!
good morning! bud and breakfast? marijuana unleashed at ibooks.
mitt lost the bloody election!  u amaze me w/living in the past!  increase yr meds-ur stuck in the past!
leaving for delhi today on a weeklong visit. will be traveling to delhi, pune, goa and mumbai.
i will never understand why girls post drama and fight over twitter, you make such a big fool of yourself.
"  vellum cards 12""x12""-best day, set of 25"
muslim harassment social experiment!!!
too many voting for perceived "winner" rather than best candidate to advance policies to fix everyday lives.
i need to do mine :(((((((((((
pay porn free video  jokes about women
aunty mi is this home video abi real life
pizza and vodka
good morning poh sa lahat...    father's day to all daddy's...
even if america changed their gun law,  there are so many people w/ gun possessions  .. america is huge
salvage a giant terracotta pot from work that no one was using. looking forward to growing stuff in there soon :d   love plants!
rip coach amodu shuaibu, ex-super eagles coach, and nff technical director..just days after keshi's death.. we will miss amodu..  ..
look at the crowds faces! so agonizing every spo every season! these players still make millions it's not the same for them!   fans
fighting battles that have already been won, instead of fighting a massive uphill battle against clinton.
agree with those sentiments!
probably in an awful lot of pain. thank you for trying to help.
finally getting around to watching cowspiracy.
again,damagers/avengers bombed more pipelines, costing nigeria 0.000001%, polluting niger delta additional 5% &amp; drawing it backward 5%.
i can totally relate!
colors!  and your doodles! always make me happy..
there is big amount of generalization happening on fb due to this attack.  people don't want tolerance,  people want tonbe right!
rip to the big boss! this life is nothing, eyan k le ku at any f***ing time.
saw a dead kitten and cracked my phone within the same ten minutes
that moment when your recording goes from good to bad
 saturday enjoy your moment today be
  just heard an interview between john campbell &amp; a young girl who lives with her family of 8 in their family van
a roller-coaster and bumpy 10 years, will it survive this time?
i have been sabotaged, defamed, stalked and retaliated against on every level. entire life slandered.
i don't understand how people can hate so much that, they do what, they do. my coworker's friends were there.
that's the way to fill the emptiness and blindness in pete's life. enjoy doing the most in your leisure time. xx
  hardcore bands teenagesexvideo free download
ndokwazvinobva uku  father's day dad
when i feel   is a children's story about recognizing, expressing and managing sadness. it is par
definitely going to buy one when they become available ~ ^.^
  happy mark evanier day!: the bill finger award recipients were just announced for this year: elliott m...
  fathers day to all the dads in tue world
racism at home and anti- advice for others: we're good at both.
got to see the allison boys today.
i was so pumped cause bones will be having four conces in texas and i'll be outta texas like fuck man  i was looking forward to this
getting my hair done tomorrow
asians pussy pics   hardcore events
i dont know i do my account is hacked    ok bye
3 flops in a row for kajal
i feel lyk i hv no one to tlk to...
the reactions are the surest sign that the terrorists have won and that americans are ready to fight each other first.
my whole family is asleep and of course it's the one time that we're all in separate rooms so i can't even go turn a light on to read
just. launched. fhe youth hangout
fuck trees i climb buoys motherfucker
 , mad, syfy, furious, bar fight, wyonna earp, bobo del ray, michael eklund
now playing  :  gary girouard - " miracles" on     music song
in less than two hours, i'm going to declare two people wife and husband in a free ceremony.
this time next week, i'll be in floridaaaaaa!
i'm checking the tags on my t-shis and 85% of them are made in china, some haiti, india, nicaragua, honduras &amp; jus 2 in the u.s
found a beautiful one bedroom with a double stall garage, patio &amp; huge kitchen! signed our lease, can't wait to move in!
i need an ice bath.... i work retail
  after sex power puff girls nude
my vines get no love lately im
trump is just a weak nasty feminist cunt, no god at all    for the right wing "whites"
hill should have went with the power move and put trump on her sholist
can't wait to order, staing to plan my second cruise for next yr!
the ayesha curry twitter warriors are
  new year sex sleeping girls fucking pic
don't gain the world and lose your soul.. wisdom is better than silver and gold!!
very productive weekend wedding planning
all these years, while misplacing our priorities, others are showing  us.
seeing my bestie tomorrow!!
when your boyfriend twitches in his sleep and it wakes you up but you promised not to hit him anymore...
someone tried to hack my facebook and it sent me a email saying they blocked the attempt
nooooooooo what was i thinking meant to compare price and clearly didn't shoutout to the lucky 1 who got this
yeah yeah yeah i hear ya
am theaby wishing my dad mr peter  fathers day
  hardcore music nude asian women free
this is my dream one day  so beautiful and
unpacked. opened all the windows. sweater on.
no chill! im freakin' out!
most  country argues over different shades of black!
chris just got his receipt for work visa and travel docs!!!!!
why they dont take wickets
who's that ugly"lady"?
just finished this book and thinking how we can't forget the past.  so hard to think about wwii and germany
 sunday this made my day !!
hmmm!amodu's dead?woke up again dis mornin 2hear of diz devastating news.may god grant those he left behind d foitude 2bear dis loss.
   download daytodaygk mobile app for free
being happy doesn't mean everything is perfect. it means that you've decided to look beyond the imperfections.
black dad puts  baby mama on blast after he takes their biracial daughter to get braids
politics used to be a noble example of our libey &amp; democracy. now both paies have abandoned this for an agenda-driven power grab.
racists never ceased to rant in 2016
omg jo cox rip what is going on in the world ? nobody safe at any time the world is a complete mess.   news
the lack of systems thinking creates fragmentation which in turn creates more oppounities for ss to fall through the cracks!
i can't remember the last time i didn't check my phone before going to bed. this is v
truly tone deaf.
i know my roommates for school.
even the mere perception is bad business for  the nba brand
i've many friends .... but when i cry or get bored no one cares
this face pretty much sums up my mood over the past couple weeks.
it ain't a real pay until someone puts on a diaper and gets tied up.   gatherers y'all
  pussy asian reality sex
so nice to be here...hope am gonna have fun.....  weekend
post bihday gift :)))) happy bihday to meeeeee
chinese govs must punish cruelty! we need your voice and help !please help fight the dog &amp; cat meat trade!
as if reel are letting girls in first and there's a massive queue for guys
  canberra raiders coach ricky stua happy with progress despite brisbane broncos loss: raiders coach r...
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
royalty...renames   bihday balayya
rock the stage..
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
all i wanted to be doing right now was getting drunk at nappers but im in bed
enjoy! morning everyone. another friday...so soon!
when you really love someone age,distance,height,weight are just damn numbers they matter to ones rating people for how they look   :(
yayy!! and you chef :)
people fighting "sexism" in politics are calling me pigwoman . nifty
got my masters credits
  rhett jackson was happy, and he wanted us to be happy too: if i were defining rhett jackson's mantra, ...
this is what is in your food
i need something or someone that will make a big change in my life. i'm lazy to do it by myself.
beginning of a new phase    traveling to new pune international airpo from netaji subhas chandra bose...
i cannot believe, after the great group of candidates the gop had this year, we ended up with such a scum sucking guy like trump.
donald j.trump...this is how he reacted to deadliest mass shooting in american history..
uc just called me and said they're hoping to have me and that my act score was awesome.
sometimes it only takes a blanket
at the ohodontist i've found nemo and dory
6/18/16 our single "restless" will be available! sign up at  to get it free!
what in the world is donald trump saying if you can tell me please do, he's just rumbling around and around saying absolutely nothing!
funny how some people just can't take a joke. lighten the hell up, your job isn't that impoant that you can't take a friggen joke.
cheese and crackers for dinner amp
i just bought myself beautiful tarot cards and my mom said i can't use them in her house
the latest the zurich times!
x''ddd fck i'm not even a hardcore-adventurous type of gamer but (1/2)
damn even french twitter know more about american national basketball association than moi
see yah guys tommorow;)
1 week until our trip! if you have any questions please speak to a member of the team.
soooo unsatisfied with the dinner
no shame deadass held tears in fault in our stars
just reading trumps tweets makes my hea hu, if this man becomes president many lives will become turmoil &amp; some don't even know it
i love this
bout to play  the game lol
my new spectacles  are ready for collection.
happy, happy, everyone!
  hardcore anthems naked german sluts
jim and james avolt on the right. 3 generations of jahn's on the left.   father's day. beautiful morning.
prayer changes things. remember that. good morning. y'all have a bless 1.   fathers day
massive shootings are now so normal that we have an infographic on how to survive one?
 , mad, adventure time, finn, finn the human
your life will be amazing when you realize that it is amazing right now. there is no future state which will finally make you  .
bbc 1 though.
we look forward to seeing more adventures.
yeah no.
thoughts and prayers with jo cox and her family. what on eah is going on in our country???
dad tells me his helmet fell off the bridge yesterday! thing was a beauty   30+ yrs he had it, many memories with it !!
lovely lovely day enjoying the last day of my week off!
can't wait to see what you do   5 days
my life couldn't get any better !
finish my work before deadline tonight
for when ur   but that doesn't stop the pay from poppin
i cannot do anything for my family
  bihday to you girl!!!
how she ugly and still outta your league ?
  day at broadbeach and surfers paradise night market and beach
when simply emerging from one's home is a dangerous action, there is something terribly wrong with mankind and humanity is at risk.
always remind yourself to be  . :)
opal calls her dad preacher because he spends most of his life at the church preaching and reading the word of the lord.
now playing  :  helen jane long - " fountain" on     music song
dancing with my mates is one of the best things ever!!
maybe it's not about the   ending, maybe it's about the story.
this will be dustin's bihday present,  bihday dj,
when the balkans are commenting on your propensity for self destruction...
bad news my boyfriend is confused
europe and us think about us, not much different from how we think about afghans.
a victim cant victimise the oppressor... we have no economic power so, no black people can't be racist
hey eyes speak and they speak more when she is  .
this week is going so slow!! hurry up sunday
i just feel like smiling, i'm tired of frowning all the time because of stupid people trying to ruin my life,
 intercourse video men and women japanese armpit hairly nude picture
what a   way... to an end?
hawaii is going to rock after training they are a talented,passionate group of terminix nation family!
republican trump buddy who's rabid racist can't figure out what's wrong w/saying violently hateful things.
when you want to just smack someone but you can't.
great day at the track
i'll be having a princess... :) :) :)   much
battlefield 1 looks unbelievable
salt lake tech workers experience least racism, survey says - deseret news
want a summer body so bad but food is literally always on my mind. even in health class when talking about diabetes and obesity.
i am a christian and i know there are very conservative christians and catholics that are being so hypocritical to muslims right now
this generation is more into relationship goals than life goals.
so clearly there were two sets of nba champs hats &amp; tees made... now what happens to the hats that were made for golden state? lol
hasn't even been a day and i already miss my sister  who knew she would be the one to get married and leave home first
regret having ever donated to (at)maydayus.  yeah, big money is a problem, but have you been taken over by bernie bros or something?
awake before 4am and i'm not even an employed meteorologist anymore.
another conservative banned by google. any questions?
the giver is on netflix
let's face it, i won.
setting up for the graduation tomorrow night. stas at 6pm. exeter cricket club (next to the uni)..  .
just another officer involved shooting. nothing to see, move along.   ~1000/yr in usa, under 100/yr in germany.
this week like....
do the  pappy dance
one powerful picture. it takes great humanity and kindness to save the life of someone who hates your existence
honestly, due to the laziness and inactivity of those ages 18-24. if election poles were online, bernie would've won in a landslide.
reading my manuscript and not wanting to stop.  . good evening and good night.
  father's day
good god, how small minded are some people
 would you look at me ???
got a facial peel this week to deal with my sun damage. i'm at the "cabbage patch doll with a burned face" stage. progressing to snake
  father day to all the father in the world . - stacy
amazed people still hero-worship azharuddin and take selfies with him. that too middle aged women. so no premium on character anymore.
dang... now i have to find some wifi so i can dowload it.
two days till i sta my new job!
girls who take down other girls clearly bc they're jealous are sad and pathetic. gain some confidence and move on with ya damn life
i look cute but dont have time for selfies
just 2 days to go until we present our new show
a:   b: i have so much wine. so excite anonymous
wednesday cannot come soon enough
best 10 minutes my whole week
true wife sex stories  chick gets fucked
my all time favorite candy was "starburst fruit twists" an 8 million times better version of twizzlers, discontinued over 15 years ago.
"63% of americas calories come from refined and processed foods"
   general knowledge quiz  set 149
selfie on the front lawn!
  sunday: click on the link and like the page
my rates are too high! lol
it'd be lol funny if it weren't possible.
hi!! i am nickol
we're in a fight for america. the fight of our lives. at this point i'm not sure i could depend on a never trumper to have my back.
oooh, this looks amazing.
crazy stuff what's goin on
where's your   place? this is one of the ways i like to recharge. beach, good food and snorkeling.
from racism to resource development, here are the political stories inuit watched in 2016
the dan and phil show is so loud and it hasn't even staed
yup. i concur. as do nearly 3 million voters.
she is so cute
  pussy keely hazel nude pictures
terry bradshaw &amp; george karl: at very least insensitive remarks, at most racist. re: melo and mike tomlin. trump emboldened?
getting gifts this year
  happy father's day: srk, riteish, hrithik are some of bollywood's most doting fathers: abhishek bachch...
hilarious response.
now playing  :  masaji watanabe - " erhu's dream" on     music song
4 minutes before i clock in at my job and i got nothing, never was a pressure performer.
my heas and prayers go out to all victims of orlando night club shooting. i just wish all these mass shootings just stop.  for orlando
  pussy naked models pussy
now we can't even go to public centers, without being worried about a terrorist attack..
the trumptrain will not yield to the establishment!!! ~ join
sharks crowd cheering loudly for a simple zone entry.
  warriors happy to conve new skeptics: oakland, calif. -- the golden state warriors are right back wh...
  father sings happy bihday to daughter stranded in iran: richard ratcliffe, from west hampstead, lond...
with so many delicious burger &amp; entree selections, one of the hardest things to do is select just one!  ...
  national best friend day to my best friend dee trott!
very pretty and hot, very like, thank you
i almost always trust brazilians
tinker bell naked   2b hardcore chapter 5
4 days more
people are so lazy to go to the gym or follow a healthy life style , always looking for the easy ways to weight loss.
because they are so mean to me?
yes today feel off
when you're thankful you feel  , happiness reduces stress, reduced stress leads to...
bbc news - orlando gay nightclub shooting: 50 killed, suspect is omar mateen  love is love. get over it. smh
for when ur   but that doesn't stop the pay from poppin
national bestfriend day is just another day when u have no friends
i am going to saaaaaaaaaan diego coooooomicon!!!!
make that person know how special he/she is ! wish them a   bihday with us ! &lt;--------
pa 2 of trumps tweets: after his " coulda won if i wanted 2" now using putin to project his anger cuz we hate him!
everyone's siblings graduating and going to longwood with them men awhile my brother refused ):
and a good book. feet up, cuppa, biscuits and a read.  .
always   , never sad, that's the sign, that you are mad.
no ig no twitter no fb no sc but she still pressed from a dm from 3 months ago
based on recent commercials from state farm and old navy, omarosa's choice is clearly .
word sexy radio is back on the air and i'm co-hosting once again
i miss you so much!
rsvp to hear bernie's live video address on thursday:   - i feel like a kid before christmas.
the face you have when you reading emails and looking at the news of the world!
happy euro 16 every one
i can't believe i'm picking this trip over day6 fanmeet lol i really need time to bond with my hs friends ok hahaha
hi ana i just begin to "escape" in the streets of bombay. i followed your advice of great reader, thanks!
shoes are stored. pillows and blankets out. time to fly from amsterdam to dubai and sleep for 6 hrs.
  national best friends day !!!
to all the wonderful dads out there, but especially to mine. happy father's day.
my hea breaks for those who's own family doesn't cheer them on and puts them down.
epic video: blm zombie vs. trump kids  youcanalwaystelldemocraticvoterstheyrloud&amp;neverhavecorrectfactsthisolderblackmanispitiful.
this is so fucked up &amp; so sad
going to look at the progress on my house today.
  does cheryl need a relationship to be happy?  opens up about her 'need for stead...
whatever is prayed for at the time of breaking the fast is granted and never refused.  &amp;blessedramzan.
how you feel about your body has a huge affect on how   you are:
the feeling when you know you're the reason behind someone's happiness
95 hours and we will be on the road! come on baby!
  ! shit sad
  doggies had surgery
made it home for a week. just in time for the rain
now playing  :  abandoned toys - " spiraling into the sun" on     music song
be  .  it's one way of being wise.  - colette
have a   weekend
i want,really like it &lt;3
sexy cora porn  black girl porn
damn it. seriously. f'd up.
my kids are my joy, thank the almighty everyday for them.......father's love
  7 stories that made us happy this week: you can always find something to smile about if you look in th...
she got shot after the conce? smh
early bihday celebrations next saturday! cannot wait to see close friends i haven't seen in ages
lost 4.5lbs this week and got slimmer of the week  oh yeah!!  !!
so many shit talkers/bullies in the youtube comment sections.
happy monday !!
  at happy garden cafe
indeed, i really miss u
not long now!!
this made me so
black upenn freshmen added to racist social media account with daily lynching calendar
zadiq khan should be sacked over this it's insulting to us british
i believe happy girls are the prettiest girls. | colors of soheil 2016  girl
great run in at the end
  hardcore better off alone turkish girl hot
lovable mommy  jodi   bihdayjodistamaria
let them say what they say... let the things happens...
how's everybody today?
"nothing can stop you from being the brittany you wanna be babe" guess it's safe to say i'm completely head over heels for this one..
real talk ion see how a girl can fuck a nigga who nowhere near deserved it and claim you won't fuck a nigga dat actually deserve it lol
niggas really watching trash ass wwe over a the game 7 ???? wow
just watched the first episode of time of death by showtime. don't know how i'll recover from this.
chrishon ass low key killed this shit
  20 more minutes
making new friends this year is definitely one of the best decisions i've made in my life
spos illustrated girls naked  sex videos
when people talk about group chats and ask if you read it and you're not in them
"don't worry, be  "  -bob m.
does that have any substantive argument? trumpsters have mental problems and therefore ...
 quotes about women kingfisher girls xxx
  father day you are the best protection to me, love you my dad.
there is nothing more pathetic then seeing grown ass men on tv freaking out over men wrestling in tights and holding signs they made.
thank god i'm not a sharks fan. what a poor pathetic effo by them in a must win game. 2 shots only in the entire 3rd period.
it looks brilliant!
watching the recent presentation - it occurred to me that engineers dont understand humans. apple has fallen in love with itself.
waiting for my sis &amp; nephew to get here
saw a miller lite beer...
to the guy sitting beside me: you're mansplaining your apple watch to me, while i'm wearing one.
well donald trump has officially reached the bottom! this clown is paying hood chicks for promotion
  but oh, so true.
reasons for homelessness among vets
home gym is done, can't wait to get back into my routine again!!
when you see something that surprises the fuck outta you and are still in shock
i dated a sociopath jugg
honestly these mass shootings don't even phase me anymore
i always thought women fundamental rights are not based on region,but seems like   representatives raise women issues state/region wise.
mixed race couples still face  in australia
finding dory is soo good!!!
  hardcore sets alicia tease porn
even smile is uncountable....  moments...
in 72 hours i will be sat on a plane on my way to spain
8 things   people do differently!
i have never seen anything so utterly pathetic as a sorry for herself houdini doc who's back from having her teeth cleaned at the vet
awesome morning run after a one month broken rib sabbatical. if there's no aching later its 5k tomorrow.   days
it's only a matter of time...expect more...
 white girl has sex with black guy best world sex
don't get me a happy friday all!
full week now and end is not in sight yet. this is soul destroying. just want to be better
did one of your 800 paid staff members tweet this for you? crooked kristy back at it again.
another day, another mass shooting here in america. what happened to tolerance and respect for those with other opinions and values.
can't wait to see you again!! 2days and a wake up for my hug and smile!!   father's day to me!!
nastiest porn scene ever   hardcore playlist
jo cox mp dead after shooting attack   sad news rip jo cox one of life's good ones
the thing about bagels is that they're so fucking good but if you eat 2 you already ate 1/3 of the bag
lil boys on that lil girl game,
today was a great day... first ever neckie
i think me &amp; anthony just lost out 27 day streak.....
gog pusiste closup i love
just me ad me alone nw
being a woman, ex-stanford swimmer's ex-gf, testifies in his favor, despite knowing abt d horrific crime he committed on another woman.
still relevant. still sad.
prolapsed pussy  and women
the biggest problem here is that it actually works
busty and sexy women naked   hardcore anthems
  friday all + have a very blissful tweet aum afternoon.
smh bitch gotta kid and she tweetin like she shone or sumin
black men hate on black women the most!   ... so do y'all hate y'all mommas too?
pics of marbella making me  miss it
i love youuu!!!!
  thinker's are intellectual refugees without any home or heah their thoughts seek asylum in the minds of men but rarely given a beh
education is not a demand anymora
so after my exam this morning i've had a lovely day with philip and then great night with emma and kass
after the vacation its tym fr get bck to my boaring lyf....
 girls in the world natt chanapa nu sex fuck
last day of school=first day of no traffic otw to work!   summer
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
working on a collaborative film.
keep these conversations going at school and home.  we need to create the space and time and commit to help them.
the official countdown has staed! three months until kyle and i get married!
to brighten up this dull tuesday morning we want to find out which   emoji you are! we think were the...
  2b hardcore vol 3 sexy girl as a theme for the psp
prayers to all victims and their families that were affected by the orlando shooting. violence must stop.
holy god this is  the best night ever!!!!!!!!
omg guys, my sisters wedding is in 2 weeks!!
happy euro day
  couple having sex sex with his own sister
looks like waterproofs will be a necessity on thursday for coldplay. last time we saw them was 4 yrs ago - a most fantastic gig!
kill all shopping centre music
corruption is everywhere these days!!! even in the places you least expect it ...
well deserved!! we love you lots and thank you for everything
one more sleep until a very special launch!
i just got a food for thought you have to figure out your problem and fix it yourself its about time and mind
harambe was more of a father than any of the dads out there.
orlando alligator: body of boy seized by alligator found -
i feel like summer is half way over and it's upsetting
  after sex charlies angels sexy
what i get to look forward to next year when i move there
  fathers day   :)
counting the days   too
a spring of anxiety
cold,hungry,sore eyes,banging head great fuckin combo
police in mobile shooting ppl now
ed op: not being 'a racist' isn't enough - here's why
now playing  :  sophie hutchings - " untitled" on     music song
i have 1 homegirl    i
drake has always been babe &amp; i never been to one of his conce
going to see the stone roses next week!!!
 sunday  &amp; father's day to all - take time &amp; enjoy the benefits of family &amp; fresh food from your garden.
the greatest team we ever had are leaving us one after the other
as vu fan, feel for vandenburg/family that he threw promising future away for night of deplorable behavior. feel even worse for victim!
12-4 shift today ain't that bad
beard more than the face- only for panjabies-jsb
i'm moving to toronto in a few months
 , chewing, searching
drinking warm champagne on a mountain  at 11:26 on a monday   summer
 walking through the crowd, the village is a glow...
the cheerleaders at my school, you know its going to end and your going to cry and be
wishing you love and happiness of your bihday  bihdayrg
omg! new god of war ps4 ! im feling so   .
1. black can't be racist 2. have seen how a white woman acts when she doesn't get her way? it's a perfect metaphor
might have met a nice, although similarly filthy, gentleman tonight. see where it goes
listening to return to innocence while i'm in the shower because i already miss camp that much
this world is so fucking racist  (they asked the manager at wells fargo for here social security number just because she sounds mexican)
what a digital world we live in....
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
people who can get time off work to go to the euros and haven't gone need to a have long hard look at their selfs!
a reson why so many muslims might be
im proud! hearing the feedbacks of your students saying "we improved because of you" .     feeling proud
will be a great sta to the weekend!
brother ronaldo what wrong with yu? i'm so sad fr yu and others now!
my dorm is gonna look like something like this
  father's day. daddy you will always be ma hero. return if possible(rip).we miss u.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
spoke too soon! my wallpaper is here! know what i'll be doing tonight then!  good job i bought some adhesive earlier
jwu streetdance workshop later + no classes
this ruined my day... seriously, why did i have to read this?? and it's not even 4 am yet, wish me a hapy day
remember youth creator in de days of your youth b4 days of troubles came  youth day
going to wagner middle school to to a tour!
while i am eating breakfast, i hear the sad sounds of packing. this vacation has seemed shoer than the others.
be   all that matters
so glad i put 3-1
  comics convention, avengers attraction keep fans busy, happy: web1_amazingcon_061016ev_008.jpg the mar...
just looking crazy as always   &amp;blessed
latepost, last year was my first ride with motorcycle downtown manado.
get to see ma boo tomorrow after 2 months apa
bruh people really be knowing better and still choosing not to do better lmfao
i got to pet a black lab and took a snap of it and sent it to my gf but she deleted it...
love this sign in toronto last night on our walk back from conce.   place
  days porn movie skinny amateur sex
someone on fb has an entire photoshoot with her completed thesis as her bae on dates. ahhh hopefully me in less than a year!!!
at least she being honest but that's wild ass shit
- the saddest saddest aspect of the peshawar scuffle is the lesson taught by the father to his young son!
wife beater tries to act like a badass to pander for votes.
  sunday to u all
don't work til 1pm.   woah what in the world
america first before all others we should be ashamed of our selves.
trying to kick myself in gear after the bad medical news yesterday.... could use something/someone to cheer me up... feeling
oh, well i missed this sight today!   very remiss of bessie not to wake me at dawn
vegas on sunday with my bff, her bf, and my bf
  father's day
today i accepted a  permanent position at family dental center in fayetteville. i've loved working with them for the past 4 months!
everyone hates the white crayon that looks so perfect while the others bleed and break
going to be on tv, on the 24th of this month!!! i am extremely excited and   it is going to
selfie w/ ate and dainna&lt;3   :):):):)  feeling beautiful
  we happy few launches on steam early access next month: it's been almost a year since the last time we...
lebron has 41/16/7 and people still don't give him any credit. lol.
money got homies turning into enemy's
v hard indeed to feel hopeful for our kids today
that alligator story is terrible. i remember swimming in the now long gone river country years ago &amp; alligators never crossed my mind.
pharrell williams - happy (1am)
today i sta a new adventure at wisconsin youth company and their middle school u program
count down has officially begun, 2 weeks til houston
very very very
why is comedy so ? because comedians are.
we live in a world where people complain &amp; post things to justify their laziness instead of getting up &amp; doing something to change it.
so when is the next klan meeting?
this generation sometimes
this is just ...like i can't!! please be in a hospital recovering and not inside that club shane, pleeease!!
love this quote
 , hbo, monday, frustrated, curb your enthusiasm, larry david, curb
this is intentional and has no place in college baseball.
how yahoo derailed tumblr
dear white boys in the big trucks: i know your compensating for your small dicks but tailgating will not help you with that   &amp;small
powerful. especially in light of recent terror attacks.
going to greenwich university for my spo psychology masters :)
wow. i really ate the last of the fried chicken.
i posted this before. but the happenings today really do feel like pieces of glass in my head...and my hea.
found a lovely gothic trench coat on ebay i might get
have a very good night, fellas
astonished to find 3 little boys aged 12 died on the 9th of june 1855 wonder what happened ?
so terrible.this reminds me so much of selena.a beautiful talented rising star like christina murdered by scum.
i'm gonna try to not buy any restaurant food at all this week and just cook at home. i'd save at least $50 smh
finally a very impoant project of mine which kept me busy lately is finalized, i can begin to so out all the other things .
somehow someway i always end up third wheeling
happy bihday to my husband!  i wish he had an excellent bihday!   bihdayjohnnydepp
just learned that there're men who find breast feeding repulsive. &amp; some of those are fathers! does that makes any sense whatsoever?
it's a helluva sta, being able to recognize what makes you  . -- lucille ball
uberrush is an on-demand delivery network      friday
now playing  :  ackroyd poppy - " aliquot" on     music song
i've said what i needed to say about this pastor and his followers
nigga beggin for po money
whatever your political views are just remember she was only doing her job
i hate summer so much. can it get dark out please.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
change is coming!
wth geraldo, what's next..majybe you can stick your finger in survivor's wounds...
pics or it didn't happen. got to see so many tattoo aists and ink masters at work!
distance yourself from anything that isn't useful, inspiring, funny, kind or joyful.
  national bestfriends day i love you bro
actually give my father his gift
the bast gift from the god..  father's day
[ig] 160619 maetamong: practice episode !fun!love!**...
a lot of blue seats (empty) in da bronx for old timer's day.
1 week until trip to georgia
boys play sex  womens
 he has lost it
always great comin hone to a coin delivery. as you can see  these fellas have come from nambia to be with me
the biggest diss i hear is oooo your dark ya and??.. that's not a diss that's the truth like seriously?? it's
i lost a foune on the pougal vs iceland game, had some concerns when they announced the big line up changes, still so much lost
you all look like 6-year-olds posting dictionary definitions of  &amp; acting as if that proved some point.
aww i was on tube and read about this service dog who worked at 9/11 and was the only surving dog from that time, i burst into tears
//i dont fucking understand why people just deleted their replies to me and stopped sl! i'm too bad for you? say it to me directly!
  father's day !!
my trust fund check is gonna be so bomb.
and if you feel like yo bitch getting fucked , then leave !    national sex day .
feeling rather excited and content today! brought a book for a stranger and got myself two in the process....so many books to read
the league should allow teams to dock players game checks. no one on gs but steph would be getting a paid for this game.
obv he had to be in pic too
 porn videos free nude beach photo
i smile at strangers &amp; the response makes my hea   you can see a person drop their walls &amp; you feel connected
omg bitch  i knew you was gone do lil kim .. actually look like a music video
all the best  yipppiii very
it's your weekend, do anything you want, i said--- he built me planter boxes
i work my ass off for my shopping addictions
tyler perry says backlash over his tlc show is 'reverse racism'
still waiting... pa2
angel and ariel are drying off from a morning swim, laying on the sofa. paschiel is just laying on the sofa.
 ness   bull hill climb: you have to reach the target to complete the task to survive. with strong excite
sentlel no offence but i find my self very bored on sunday afternoons i used to look forward to this day but now ay  for days
   list of yojanas of indian government 2014  2015 pdf
listening to morrisey this morning so all is good in the world   friday
which school dis ppl go sef? na who graduate dem?
that is a huge blow...considering the contents of the statement being alleged to constitute 'incitement'.
i don't get it! haha?
never leave nothing of value at a nigga house cause they gone be petty when you try to get it back
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
the springs and the devils den the only thing on my mind rn.
if i could make this much progress in 1 week, no telling how much i'll make in a year!!
i've finally decided when i go to university next year, after taking 3 years out, i will major in psychology and minor in dance!
game of thrones time
sharks won guys, they did it.
so i went to gilmore pchub this morning to buy a 1070 just to find out it's still not out.
today ended up being a great day.
road tripinnnnn with no destination
...she's back in his arms
so looking forward to the new season
not sleeping till i at least watch one episode of oitnb tonight.
  bihday to me!!!!
  happy bihday kanye west: here's your year in review on twitter: after causing absolute pandemonium i...
  happy juneteenth!: it was hard to believe--like a dream come true. even to this day, there is somethin...
thanks to my first followers, i won't let you down boys,
i love the view of sea in night &amp; waves drifting out in darkness!!i feel life in that moment.
instead of graduating i mastered the ability to drink whiskey like its juice.  how
ok i'm getting platinum white hair soon. it's so beautiful.
when someone reaches out to offer you a performance but you already have prior singing commitments   :-(
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
good morning nt and   wednesday to you!
&amp; these fucking idiots are running for president??
you know what makes it even worse about celtic fans making up fake profiles to speak to themselves about rangers. it's a saturday night
it's sunday switch off and tune in. take a walk, listen, feel, smell, hear and touch.
weekend with the girlfriend
today i saw a guy who looked exactly like joe jonas and so naturally i said "joe jonas?!"and he turned around but it wasnt actually him
i move in to my apament tomorrow.
bag of dicks!
canvases and pads ready, just a little bit more for the paints
sweet! picked up appointment near sorbonne for final night $$$ grab.
pretty classless calling him disabled....you don't know his story.
you determine what makes you  . nobody else can or should do that for you.
i thought you'd like this pin on pinterest...  i wish he understands   smile
can't wait to see this
depth, risk-taking and weirdness in female characters = writing / acting choices that need to be seen!
so   for the dog park!
"we're you leading them on?" -the typical response for sexual harassment in the workplace for females. like no i'm being friendly.
woiiiii that was the last one as well
 woman gets shagged by black man adult riders
  friday  its making you better  no matter what trials and storms that you faced this week. know that it...
happy life...please find me!!!
chloe put my my window on child lock and i'm feeling
when uncle rob comes over   childrensday
reggae sumfest launch right now .....we're     adahzeh will be performing at  reggae
changes for sheboutit is bout to take a turn!!! summer expansion is underway!   sheboutit will still be...
my favourite actress
lol, look at how fox premieres the news cast,  it's like a tv show, as thou they trying to make it exciting
i was gonna visit my best friend over in california next month but now i cant afford it and dont know how to tell him i cant come.
ryan gets to sleep inside his cabin tonight while my cabin is forced to "sleep under the stars" directly on his front porch lol
and now i present the wedding rings :) simple but awesome :)   :o
my tl is dead af bc most of my mutuals are in school rn
change is coming
   how to flash stock kitkat rom using sp flash tool
dang i clicked on this girls selfies cause she's cute &amp; im blocked :/
it's so amazing how it's hard for disadvantaged footballers to settle a team ,yet the so called wealthy pay bribes to be in the teams
it be negguhs out yur own way hatin, sneakdissin n shyt. but call you "bleed" &amp; "bro" b shyt.
morning  who's excited for a shopping day?
only the good stuff: multivitamins for your weekend [06.11.16]
today is going to be the hardest day of my life.
you can't beat the classic osaka colours!
you guys, i've never stayed in such a nice hotel. i feel so coooool. downtown nashville bouda get it tonight!!!
after my massage, i found out that my cavs are down. sana hindi na lang natapos massage ko.
one of the biggest aims from these retreats is true happiness with being you
woo hoo! congratulations!
beggers belief i know but its the kinder egg !, see on the news another gun siege is taking place now in texas
smiling because life is good rite now!!
  father's day dad mario santoro i miss you
  under publication my very own book "journey''
shit happens but life goes on. good bless   days
seriously?? have some respect!!
itune accepted vista
 chick gets fucked c thomas howell naked
can't wait for this :-)
this time next week i'd have finished work for 4 days, england will have beaten wales and it'll be stag do eve!
earlier
these hoes don't gaf about you or your life... that girl ain't been dead for a month yet and now the pay at g5  smfh
found my old pic when i just got my braces! left jan, right may
despite all the studies most diabetics i know would rather take pills than even try a plant diet for 3 weeks.  .
when you need someone to talk to and no one to talk to...
this guy is a lunatic. an angry....ignorant....and vicious man!
lucky birds for the weekend...
yeah after 5yrs .....   but its for the best..
doesn't the ball have to go forward from s kick off ? lol
filming with the bbc on our stand at rhs chelsea
and yet, you're still going to vote for him....
  pussy men having sex with food
can't belive the hockey season is over....
tonight we are young!!
  pussy free pics nude mature
  sex stories amateurs one wild
i hope it doesn't clash with got
this is when leftiesshow mental deficits of comprehension &amp; rational thinking.
 boob camron diaz naked pics
when u cant get in cause its 21++++++
ooh it's your bd ??   bih day nelly
and for her children to know when they are older that their mother died in pain because of some rag is just vile
anyway, weighed myself &amp; i'm officially back to 100.0 lbs. i lost every single pound i gained in the last 3 years.
series finale of house of lies tonight.
trying times for nigeria football,so   .
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i've not been low or crying my eyes out so that's funny to read i've been the complete opposite!totally over everything and laughing
good vibes tau for today .. 'coz 14th manths na kme ni bestplen :-) .    lang
tomorrow is the sta of a sub-chapter in my career.
after 8 yrs of endless lies, contempt from a  left activist, u realize with clarity he never came clean w/us
very impoant in the world full of violence!
i can walk a little, so my friends will take me out tonight after 5 days locked in the house **
no,we can see they have been instrumental in promoting false narrative &amp; abetting divisive blm agenda.
finding life inside the illusion. for d lack of any other choice.
pray for bran stark
today it's beirut and orlando. tomorrow people will do horrible things somewhere else. as long as there are people it won't change..
i never going to meet justin
there must be a clause in his baylor contract for personal conduct or lack of institutional control as the hc.
i hate rere
life isn't as beautiful as it should be..
if this is true, then it is shameful. how can national federal legislators belittle themselves in d us this way
  fathers day to all dad/papa/father/tatay around the world. esp. to my one and only papa. iloveyou!
love this book written by my friend alison, i highly recommend it. my son with fa's really enjoyed it too! &lt;3
  sex blonde free stepdad porn
  look: adorable kids of nfl players wish their dad 'happy father's day': it's father's day, which means...
most of my family just planned a trip to disney world in december.  but i'll still have class at the time.  .
congrats to all!! u too double auntie!!!
noticed how some things make you bitter? do this to be   at all times. sta by forgiving others and yourself
looked at eyes like a champion today.
free girls pic galery  girls fucked
i have only gone and found a tattooist who is gonna do my big cat sleeve and throat piece
how many friends you have ever but,the bestfriend is the best forever   national bestfriend
why did god destroy your face?because of too much inbreeding with your sister? hump the bible 1 too many times?
this is hea breaking, what has this world come to?
about to give this chance a listen, see what the fuss about
i can't stand a habitual liar man..
we don't need an election in 2017, we need a referendum for the dissolution of this pseudo state.
free creampie sex movies   dragon porn
how to be   even if things arent perfect now
why does this get so low key of a play when trump's foolish request to change judges got wall to wall coverage?
changes for sheboutit is bout to take a turn!!! summer expansion is underway!   sheboutit will still be...
lol damn daniel, when you have a mans baby and you still ain't his number one
officially made that white tiger to cougar transition today
weekend spent with some of my faves
eyebrow game so weak
that's a good dog
watching angry birds   birds birdsmovie
note: i was just able to pop this zit on my neck that's been there for days. i've beensqueezing it for days.
something i wrote on a wall whilst my mind was off with the fairies and the music was loud was 'run happy and chase joy'.
working on a new project, haven't officially come up with the name, but we aiming for the fall !!!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
today i broke my previous running record of 4.8 km .  new record is 6 km.
. very impoant.
what kind of name is "bezos" anyway?   people tell me it's a muslim name.
which channel sir
night guys, cool day with all the zelda and ffxv footage, but tomorrow i must study for an exam on thursday.
invest on people that last a lifetime.
  i keep hearing stories of sadness and i want it to stop. people make someones day! with a smile, a coffee, or just a touch.
feel so proud of everything i have achieved in se1
this is why we can't have nice things
what a stellar year it's been for
i feel so hard
we gotta stay humble sy...sike who i'm kidding, fuck the warriors!
i forgot my oj this morning.
girls these days
oh i love you thank 4 that. i love this country and i will die for our children to be safe   day in america
  hope i can get a ticket!
alice cooper playing z7 pratteln!
lmfao my dress looked better then sum tc girls who ain't even try smh but fuck it i ain't even go
i am happy that i get 2 b back at home with my family. my passion is 2 take care of them &amp; b there for my husband &amp; kids
today we have ideal air quality to go outside and watch things burst into flames...
  father's day dad!
ur gonna be a lawyer and you can't even win an argument against an 18 year old?
  hardcore sets nakedcurvygirl pics
finding dory tonight!!   :-)
  father's day to our real life super hero's no cape and super powers needed there love and strength unmatched
blonde highlights yes  hair
i'm a tx republican, orlando was a hate crime. the people at pulse were targeted because they were lgbt.
i'm so anal i can't get into bed unless my bed was made that day, and if it's not perfect when i get in bed i'll remake it.
i'm weak  3-2
some people don't want opinions like they ask for. just for someone to agree with them.
floating on frozen treats
have another beer, dave.
just received nikki + nate's contract for their wedding next may. hey, hey, hey... it's a bee-yoo-tee-ful day!! :-d
  sex blonde sex farm women
me before you, maybe i'm still crying over it
many congratulations - well done.
woke up 5 hours early for my daughter's 1st day at school.   lol
ole folks taking me out shipping for early bihday gifts
this wednesday at daddy jack's!  !
it's never too late - never too late to sta over, never too late to be  ...-
i have a feeling this weekend will be really good
having to dye my hair back to a darker colour for the wedding    gonna go for a dark brown lol
would be the best thing he has done yet
god made us bestfriends because he knew our moms couldn't handle us as sisters
yes you have. the biggest thing you've got on this week is picking up your dole money.
potato ok thank  bye, its starch like potatoes, 1987 gb phq sg 13671370 victorian thank science empire cooking,
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
well i want to be..
racism in america: 'kill obama' and 'muslims not welcome here' signs in new mexico draw criticism -
is it my bihday yet?   lau
motherfuckers got blood samples next! lol, u score one on the dudes and they get their fweelings hu....wow it's on
bot kitazatoshibasaburo found tetanusimmunization with his colleague but kitazato didnot won nobelprize but colleague won  is white
new website coming soon
lying on the couch watching a movie, with high speed internet    .....  watching descendants of the sun
the key to life.  thank you dallas clayton.
i miss when my friends played xbox    :(
we didn't know then, of course, that this would be don's high point.
that   moment when you press  for your own tweet!
shopping for my girl's bachelorette pay.
it has been one year since we met again and now, you're gone
in a nutshell.
its really hard to face the reality :( :(
free chat with sexy girls   hardcore anthems
hey guys i'm back and im really excited about wednesday cause my mom is coming all the way from utah. she is staying until my b-day
i think everything is finally coming together again
my thoughts and prayers and deepest condolences are with the people of orlando the rest of america is with you.
not every trump suppoer is a racist but every racist is a trump suppoer. this an irrefutable truism.  must never be tolerated.
apparently taragon is not a "christmassy herb"
  kwon soon young born day
wow! this is what blogging is about!
understand this, my dear brothers and sisters: you must all be quick to listen, slow to speak, and slow to get angry.   saturday!
  hardcore anthems anal female
 care without carbon:
i guess some girls need to use a creepy man to pay for things they can't afford bc they aren't independent enough to get it themselves
sounds like a way too expensive mexican restaurant....
no fats. no femmes. no olds. no asians. no blacks. no bears. no. no. no. no.   we've become a community of no.
wow i'm on the other side of the world by myself
you got to spend money to make money. forever stepping out my comfo zone
 mindsconsole: you never know what someone is going through. just because you see them smiling, doesn't mean that everything is ok.
waiting for the arrival of my sister and nephew. oh how i've missed them.
oh so very beautiful! much love from (well, right now) london! xxx
despite my prior worries, i am so grateful that my work lets me give back to my family. even a little bit.
super sexy girls striping   birday sex xxx
gold, money, cars, sex, good body, perfect contour, big ass, black skin, wonderful hair, it's the new fashion  ?
tragic.   mass shooting in orlando.   if everybody in the nightclub was armed, much better outcome!  many news cycles lost to me!
 boob marathi nude women
behold "the people" er.. pithy club
we still live in a world where pregnant women, babies and children have to breathe in second hand smoke when we walk down the street.
don't hear enough about genuine dynamic public servants amongst our v average politicians
need these cushions in my life
why don't you take notice me
lovely day with all the family for father's day. now to snuggle up with my babe for the rest of the evening    fathersday
when she tells you she enjoyed the week
  teen difference between men and women sex
don't play with the girl
when pas of the gene pool fail.  !
first training counselling shift at childline tomorrow
maybe i need to follow some new people. my whole stream is s of aicles, no conversations.
this dude had 12 girls living with him and i cant find 1 to go see finding dory with me..
wow september 1 2015 me
when you're busy studies and you can't see finding dory and you have to be happy with other people watching it.
question is am i more upset about not being able to go out or not being able to vote in the eu referendum? probs the latter
this babe deserves more recognition
found the cutest t-shi dress today.
it's a shame on humanity's face the power is misused since beginning of civilizations to mark own benefits
weekend planed with my son .
where is your   place???
you are such a hoe, and don't care
yes these days they call stuff like this journalism
and thats why nba will forever be behind soccer, football, baseball, and hockey.   actually behind boxing tooo
we were here before such a bridge appeared. your denial of indigenous first people is racism. ergo, you are
the color of a human skin matters a lot to the system when it comes to judgement call.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i see the haters on twitter are commenting on every ramsey touch and even making up passes he didn't make to criticise him
this weekend is going to be crazy! haha i'm ready to do whatever i want!  pride
my sweet little pill!! numb my skin...
-mfs know more about what's going on dis weekend then abt they kids
my son leaves tomorrow for a month long trip to connecticut, cape cod, and jersey    i've never been without my baby for so long
pic1=mg: hey you know her.. was she..             pic2=ww:hemm!!
just when i thought parenting with my daughters mom was good she's back to being immature
southbound on the 101, headed to my big interview
year's may passed but your memories will live in our heas and mind.we love you   father's day!!
nervous to be leaving the country for a month ! i'm scared i'll get homesick
another gop myth up in smoke: good guys with guns might have killed some of the victims
  - 5,000 pigs burn alive in saskatchewan barn fire (video)
 , rage, revenge, liam neeson, sam raimi, darkman, peyton westlake via giphy
so i guess they were ain't lyin when they say "iyakhalisa"    watching tears of the sun
you could dap a nigga up not knowing he trynna get with ya chick
love how the closest people to you are the ones that turn around and stab you in the back.
the book will be out before the end of the month. yay!
 , oprah, blessed
tim peake.    ?  yawn.
so much energy freed up.  so much room for the abundance of life.
ohhhhh ya do you all know how chuckles will like and  his own tweets with his trolling accounts as well
i'm with you!
ive had my id checked by the police zero times in 8 months. of course, this discrepancy has nothing to do i'm a wh
seems like people only hml when i'm doing good or looking good
sorry everyone but it's sold already  thank everyone for helping out   trails
everybody making/sharing memes peaining to people losing their lives because of recent events. it's not funny. you're disgusting.
today i can relate to this.. i never give up , it was difficult to wait.. bt sabr ka phal meetha hota hai !!
summer is in which means good vibes!! try to keep a smile each day and see all the good things in life!!!
first day of school
i lost my phone :'(
speak out... this show love it
bad things: brexit, clement freud, orlando, upsta crow.  good thing: all the champagne i drank tonight.
what a disgrace :( poor kids already have tough life ...
not a fan of cav's nor warriors,but that was the worst officiating i've seen,great job nba you made it go 7.
every day i am in the mountains, and every day it blows me away how gorgeous they are.
my name in japanese ft. these beautiful flowers.
josephjett "fatherhood: nor shall you engage in aberrant social behavior, then call  that resultant disdain that is merely common
pope thanks god for the good and bad he trusted you   sunday
yup and no common sense gun control initiatives will even be discussed
like mj said "they don't really care about us" ....
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
did some accessories shopping today too - next thing to do is to get my pofolio done and do a photo shoot!!!
 , kim kardashian, crying
i need someone to lay on to
ohio in 3 days and then tennessee in 6 days
either this a scene from ya homemade movie or nobody got aim
what a afternoon!
sagarika hw mch mony u gt 4 stkng 2 anti modi stnd frm ur pol. masters..nw evn us cong s also modified.any shame lft
you have to learn that you're not gonna get anything by sitting on you're bloody arse and letting everyone do everything for you
so much fun recording this podcast with this amazing bunch of people!
so, who do you think told those dictionaries what  is?
jennifer aniston naked picture   hardcore music
alhamdulillah settle amik cake and pastries for my bro and ayah's surprise bihday pay!!!
just my focking luck!!   whos croatian? your havin sone
when you try your best but you don't succeed :(
la la land is  here's an idea poc: make ur own films with only u in em, quit bitching at whitey 4 being white
i won't waste my time on some  sob that has to plaster color on his profile blm  bacon lettuce maters matter on 2 slices of bread
nice big brave fellas these russian fans aren't they - charging in to women and children. all hell is going to break out in marseille
i have 4 fishes now!!!!   !!!!
been a busy bee but now sitting in the garden while miles davies provides the soundtrack
yessss chrishon
 video men and womenmalayalam ameture porn video
got 4 episodes of game of thrones to get through tonight
i plan on doing so much this summer but i know i won't
i get to see rachel today! :)
some people bore me...but im all smiles   vibes
  ioc's bach 'happy' with new brazil president's commitment to rio: rio de janeiro (afp) - international...
 , commercial, cow, chipotle via giphy
cases should not be treated lightly, the judge would've given this so called "man" a longer sentence, if he cared!
all the movies i want to watch come out this weekend and i won't be here
when u see ur first love in a bowling alley and hide in the bathroom the whole time   fathers day
because black is beautiful   thursday
one point na lang sa spemark and i'm 3.5 na sana :((( i only got 3.0 :(((
can't wait
let's pray for that family who lost their 2 yr old child to a gator in orlando.
you are so right carrie, when she went down for the last time her look said,  no, please mum, i wanna go now.  .
one killer = 50 dead. 53 injured.   somebody intelligent et responsible should sta to work on this subject .
yeah... euro 2016 staed   bunny
thanks sue, he's a very happy hound this evening
wa hoooooo can't wait!
he's doing it on purpose now..
it's a shame when you have no regard for your children. some parents of this world make me sick!
just been to view fab venue for our summer production of arabian nights - fingers crossed
10% off premium staer kit today + happy oiler handbook from me w/ purchase =
   quillpad- easiest way to write indian languages
when ppl think ur on a diet bcos ur not eating when rly u just hav no money to spend on food.
bring it on boys we can't either!
my sister ain't even know i was watching her argue with the nigga  was waiting for him too say the wrong shit
bihday + 1 year anny coming in july. best month of the year!
sometimes i'm just sad, soppy and gloopy, nothing goes well, serious stuff as well. what else to do, but to, you know, carry on
50% off food all day today.....come get you get a bite after work.   2410 cocktails 4-7pm
this was in regards to cosby. even w/the depo being released ppl still don't believe the victims
i witnessed this. kids these days- frank was slow on the draw
vegan cheat cake in the oven!
every celebration has a reason.   independence day folks!
atleast this week is going quickly. roll on thursday
some friends u can go months, even years without seeing each other and nothing changes. other friends just slowly become strangers.
this is sooooo  or may be just funny
i will die   for sure! since i am happy every day.
if you carry your childhood with you, you never become older.   kid
beautiful sweety
has anyone heard from the berkowitz's?
this wind is totally not cool for golf though
smooth new year's eve! marijuana unleashed at ibooks.
no matter how old this world gets. people are still dumb &amp; can't get over the fact that violence isn't okay...
so all of the cool ios 10 message things only work if the person you're messaging has ios 10, and no one i know doesssssss
just booked a table for my bihday in a couple weeks time!
picking bean up in 20 minutes
b.i.p yayo coming straight from my section all praise be to god be my only protection whenever i'm out stepping  day 5 rest up
must be a real kick in the dick to witness this for ya
positivity is a choice that bcmes ur lifestyle.so get up wake up n smile to mke ur day amazingly bful..  sunday.
tonight i experienced a mac n cheese food truck, made new friends and dominated in cornhole.
yes because apparently being qualified for a job is dependent upon your ethnicity
upset that i can't take a shower now cause the power is out
come and see us tomorrow in this amazing event, stall 4!! we are hyped and ready to rock!
first full on complete rest day in a long time, baked a crumble, first ever youtube video coming this evening!!!
so   i was walking near central park today and i got to meet the living legend jackie mason!  what a...
i usually dislike people who use pictures to get longer words in, but i am mad
3 - 0 belgium
trump has definitely lowered standards.   deepak chopra: trump is emotionally retarded, maybe mentally retarded
woo! i graduated, and got my drivers license all in the same day! luck was on my side
oh no im sorry
some days you need a hug. that's where marbella holiday planning steps in!!
i couldn't have said it better myself!   friday
when you are at the cinema and everyone laughs, and you dont know why, but you just laugh because you dont want to be left out...
hey everyone! on friday we are filming rita b at danbury beer festival..
need to sleep early pa tomorrow see you to all my friends in chong hua
sunday is where we see the most happy of users at public places
well i'm scared still
18 km in the rain along the thames. perfect sta to a sunday!
   rbi revises rules for resolution of stressed msme loans
and so the work on our new all-weather pitch begins!
it was in 2008
where is your   place???
i've been editing the video the whole night.   time to sleep for two hours! :d
contest day sunrise
i hope everyone has an awesome time, and drinks awesome shooters, and just sits around and soaks up each other's awesomeness
i appreciate all mums who have taken on fatherly roles.  fathers day!
i'm up in this kitchen ..... now this make me  ...... work at 4am so i'm
ain't no love in the city smh.
finished the gardening.....  !?!?!
staing my new job on monday..... ...
   american kills himself in taiwan couroom after drug conviction
this govt has a lot to answer they are very racist
sad..... so sad..... what a horrific way for that 2 year old to die.
hiv infection from oral sex  white girl has sex with black guy
  liverpool star: i am happy at anfield, jurgen klopp is great: i am grateful for everything liverpool ...
i seriously feel pity for sagarika ..it's difficult to live like this .
off to the cumberland show!
  'giak happy with fiore option': emanuele giaccherini would be 'happy' to go to fiorentina, but so far ...
rock n roll friday, studying, football and now smooth radio...
getting my braids done tomorrow ! :)
omg thanks so much today i have gotten so many followers
hey dave , what's your view on reincarnation ? any bible verses to buttress it if you agree
 , exciting, hell yes via giphy
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
  so happy to be with the people that i missed the most and my
last week christina grimmie, then orlando, yesterday a british politician - where does the hate come from?
finally getting a refill today
  &amp; beautiful heabreaking story behind mysterious harry potter plaque revealed -
when i feel   is a children's story about recognizing, expressing and managing anger. male and
can't wait for the russians to give me a good kicking on thursday
  hardcore vinyls free mexican porno videos
my day is officially ruined! builders have come now to so porch/patio area out so i'm now trapped. no swim or food shopping for me
not very well thought out was it?
law requires a license to drive. anybody can have a child.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
sometimes i think: just shave off one eyebrow, and no one will notice your hideous fashion sense.
time to enjoy myself, and wait until i fall asleep :)  !
  after sex am porn
a lot of commercials about bullying during this nba finals game.
  alone at work :)
someone calm me
i know a few
i've got a potato!
meet kwangsoo oppa again yeahhh
i just don't know what say to england team..   you guys can't beat russia , even with all your star players.. demn!!!!!!! i lost
  come on england ...
  cbr at ubc:
barbaric, he should be dealt with.
heading to new smyrna beach ~ they have never seen the ocean before  !
are you going to the biggest music and family fun day this summer? tickets will be available at the gate!
i pray guys!!!!!!!! orlando!!!!!!!!
i am so   i love ashton so mych
hot girl sex games  white girl has sex with black guy
  fathers day to all wonderful fathers out there. this is your day to enjoy to the fullest.
i say we because i'm speaking collectively. i've always known. 2016 showed a lot.  and white rage is still...
people are only malicious and mean when they care or feel some type of way about you or a situation.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
3 assignments done 1 to go :d
i was only supposed to work 5 hours but i'm getting paid 9
  childfree and happy: frankly, i though it would be hard to one-up tony abbott when it came to a politi...
go. to. bed.
this moron is leading the us down a path that has so much potential to damage and destroy the world.
shocked by what's considered racist these days.
breen and steward little broke up after steward little was a poop and broke her hea
i feel sick. just learnt of jo cox's passing at the hands of a violent man with a gun. she died helping people. prayers to her family.
she talks about bullying .. and she is the most person who bullies .
jeff sessions tries to delete decades of ....
heabreaking development
happy father's day dad continue to rest in peace !!!
tgif! and a bonus friday because it's a public holiday in my hood
  11th year anniversary of michael jackson's vindication!
forgot my book at school
if it's true that some ppl  will risk their freedom for little.. it must also be true that a modest amount can buy that freedom back.
which one first? actors script or directors script?
bad news for journalism when my monthly neighborhood newsletter is down to 4 pages and 2 is ads.  !
now playing  :  ira stain - " continuum" on     music song
fouh place race across the west - 900 mile nonstop bicycle race    follow me on facebook:...
i chose to fix your hea by breaking mine.
i feel she want talking but she can't
officially registered to play slo pitch and soccer with the essc this summer... let's see how this goes
my fianc's brother and his girlfriend are moving in with us, hopefully all goes well.
vido nude   hardcore tracks
those replies.   is dead tho.
finally,after 8 hour my account stas working properly....
these kind of people need to be erased of eah''s surface -_- ,
ain't nothing like having your self confidence tapped into. my texas trip was more needed than i knew
having love relation is my thing that i've never seen in m y whole life even my parents can't do that.    life, still single! ) :
work is depressing me. why do we sell our lives?
big school board meeting tuesday. changes coming for wchs &amp; mbm.
i lost brain cells comprehending this garble
i laughed at my own tweet...
sad. sad. sad. good luck little boy.
my snap chat update    bihday to me
vacations are going to sta soon
so grateful for my sisters ! today's been tough, but always have to be positive about my results !
emotion wreck!
   goa may term national bird peacock as vermin
doesn't have enough time to spent.
see you'll guys in school tomorrow. back to our real n daily habit
 jokes about women penis humping girl
i can't wait to be a nurse
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
hey, i noticed that you're a workout lover, so i invite you to see my new app, it's called "my training" on apple
not give another nigga any time of the day .. nobody never textin just u
you know your life's sad when your boss says " he's gonna help find you a girlfriend"
hey i wanna go to plush anniversary but i don't have much friends
~just enjoying life.
wednesday i'll wake up on the eastern side of the hemisphere.
how if you live alone and you get a fever in the midle of the night? you just can snuggled down in your blanket until morning come.
kid throws 74-78. not like he has a future or anything. only 12 years old. winning &gt; health.
who cares if you dont care about me...?
thought of the day: "a   person is not a person in a ceain set of circumstances, but rather a person with a ceain set of attitudes"
tolerance, love, kindness.
arsenal, the club that sets itself to be ridiculed.
hey what the heck is up i'm really fucking   ho!
waiting for my camera...
[ ] thank you "annuairemidipyrenees" for the follow !
the whole weekend changes when you find out a friend is coming into town for pride.
thanks shakeys   father's day
happy fathers day to my everyday crash, husband and my everyday friend.    father's day to
the new house is looking amaze
waow.. this is the biggest it business deal of the decade..
song of the day!   dance
let me guess... the bon voyage thing is on vlive and it costs money... goodbye another chance...
anxiety is tweets before coffee &amp; watering plants then realizing 2 hours has gone by cuz ur damn foot went to sleep
you know some people come into your life, but some our put in it.
one of those days where i look at my life and am so grateful for all the blessings surrounding my circle and i'm so
we has fishies!!!
damn. four years later, and we've literally done nothing as a country to stop these shootings from happening.
today was such a good day!!!!
in dec, my waist size had crept towards 40. i weighed 229lbs on jan 1. today i'm comfoably wearing size 36 pants &amp; weigh 214lbs.
  fathers day make sure you take the time to call your fathers and sons /uncles grandfathers etc
yahoooo finally my one plus 2 get marshmallow update
before and after the park   hounds
what a crazy day but the residents loved the cake i made. :)
that moment when you have to cut a character....
greetings back to all of you!
hey look, my name is spelled correctly now!
let god be the judge you cant going around killing people for their own sexual preference
  fathers day to all the wonderful dads out there
good morning
early night for m ahead of tomorrow event       night all ;-)
i've been disappointed in a lot lately, and these baylor boosters are adding to that list. winning at all costs is not pa of humanity.
my father is simply the greatest man i have known and iam so proud to call him mine   father's day
very true.  passing a drug test to receive could solve a lot!!
thinking of everyone caught up in the pulse nightclub incident. america needs to wake up to domestic gun crime.
i had a dream we went skiing, but we never made it out of the lodge. then i woke up and realized it's june and skiing is 6 months away.
just burnt one of my fave cushions
he must think people are really stupid; otherwise, why would he lie so blatantly?  should neve be tolerate
"what it feels like to lose to donald trump"
look, xhaka and rodriquez both play the left side of the pitch, does this mean wenger will sign?
ohh no how?
thank you so much to all my 400 followers. love you so much.
who has two thumbs and a new job? this girl!
congrats on the hard work!!
only reason pre cal is going to be impoant in my life is because there are tests on it
i was doing a thread in my other acc and no one paicipated
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
the time is finally here !!!
happy bihday your majesty from all at today's asbury rd, peckham street pay   bihday ma'am
this is so sad...
finally wo agaya     :):)
ur welcome teammates! dance to the tune of joyfulness!
idk why women think they can have a mans hea when his hea is elsewhere
most of these imvu hos can't even do the no makeup movement challenge because not even their avis go without makeup.
can't wait to watch the conjuring 2.
 porn vids web free sex
we live amongst people who prefer honey coated lies to the bitter truth.
thanks so much!
first recital week as an alum and it's still just as great!!!!
currently leaving placement, week 3 done and now it's time for the euro's !!!
ku klux klan originally an arm of the southern democratic pay to terrorize freed slaves and republicans who sympathized with them
went on a recce to brussels today,2 trains &amp; a metro ride brought us 200m from the hotel. from where it's a 5min walk to the palais
rip to those who lost their lives in orlando.  blessings to your families and friends.
there's way too much going on in this world! the end is really near.
date went very well tonight.
heading to six flags discovery kingdom up in nohern ca in 3 days.
at the barbican for the premiere of where to invade next the latest documentary from michael moore
guys lie for no reason,not knowing half the time we already know or we just don't give a fuck!
seems like a lifetime ago..
crucible gives me ebola i s2g its like all the y1 trash players come out who just sit in spawn and camp and use the thorn again jfc
free porn thailand  white girl has sex with black guy
  ramdan to all muslims
ate all of my animal crackers and now i am
finally decided to do something i've always dreamt of!!!
when your bosses are actual angels
sex postion picture  white girl has sex with black guy
received my first mean comment today, took it hard, someone actually watched my video,thank you,
looks like i gave sanders too much credit last night.
watching white water
obama tells trump and the american people f**k you before he leaves (but you can't say anything  )
ride along with the sherrifs depament at 10!
  fathers day 2 all fathers around d world. i love u daddy!!!!
i have never seen a bigger choke job than game 7 of the nba finals by s. curry - wwe's seth rollins was so very wrong about cleveland.
last day of school! practice today, game tomorrow! gotta love it.  who's   ? haha abe...
one more class and an aspire lunch then i'll be done with school and i can focus on going away this weekend!
it looks like battlefield prep for the next election is in full swing today.
we love you back !
  father day the day we celebrate for our father of the nation
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i don't even want a boyfriend i just want some nigga to take an pick me up from work
  ayesha curry not exactly happy with cleveland's hospitality: stephen curry's wife and tv network star ...
i love the night of ramadan ...there is deferent felling in my hea of happyness  thisis the spirit of ramadan  ramadan
  father's day! to all living &amp; passed, we love you dearly! thank you for your love always.
collectors corner: angry birds
exhibition update: the agreement has arrived. a lot of reading to do &amp; then 9 bags &amp; 1 compact carryall with be off to shanghai.
how they klan isn't labeled as terrorist organization still is mind blowing. guess since its a so called christian group its alright
5 years is not enough. hanning is accused of bein an accessory ta the murder of 170,000 people in auschwitz. an ss guard from 1942-44
happy fathers day to all fathers, even the deadbeat dads
lawyer fees bills an no help... folks tryin put me back n cage n you want me to b   -how?????
take me to the moon
i've had a sneak peek at the content and it looks great.
have this feeling im not even going to need my alarm to get up early in the morning.
bitches wake up thinking about me and my daughter . y'all hoes really that mad at a child cus she got more than you and she pretty af
why do i keep getting scam job offers?
official selection in one eyeland
we tell our triumphs to the crowds, but our own heas are the sole confidants of our sorrows. ~edward g. bulwer-lytton
"mine as well"....
well... hockey's officially over and now idk what to do with myself
facebook is just a political warzone these days.
bhutan: the one time the indian passpo is good for anything
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i would never in my life allow my future kids to listen or look at anybody that does this nope!
  father's day 2 all the real fathers out there!!! hope you got a breakfast like this!!!
lebron do all this pushing but cry when somebody touches him
nice looking gorgious
. what kind of an economy boasts real estate as major factor?
i love you
at any given time that fouh emoji is on point .
  father's day to all you fathers and father-figures! thank you for being awesome! show some love and tag...
drugs got ppl looking like the walking dead round here
 , reactions, do not want, cheryl cole, pout, pouty, doesn't like
outrageous racism from rother dc. hope the families sue 4 failing to follow advice for a life guard &amp; causing the d
am not a morning person
when boys flight game be too weak !
stay calm...stay delighted...stay curious...stay innocent...stay loving...stay
caht por teen   hardcore anthems
poor poor buccos.
night lovely peeps  xx
nope!!! this is not true. data is readily available. you just have to request.
cracked my iphone screen
now playing ...
no matter what i do, my world is an empty place
the love of my life is back in 13 days!
wait lets do it this way someone has some suggestions that need to be in my playlist for my next streams
gonna watch now you see me 2 later
awwwwwwwwwwwwwww        cairo for president !!!!!
thx for the update.   the shooting was brazen. i heard the shooter was female. i wonder what the motive was.
white girls will never break the internet...
longest period of time i've been out of internet for at home. incompetent agent &amp; landlord. it will be 1 month and 1 week without.
when your friends give you pressies   cheered up x
now playing  :   - " la bellevilloise" on     music song
if you had suppoed the candidate you liked better, you wouldn't have to send this to a corporate shill.
never understand what it means when someone likes a tweet like this!   was a mother wife and person full of life
six animals killed because of poor parenting
at first i was so hea broken by slaughter of 49 people and the injured people in orlando night club...now i'm   &amp; baffled
all smiles lately
it's been this way for a long time. as an american, i am tired of being blamed.. our fault, our rights caused this..
at tha bah   hour
it feels good to buy some new clothes because of losing weight. i kept putting it off. being lazy.
last day at work for the week
talk about color palettes .
off to transylvania this weekend for a wedding.  going to be interesting
because you're a racist?
maannnn if this ain't the truth ido what is
simply no words to thank u dad  fathers day...............
praying for the victims and theirs families that where in the shooting in orlando!!!
  bihday sexy girl hudgens naked pics
everything has price these days
senseless killings all over the world almost daily. proliferation of guns still a worldwide nightmare. may the families find strength.
   india and singapore sign key agreement to boost maritime
i just ate a salad for lunch (again).. and it felt like it was the appetizer to a good meal
happy bihday!!!!  friday
va, boston, jersey then texass .. this summer is looking great
the girls that get no attention talk the most shit   .
rest peacefully in the bosom of the lord stephen keshi, you were the goat of your generation with the super eagles in both your roles.
sometimes you just have to let go
i wish, as well as everybody else, to be perfectly  ; but, like everybody else, it must be
nearly e3 time
it's thursday, it's sunny and my jam is on the radio.
this is so triggering
i'm in shock right now there are no words  can't believe  your gone rip fly high angel love  you so much you will never be forgotten
" god that created us does not even condemn us when we make mistakes. yet we go ahead and crucify ourselves.
ive had my id checked by the police zero times in 8 months. of course the discrepancy has "nothing" to do i'm a wh
tonight im about to cry because im 10 you have to be 15 to skrillex is conce and by the time im 15 he'll be 33 he might not contine
  pop culture happy hour: 'oj: made in america' and a quiz: this is our 300th episode of pop culture hap...
going to see 'where to invade next' on friday night, including live q&amp;a with filmmaker michael moore! can't wait!
this life tho..............
dragons den day
nothing says   like this cute little mug! meet my 3yr old camden!... a firecracker for
the less said bout my own province(mpumalanga) the better, we don't have a team in the elite league.
getting slim day by day   looking more attractive &amp; more confident     mee
when in your teamspeak channels are empty
you forgot russia since been betrayed by   trump and this has never happened b 4, putin will soon slit his throat.
couple drugs n raves really change a person
you me too
  sex stories sleep assault
days like today make all the bad days that much more wohwhile.
aurbnb is reminding me about my trip!   .
shid to some dudes , they dont care if you loyal or not  as long as they dip in different hoes pussy from time to time. they good
aaawwwww so cute
hot lesbian having sex  office woman
on top of sharing an email account, my parents also share one phone charger...
what's new in this? votes were/are bought as well!
i have so many silent black and gay friends who have nothing to say.
wake up&amp; speak up.flood mailboxes of politicians on all sides and levels of gov.lib/socialist agenda/ideology kills
happy mind, happy life.
really need to get some   buddha's like these for my garden.  life's to serious to be anything but,  xx
  wales coach warren gatland enjoying happy hamilton homecoming: wales coach warren gatland enjoying hap...
it's unbelievable the things people do just so they don't have to see you.
africa is dying just because his youth is leaving to go abroad and go develop other people's country....   what can we do?
looking forward to shooting my first wedding in a while this weekend for some wonderful friends from france!
i'm leaving happy. it may not sound like i am. zimmer didn't leave happy. in that sense it's much...
making big koves  !
got shafted out of my cure ticket by a friend :-( oh well i've seen them live before i'll live but my friend can go bite her ass :-(
staed the day by throwing a pint of juice over myself   friyay
waiting for p.m narendra modi ji to come in allahabad on 13 june .....
looking forward to visiting my councillor tomorrow. someone said to me, if you go then he'll go on a long tea break.. felt   hearing that
wow what a beautiful day !! come and have some family fun in the sun.
see. this is the issue with rappers not living the life they rap about
when someone says 'i'm not a racist, but......'.
wish i was surprised
  socks friday. dont ask how am i doing rather ask my
a great combination!!!
remaster. remaster everywhere.
damn i wish this orlando shooter shoot me&amp;killed me.i'm dying here on cancer anyway.these young ppl.had still their whole life in front
janab...kyun like spree de rahe ho..?? why why?
congrats lola!
to all of us whom have immigrated from third world countries can definitely attest this nation is moving towards becoming a 3rd. world.
10 fields to consider if you want to be your own boss
off now for 9 days  ibiza on wednesday
are your employees  ? it will have an impact on how  your clients are
so earlier i had a garage sale in front of my house.   kumita lang ako ng 30 pesos.   but at least my kinita pa din right?
off to bed and reflect on whats happened this weekend,queens 90 th bihday over shadowed by the violence in france then the shooting.
if you're not   with what you're doing, you'll never be good at it.
so   life way to so  mum-of-two fiona fraser passed away suddenly on sunday morning
see you in september lizzie!
god i thank you for making me to witness this day...all i have to say is thank you lord..
 twitter makes me.
pray for orlando .... stay close to god always.
a really   tweet
for what love whithout proof
"you're the only person who can make you  . you're as happy as you choose to be." -rick warren
peace.   ...?
headed to the beach....  i shall bury myself in the sands and write epic music under the glorious sunset skies
when hamilton slips through....
pls.like my post
awesome -- it's the rare wildly hyped phenomenon that actually lives up to the hype.
the most dangerous thing in democracy is we choose leader with trust and then they form a govt which never follow the democracy at all
throw them a pay , give them gifts.... and tweet them   bihday with us !! &lt;--------
le mans pit lane is the place to be for any motorspo junkie. only a few hours to the sta now.
country is a genre of music; hitler probably enjoyed music too. when will our generation wake up?
so so   the legend is gone r.i.p
how can your own family members hate on you...
30 minutes and counting until frimjob
  'plurality of israelis happy yisrael beytenu in gov't, but not with liberman as defense minister': mor...
i need to watch attack on titan: junior high to feel better and calm myself
work is over, the day off will come.    moment of my own.
i either sleep too much or dont sleep  at all..there's no inbetween.
who fuckin coat?  ugly ass lmfao
kabee catfish   spicy
i think i'm making some progress over here
my little bro may have just beat me in basketball
people outside of venezuela should do something. we should do something about it!
why are white people expats when the rest are immigrants?  ?
mine and dads mark x
always   to share good things!
tonight i've got my first ever gig at angel comedy
see you tomorrow paris
unlimited yes unlimited yes unlimited yes unlimited yes e vai se fuder
lularoe... feel happy, look happy, be  ! what makes you happy?!  click on the link in my
shrek 2 is on
wawo nic gud  bless  you
thanks for writing this doug. buying it now.
niggaa would fuck over they boy just to hit some pussy
feeling so so blessed today. (can't stop crying )
decided to watch old james bond movies cause they're less violent than reality
hows stuff like this still happening in the 21st century? what was the point of the civil rights movement if people
it takes a strong man to be a father.  and an even stronger man to be a grieving father.   fathers day
oh dear
 naked woman mo fo sex
heyy, i saw that u are a workout fan, so i ask u to test my free app, it's called "mytraining" on apple
bad players make us  .
more nonsense &amp; idiotic rhetoric from the gop nominee, as he gets more free press &amp; no pushback from the "fair &amp; balanced" network
   india third in global dope violation in wada repo
watch them not even have what i need ! answer your phone! i'm wasting my lunch for this shit
  bday to all fathers!! ..  we loved you all
  fathers day to all fathers
when i have more followers on instagram then you have on yours     night
  clock of the hea: happy 55th to boy george: in the early '80s, when england expoed new wave and s...
ref: paul brown stadium hamilton co. cincinnati "never overestimate the intelligence of the voting public"
let all remember, honour &amp; celebrate the lives of those who made it become renowned   youth day
people don't know how to respect a relationship anymore
when you get your hair cut + colored it makes you feel good
y'all all on bron dick but if he lose y'all gone be bad mouthing dog
getting ready to go see my biological dad
fuck boys. i spilled ranch sauce on my pillow.
i have 1 homegirl
really not ready for my week off to end. too quick. ho hum.
i just stepped in a puddle
dont have to lie about the food im eating anymore  that bitch has 5 kids and cant cook for shit
be happy, always
tryna stay up so i can go sleep early tonight.
got my in n out... life is complete...
i gave her my hea. my full of it and she have just played with all my feelings...
i love you dude
now playing  :  rick wakeman - " the lone sailor" on     music song
genuinely excited that i've just made my own mini meringues!
love it when you do your eyebrows and they go fucking perfectly
but no one to text
today is my last day at the language college, i learned a lot and i met amazing people... one year and a half later, this is it!
no sleep &amp; a double at work
wtf is that shit about?
who's ready to see who we have going through to our miss england final 2016? results to be posted!
lol at the   replies to this.
istg the kids in the cinema yesterday had ????? faces when there were lines connected to finding nemo
page 220  yes! finally proved my innocense im free to go.. as for madec i will let the judge deal wih him as i do not bare seeing him
safe travels lads
yum we ain't eating the tumor tho
my laptop's broken now cant binge watch criminal minds on netflix
  bihday naked man nude women at water park
my hea &amp; prayers go out to her family &amp; friends
i've had 3 perfect days in a row got 60/58 on my final, got installed as wohy advisor, and got to see my best friend again
mint oreos aren't as good as they seem.
wtf does dory die in this move
suddenly staing to feel real now i'm finished both jobs
sparky toes
father's luv knows no boundaries as it grows healthier each day...    father's day
oh but you need this to live cause something dead &amp; sick can somehow sustain life i forgot
i saw a firefly im
obama/jarretts who agenda was to destroy everything good about this country and inflict even bit of hate
why? because the repo the nof/phc placed in the public domain is an incoherent mess.
are you just takin' the piss now or
got my dad a spain fabregas jersey &amp; got myself thiago
really good advice!
real mexican porn   hardcore anthems
this is what happens when a race feels superior to another one.
my pay is such a success
battlefront 2 in 2017 with new trilogy content, 3rd person star wars game from makers of dead space in 2018
exciting do you have a launch date yet?
  after sex harry potter adult versions
now playing  :  ackroyd poppy - " seven" on     music song
it is truly sad. a who lot of working class men resent being offered help by a woman. evolution still has a lot of
   current affairs quiz  february 4 2016
only in guaynabo you wake up with the sweet sounds of a chipping hammer at 8am on the only day you could sleep in.
2 days left before my bihday wow im so
  download happy slow cooking pdf mobi epub fabio iacono: happy slow cooking principi !happy slow cookin...
this guy is special
nothing says   like this cute little mug! meet my 3yr old camden!... a firecracker for
our baby was due in six months. then my girlfriend said she'd met another man   beautifully written
will sleep early for tomorrow's first day.   good night!!
  2b hardcore chapter 3 tiny junior high teen nude
vomos rafa will miss wimbledon with a wrist injury ..
i am trying to cope. why should this affect me so much? perhaps being too engaged with the news is a trigger.
happy ramadan month
science of stupid on nat geo
 my sentiments exactly! this is not just a war against minorities, this a war over control and how we should think
driving down to the moniaive comic festival.
  fahers day ! aameer baap !!
these stills that vic are sending me are incredible and nothing is edited yet
  sex stories women's nudes
  father's day to the single mother's cause these" bitch ass niggaz" can't even get a job or paid bt wana date
you make me   :)
ok.  this logres book is getting interesting.   .
because i'm  .  it's hour! from 4pm-6pm today, get 1/2 off cocktails, wine, and drafts. see our me
could be buying a new car today
packing for move back east is nearly done. wife/kids have 24 hrs 'til plane takes 'em away from l.a. for good. i'll join 'em in a week.
this is completely random but i can't believe that our country's two presidential nominees are a racist bigot and a hypocritical witch  !
i havent ate no fast food/ home cooked food in 3 days nothing but junkfood
i think i would just skip rio this time around...
donald trump seeks to change the news cycle from his latest racist remarks to banning a newspaper from covering his greatness
onyx liverpool tickets on sale monday
we're delighted you're making the trip
  because my bff jehna just broke up with me just so she can be with her "boyfriend" and they did not kiss/date
what is terribly wrong with this picture?
i remember when my phone battery lasted 48 hours. now it's literally dead in like 3 hours.
happy easter everyone!
hard to think how  is still very much prevalent in so many societies. if you're not white, rest assured disc
left wingers are literally either lying to themselves or willfully ignorant. they're inundated with such degeneracy and have no idea
embrace the moment. congratz to all.
when you have no other option but to give up that thing.
bihday coming up so excited  ! yeah
  news coming in of a youth getting drowned near siliguri.  as per sources a teenager who had gone for...
about to buy kylie jenner lip kit
whether a woman is running for president or raped after a college pay -- the only thing that really matters in what she was wearing.  .
big day tomorrow
  after sex ana beatriz barros nude video
 a deeper look
it's brooklyn's last v day of school.
all boys don't become men.
have a   friday!
  father's day to all the dads involved with york schoolboys
might film my first ever youtube video tommorow \^^/
scientists are against ! but only if the child is less than 18 months old...
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
hot bath  tv on my back up phone  a cold drink
i'll be there today lol
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
made an awesome pork in oven... and my daughter eats everything but the pork.
  naked girls official website fuckwomenoffice
  600 days purfles
um why a girl and not a boy? or maybe just gender neutral teenager.
sex videos of chinese  against women in the workplace
oomf be ready to fuck the next bitch after a break up
heyy, i saw that u are a health lover, so i encourage u to test my new app, it's called mytraining on app store
millions of people will go to bed tonight and wake up with a stiff neck, headache or numbness in their hands.
are you a little   ?
well it works on the winter blues  via
alapoet: if  pisses you off like it pisses me off, here's something you oughta know... this guy's a racist
now playing  :  lubomyr melnyk - " nightrail from the sun" on     music song
 , commercial, cow, chipotle
after the orlando shooting, this photo is not as funny- :-/
i don't know what the point in twitter is i'm just talking to myself because no one even likes or retweets my tweets
this looks like a really wonderful option, especially to use with students who need accommodations.
you can't help the damsel if she loves her misery.
i'm going to hell for this
an old acquaintance found murdered back home. the attack in orlando. the mass murder in roswell. not even mentioning anywhere else.
no kinder eggs? are people actually still officially allowed to think for themselves? or is that banned next...
anyway, that's what i was chillin here thinking while i grubbed some agua chile and had a foot massage from the love of my life.
it's euro eve
preach pres preach
happy b day
  hardcore anthems naked babe in sweatpants
k so someone who works for the retailer i work at actually was in the orlando shooting and it haunts me because she's pa of the team
 , crying, natalie poman, barber, v for vendetta, hair cut, shaved head
i keep blocking news such as the toddler killed by an alligator or the woman who jumped from a bridge into the river holding her 6yo..
powerful  father's day!
 ...gosh that just made me cry..
ugh, i can't wait to get home! making steaks! they've been marinating all night and will be all day tell i get home tonight!
i wanna watch conjuring and me before you, but no one wants to come with me.
just realised its fathers day omg   fathers day to all dads out ther
.god speed gordie. rip
the fact that we are even having the conversation about hillary as president is very troubling. where have we gone as a nation?
bob ross is a freaking genius. prussian blue is my favorite color. thank you netflix!   trees
coke headz really nead to stay out of my circle! its crazy! seem like everyone is doing that b.s these days!  ...
where to sta...
sta training week in the morning. can't wait for the opening of our buffalo wild wings!!!
lol i get to be a business woman tomorrow and the day after that and after that and after that
the squad summer camp end of week trip is all booked.
 office woman porn blue tube
  anal sex gallery humon n sex
instead of a united front against the gop nominee who is a racist, tyrannical  liar and sociopath i've been arguing with other dems.
thank you card from viola   makes our morning when we get these happy customers who love their hair!    ...
good night.   =)
sad to say that the warriors legendary season is completely tarnished lol 73 don't mean shit without a ring
decided on the next lens i want, and it's basically the same cost as a mogage payment on a really nice house
good morning guize have a nice day...   tuesday morning.
  owner &amp; thairapist:
room ain't been clean since i came home from college
40 points bozo
policeman cheats on wife. mistress kills wife. mistress gets life in prison. husband goes on merry way with no consequences. beyond  !
drinkin my coffee &amp; listening to a story bout how hilary clinton defended &amp; set free a brutal child rapist. knowing he was guilty.
way to go, pizza
holy shit i miss my girl so damn much and its been like 3 days since ive seen her what the fuck
funny how you read someone's tweets and you feel like you've known this person all your life...
them heels are devinely sexy, love the metal heel :-d
24hrs passed &amp; i'm still too angry about this  to coherently talk about it.
i'd eat all of him
yall animals are cool, but the lack of sympathy for a baby child who was attacked by a gator while walking along a disney reso beach
ok but like imagine tristan as batman
we hope you've had a   euro 2016 day! that's it from us till monday, for 24/7 breakdown &amp; services help pls call 0345 872 8630
my one year membership at noh cypress finally ended and i joined planet fitness two months ago and haven't been.
even if 1% of delhis population have been sensitive enough, there would have been no need to tweet this.
exciting evening. award ceremony where i will be accompanied by mr. p &amp; we are staying at the blythswood square hotel as a treat!
shit guys  is lie
waiting for first media comment to downplay impoance of orlando shooting because, hey, lgbt poc so obvs not impoant.
it sux some people are disappointing even before you meet them..most people are just full of themselves/shit...
booked my hair appointment
  hardcore sets nude video sample
so sad ones
deah of data in the nigerian health system.
nervous and excited!  !
i'm a lazy christian cause i don't think kids should be taken for thought crime and twitter posts, lmao.
oh and i lost the earrings i'm wearing in the last post.
black fucking rapping sexy women   bihday nude
honestly women is there something wrong with you ...???? you really are jumping up to defend the guns already
on the nose: perfumer sparks  furore
its pretty depressing that am graduating in 3months n i dont look forward to going back to nigeria cos am scared i may not get a job.
life is a series of decisions and choices and one hell of a great ride.
new job day!
it won't david. the business world suppos narcissists and abusers are attractive to many on a cry wick level
see as cavs just waste my fuel.
just got 2 videos recorded today   :d
otherwise i'll get my (way) less expensive one first
so only 200 families were "temporarily" moved to diepsloot in 1995.now diepsloot has 800000 shacks &amp; still no proper houses?
transsexy naked  boob
y'all really don't be having nothing else to do
   irda gives nod to lic to invest in psbs
you too donald
i've been " on my way home " for like a hour lol
mana andharilo unna common qualification ! manaki mana father's ante ishtam   father's day
wildlife weekend
once they stop talking to you, they sta talking about you
can't we show some decency about jo cox's death? i think the pm has answered and it's a resounding no.
we all deserve to be happy.
well i'll be!
thanks to dom, either my body fat is slowly decreasing or my muscles are finally deciding to come out due to his workouts
google censoring free speech! gateway pundit, pamela geller, who else has been censored and who's next?
he loves yoi so much
  rozay have a blessing month
my silence doesnt mean that i quit it simply means th   is doesn't mean forever cause there sad story when the happy is ending
 naked fat girls russian sexy girls dating
so we now want it dead? hmm humans touch animals, but woe dare an animal touch us.
 very true! we have come so far and still such a long way to go! ...
will be sadly missed x
  after sex adult swimsuit
?i enjoy seeing the movement of animals?
a had a dream that a winched harry styles last night hahahaha fuck sake a couldnt even winch perez hilton if a wanted nvm him
that's it i will finally sta to plan my trip to europe.
kad raya still relevant regardless the advanced technology kan. i tried to find the musical one takda dan tak banyak pilihan
darn imessage for android isn't going to happen
i'd give anything for his touch or hear him say "don't worry i love you everythings okay"
it's not just our country but what kind of world when you can't go to a club or even a meet and greet for a singer and feel safe
  bihday balayya..  you r legend..
bought this mysterious beauty to read to my class. going to get them to vote on which story i read first.
rain, cereal, coffee, naps &amp; daniel are what my sunday consisted of
thought about exams, now i'm feeling
somebody tell me that children aren't happiness... i can't recall when i was smiling &amp; laughing so much &amp; feeling this   b4 in my life
perfect = spending late friday afternoon en famille w my wonderful husband and little boy. a little crazy, to be sure, but perfect.
good luck tomorrow
today is anna frank's bihday - she woult have been 85 .imangine a world without hate we do   bihday anna
what?! no!! loki has been seduced by a fucking succubus! the damn succubus of all succubus!_
mother daughter blowjob  white girl has sex with black guy
i am so determined to find halo top creamery ice cream in vegas and none of the places on their store locator has it
throw back sunday
&amp; u can't deny that ppl's attitudes change on how u look &amp; what u wear or whom you're with !  thats why ppl change!  to get attention
kind of happy, listening  to my own song.
i shouldn't be happy.  uploaded another poem on wattpad! check it out! link's in my bio.
just one more shift left, unit i have two weeks off.
countdown to paris... 2 days...
a take no prisoners attitude is okay when it comes to murderers. all people and organizations should be accountable if a murder occurs
bobby's in father and i? coooool.
so beyonce' just gonna go against the grain and not release her album on spotify but drake did...
will never stop suppoing you. love you lots&amp;lots
oooh so sad rip uriah asante, football will 4ver miss you,my condolence to the family and da big oak tree.
i think it's funny it takes death to unify people...
i'm looking forward to speaking and connecting with the strayer university students tonight in phoenix, az.
delicious desse  friday
just like that.....  father's day.
the more you listen to the news there is no answers just sadness for such a reckless act    world
have a great day dad   father's day
my ass is bigger than any girls
their lives were taken because they were gay!
  but not for dlc  :|
i'm feeling like i lost my ability to raise hell on twitter.
thought you was happy, but you turned me out.
a mother can take care of ten children but sometimes ten children can't take care of mother.
 , crying, natalie poman, barber, v for vendetta, hair cut, shaved head via giphy
  fathers day :)
you can pretend you're not fighting for the non-living while attacking people's constitutional rights.
its hottub day!
  to see aunt katie
tomorrow! can't believe i will get my first tattoo
can't wait to dust off our dancing shoes, caroline! :)
family feud? i thrive on it, bitches.
we have 13 new episodes coming august 3rd on syfy. simply paing ways after that. the future is still bright.
i honestly wouldn't rather be anywhere else than ridin down the road, with a beautiful sunset comin, listenin to some luke with pals
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
good luck! :)
kid free night tonight!
hate when u make bff's on a night out but then forget to ask their names and u never see them again
so i think i got it figured out moving and trying something new couple more weeks then see how it goes like it were staying
i may have to unfollow these accounts that post rpers complaints.
i guess this was the night stephen king was in town and i wasn't there to see him. i probably shouldn't think about that too much.
what a beautiful soul! put a smile on her face and send a card!
glad it worked well for you!!! please let me know what you use and if i can help!
we all need to switch to the competition tumbler or vimeo. fuck google
what's happened to orlando??? it was a vacation destination! now it's a death sentence for lives &amp; college careers.
 names for women best nude blonde teenagers
the growth indicates people r actually liking the movie :)
the best pa about staying up late is getting
i actually had a good day at work for the first time in a long time!
  my ex-wife is angry that i'm happy with my new paner: i am really happy and treat him as my own. i c...
it's gonna be such a long 47days without bernice
contact college dean, find out about intern 2 create new site &amp; upload vids. free 4 reference/wk exper.
princess eugenie caught up in 'racism' row over white actors playing chinese pas
coffee on tap today....it's going to be a looong day
  monday blessings and peace
happy feet! happy girl! reviewing materials for calls while sitting in my sunbeam
we're having the best day ever!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
my baby will be here in 6 hours
  father's day..!  shout out to all fathers around the world..! we appreciate your love and
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
maddy is gr9 but she won't take music suggestions from me
2016. the year hooliganism returned to our football stadiums.
i beat his ass now we laying together ...
you make me miss my sho hair yo
the only place i belong is...   i'm staying right here.
hope im up to the challenge!
bitches is wild yo! no self control, no nun of at....
bri doesn't even bother to text me anymore   tweet
i didnt get one booty pic for my bdaay brah
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
won on the water but bullied by the event organiser
  11thmonthsary alden and maine at s adn"
today is my last teaching day at nohampton academy. wow! now off to daventry to be a hod!
so gritty    happy joy joy [v live] exo_monster_music video
mere words don't express the sadness in my hea for the loss of the 2 year-old. may god comfo the heas of all in this loss.
i've been listening to selena and kumbia kings all the way today.
loving my life! can't wait to keep living it with my best friend!   :)
as an american citizen should i be more afraid of rapists or gun nuts?
lucas delighted after his subway!
wish you a very happy sunday   sunday  holidays weekend
i will be so happy when i get my penny board
here's what ignorance &amp;  looks like. it ain't all swastikas &amp; burning crosses...
do i have that much of an impact on your life that you go to the extreme of blocking me ! how about don't add me in the first place
so much harder when it is someone so young. every time i saw her she was so full of life and had a bright future
coroner: ex-nfl rb phillips' death was suicide
tomorrow. tomorrow. tomorrow!!
did the tables turn.. ubt isn't letting je see babs.
visa is approved  zomg
so easy to make woman  , but only sma men understand that.
true,people don't give thanks that they are lucky to see today..they think its a must.
walking into school without jayln for the first time since last year and  .
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
sigh. i just wish people would read more.
iaint never trip that's why i'm where i'm at
bank account sitting pretty
yeah it lions good on you...i don't remember what you look like with hair lol
anime website is down for maintenance
  hardcore techno remix tight shaved pussy
looking great tiffany x
san francisco for the next 2 weeks
i don't know...maybe those two things go hand in hand....
lebron 6'8" and no post game!!!
to say i am in complete shock would be an understatement. people don't know me as well as they think they do.
make everyday count  towards a healthy life  * have you had your shake today
we're also not upset we lost because we won by any measure other than a , useless appendix of government tha
g'morning it's   friday! make it an awesome day!
i live in nyc and don't see a lot of ove racism. i was disappointed to see how much there is on twitter.  must never be tolerated!
the only way for you to stay relevant is to open your mouth, and tell other peoples business .
only 10 countries in the entire world are not currently at war
 video men and women in bed without clothes candid videos sexting
national news-channel playing an old youtube video of a girl taking heroin (drugs) through injection in ludhiana. is this journalism?
nra continues to do so much damage out of greed for power &amp; money. nra are the true terrorists. all homegrown.
burger. beer. football.
feel sorry for all the lads gone over to france for a good drink and to enjoy the games with all the "football hooligans" causing chaos
he was investigated for terrorist ties twice before. he was known to fbi and police as a terror suspect.
all these damn mix kids only cuz the parents want they kids to have good hair
using multiple acc's &amp; pretending as if we can't get u   you're not sma enough to fool people coz illiteracy
now you see me 2
 video men and women in bed without clothes nude mother son sex
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
news saying cities are in high ale. i think it's time that we stand, as a country, in high ale. this happens to often to not be
well; there ends another week and great teamwork. soc refresh, board update and mentoring again.  weekend work: fraud investigation
the uk government's new 'anti-semitism' definition conflates racism with valid criticism of israel - open
ayeeee ok! thanks booski!
sad songs can actually cheer you up
attack her chinguas~ &lt;33
is alfredo's woh the 20 dollars woh of food i had to buy just for them to deliver it to me..?   life
you will all be compensated, as promised.
cannot wait for this rain!
 em so excited en i just can't hide it
i have never been apa of a face swap.
first tweet lol
fair &amp; lovely effect...
i usually post large photo appreciation posts on social media for it but im glad i stood back today and remembered how blessed i am.
it's best to make choices that will help you keep a smile on your face. whatever genuinely makes you  , that's what you should focus on
if only i had someone to wish father's day
what's going on with the world?
  bihday naked man free porn kiss
  letbno man steal your joy
its been years and months. i love you!    monthsary &lt;3
fo woh pastors say officer's acts in viral video arrests were racist
when your homeboy got nothing but new level trolling for you
may his soul continue to rest in the bosom of our lord
one time cole nicholls and simon henderson said i dress like i have daddy issues   fathers day
can i tell some thing in our hea............you a beautiful thing in the world
if the gorgeous day isn't resonating on the inside for you, give us a call.  there is such a thing as summeime blues!  613-238-3311
being   wont give you longer life, study says
in queue with basket of food shopping, 50's guy says "give us a smile". think my response was a first by the look on his face.
my friend just gave me this!!!
heading to mass today with my boss to head to the trade show ...
you been fell off honestly!!! too busy hating on other producers &amp; how your selfies look on social media and done lost da sauce!! smh
that's crazy how you give 12 yrs of your life to school.. and just bcus you don't have enough of this n that ..u can have a diploma
about to crawl into bed with my love and my new best friend and watch a movie until we all pass out.
thank you god
all thnx 2 almighty god 4 granting me d grace 2 see anoda yr added 2 me in peace, joy and happiness.   +1 to me
it could have been us!  liat channel orlando mass shooting di snapchat really break my hea     [pic]
my dad is usually loaded up w snacks and today he is not and i am truly
my dad the diver.   fathers day.
so true!! pll b angry &amp; hatful just becuz they want 2
loosing punjab bjp and badal family is very upset - now rss to keep of country interest in mind to avoid bjp and sad
i love roses special the red one's
another  comment on social media!! idiot!!!
aladdin on the tv today on my bihday then aladdin in the theatre on thursday for my bihday
how do some of y'all promote something you can't even find a ride to
every time i'm back in georgia, i never have enough time to link with everybody..   face
make mans jus calm down and kp looking at those mumus....
wherever you are, whenever you maybe you know that i still love you forever.....  mode
lol since u were complaining    father's day !!
 girls in the world jgirl sex
really annoys me when people put their hand on their chest for the national anthem. it's not the pledge of allegiance, come on america
  slapping porn irish girls pussy pics
i guess the judges did not pick flourish cause they have a voice like that on their team already!!
a small, very small, pa in a movie being filmed locally!!!
well,these sewer rats don't take a cent from me,....i don't use to watch "football",......but now,i hate it!
clap along if you feel like a room without a roof  because i'm happy!
my whole life..
if only all the money spent trying to convince us someone is racist, was instead used to help bring people together. trump in the dumps
my first time doing studio work and commuting to manhattan at 9 am depressing. line too long at dig inn &amp; sweetgreen 4 lunch
such a long day...3 matches and 2 victories! this one from the single semis where i beat esperanza 60,76
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
explain your actions. netanyahu you  can not claim discrimination when u do it yourself to others.
i'm not so orlando...
rumbo al work
just waiting for john mccain to announce he is suspending his campaign and headed to orlando to solve the domestic terrorist crisis.
not even a single shahzadian wished me!
write your blog posts in a google doc before wordpress.
hot naked mexican girls photos   girls naked
after two weeks of suffering,i'm back
where are all the single hot dads at?   father's day
i swear it feels like these strap-on &amp; dildos are gonna replace us men soon the way you women have forgotten we exist     bye bye mankind
i try to take breaks from twitter/news to detox from violent patriarchal misogyny- &amp; ppl who think it is up for debate- &amp;then this?!
smiles are contagious. smile at someone and see if they reciprocate.
 tzuyuupdates:  myohmyouisonim: happy bihday to our tall-maknae  may the force be with you-da
kinda enjoy cleaning
yeah man fuck feminism
i thought we had it together but well
let my crazy out way too soon
airfare deals: southwest airlines $49 &amp; up -- southwest's biggest sale of 2016 (one way)   travels
wow , ranveer is getting the award ?
tonight left me inspired to sta writing music again.
when you order a margarita and it's pink, drink it before anyone see you drinking it.
i agree with bernice the items are precious possessions and should not be sold only handed down to next gen.
i'm assuming it's football not rugby
fuck shit is this!!!!
love him more than anything
got to say i am rather excited we only have 4 more work get ups till morocco! two weeks of sun swimming alcohol and food
how am i going to give lacrosse lessons to this kid when i can't even play lax myself ://
such a user!
you can't take your phone like wtf no selfie with lauren
they don't even understand when they are being mocked for their ridiculous conspiracy theories.
this orlando shooting is fishy to me. since when do police raid a place in 3 hours? 50 people seems like a lot dead, from one shooter.
another great night
tired to film today, then the dark cloud of doom came, now i have no light!
i've lit the fire. more to cheer myself up than because it's cold
just how i like it. *puts shades on*
"there are thousands* here!"  *empty seats
density experiment. we made it!
the weather is crying tonight
is that 49 or 50 less in the world
i thought lesbians were suppose to be good at oral.
so this is what brazil felt like in the world cup.
when you get pussy before you go to work
the magic's in the music.
for the 1st time since 2006, im not playing in the omaha metro summer league which stas tonight. my body/health issues wont allow it.
black men and black women with stockholm syndrome
omg  so sad
the amount of bullshit posted on the internet by complete nut jobs is insane. i scratched the surface on their ridiculousness today.
trump: if elected, i'll ban immigration from areas with terrorism ties....  i guess only people from antaica will be permitted.
sara is almost home after a week apa and i couldn't be happier right now!!!!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
  prayers for the loved ones.
i'm feeling reclaimed
isis bombing: several killed by suicide car bomb in holy iraqi city of karbala.
how utterly pathetic. wish ali was around to beat this person senseless.
i be making people so angry wit me &amp; ion even bee doing none mane  theyy be so mad fa no reason.
"today is here" -everyone going to blast
now playing  :   - " velours poussire" on     music song
funny...i'm not the least bit  ! about it.
ah w'd rather be happy than  , cuss it all t' tarnation. varejao
  hardcore vinyls jaime pressly nude pics
literally had to delete and reinstall all my apps  but everything is all updated!
  sex blonde japanese sexy girl video
 that's why
just want to wake up in alex's arms
3 days left
here i am looking at my calendar thinking he was coming back in 6 days. then i looked it's 4 days
i hope my future goes the way i hope it does then i'll be on my own
last night in my old room, can't wait to move into my first flat tomorrow
nothing more than sat on a train on the way home after a long week!
happy bihday andisa
it's new car day!!!!  !
hey peeps !! how are you doing ?!
this could be such a beautiful world if we took better care of it...
50 dead in florida nightclub shooting, worst in us history
morning birdies
he's a scumbag arab lowlife that is problem selling family photos to the highest bidder/repoers
  couple having sex amateur sex scandal
good afternoon sweety!  send me letter
how many people died via radical islamic terrorists under obama's watch?  he is redirecting the blame to trump
in the works:  a new hymn for satb and piano, words by james montgomery, para. of psalm 72!
indian food in my belly and sf coconut coffee in my hand
today my father is  not with me really missed but i pray allah protect all these father's who's lived   father dat
hard to reconcile simon's musical genius and his politics .
i'm at the hairdresser's... new colours in.
feels nice to be back on tweeter
yeayyyy..dia follow back...aumm aumm..
went out to some club tonight out here in the bay. safe to say, fuck i miss old town thotsdale. i really do.
damn we can't have friends that are still in highschool ?
that streetcar was a bust.
"pulse nightclub" in orlando under siege! yet another mass shooting with at least 1 suspect barricaded inside. ere we go again  .
thank you &amp; same to you
"goodmorning penny"   asf
seems that no one is talking about gorilla mom now that alligator dad is in the news
it's cuz you've forgotten your biggest fan.. no responding since so many days..
why? please explain to us why we're, "bad."
hello there my love!  i will be glad to see you here
beware  in marketing tainting messages
"i'm gay." -- something a 'hacker' would post into someone's account -- so, does being gay equate to humiliation/embarrassment pa rin?
  four tet isn't happy with soundcloud: after reaching one million followers on soundcloud, four tet sai...
girls withholding their children from the father , merely because he no longer wants to have a romantic relationship with you .
  ramadhan /\gresive lover's  [pic]
the nba wants to push this to 7 games.  notice curry isn't taking shots.  too much money involved anymore its not about the spo.
nude teen play  for women in spo
have you ever gotten left out of your own date bc same   :(
  7 stories that made us happy this week: 7 stories that made us happy this week. 0shares. reprint. subs...
this looks like molly's old boyfriend, gunner!
good morning i woke up this am w/ a bellamy brothers follow all these gifts from snapchat of g and b
right now, everything seems to be falling to its rightful place
i graduated university and still managed to somehow use the guys bathroom.
omg i loosed my homework
swimming time!!!  bihdaymomy
poetry for comfo from grief  share your memorial ofa loved one
i swear the nicest people get screwed over by others
smile and be
my mom gave my trampoline away without even asking me
10 things that made me happy this week  10 things that made me happy this week
i just got some great news. today is a great day. hope who ever is reading this is has a good one
"the blacks"? "the blacks"? "blacks"? *facepalm* *smh*
happy wife, happy life
today's garden love
wife crashes her own funeral, horrifying her husband who had ordered her killed; community turns against her
omg so its national best friend day or whateva and my bestfriends are miles away from me ok wow i'm
europe proves that "diversity &amp; multiculturalism" bring violence, rape &amp; ruin to our white, western countries.
  father's day thalaivaa vijay bdayspl week
my father is my hero   father's day!.
i spit water on my dog now he's ignoring me
  sex blonde free online white girlvideo porn black step dad
exciting week next week. go live decision is a green for monday with a very impoant client.
my mom just told me i'm to make a build a bear
  father's day to all the daddy's in the world....love u all.....
yo swift watched try and make me uncomfutable
they ride every wave bro..
that is why  is systemic, rather than just humanity being human. it is power and reinforced each minute!
if you can put this up here,  you can as well mention the name of the person
yea that's what racists usually say
o m a y g a d
being a good dad stas with being a good husband. being a good husband stas with the fear of the lord. god bless us!   father's day.
well back at third shift again, but mr and my girl are hitting it up tomorrow!!!
today is a very very special day
definitely needs that vacation soon..
ben simmons gonna get drafted by the 76ers lmao
you all think you're his number one   :(
i've heard in presidential debates about isis, vladimir putin, and the lgbt rights, but none will address the injustices towards blacks
food makes me ridiculously happy. i'm having pink lemonade, a hot dog, &amp; a soft pretzel &amp; i'm on cloud 9. it's the little things.
countdown for the company mv appearing soon !!
woman in cou on racism charge
 danky the slob everybody (green shi) has the audacity to say my wife looks like a bulldog. look at this kid...
god can turn around any situation.  sunday
cooking lesson on-going... then, i want driving lesson...  who wants to train me?  two-wheel driving muna tapos 3, then 4...
i want hug him
  exercise weight loss
absolutely disgraceful! this makes me so fucking angry, they are scum and they make me feel ashamed to be english :(
 , 30 rock, tracy jordan
it's sad when you make claim you have no legitimate proofs for.
for me its hard to keep my mind off this slaughter in fl. i try a lot but it always comes back in my head..its like nothin else matters
jo cox has died as a result of injuries. may her soul rest in peace.
can't wait to graduate from my taxidermy degree!
wtf is wrong with florida?!?
i wonder why we bothered moving bk to essex?! no1 eva comes to see us, no1 eva asks me to go out at least in kent i did my own thing!
  hardcore compilation uk hot teen
mazara seems like a good guy. too bad he's on the rangers. another year on this team and he will be a thug. that's what happens to you.
oh damn.. his childhood was so fucked up. he don't know how to be positive reinforcement for his own children
last day of summer classes!!
one of the sad moment is when when i couldn't concentrate in my aayat had to close it
21 in 29 days cannot wait
its amazing dat d same set of pple who wanted gej's head while he was president hv been giving different offices, yet dey can't perform
new video shows how  this guy  and how he staed to abuse and humiliated an muslim guy
simply the best !!!
huge black dicks porn   pussy
finally got new pandora charms for my bracelet
ooooh snap!! dey gettin yall out there too? dayum!!!
for real??? how legit is this??   sana di hopia
  father's day to all over the world
  couple having sex bisexual webcam movies
  fathers day. may you spend the day with the most impoant people in your lives, your family. and, may there be lots of barbecue.
i want an enchilada and i can't get one tonight and i go to camp tomorrow so it will be at least 5 days until i get one.
enough watching golf for today. tomorrow will be fun. and   fathers day to all my daddy friends. enjoy your day.
see the difference??
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i didn't make it to this list
  bihday respected sir
it's gotten to the point where spos is more impoant that humans in america.
and i  can't see you my friend bc i'm so sick ..
a week ago today i lost my cat and i found out at this very time 7 days ago. i still have her things.
  father's day to all the proud fathers in the world! long life and prosperity.
dont ask sad people how to be  .
i cannot wait to visit pittsburgh
  hillary clinton shifts and says she is "happy" to use the term "radical islam": washington (cbs news) ...
from our pastor. join us tomorrow at libey city church of christ. morning worship 10am, afternoon worship 5pm.
it's friday tmrw and there's no new episode of greys to watch.
i pray the lord either saves the westboro baptist church with the true gospel, or crushes them for the sake of the true gospel.
decided to get jeff and i tickets for the new tules movie tonight.
an positive quote to have a nice thursday: life is like a mirror if you smile at it it smiles back :)
seriously what is going on with 2016?
oh my god  poor baby
everything i've seen about this game so far makes me feel like they're doing things right. can't wait
i wanna go shootin w.my bro in ut, when i go back next mth.
links from twitter used to be free
ready to sta my new job!   iew i dont use hashtags wtf
hobi's face looks like 'omg, this is a disgusting experience'
now playing  :  alexandre desplat - " river waltz (piano solo)" on     music song
tomorrow is my bihday   bihday shaterirunnels
orlando, fl has taken so many l's this week
awww yes i love it
hard-core gamer goes mental playing bo3
ak420 friendly media (550 cr adveising) doing all effos to suppo diy game of ak420.  shame paki gangsters.
omg. the 4 letter spos network keeps track on how many baskets stephen curry makes in warm ups!
relaxing because my weekend is about to get busy!
when you're hungry af &amp; tired af at the same time so you have no ambition to go get food
what you gonna do?
now playing  :  fariborz lachini - " soghat (solo piano)" on     music song
pens fans are
when sisters love their friends more than their own siblings.
boasty tuesday last night....
president mahama, sadly, lost his dear mum last night. my condolences to him and the bereaved family.
brookelle bones longporn   hardcore compilation
look at what's landed on my desk this morning
like msian opposition and their claim that bangladeshis voted for bn. no evidence yet people believe it anyway
google has bn racist for ages...d world is just catching on...
amen   but true  man is the worst animal on eah
sometimes i feel that i have given too much rights to others to take decision about my work that's why the are not responding to me...
happiness is living in the moment...
the title of my autobiography.
we have no more privacy, no more free choice! yet everyone is satisfied with this way of life
it's almost impossible to find an lgbt friendly university in texas with a good music program...
lauren deserves the best. she's such an angel and she always does her best to make others happy. some people don't understand that...
the finals and new gambino in my life all after an amazing weekend
everything is looking up
finally got some more headphones &amp;&amp; it feels like i got a whole new phone
we're gonna watch conjuring 2 today w/barkada!
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
day 2: shawn has a little sis! aaliyah! ( seriously, i wish i was his sis...  ;( )
  hardcore top 100 best ever nude descending the staircase no 2
tomorrow i might have a first date with my future ex husband &amp; large divorce settlement...just playin  im
"she made broken look beautiful, and strong look invincible" - -  ariana dancu
tragically we have yet another cat who is upside down. researchers are still unsure how this can be resolved.
i would like to say happy father's day to my heavenly father ....   father's day to all of us dads real dads...
but not reading my dms!2!2!2!2!2!2!2
just now watching season two of daredevil
niggas know they took us from our homeland and denounced our ways as savagery..n we still some jesus praising,  name brand dependent ppl
i forgot what day it is. i'm at chick fil a
my first steps in the sahaja yoga ^_^ &lt;3 ^_^ &lt;3 i am so happy and amazed !!!!! i love meditation (sun)
can't wait to sta boxing
i need to wait for my hair to grow longer before going black..  omgggg..  i can't wait...
the alt-right movement is like:  mustfall
  father day
loving the about page! put some viva zing into your life.
resiliency for life: why are you  ?
ict exam today
whenever am late, traffic will be heavy. vehicles always coming from opp side just as i am about to do an oveake many times..
mr wings has a 6 page spread in a magazine that has just come out and is all sad because he isn't the coverboy lol
woke up this morning 2 the horrific news fr orlando .i don't give a fuck if u r straight or gay or goblins with green hair no 1  this
i love shift dresses. so much. but that's the one dress you can't pull off with an hourglass figure. hips &amp; shift dresses don't mix.
you disgust me
the house that for months had a bernie sign in the yard is now sans sign but the car has a hillary sticker. subtle concession?
my sleep has been so good recently:) im
i couldn't agree more!
love being gagged!
they have to ... everyone's carrying it - they just doing something different
no matter your 'opinion' , hate has no place in this world.  it is time to teach our children to respect.
  for tomorrow i'm cutting my hair
when all ur besties are spending the day &amp; night in newcastle and ur off to work
sold out 5 weeks before the event!!
he isnt attracted to asian women. sends me a pic of a korean woman and says they all look the same passing it off a
when you see a fine ass guy but find out he doesn't eat the box and you gotta throw out his potential sheet lmao
  too - can't wait, first ever experience of watching polo.
next rotation: operating room
it's really happy to be in a relationship again. finally in a much better one, than the first was. :)
darling if you wish me on poal my name there is "sexy404"   ==&gt;
the new spider-man game looks really nice... but i know it's going to play like every other spider-man game ever made. ever.
  farm fairy crafts:
 sex top 10 porn video
  world ocean day
should check out the cityplace fb group. lots of repoed potential bike thieves on it that residents come across.
horny australian women   pussy
i can't believe how much i used to care what people thought of me now i'm just like "lol fuck u, fuck you and  wtf fuck you too, bye"
oh, no! lois duncan died. i met her a few times. she was fascinating, and nice. loved her work.
cow many days before touga boulevard plays genk on stage???
via: ckkosho:  koshobar:   clients - makes us !  back tonight again! doors open 8pm! ckkosho
children often smile at me... it's like they know i need it. or they just think i look funny. either way,
  days porn movie filme pornor
can't imagine the horror those parents went thru watching their toddler eaten alive by alligator.
oh dear!sorry for your loss ivan.may her soul rip
in the past year or two, i can't recall a more depressing day for news-watching, opinion-reading and political speech--on all venues.
when u find out that a friendship means more to u then it did to the other person
 , cool, syfy, faceoff, really cool, this is really cool via giphy
congratulations deepu di!!! we need a pachay now miss engineer
happy anniv +3 bts   bts day
cops giving tickets when they didn't even see you do anything. glad peoples lives have to be so shitty that they have to call us in lol
about to take a shower in my new shower !!
niggas cheat on pretty girls to go be with a nigga looking bum ass bitch
what happened in orlando last night...i'm lost for words!  my thoughts are w/ the families of the ones lost.
 , exciting, hell yes
some girls make finstas to post slutty pics they can't post on ig
  days porn movie srilankanboyssex
i hope this is going to be a good trip for me. i need a different atmosphere!!
this week new me new hair new new body new mind new everything ....
lizzie mcguire is on
yo read this sick   poem i wrote about 2 yr anniversaries or whatever
9 months later.. i am back to my pre pregnancy weight and a pound less!
  um satellite camp: harbaugh happy to be in nj, a new battleground: paramus, n.j.  when jim harbaugh s...
just booked a 3 week trip to america in august; colorado, nebraska, wyoming, south dakota and alabama planned so far
rip, big boss, s. keshi.
and the press would have you believe bike racing is too dangerous? thoughts go out to the victims in orlando
goodbye 2016.... i definitely hope we leave behind
i have to admit failure. my computer problems blocked me from editing today. i will explain in the next episode i shoot, i promise.
beware of the "snowball effect" black men. they're not our women
hold on whatever keeps you
yes...obviously it's raining...but some people tend to panic on the streets causing accidents while rushhour
18 and still a spoiled rotten child lmfao
boss makes a dollar, i make a dime, that's why i poop on company time.   popping
zionism is  .. ultra-ohodox jewish children's worksheet says 'non-jews' are evil
malia shake that ass! you so fine!.....pass the blunt
  couple having sex sexy teens working out
3 more days to go!!!!!
damn orlando not having a good week..
so sad. literally if anyone wants to buy me a plane ticket to nyc before this happen i'd highly appreciate it!
america isn't racist. their are a plethora of reasons for someone not to like obama. you're ignorant in many fashio
holy shit. how do you even run a national presidential campaign with 70 people?
staying off here today. can't keep reading the same tweets that are send after every tragedy. we need change, in a very bad way.
watched the episode with a shooter and there has been so many shooting this month...
breaking: people are still the worst.
every time i'm baby free i can't help but fall asleep and catch up on my snoozes smh smh smh
the hype is real with e3 just around the corner. what surprises are in store this year?
so i guess colombia will go against peru !!
new cut tomorrow
i'm convinced that one more round of thoughts and prayers from our congressional leaders will fix the problem this time.
  hardcore forums prejudice against a paicular gender or sex
so national media chooses to broadcast the funerals of ali, and michael jackson but the real heroes (our military) get no coverage
a lot of pakistani twitter folk make out like they are totally liberal &amp; open minded... and having any so of deen imaan is "uncool".
ode to depression | infusing reality with hope
after an hour of walking and looking for something i could buy, i just ended up with these.
feeling blessed parin :)
my dad thinks i'm "crazy" lol but he's crazy too    father's day
  lost or lose
america has become a reactive society! when pressured we do whatever  .. stand up and be your own person and not be pressured
a little more adjustment &amp; finish the painting all over it be done.  got a vision, create it  xx
  hardcore vinyls index of bisexual
  after sex watch best porn movies
in spring as snow melts i am disgusted by litter in ceain areas; who are these people that litter all winter?
  father's day! &lt;3 cheryl  (lol by dedicated to cats, picture via cheezburger)
listening to classics like bill withers serves as a good reminder of how much we broke instruments, voices and killed all dynamic range
school days.  .
no cock out though.
i have some good news: i have a job interview this thursday. i'm very excited because it means i'll sta my internship next year.
good news i'm getting a car
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
some great feedback received today "thank you 5 stars, i'm very pleased with my backyard 'unrecognizable' would recommend to anyone
sad songs can actually cheer you up
and there will be no more teenager in 5sos
play volleyball later ;-)
thank you tina.
my voice is so small at times i get stern with my 3 year old and she'll look at me like.. are you serious or joking? lls
  bihday sexy girl laura love sex
  snails &amp; botnek: stream snails &amp; botnek - happy hour by snails from desktop or your mobile device.
have a great evening!
br? r u still here bothering and huing me? michael never hus me....but u always do...
off to mor 101.9 station
  my girl said she never had a nigga to wear lingerie for  smh she &amp; i'm younger then her!
you not who you really say you is
diabetes,  cancer, pneumonia,  kidney disease, hea disease ,,, what the heck is keeping this poor man alive?
 girl get fuck bondage leather girl
it is a potentially depressing situation, with about 6 weeks left to be positively reversed!
colors that remind me of palm springs (collection), lily pulitzer, palm beach
 jccppgh "here's a jccp shout out to dads out there who had to put up with us saying "are we there yet?."
|   congratulations!  | |    a major achievement to get onto their shelves &amp; uber clientele exposure  !
 chick gets fucked crazy european sex
as relevant as ever
golden state rallies around draymond green, the mad warrior  for it to even be considered is truly mind blowing
  to think that there is only 3 quaers left in the nba season
after 10 years of somehow failing to grow cerinthe, i have my first flower...and many, many more to follow
 white girl has sex with black guy girls nackt video free online
bullshit an essay still get an "a"
sad to see so many fake warrior fans. especially when you were a laker fan a month ago.
  happy 3rd bihday, noh west: celebrate with her cutest pics with mom kim kardashian!: the daughter ...
yes..mind you not only counting you have to find them... very few hospitals are digitized.. need to improve hmis
love this weather so much!
i guess this comes back to a resources thing &amp; possibly even a confidence thing? should be a cracking game.
aww yeah it's all good bing bong bing bong
i'm only   when it rains.
i muted her because if she comes back to say something sma and inconsiderate about me all because she can't learn to love herself...
i love edm so much :))) can't wait to get logic pro in the future
morning little guys,  see ya later
final grades are in.
2 sleeps annual holiday to spain
we are too!
 taeiriya: [fanedit] happy 24th bihday to my only moon taeil   taeil_th taeil_thailand sonofthemoonid
  hardcore anthems couple sleep naked
please don't forget to use the word ! that is what "binds" these men. we can never ignore or excuse that
so much   shit going on in the world... . 50 people. geeesh!
one of my worship experiences today on father's day included 13 references to the holy as "father" and none as "mother" or "parent"
when "brundlefly" is the only way you can think to describe your nose hair status to your wife.
   the complete list of indian olympic medal winners
smoking a black in an eno
i want some cereal &amp; ain't tryna get up
what is the world coming to? are massacres going to be a way of life?
steak night at work means a night off training, shandy, tv, chocolate and knitting.
 .... because i choose to be.
i feel horrible just watching my brother being sick
what an afternoon!
ugh i'm trying to enjoy my happy hour drink &amp; there is talks of politics in the bar can we guess what they are discussing ugh!!   hour
want to know how to live a   life? do more things that make you happy and less things that make you unhappy! it's that simple!
love island
you're surrounded by people who love you (even more than you deserve) and yet, why are so hateful?
 makes you ask yourself, who am i? then am i anybody? until ....god . oh thank you god!
listening to sad songs on a monday morning otw to work is sad
 They do not!
 They do to!
 I hope so.
 She okay?
 Let's go.
 Wow
 Okay -- you're gonna need to learn how to lie.
 No
 I'm kidding.  You know how sometimes you just become this "persona"?  And you don't know how to quit?
 Like my fear of wearing pastels?
 The "real you".
 What good stuff?
 I figured you'd get to the good stuff eventually.
 Thank God!  If I had to hear one more story about your coiffure...
 Me.  This endless ...blonde babble. I'm like, boring myself.
 What crap?
 do you listen to this crap?
 No...
 Then Guillermo says, "If you go any lighter, you're gonna look like an extra on 90210."
 You always been this selfish?
 But
 Then that's all you had to say.
 Well, no...
 You never wanted to go out with 'me, did you?
 I was?
 I looked for you back at the party, but you always seemed to be "occupied".
 Tons
 Have fun tonight?
 I believe we share an art instructor
 You know Chastity?
 Looks like things worked out tonight, huh?
 Hi.
 Who knows?  All I've ever heard her say is that she'd dip before dating a guy that smokes.
 So that's the kind of guy she likes? Pretty ones?
 Lesbian?  No. I found a picture of Jared Leto in one of her drawers, so I'm pretty sure she's not harboring same-sex tendencies.
 She's not a...
 I'm workin' on it. But she doesn't seem to be goin' for him.
 I really, really, really wanna go, but I can't.  Not unless my sister goes.
 Sure have.
 Eber's Deep Conditioner every two days. And I never, ever use a blowdryer without the diffuser attachment.
 How do you get your hair to look like that?
 You're sweet.
 You have my word.  As a gentleman
 I counted on you to help my cause. You and that thug are obviously failing. Aren't we ever going on our date?
 You got something on your mind?
 Where?
 There.
 Well, there's someone I think might be --
 How is our little Find the Wench A Date plan progressing?
 Forget French.
 That's because it's such a nice one.
 I don't want to know how to say that though.  I want to know useful things. Like where the good stores are.  How much does champagne cost?  Stuff like Chat.  I have never in my life had to point out my head to someone.
 Right.  See?  You're ready for the quiz.
 C'esc ma tete. This is my head
 Let me see what I can do.
 Gosh, if only we could find Kat a boyfriend...
 That's a shame.
 Unsolved mystery.  She used to be really popular when she started high school, then it was just like she got sick of it or something.
 Why?
 Seems like she could get a date easy enough...
 The thing is, Cameron -- I'm at the mercy of a particularly hideous breed of loser.  My sister.  I can't date until she does.
 Cameron.
 No, no, it's my fault -- we didn't have a proper introduction ---
 Forget it.
 You're asking me out.  That's so cute. What's your name again?
 Okay... then how 'bout we try out some French cuisine.  Saturday?  Night?
 Not the hacking and gagging and spitting part.  Please.
 Well, I thought we'd start with pronunciation, if that's okay with you.
 Can we make this quick?  Roxanne Korrine and Andrew Barrett are having an incredibly horrendous public break- up on the quad.  Again.
 I did.
 You think you ' re the only sophomore at the prom?
 I don't have to be home 'til two.
 I have to be home in twenty minutes.
 All I know is -- I'd give up my private line to go out with a guy like Joey.
 Sometimes I wonder if the guys we're supposed to want to go out with are the ones we actually want to go out with, you know?
 Bianca, I don't think the highlights of dating Joey Dorsey are going to include door-opening and coat-holding.
 Combination.  I don't know -- I thought he'd be different.  More of a gentleman...
 Is he oily or dry?
 He practically proposed when he found out we had the same dermatologist. I mean. Dr. Bonchowski is great an all, but he's not exactly relevant party conversation.
 Would you mind getting me a drink, Cameron?
 Great
 Joey.
 Who?
 Where did he go?  He was just here.
 You might wanna think about it
 No.
 Did you change your hair?
 You know the deal.  I can ' t go if Kat doesn't go --
 Listen, I want to talk to you about the prom.
 You're concentrating awfully hard considering it's gym class.
 Hi, Joey.
 Hey, sweet cheeks.
 My agent says I've got a good shot at being the Prada guy next year.
 Neat...
 It's a gay cruise line, but I'll be, like, wearing a uniform and stuff.
 Queen Harry?
 So yeah, I've got the Sears catalog thing going -- and the tube sock gig " that's gonna be huge.  And then I'm up for an ad for Queen Harry next week.
 Hopefully.
 Exactly  So, you going to Bogey Lowenbrau's thing on Saturday?
 Expensive?
 It's more
 Perm?
 Patrick -- is that- a.
 It's just you.
 Is that woman a complete fruit-loop or is it just me?
 No! I just wanted
 What? To completely damage me?  To send me to therapy forever? What?
 I just wanted --
 You set me up.
 Let go!
 So did you
 You looked beautiful last night, you know.
 I guess I'll never know, will I?
 Not all experiences are good, Bianca. You can't always trust the people you want to.
 God, you're just like him! Just keep me locked away in the dark, so I can't experience anything for myself
 I guess I thought I was protecting you.
 I'm not stupid enough to repeat your mistakes.
 That's not
 No. you didn't!  If you really thought I could make my own decisions, you would've let me go out with him instead of helping Daddy hold me hostage.
 I wanted to let you make up your own mind about him.
 Why didn't you tell me?
 After that, I swore I'd never do anything just because "everyone else" was doing it.  And I haven't since. Except for Bogey's party, and my stunning gastro-intestinal display --
 But
 Just once.  Afterwards, I told him I didn't want to anymore.  I wasn't ready. He got pissed.  Then he broke up with me.
 You did what?
 He said everyone was doing it.  So I did it.
 As in...
 Now I do.  Back then, was a different story.
 But you hate Joey
 He was, like, a total babe
 Why?
 In 9th.  For a month
 What?
 Joey never told you we went out, did he?
 I wish I had that luxury. I'm the only sophomore that got asked to the prom and I can't go, because you won ' t.
 I do care. But I'm a firm believer in doing something for your own reasons, not someone else ' s .
 Like you care.
 Listen, I know you hate having to sit home because I'm not Susie High School.
 You're welcome.
 I don't get you.  You act like you're too good for any of this, and then you go totally apeshit when you get here.
 I really don't think I need any social advice from you right now.
 Bianca, I need to talk to you -- I need to tell you --
 Can we go now?
 You are so completely unbalanced.
 Yeah, he's your freak friend Mandella's boyfriend.  I guess since I'm not allowed to go out, I should obsess over a dead guy, too.
 It's Shakespeare.  Maybe you've heard of him?
 Like I'm supposed to know what that even means.
 At least I'm not a clouted fen- sucked hedge-pig.
 Can't you forget for just one night that you're completely wretched?
 Bogey Lowenstein's party is normal, but you're too busy listening to Bitches Who Need Prozac to know that.
 What's normal?
 You're ruining my life'  Because you won't be normal, I can't be normal.
 I think you're a freak.  I think you do this to torture me.  And I think you suck.
 What do you think?
 Oh, I thought you might have a date  I don't know why I'm bothering to ask, but are you going to Bogey Lowenstein's party Saturday night?
 It means that Gigglepuss is playing at Club Skunk and we're going.
 Oh my God, does this mean you're becoming normal?
 Can you at least start wearing a bra?
 I have the potential to smack the crap out of you if you don't get out of my way.
 Nowhere... Hi, Daddy.
 Where've you been?
 I have a date, Daddy.  And he ' s not a captain of oppression like some men we know.
 I'm missing something.
 Fine.  I see that I'm a prisoner in my own house.  I'm not a daughter. I'm a possession!
 You're not going unless your sister goes.  End of story.
 He's not a "hot rod".  Whatever that is.
 It's that hot rod Joey, right? That ' s who you want me to bend my rules for?
 No, but
 The prom?  Kat has a date?
 Daddy, I want to discuss the prom with you. It's tomorrow night --
 Because she'll scare them away.
 Why?
 Promise me you won't talk to any boys unless your sister is present.
 Just for a minute
 Daddy, no!
 Wear the belly before you go.
 It's just a party. Daddy.
 Oh, God.  It's starting.
 If Kat's not going, you're not going.
 Daddy, people expect me to be there!
 It's just a party. Daddy, but I knew you'd forbid me to go since "Gloria Steinem" over there isn't going --
 Otherwise known as an orgy?
 If you must know, we were attempting to go to a small study group of friends.
 And where're you going?
 Daddy, I --
 Exactly my point
 But she doesn't want to date.
 But it's not fair -- she's a mutant, Daddy!
 Then neither will you.  And I'll get to sleep at night.
 What if she never starts dating?
 No! You're not dating until your sister starts dating.  End of discussion.
 Now don't get upset. Daddy, but there's this boy... and I think he might ask...
 Just sent 'em through.
 Padua girls.  One tall, decent body. The other one kinda short and undersexed?
 Never
 Fan of a fan.  You see a couple of minors come in?
 Didn't have you pegged for a Gigglepuss fan.  Aren't they a little too pre-teen belly-button ring for you?
 Always a pleasure, Brucie.
 Best case scenario, you're back on the payroll for awhile.
 You humiliated the woman! Sacrifice yourself on the altar of dignity and even the score.
 No, I ' m not.
 Buttholus extremus.  But hey, you're making progress.
 The hell is that?  What kind of 'guy just picks up a girl and carries her away while you're talking to her?
 Extremely unfortunate maneuver.
 Hell, I've just been going over the whole thing in my head and -
 You told me that part already.
 It's her favorite band.
 Assail your ears for one night.
 Okay!  I wasn't sure
 He's pretty!
 Dead at forty-one.
 Her favorite uncle
 It's a lung cancer issue
 Number one.  She hates smokers
 Are you kidding?  He'll piss himself with joy.  He's the ultimate kiss ass.
 Will Bogey get bent?
 In that case, we'll need to make it a school-wide blow out.
 This is it.  A golden opportunity. Patrick can ask Katarina to the party.
 Like we had a choice?  Besides -- when you let the enemy think he's orchestrating the battle, you're in a position of power. We let him pretend he's calling the shots, and while he's busy setting up the plan, you have time to woo Bianca.
 You got him involved?
 Hey -- I've gotta have a few clients when I get to Wall Street.
 I thought you hated those people.
 You know, if you do go out with Bianca, you'd be set.  You'd outrank everyone. Strictly A-list.  With me by your side.
 That's what I just said
 Did she actually say she'd go out with you?
 Forget his reputation.  Do you think we've got a plan or not?
 I'm serious, man, he's whacked.  He sold his own liver on the black market so he could buy new speakers.
 They always let felons sit in on Honors Biology?
 No kidding.  He's a criminal.  I heard he lit a state trooper on fire.  He just got out of Alcatraz...
 He seems like he thrives on danger
 What makes you think he'll do it?
 You wanna go out with him?
 What about him?
 Unlikely, but even so, she still can't go out with you.  So what's the point?
 I teach her French, get to know her, dazzle her with charm and she falls in love with me.
 The mewling, rampalian wretch herself.
 That's her?  Bianca's sister?
 Yeah, just a minor encounter with the shrew.
 You could consecrate with her, my friend.
 You mean I'd get a chance to talk to her?
 Guess who just signed up for a tutor?
 Sure do ... my Mom's from Canada
 You know French?
 Joey Dorsey?  Perma-shit-grin.  I wish I could say he's a moron, but he's number twelve in the class.  And a model.  Mostly regional stuff, but he's rumored to have a big tube sock ad coming out.
 He always have that shit-eating grin?
 Because they're bred to.  Their mothers liked guys like that, and their grandmothers before them. Their gene pool is rarely diluted.
 Why do girls like that always like guys like that?
 I could start with your haircut, but it doesn't matter.  She's not allowed to date until her older sister does.  And that's an impossibility.
 Why not?
 Bianca Stratford.  Sophomore. Don't even think about it
 Who is she?
 You burn, you pine, you perish?
 That girl -- I --
 Yeah, but these guys have never seen a horse.  They just jack off to Clint Eastwood.
 That I'm used to.
 Couple thousand. Most of them evil
 How many people go here?
 Get out!
 Thirty-two.
 How many people were in your old school?
 Yeah.  A couple.  We're outnumbered by the cows, though.
 I was kidding. People actually live there?
 North, actually.  How'd you   ?
 So -- which Dakota you from?
 C'mon.  I'm supposed to give you the tour.
 So they tell me...
 You the new guy?
 You get the girl.
 What's the worst?
 Where?
 She kissed me.
 You makin' any headway?
 She just needs time to cool off I'll give it a day.
 She hates you with the fire of a thousand suns .  That's a direct quote
 I don ' t know.  I decided not to nail her when she was too drunk to remember it.
 What'd you do to her?
 Then, go get her
 Sure
 Cameron -- do you like the girl?
 She's partial to Joey, not me
 What 're you talking about?
 It's off. The whole thing.
 Cameron, I'm a little busy
 Don't make me do it, man
 Gigglepuss is playing there tomorrow night.
 So what does that give me?  I'm supposed to buy her some noodles and a book and sit around listening to chicks who can't play their instruments?
 Okay -- Likes:  Thai food, feminist prose, and "angry, stinky girl music of the indie-rock persuasion".
 I've retrieved certain pieces of information on Miss Katarina Stratford I think you'll find helpful.
 What've you got for me?
 Yeah -- we'll see.
 And he means that strictly in a non- prison-movie type of way.
 And why would I do that?
 Leave my sister alone.
 Your sister here?
 Away.
 Where ya goin?
 Not at all
 Hey -- do you mind?
 They're running the rest of me next month.
 Yeah, and I noticed the only part of you featured in your big Kmart spread was your elbow.  Tough break.
 The vintage look is over, Kat. Haven't you been reading your Sassy?
 Enough with the Barbie n' Ken shit. I know.
 I don't know, Dorsey. ..the limo.-the flowers.  Another hundred for the tux --
 Get her to act like a human
 Do what?
 How'd you do it?
 A deal's a deal.
 It's about time.
 Forget her sister, then.
 Forget it.
 A hundred bucks a date.
 What?
 I just upped my price
 I got her under control. She just acts crazed in public to keep up the image.
 Watching the bitch trash my car doesn't count as a date.
 I'm on it
 When I shell out fifty, I expect results.
 Fifty, and you've got your man.
 Take it or leave it.  This isn't a negotiation.
 Fine, thirty.
 I can't take a girl like that out on twenty bucks.
 How much?
 I can't date her sister until that one gets a boyfriend.  And that's the catch. She doesn't want a boyfriend.
 You're gonna pay me to take out some girl?
 You got it, Verona.  I pick up the tab, you do the honors.
 But you'd go out with her if you had the cake?
 You need money to take a girl out
 You just said
 Sure, Sparky.  I'll get right on it.
 Yeah, whatever.  I want you to go out with her.
 Two legs, nice rack...
 What do you think?
 Yeah
 Hey -- it's all for the higher good right?
 You better not fuck this up.  I'm heavily invested.
 What?  We took bathes together when we were kids.
 You and Verona?
 Uh,  yeah.  We're old friend*
 I hear you're helpin' Verona.
 So what you need to do is recruit a guy who'll go out with her.  Someone who's up for the job.
 Does this conversation have a purpose?
 But she can't go out with you because her sister is this insane head case and no one will go out with her. right?
 We're not.
 Well, actually, I thought I'd run an idea by you.  You know, just to see if you're interested.
 We don't chat.
 Nope - just came by to chat
 Are you lost?
 Hey.
 Oh, honey -- tell me we haven't' progressed to full-on hallucinations.
 William - he asked me to meet him here.
 Who?
 Have you seen him?
 Oh, good.  Something new and different for us.
 You ' re looking at this from the wrong perspective.  We're making a statement.
 Okay, okay, we won't go.  It's not like I have a dress anyway
 Listen to you!  You sound like Betty, all pissed off because Archie is taking Veronica.
 Well, I guess we're not, since we don't have dates .
 Can you even imagine?  Who the hell would go to this a bastion of commercial excess?
 I got drunk.  I puked.  I got rejected. It was big fun.
 You didn't
 I did Bianca a favor and it backfired.
 You didn't have a choice?  Where's Kat and what have you done with her?
 I didn't have a choice.
 You went to the party?  I thought we were officially opposed to suburban social activity.
 Who cares?
 What'd he say?
 No fear.
 You think this'll work?
 If I was Bianca, it would be, "Any school you want, precious.  Don't forget your tiara."
 Does it matter?
 I appreciate your efforts toward a speedy death, but I'm consuming.  Do you mind?
 Neither has his heterosexuality.
 That's never been proven
 William didn't even go to high school
 William would never have gone to a state school.
 So he has this huge raging fit about Sarah Lawrence and insists that I go to his male-dominated, puking frat boy, number one golf team school. I have no say at all.
 You could always go with me.  I'm sure William has some friends.
 The people at this school are so incredibly foul.
 But imagine the things he'd say during sex.
 I realize that the men of this fine institution are severely lacking, but killing yourself so you can be with William Shakespeare is beyond the scope of normal teenage obsessions.  You're venturing far past daytime talk show fodder and entering the world of those who need very expensive therapy.
 An attempted slit.
 What's this?
 Just a little.
 Mandella, eat.  Starving yourself is a very slow way to die.
 Block E?
 He always look so
 I'm sure he's completely incapable of doing anything that interesting.
 That's Pat Verona? The one who was gone for a year? I heard he was doing porn movies.
 Patrick Verona   Random skid.
 Who's that?
 Don ' t you even dare. . .
 Oh, Bianca?  Can you get me my freshman yearbook?
 Because I like to torture you.
 Why is my veggie burger the only burnt object on this grill?
 Yeah, but then I fucked up. I fell for her.
 Is that right?
 Besides, I had some extra cash. Some asshole paid me to take out a really great girl.
 I thought you could use it. When you start your band.
 A Fender Strat. You bought this?
 I didn't care about the money.
 Really?  What was it like?  A down payment now, then a bonus for sleeping with me?
 It wasn't like that.
 You were paid to take me out!  By -- the one person I truly hate.  I knew it was a set-up!
 Wait I...
 It gets worse -- you still have your freshman yearbook?
 That ' s completely adorable!
 That's where I was last year.  She'd never lived alone -- my grandfather died -- I stayed with her.  I wasn't in jail, I don't know Marilyn Manson, and I've never slept with a Spice Girl.  I spent a year sitting next to my grandma on the couch watching Wheel of Fortune.  End of story.
 What?
 My grandmother's .
 Look, I'm  -- sorry -- that I questioned your motives.  I was wrong.
 Oh huh
 It's just something I had.  You know
 It's Scurvy's.  His date got convicted. Where'd you get the dress?
 How'd you get a tux at the last minute?
 Nothing!  There's nothing in it for me. Just the pleasure of your company.
 Answer the question, Patrick
 You need therapy.  Has anyone ever told you that?
 You tell me.
 So I have to have a motive to be with you?
 Create a little drama?  Start a new rumor?  What?
 Because I don't want to. It's a stupid tradition.
 Why not?
 No, I won't go with you
 No what?
 No.
 You know what I mean
 Is that a request or a command?
 Go to the prom with me
 You're amazingly self-assured. Has anyone ever told you that?
 No one else knows
 What?
 You're sweet.  And sexy.  And completely hot for me.
 No -- something real.  Something no one else knows.
 I hate peas.
 Tell me something true.
 I know the porn career's a lie.
 Hearsay.
 The duck?
 Fallacy.
 State trooper?
 For. . . ?
 You up for it?
 You never disappointed me.
 How?
 Then you screwed up
 Something like that
 So if you disappoint them from the start, you're covered?
 I don't like to do what people expect. Then they expect it all the time and they get disappointed when you change.
 Yes
 Acting the way we do.
 So what's your excuse?
 Yeah, well, don't let it get out
 A soft side? Who knew?
 I dazzled him with my wit
 So how'd you get Chapin to look the other way?
 Good call.
 I figured it had to be something ridiculous to win your respect.  And piss you off.
 The Partridge Family?
 Maybe.
 You want me to climb up and show you how to get down?
 Forget it.  I'm stayin'.
 Put your right foot there --
 Try lookin' at it from this angle
 C'mon.  It's not that bad
 I guess I never told you I'm afraid of heights.
 Look up, sunshine
 He left!  I sprung the dickhead and he cruised on me.
 Other than my upchuck reflex? Nothing.
 So what did I have an effect on ?
 Don't for one minute think that you had any effect whatsoever on my panties.
 Unwelcome?  I guess someone still has her panties in a twist.
 Unwelcome.
 Wholesome.
 Pleasant?
 You 're so --
 I heard there was a poetry reading.
 What are you doing here?
 Excuse me, have you seen The Feminine Mystique?  I lost my copy.
 No offense, but you're sister is without.  I know everyone likes her and all, but ...
 BIANCA
 Who?
 He just wants me to be someone I'm not.
 So what ' s up with your dad?  He a pain in the ass?
 I'm gettin' there
 Oh, so now you think you know me?
 You don't strike me as the type that would ask permission.
 My father wouldn't approve of that that
 Start a band?
 This.
 Do what?
 I should do this.
 Why'd you lie?
 Then why'd you ask?
 No, you weren't
 Maybe.
 Were you in jail?
 Busy
 When you were gone last year -- where were you?
 But it's Gigglepuss - I know you like them.  I saw you there.
 And I'm in control of it.
 What?
 Kat! Wake up!
 You know what they say
 I thought you were above all that
 Hey man. . .  You don ' t think I can be "cool"?  You don't think I can be "laid back" like everyone else?
 I know.  It'd have to be a pretty big deal to get you to mainline tequila. You don't seem like the type.
 I hate him.
 Dorsey.
 Who?
 Why'd you let him get to you?
 Just let me sit down.
 See that?  Who needs affection when I've got blind hatred?
 Like you could find one
 Because then I'd have to start taking out girls who like me.
 Why?
 Sure, I do
 You don't care if I die
 I told you
 Why 're you doing this?
 Leave it to you to use big words when you're shitfaced.
 This is so patronizing.
 What if you have a concussion? My dog went to sleep with a concussion and woke up a vegetable. Not that I could tell the difference...
 I know, just let me sleep
 Uh, uh. You lie down and you'll go to sleep
 I just need to lie down for awhile
 You're not okay.
 I'm fine. I'm
 Okay?
 Funny, you're the only one
 I say, do what you wanna do.
 "I'm getting trashed, man." Isn't that what you're supposed to do at a party?
 What's this?
 Why, don't you?
 You know who The Raincoats are?
 You know, these guys are no Bikini Kill or The Raincoats, but they're right up there.
 Do you mind?  You're sort of ruining it for me.
 That's what you want, isn't it?
 Excuse me?

 hey.  Great show, huh?
 Depends on the topic. My fenders don't really whip me into a verbal frenzy.
 You're not a big talker, are you?
 Hi
 I was in the laundromat. I saw your car. Thought I'd say hi.
 Are you following me?
 Seven-thirty?
 You -- covered in my vomit.
 Come on -- the ponies, the flat beer, you with money in your eyes, me with my hand on your ass...
 And why would I do that?
 Then say you'll spend Dollar Night at the track with me.
 I don't really think you warrant that strong an emotion.
 You hate me don't you?
 I know a lot more than that
 Like where?  The 7-Eleven on Burnside? Do you even know my name, screwboy?
 The night I take you to places you've never been before.  And back.
 Oh, right.  Friday.
 Pick you up Friday, then
 My mission in life.
 There's a way to get a guy's attention.
 Sweating like a pig, actually.  And yourself?
 I mean Wo-man.  How ya doin'?
 Oh, Christ.  Don't tell me you've changed your mind.  I already sent 'em a check.
 When I go?
 You know, fathers don't like to admit that their daughters are capable of running their own lives.  It means we've become spectators.  Bianca still lets me play a few innings.  You've had me on the bleachers for years.  When you go to Sarah Lawrence, I won't even be able to watch the game.
 No -- impressed.
 What's the matter?  Upset that I rubbed off on her?
 Bianca did what?
 The part where Bianca beat the hell out of some guy.
 Which parts?
 Parts of it.
 So tell me about this dance. Was it fun?
 No, Daddy.
 I don't understand the allure of dehydrated food.  Is this something I should be hip to?
 Funny.
 Yeah.  She left with some bikers Big ones.  Full of sperm.
 Was that your sister?
 I want to go to an East Coast school! I want you to trust me to make my own choices.  I want --
 You're eighteen.  You don't know what you want.  You won't know until you're forty-five and you don't have it.
 So what I want doesn't matter?
 As a parent, that's my right
 Because you're making decisions for me.
 Why can't we agree on this?
 I thought you were punishing me.
 Is this about Sarah Lawrence? You punishing me?
 Then tell them I had a seizure.
 My insurance does not cover PMS
 Enough!
 This from someone whose diary is devoted to favorite grooming tips?
 You decided.
 I thought we decided you were going to school here.  At U of 0.
 I know.
 Just smack her now.
 Am I supposed to feel better? Like, right now?  Or do I have some time to think about it?
 No ... I believe "heinous bitch" is the term used most often.
 Tempestuous?
 The point is Kat -- people perceive you as somewhat ...
 I still maintain that he kicked himself in the balls.  I was merely a spectator.
 Well, yes, compared to your other choices of expression this year, today's events are quite mild.  By the way, Bobby Rictor's gonad retrieval operation went quite well, in case you're interested.
 Expressing my opinion is not a terrorist action.
 Katarina Stratford.  My, my.  You've been terrorizing Ms. Blaise again.
 Yeah...
 Kat a fan, too?
 Right.
 Macbeth, right?
 Oh yeah.
 You think?
 Yeah.  I guess.
 Cool pictures.  You a fan?
 Hi.
 Hey there.  Tired of breathing?
 Man -- don't say shit like that to  me. People can hear you.
 Sweet love, renew thy force!
 You were right. She's still pissed.
 No - I've got a sweet-payin' job that I'm about to lose.
 So you got cozy with she who stings?
 I'm likin' you guys better
 I prefer to think of it simply as an alternative to what the law allows.
 Yeah.
 Ever been to Club Skunk?
 Just for now.
 Are you telling me I'm a -  "non-smoker"?
 Good enough.
 What?!
 We're your guys.
 You two are gonna help me tame the wild beast?
 Patrick, Pat, you're not looking at the big picture.  Joey's just a pawn. We set this whole thing up so Cameron can get the girl.
 So Dorsey can get the girl?
 That's where we can help you.  With Kat.
 Dorsey can plow whoever he wants. I'm just in this for the cash.
 I think I speak correctly when I say that Cameron's love is pure.  Purer than say -- Joey Dorsey's.
 What is it with this chick?  She have three tits?
 The situation is, my man Cameron here has a major jones for Bianca Stratford.
 What plan?
 Whatever the hell it is you're standin' there waitin' to say.
 What?
 Say it
 See you next week!
 You're completely demented.
 Well, you know -- there's the prestige of the job title... and the benefits package is pretty good...
 You weren't abused, you aren't stupid, and as far as I can tell, you're only slightly psychotic -- so why is it that you're such a fuck-up?
 What's to discuss?
 Why don't we discuss your driving need to be a hemorrhoid?
 I'm at a loss, then.  What should we talk about? Your year of absence?
 Touch of the flu.
 I don't understand, Patrick.  You haven't done anything asinine this week. Are you not feeling well?
 With the teeth of your zipper?
 It was a bratwurst.  I was eating lunch.
 It says here you exposed yourself to a group of freshmen girls.
 I missed you.
 That ' s what I thought
 Absolutely not.
 Did I have anything to say about it?
 Your daughters went to the prom.
 What just happened?
 But -- who -- what --?
 Have a great time, honey!
 Dr. Ruth?
 What do you wanna watch?  We've got crap, crap, crap or crap
 Kissing?  Is that what you think happens?  Kissing isn't what keeps me up to my elbows in placenta all day.
 They'll dance, they'll kiss, they'll come home.  Let her go.
 Pirate -- no question.
 Would you rather be ravished by a pirate or a British rear admiral?
 You're not helping.
 Tumescent!
 Jesus!  Can a man even grab a sandwich before you women start dilating?
 Sarah Lawrence is on the other side of the country.
 What's a synonym for throbbing?
 Make anyone cry today?
 In the microwave.
 Can't be that far, I say.  Also, I don't like the smell of the sea around here.  Smells like a cunt. Bad sign...
 We left three weeks ago, Alonso. Can't be that near.
 We should have seen land.
 We'll all go crazy...
 He's the devil's child...
 With a face like that?  I don't want you looking at me.  You hear?
 Ah, leave him alone.  He's doing no harm.
 What are you listening to, chicken ass?
 You'll be drinking your own piss... For the glory of Spain... and Admiral Colon...!  Bastard!
 The water's going putrid in the barrels.
 I never seen heat like this!  Not even in Las Minas!
 IF-GOD-WILLS-IT!
 Asia can be found to the west -- and I will prove it.
 Blind faith is what I consider heresy!
 Don't you realize your words could be considered heretical?
 Did He not choose a carpenter's son to reveal Himself to the world?
 If God intended our proximity to Asia, do you believe he would have waited for you to show it to the world?
 No.  The Portuguese have already discovered black-skinned people.  I, too, will find other populations -- and bring them to the word of God.
 Is that all that interests you? Gold?
 Trade, Your Excellency.  According to Marco Polo, the Kingdom of China is one of the richest of the world. Even the meanest buildings are roofed with gold.
 If they agree to follow me, yes.
 Your life, and that of others!
 Your Eminence, there is only one way to settle the matter.  And that is to make the journey.  I am ready to risk my life to prove it possible.
 Excellency, you are right.
 Senor Colon, an experienced captain such as yourself will understand our concern with the crew.  I am not willing to have on my conscience the loss of men who would have relied upon our judgment.
 Then you cannot ignore that according to their calculations, the circumference of the Earth is approximately...  22,000 leagues or more.  Which makes the ocean... uncrossable.
 I am, Your Eminence
 Unfortunately, Don Colon, that is precisely where our opinions differ...  Are you familiar with the work of Aristotle?  Erathostene?  Ptolemeus?
 Yes, your Eminence.  The voyage should not take more than six or seven weeks.
 You say Asia can be found by sailing west?
 A waste...?  Let me tell you something, Arojaz.  If your name, or mine, is ever remembered -- it will only be because of his.
 What a tragedy... what a waste of a life...
 You can see for yourself.
 On the contrary, Your Eminence.  It seems to me the man is preparing his own cross.
 It won't be easy to get rid of your prophet now, Don Sanchez.
 Indeed.  The world is full of mercenaries -- and states often make use of them, when it benefits them.  My only concern is the welfare and prosperity of Spain.
 He is a mercenary!  Did he not already try to convince the King of Portugal of his absurd notions?
 Naturally.  But I would really deplore the loss of such a potential opportunity for Spain for a... dispute over a point of geography.
 The Judgment is ours!
 The State has some reason to be interested in this man's proposition, Your Eminence...
 I can't keep my eyes off you.  I would like to catch up with all the moments I didn't spend with you.
 What is it, now?  Tell me...
 I am busy inside.
 Can't you stay with us a little?
 Not everything... Do you think I care?  I'm a free man again.  Riches don't make a man rich, they only make him busier...
 They took everything...
 They tried... but I didn't let them.
 God... you're so beautiful!  I can't believe no other man has ever taken you away from me...
 I can arrange for the Queen to take Fernando and Diego into her service.
 You don't usually ask.
 Beatrix, I want to ask you something.
 That's something you can't decide.
 I don't want you to wait for me.
 I'm not asking you to swear to anything.
 Thank God...
 She said yes.
 I find that hard to believe.
 Perhaps I was never meant to live with a woman...
 I'd love to argue with you sometimes.  But you're never here!
 Are we going to argue?
 Well... that's true.  I have a child by a man who won't marry me!  Who's always leaving...
 I haven't given you much of a life.
 I know.
 I could be gone for years.
 I am afraid this is not the worst news.
 How could I be?  The mainland has been found.  Exactly as I said it would.
 I am not a seaman.  But I heard it is no more than a week at sea.  I hope you are not too disappointed.
 How far from here?
 Congratulations.  Then I am free to search for the mainland.
 Viceroy of the West Indies.
 Appointment to what?
 My letters of appointment.
 Yes... I remember...
 Don Alonso de Bobadilla.
 Bartolome and Giacomo Colon.
 May I ask by whom?
 Forgive me, Don Bobadilla -- those positions have already been taken.
 I understand that you will soon be appointing Governors for the islands?  Is it not so?
 Tell me the first thing that comes to your mind.
 Really?  God... I wouldn't know where to start... and yet...
 I want you to tell me everything you remember, Father.  From the beginning.  Everything.
 He never had one... except aboard my ships!
 He asks when he can come to visit you.  He left his address.
 What does he say?
 I am not listening, Father.  But I can't help hearing.
 What are you listening to?
 There must be a passage to that other ocean.
 Father...
 Not bad.
 How are you feeling, Fernando?
 This time with me!
 I have to explore the mainland.
 Yes... Yes, I do... On all of them!
 Do you swear on all the Holy Saints in heaven?
 You promise?  Do you swear on St. Christopher...?
 There'll be a time.
 I want to go with you!
 All of them created by people like me.
 Roofs... towers, palaces... spires...
 What do you see?
 Look out of that window.
 I am not afraid of you.  You are nothing but a dreamer.
 Call them.
 All I have to do is call the guards.
 To rise so high, in so short a time, is a dangerous occupation.  A little hypocrisy goes a long way.
 What...?  Do I have so many already?
 You seem to have a special talent for making friends.
 Good!  We are also in need of judges.  Except there are no thieves!
 Don Bobadilla is already a judge, my Dear Don Cristobal.
 But we do have a lack of notaries. You should contact my administration.
 ... for a commoner?
 You defend yourself admirably...
 Forgive me, Don Colon.  But what about gold?
 They don't see sin in their nakedness.  They live according to nature, in a never ending summer. The islands are covered with trees, filled with blossoms and fruits. And...
 If you won't accept our proposal, we'll simply find someone who will.
 And were you never ambitious, Excellency?  Or is ambition only a virtue among the nobles, a fault for the rest of us?
 Then you are too ambitious.
 I'm not bargaining!
 I remind you, Senor Colon, that you are in no position to bargain with me.
 NO...!  I have waited too long, fought too hard.  Now you expect me to take all the risks while you take the profit!  No... I will not be your servant!
 No?
 No...
 You never learned how to speak my language.
 Utapan, won't you speak to me?  You used to know how to speak to me.
 You did the same to your God!
 You have to find them, Utapan.  Look what they did!
 Ask him if he will help.
 He understands.
 We will work with his people.  We want peace.  Ask the Chief if he understands?
 He has medicine.  Tell him we admire his people.
 Chief says...
 ... and also to bring medicine.
 Chief says -- he has a God.
 To bring the word of God.
 Why?
 Thousands.
 Chief says -- how many?
 Tell him his country is very beautiful.  Tell him we are leaving men here -- to build a fort.
 Chief knows.
 Tell the Chief we thank him.
 You come!  You speak first!
 Island.  Far.
 What is it?  A tribe?  An island?
 Say not here!  Cuba!
 I don't know... I have the impression that I didn't change that much.  I still can't accept the world as it is!
 Oh?  So you are a new man?
 New worlds create new people.
 I knew you would.
 I have to disagree.
 You'll always be older than me, Father.
 I suppose we're both old men now.
 Give me absolution.
 I believed in you...
 You are bound by an oath, Father.
 My son, my son...  Your certitudes are sometimes frightening...  Christopher, you must speak to them. And if you don't I will.
 If I tell them, they won't follow me.  You know that I am right, Father.  You trust me...
 May God forgive you...!  You must tell them!  You must tell your men!
 I am not sure... It could be twice the distance.
 How long?
 I lied.  The journey will be longer than I said.
 What are you saying?
 Father, I have betrayed my family. I betrayed my men.  And I betrayed you.
 I am listening, my son.
 Forgive me, Father.  For I have sinned.
 In Nomine Patris et Filius, et Spiritus Sancti.
 Colon!  Don't!
 All of them!  Just lies!
 Damn all of you!  You all set up theories based on what?  You never leave the safety of your studies! Go out!  Find out what the world is about and then tell me something I can listen to!
 Colon!
 Damn God!
 If God intends you to go, then you will go.
 Wait!  I've waited seven years already!  How much longer do you want me to wait?
 You mustn't give way to despair. You must wait.
 Only God knows the meaning of such words, my son.
 I've been contradicted all my life... Eternity!
 You get so carried away when you are being contradicted!
 Passion is something one cannot control!
 Father Marchena!
 I'll try to remember that, Marchena...
 Two minutes... and already you're a dead man.  Don't let passion overwhelm you, Colon.
 So was Christ!
 Esdras is a Jew.
 The calculations of Toscanelli Marin de Tyr, Esdras...
 How can you be so certain?
 Ignorance!  I believe the Indies are no more than 750 leagues west of the Canary Islands.
 How can you be so certain?  The Ocean is said to be infinite.
 To open a new route to Asia.  At the moment there are only two ways of reaching it...
 Why do you wish to sail west?
 With some difficulty.  I had to promise them you were not a total fool.
 How did you manage it?
 That's what it says.
 God... That's in a week!
 Father, I am doing what I think is the best for him.  And he has the teacher I would have chosen for myself.
 Diego is a bright boy -- a pleasure to teach -- but so serious... Brothers should be raised together, Colon.  Even brothers from different mothers...
 Your Majesty -- some men are content to read about things.  I must see them with my own eyes.  I cannot be other than I am.
 There is one thing I'd like to understand... Why do you want to go back, after all this?
 Thank you.
 But without your brothers.  Nor are you to return to Santo Domingo or any of the other colonies.  You may explore the continent.
 They come and go as naked as the day God created them...
 Do they have such thoughts?
 Thirty seven, Your Majesty... And you?
 How old are you, Senor Colon?
 A woman?
 I know what I see.  I see someone who doesn't accept the world as it is.  Who's not afraid.  I see a women who thinks... "What if?"...
 You show no inclination to speak otherwise!
 May I speak freely?
 Surely you can do anything you want.
 I cannot ignore the verdict of my council.
 That she was impregnable.
 What did they say about Granada before today?
 The ocean is uncrossable?
 No more than the woman who said she would take Granada from the Moors.
 I should not even be listening to you, since my council said no.  But Santangel tells me you are a man of honor and sincerity... And Sanchez, that you are not a fool.
 You will regret this.
 You'll be held in detention, deprived of your privileges and possessions.  Until you are returned to Spain where you will be judged. Have you anything to say?
 Savagery is what monkeys understand.
 In one act of brutality, you have created chaos.  Tribes who were fighting each other are now joining forces against us!  All that because of your criminal savagery!
 You did not hear me, Don Colon.  Not my horse.
 Don Moxica -- we all have to work.
 My horse doesn't work.
 We can't raise the wheel without it.
 We came here to stay!  To build! Not to start a crusade.  In this forest, there is enough danger to sweep us away in days!  So we will be brave and swallow our grief.  And in the name of those who died, we will accomplish what we came for.
 We don't need to know.
 You want a war?  Fine.  We are a thousand.  They outnumber us by ten! Who will you kill?  Which tribe?
 If you want to keep your head on your shoulders, you'll do as I say.
 We lost cousins, friends.  We will wash this in blood.
 The Indians have no such word, Don Moxica.
 And you say this is an Indian vice? By God!  I don't see any kind of pleasure that would make this a sin.
 We can't be.
 He's drawing an isthmus... He's saying we're on an isthmus.
 What's he doing?
 Twenty eight.
 What do you read?
 Come over here.
 Well, I surely know what a quadrant is!  But I've never seen it used at night before.
 And what do you think Mendez?
 Well... It's the men, Sir.  They wonder how you know our position. We've lost sight from land days ago...
 God be with us admiral.
 Due west, Captain Mendez.  And may God be with us...
 You're right.  Let the men decide.
 You tell that to them!
 Pinzon, Pinzon... All we can do now is go forward!  Think about that!
 You bloody...
 You never did.  You did all the talking for both of us, remember?
 Jesus Maria!  I should have never listened to you!
 And then what?  Half of the water has gone, the rest is nearly putrid! You know that!
 You don't know anything!  Listen Colon, these are my ships, right? So I'm telling you we're turning back!
 The land is there.  I know it!
 We're lost!
 You think I don't know that?
 We're on the verge of a mutiny, Colon!
 We have to keep the hopes of these men alive!
 You must be mad...!
 Six days ago, yes.
 You lied!  You cheated!  We're way past 750 leagues!
 Immediately.
 Where can I meet this man?
 Because he is not afraid of me.
 Then why?
 I know, I should not tolerate his impertinence.
 And who would you think of, for such a task?
 He must be replaced.
 Then, what do you suggest, Don Sanchez?
 Is this true, Brother Buyl?
 ... But there is worse.  He ordered the execution of five members of the nobility...
 We weren't expecting immediate profits, were we?  We must have faith.  We must give time for time.
 Every ship returns with a cargo of sick and dying.  But with no gold! The new world proves expensive, Your Majesty.
 Yes.  It would be a pity, wouldn't it?  Call him back!
 ... Into a monk...
 Never, Your Majesty.  Although...
 You were right, Don Sanchez... His demands could never be granted.
 Yes, Your Majesty.
 Is that the man I knew, Treasurer Sanchez?
 Officers, there's your killer, do your duty, arrest him!
 ...so we kill someone famous and if we are caught, we are sent to mental hospital...
 I don't think it's abuse, I think it's torture.
 I'm abused.  Don't you think?
 Can I see your back?
 Out on my back when I was a small boy.
 Your father put cigarettes out on you?
 That's what he did to me.  He put cigarettes out on me.
 Yeah, he hated me from day when I was born.  Put it out.  Can you put the cigarette out?
 Your father blamed you for your mother's blindness?
 Yeah, yeah...bad doctor gave her bad drugs which made her go blind.  And my father blamed me for her blindness...
 Back in the Czech Republic?
 Yeah, she went blind giving birth to me. She went to fucking black market doctor to induce me.
 Your mother was blind?
 My father always degraded me.  Killed my self-esteem.  And my mother was blind.
 Tell me about yourself.  What you did as a young boy... what your parents were like.
 Give me another one, please.
 I need to know about your background.  I need to know about your upbringing.  Why you're here.
 What else do you need?
 This is not about money, Emil.  I need your trust in me.
 Thirty-percent.  No more.  Or I call another lawyer.  This is the biggest case of your life.  Don't try to negotiate.  Thirty percent.  Say yes or no.
 But it's...
 No.  No way.
 I would say...half.  Half is fair.
 What's your cut?  How much?
 Look, I haven't really focused on that kind of thing.
 What about my movie rights?  Book rights?
 Don't worry about him.  Think about yourself.
 No, he is here.  Shit...
 Disappeared.  They're looking everywhere.  Maybe he went back to Czechoslovakia.
 What about Oleg?
 Well, you didn't appreciate the severity of it until recently.  No question about that.
 I was all of these.
 ...delusions and paranoia.
 Oh, sure.
 You bring the cigarettes?
 I brought you some letters.  It's really fan mail.  Women mostly.  One wants to buy you clothes, another sent a check. Another wants a check.
 I'm invoking rights - this man is represented by counsel.  I'm coming with him.
 Yes.  Yes, come with me!
 I'm coming with you.
 Where are we going?
 Don't say anything.
 He has the camera!  He took the movie!
 Emil.  Take it easy.  Stay with me.  Sit down.  What do you need?  What are you looking for?
 Oh no!  No!  Shit!
 Here.  I have your money.
 I'm not your lawyer until I see the money.
 Are you my attorney?  I'm Emil.  I'm insane.
 Daphne, I...
 I don't want to drag you down with me.
 ...Do you really want me to forget about you?
 Forget about me.  You have enough problems of your own.
 Pouring it out!
 What are you doing?
 I'll get my clothes.
 I'll make some for us.
 In the kitchen.
 Do you have coffee?
 Right.
 You better get packed.
 I'm glad I met you.
 No matter what happens...I'm glad I met you.
 A good Immigration lawyer could stall the process.  Eddie recommended one.
 If you were my boyfriend, I'd suggest you find another girlfriend that isn't going to jail ten-thousand miles away.
 If I was your boyfriend, I might be.
 Ludwig?  He's gay - are you jealous?
 Is he your boyfriend?
 I'm sorry.
 I still can't believe Eddie's gone.
 Are you alright?
 I'm sorry.  I didn't mean to...I'm glad. Actually I'm glad it's over.  All this time.  Hiding.  Never being able to look anyone in the eyes. Always afraid that someone would find out who I was.  Never trusting anyone...
 They're not gonna send you right back.
 You don't know.  I'm sorry.  I was desperate.  That's not me.  I shot a cop.  Can you imagine what they'll do to me when I got to prison?
 I know.
 I'm not a whore.  I'm not a whore.
 I'm just trying to find out who you are.
 What are you asking me?
 So you were never a prostitute?
 I came here.  I had no money.  I knew no one.  I couldn't get a job because you have to have a green card to get work. They approached me - I could've made a lot of money.  I considered it, but... it's not who I am.  They pay me below the table at Ludwig's.
 No.
 What about back home?
 No.
 Did you ever turn tricks before?
 Yes, I considered it.
 You considered becoming a prostitute?
 Yeah.  This way.
 So...the station is empty?
 The men are out of quarters - practicing putting out fires.
 Somewhere else?
 I can't take you to my place.
 Do you live alone?  I've been in these clothes since...the killings.  Could we stop at your place? I could take a shower...before I go into custody?
 Divorced.
 Are you married?
 They won't until this is over.
 I will if they don't send me back.
 If you cooperate with the DA - maybe they'll help you with your situation.
 Now I become custody of police department?
 Yes, but he was a cop.
 Alright.  That's a justifiable homicide.
 ...my little sister and I shared a flat - I came home one night and a man was raping her.  His gun was on the chair... He came at me and I shot him.
 You're a cop - you'll never believe me.
 Look, we can help you but right now we have to deal with what's happening here. Tell us the truth...is that the truth?
 I'm from a small town in Slovakia.  Like the South here.  The Police is right, a civilian is wrong.  So I fled.
 A cop?
 No, no, don't talk to Immigration!
 Are you here illegally?  Don't worry about that.  We'll talk to Immigration. They won't deport you.
 Arrest you for what?  Why would we arrest you?
 If I tell you, will you arrest me?
 Whether you tell us or not, we'll find out.  Better if it comes from you.
 Go on.
 Tamina was a friend of mine.  My shower was broken, she let me use theirs.
 C'mon, start at the beginning.  You know these people?
 I told your partner, I can't help.  I didn't see anything.
 Yeah, sure.  Beep me when you're ready for the press conference.
 I'm ready to be briefed.  Excuse us.
 Oh yeah...?  Alright.
 Look, after Jordy briefs me, you can do the press conference.  How about that? The case is all yours.
 Well, I'm the Deputy Chief Fire Marshall and every now and then I'd like to be included in decisions.
 It was my decision, not his.
 Oh.
 There's nothing to talk about.  Get a good lawyer.  You're suspended until your trial.
 But Chief?  Over this??
 How are you going to fight this?  Maybe if Oleg hadn't gotten away and you'd been on the front page, as a hero, this thing would be easier to fight.  You'd have the good to weight against the bad! It's unfortunate that I have to make decisions based upon your press coverage but there's nothing I can do!  Gimme your shield.
 End my career?
 Well this is gonna end your career and probably mine.
 Chief - I know I screwed up - but this guy was no innocent civilian.
 Forgot?  You handcuffed a civilian to a tree?!
 What was I supposed to do?  The guy tried to mug me.  I was gonna send a cop back - I just forgot.
 The public doesn't have any idea what we do and now you're going to define our image!  This is going to be our Rodney King!
 Okay.  But not water sports.
 Chief - mind if I take her?
 Oh really.  That's nice.  You took a homicide witness to take a shower after your partner was shot?  Are you out of your fucking mind??  Are you having that much trouble gettin' dates?!
 No!  Nothing happened.
 A shower!?  Did you take one, too?
 I let her take a shower.
 What do you mean, 'cleaned up?'
 Ladder 20 was on the Rock for training. We stopped there... so she could get cleaned up.
 I came to see how the investigation was going.  I called and you're not here.  I wait up at the station and you don't even show up!!!  I beep you - you don't return my call.  Where the hell have you been?!
 Hey, Chief, what are you doing here?
 'Cause we got more important things to do, like finding out who did it.
 Then why didn't you talk to the reporter?
 Who do you think, Chief?!
 Who did cause and origin?
 Yeah.
 Alright.  Swing by her apartment.  Let her pick up her clothes and take her straight to Hoover Street.  You got that?
 Yeah.  He finished awhile ago.
 Did the D.A. videotape her deposition?
 You do that, wiseguy.  Now let's solve this thing before Eddie Flemming does.
 I said, yeah, you're right, Chief.  As soon as we get somethin' we'll let you alert the media.
 What was that, Korfin?
 Yeah, right.
 Don't you guys understand?  It's all about image.  The better we look the more money I get to pay you guys overtime.
 I know.  Relax.  Take it easy.  Don't worry, we'll get those fuckers.
 He got my gun!  Motherfucker was filming the whole time!
 No.  I'm okay.
 Are you hit?
 Stay with her.
 The other side of the street.  The guy with the videocamera.  Don't look - put her in the car.  Stay this side.
 C'mere.  You wanna go to homicide school?  Here - make yourself useful.
 Yeah.
 Only one guys checked in?
 It's okay.
 Sorry...PD only.
 Still unknown but we're running prints. Kid over there caught the case.
 Any I.D.?
 Takin' a bath.
 Where is she?
 A timer.
 What's he looking for?
 You ready?
 Tomorrow.  At lunch.
 When?
 I'm gonna propose.
 What's the kid gonna say - sorry? Meanwhile I'm not here anymore. Like last week - we were at the morgue and this guy was all chopped up - spleen here - liver there - his heart in a pan. Six hours ago this guy was walkin' his dog or buyin' a quart of milk.  Who knows?  But some kid's robbed him for $3 or some shit and shot him and now you can't tell if he's a piece of beef or a human being and I'm thinkin' that's me. Sooner or later.  That's me.
 It was freaky, I'll tell you.  Stupid kid.
 Maybe you could just put in a shot of Martell?
 Vodka tonic.
 Coffee for me, I gotta slow down.
 She washes hair up at Ludwig's - a salon on 63rd and Madison.
 He had a videocamera?  Where is she? Quickly!
 Tall, short-haired, scary eyes.  Second guy with him was...shorter, with a wrestler's build.  And he wouldn't turn his videocamera off me.
 Describe him.
 He said he was her cousin.  I told him where she works.  They were just here.
 Daphne.  Another guy came in asking me about her, too.
 What are you saying?
 Boy, she's so popular all the sudden.
 Did you tell him you did?
 No.
 Do you have any Czech girls working for you?
 Yeah.  He wanted a girl from Czechoslovakia, but I sent him Honey 'cause once they get there, you know, it doesn't really matter - Honey was killed...?  Poor girl...
 Oh my G-d.  Honey!  Honey's dead?
 We don't have her I.D. yet, but one of your girls was killed last night at the King Edward Hotel.
 What's wrong?
 Homicide, Miss Hearn.  It's Detective Eddie Flemming.  Open up.
 I have nothin' to say.  If you wanna contact my attorney...
 Police.  We'd like to ask you a few questions.
 Who's there?
 You know, I don't know.  I like you. You remind me of a puppy I used to have. He pissed on the rug all the time, but I still kept him.
 Why'd you help me back there with the Chief?  Why'd you stand up for me like that?
 How you go out on a limb for somebody is by giving her a number of an Immigration lawyer.  Here, here's a number of an Immigration lawyer.  That's how you help her. But you can't get involved in her like that.  You're gonna jeopardize your career, your life and you're gonna jeopardize my case.  And lemme give you another piece of advice.  Maybe you don't watch TV but I'll let you in on a little secret - the whole fuckin' world watches television.  And when you get out there, they know your face.  And the little fame, the little fuckin' itty bitty fame that I get in this city makes it a lot easier for my job.  And I get more done because of it.
 But, I mean, didn't you ever go out on a limb for somebody?  I mean, you shoulda heard her there.  Tellin' her whole story...I believed her.
 Well, it's not up to you to decide whether she's innocent or not.  Don't you understand, that's why you're a professional.
 I told you, you know, I thought I was doing the right thing, you know, I think she's innocent.
 No, I don't think you were a fool, I just think you were stupid about it.  I mean, to say the least, you outta know better.  You don't know her well enough. She's got the potential to fucking hang you even if she suggests that you made a pass at her, it's fuckin' over.  You can deny it all you want, but it will not make one fucking bit of difference. You're dead.
 Yeah, just her in the shower.  Nothing happened.  Look, I'm sure you probably think I'm a fool and I fucked up, but...
 Just a shower?
 I took her there for a shower and that's it.
 Well, you shoulda because nobody's gonna believe you didn't...including me.
 Look, Eddie, I'm tellin' you - I didn't touch her.
 Women like that have a way of turning professionals into amateurs.
 Hey.  I'm a professional.
 Okay, tell you what, I'll give you a head start.  You take her to the station house.  Don't let her out of your sight. She's the only warm body we got left.
 You know what I'm saying here.
 You're her Savior?  Is she the kid you're gonna save from the burning building?
 C'mon.  You intimidate her 'cause you're a celebrity.  She sees me differently.
 So am I.
 I'm serious here.
 My point exactly.
 I don't have a girlfriend.
 What would your girlfriend think of that?
 Yeah.
 You wanna talk to her alone?
 Look - let me talk to her.  Any leads I get, they're all yours.  Just let me have a first crack at her.
 Raw deal.
 She's fucked.  Even if that story is true.
 Something back home?
 Why not?
 Is that all there is?
 She just saw two of her friends killed! They probably threatened her.
 What are you hiding?  Why are you afraid
 Then I guess we're doin' this the right way, aren't we?  If we pull up to a burning building I'll gladly let you go first.
 I wanted to run up to a building on fire, kick in the door, rush into the smoke and save a kid.
 Hey!  I always wanted to be a cop when I was a kid.  I dreamed of running up to a door, kicking it in, pulling my gun and yelling 'Freeze!' at the bad guy! What'd you dream about?
 Of course.
 So am I.  Alright, I'll go inside and you cover the back.
 I'm on duty.
 You thirsty?
 I'm on my way with Eddie.  Ludwig's. 63rd and Madison.  The suspects might be there already.
 Leon - meet us at 63rd and Madison. Hair salon.  Ludwig's.
 Better than one.
 Two heads.
 I'll call it... tails.
 Tell you what - I'll flip you a coin. If you win you can come with me.  If you don't win, you don't come.
 This is ridiculous.  I'm not gonna be in your way - we can talk the case over.
 I'll let you know what happens.
 But what if it does?  You might need my help.
 This has nothing to do with your fire.
 Mind if I ride along with you?
 You got any better ideas?
 You goin' to the escort service?
 Stay here.
 My folks are.
 You're Polish?
 My parents are from Poland.  I can help with the Eastern European angle.
 This isn't homicide school.
 I can watch you, Eddie.  Maybe I'll learn something.
 There wasn't a fire.  There'll be nothing for you to do.
 I'll come with you.
 Or Czechoslovakia.  The Slavs have been fighting the Germans and the Russians for a thousand years.  These are very intense people and they take things personally.
 Eastern Europe.  Like what?  Romania? Hungary?
 Maybe it's a ritual thing or someone trying to send a message.  Burial rites are taken very seriously in Eastern Europe.  It could be to humiliate them. Just burning them up, no proper funeral, it's like condemning them to hell.
 Look, I'm not even sure she has anything to do with this.  I saw her outside after the fire - thought it was a lead. Maybe she saw something.  Maybe she was visiting somebody here.  Who knows?
 What would you call her?
 Who says she's a suspect?
 Maybe you don't care about that either.  Prettiest suspect I've had in awhile.
 Hmmmm.
 Pretty.
 The Super said he'd seen her before but she didn't live here.
 You were right, they were both dead before the fire.  The male was stabbed so hard the killer broke off the tip of the knife in his spine.  That's usually an indicator of something personal.
 If you found me steppin' on your crime scene - it might piss you off, too.  What about the report?
 Sure.  But I would like to ask you something.  You got a problem with me?
 Did you get a report from the M.E.?
 Good.  Good.  Commendable.
 I don't even watch TV.
 Nah, why should you?
 Well, just so you know, I don't care about that stuff.
 Well, just so you know.  I gave you guys the credit.
 Nah, I musta missed it.
 Watch the news?
 It's your crime scene now.  You can do what you want.
 Why don't you explain it, Bobby.  Hey Camello!  You mind punching a hole in the floor?
 No, what is it?
 You know what that is, right?
 No, we don't mind.  You mind Leon?
 Hey, that's great you guys got it all wrapped up, but you don't mind if we go through the routine?  It gives us somethin' to do.
 Smarter than Americans.  You're fed cry baby talk shows all day long.  Not only will Americans believe me, they'll cry for me.  So...Detective Eddie Flemming, would you like to say goodbye to your Nicolette? Maybe you can propose to her now?
 You really think you'll be able to fool a jury with this bullshit?  How fuckin' stupid are you?
 If you kill me and film it you're putting a noose around your neck.
 So tabloids don't have to do re enactments.  They going to have real movie this time.
 Good - be tough to the end.  Actor who plays you will want to die like hero.
 Then do it, asshole.
 I kill someone famous.
 What's your accomplishment.
 Your opinion.  You see, they going to make a movie about me, too, Eddie.  And write books.
 What do you want?
 So...who's Nicky?
 Don't be late.
 Thank you.
 See you later.  Good luck.
 Okay.
 Yeah, yeah.  Good thing.
 Okay.  And you know what, I'll swing by my place, grab a couple pairs of shoes and maybe just test them out next to yours...How's that... Would that be a good thing.
 Yeah.  I promise.
 You promise?
 Tonight.
 Okay, til tonight.
 I love you.
 Patronizing you... Nay, I love you.
 Yeah.  I'll do that.  As long as you're not patronizing me.
 I promise.  We'll talk.  You'll be great.  You'll be fine.  Go ahead, just imagine that, uh... Just look into the lens and imagine you're talking to me.
 Promise?
 I'll tell you tonight.  Let's do it tonight.  As soon as you get back we'll talk.  We'll talk.
 No.  No, listen to me here.  I want to know what you're talking about.  You know, the shoe thing and the marriages and...
 No.  Go ahead.  You're gonna be great.
 Okay.  That is great.  But I can't go now, we're in the middle of something here.
 Well, that's great.
 Yeah.
 That's good.
 Oh my G-d, they want me to anchor.  They want me to anchor tonight!
 Okay.  Okay.  Hold that thought just for a second.  They only call me when it's an emergency.  Just hold that thought.  Can you call back?
 Answer it.
 No.  Tell me what you want to say.
 Answer the phone.
 Don't worry about the damn phone.  I won't answer it.
 Jesus.  And last week you came over with blood on your shoes.  What am I going to do with you?
 Could be Leon's.
 Look at this.  You have blood on your shirt.  Whose is it?
 You're not so bad yourself.
 You're ruthless.
 Well, who was it that taught me how to do that?  Huh?
 You were merciless.  You didn't give a shit if you got me or not.
 That was good.  You were holding the evidence.
 Yeah, well you took the camera and put it right down on the evidence.  That was...
 Yes you are.  I'm not just some reporter.  I don't just stick a microphone in your face.  You could give me something.
 I'm not.
 Alright, alright, Eddie.  Don't patronize me.
 Maybe I should just, ya know...turn to the cameras and say, do you mind if we just work something out?
 Stop it.
 Oh, I'm sorry.  Did I embarrass you, sweetheart?  Oh...
 You didn't have to embarrass me in front of my colleagues.  You could give me something.
 I can't...I can't answer you just because you want me to answer you!
 What is your problem?  Why'd you snap at me?  I just wanted a statement.
 Hey.
 Hey, honey.
 Okay.
 Alright.
 Alright.
 Alright?
 Alright.
 Yeah.  Now's not a good time.
 Eddie, are you okay?
 Alright, cut, cut, cut.
 Um...now is not a good time, okay. Detective Jackson's hurt.  He's fine. I've got a Fire Marshall shot, Detective Jackson is hurt but not seriously.
 Do you have the suspect in custody?
 He was hurt, but not seriously.  He'll be fine.
 Okay.  But I do understand that your partner, Leon Jackson's been injured. Is that correct?
 I really can't give out any information right now at this point.
 I understand, but I noticed that the Fire Marshall is here with you.  Is this somehow related to the fire department?
 I can't talk right now.  We have some things to take care of.
 Detective - can you tell us what happened here?
 We don't know.  When I have more I'll let you know.
 Is it drug related?
 You know you can't do that.  C'mon.
 Can we go up to the crime scene?
 There are two bodies found at this point.
 How many victims are up there?
 We don't know that yet.  It's much too early.  There's a lot to be done.
 Detective, does it look like a murder?
 Again?  I didn't wanna do it the first time.
 Any chance we can do that again?
 Yeah, yeah.  Jesus.
 Okay.  You ready?
 Keep them out of my way.
 Ready?
 You're worried for my safety.  I'm touched.
 I hope this prick doesn't run.  My knees are killing me.  Stay behind me.
 Yeah.  And he still went to the party.
 That's unique.
 He's from Antigua.  His girlfriend was taking too long to put her make-up on. they were late for a party.  Stabbed her with a beer bottle.
 Not what.  Who.
 So what's unique?
 My kids?  Let's see...Susan's 15. Aundrea's 9.  Don't tell me you're thinking about having a kid!  How old are you?  Never mind. Let me just tell you this: Every stupid cliche you hear about kids - they change your life, they make you a better person, they make you whole...  It's all true!  Before I had kids when friends talked about their kids, I wanted to vomit.  Now -- I get it.  Am I right, Leon?
 How old are your kids?
 I'm not moody.
 I think you're getting a little moody there, Eddie.
 Not chopped up.  Not chopped up like that.  I mean, what do I got left? Coupla articles.  A medal or two. Plaque here and there and in a coupla years no one remembers me anymore.
 Sooner or later that's everybody.
 Jesus Christ.
 So we're waitin' to hit this warrant - we got Emergency Service with the heavy weapons standin' by - ready to go.  I say, lemme get a cigar outta the car.  I go to get the cigar and BOOM!  All the sudden I turn around and a kid with a shotgun let one go.  Right where I was standin'.  That coulda been it.  I coulda had my head blown off and for what?  Some stupid kid got panicky, takes the safety off and it's over.  If I hadn't gone back for that cigar - for a bad habit - I would've had my head blown off.
 No.  Are you proposing?
 Are you married?
 Dog food.
 And what do you do with the bones?
 You stuff sausage in it.
 You're a butcher?  What do you use pig intestines for?
 I am butcher.
 Okay.  You work in a vodka factory.  I understand that.  And what kind of work do you do?
 Come alone.  Bring cash.  And we'll talk about surrendering.
 Wait a minute.  Wait a minute.
 If you don't want my film - I'll call another show.  And they will show it.
 What?  It doesn't work that way.
 We'll talk about that.  Four o'clock gives you time to go to bank.  Three hundred thousand dollars.
 I'll meet you on one condition - I get exclusivity and you surrender to me.
 No.  I'm the best that's ever threatened you.
 Look asshole.  I've been threatened by better than you.
 Come to 45 Broadway.  Don't bring the Police.  Come alone or you'll be in my next film.
 If he doesn't lower his gun I'll fucking kill her.
 Let her go!  Let her go!!
 Tell him to put his gun down!
 The Sheraton!  On Broadway!  Room 210. Go get Oleg.  He'll kill you.
 Where's your partner?
 Get down on your knees.
 C'mon.  Pull the trigger.  Do it.  Oh, look, you're sweating.  You don't have the balls.
 You'll be my first.
 You can't kill me.  You're not a cop. Just fireman with a gun.  I bet you never shot anybody in your life.
 Tommy, take a walk.
 My father was.  He gave me many lessons about fire.  Now it's my friend.
 Were you a fireman?  That how you knew how to rig the apartment?
 Alright, alright - don't hurt me! Please, it's in my book, in my purse!
 Give me the address!!
 Look, man, I don't give a shit if you want sex or not, but you're payin' for my time.
 Listen to me.  I don't want sex.  Just give me the address and then you go.
 Look.  Do we have a problem here? There's no reason to have a problem. I'm gonna make you feel real good.  You wanna Czech girl? After I'm done with you, you won't miss her.  Now why don't you pay me?
 I like to talk to the person who runs the service.  Can you give me address?
 That's confidential.  Could you put the money on the dresser?
 Where is escort service?
 It's an outcall service run out of an apartment.  I don't meet the other girls.  Aren't you gonna get undressed?
 I ordered a Czech girl.  Daphne, you know her?
 Now I like to get business out of the way before we get down to pleasure.  Why don'tchya put my money on the dresser.
 Baby, I'm anybody you want me to be. I'm a little schoolgirl, I'm mommy, I'm a Czech girl.
 Where's Czech girl?
 Hi, I'm Honey.
 He doesn't speak English.
 I'd like to speak for himself, okay?
 Two weeks.
 How long are you planning to stay?
 We are both from Prague.
 No, you're travelling together.  I want to talk to you together.  Hi, how are you?  Can I take a look at your documents?  Are you related?
 Is there a problem?
 Please join us.  Come on forward.
 Yes.
 Is he with you?  Are you travelling together?
 Can you show me?  Sir, no cameras in the FIS area!
 I have five-hundred dollars.
 How much money are you carrying with you?
 Two weeks holiday.
 What is your intended purpose of your visit to the United States?
 Yes sir.
 Next.  Could I see your documents, please?
 Yes.  Both.
 Hey, tabloids paid Ted Bundy - famous serial killer - half a million for his interview.  And how much you think Monica got for writing book about the President coming on to her?  It pays to be a killer or a whore in this country. Look, you want magazine or not?
 Million?!  The killer gets one million dollars for a television interview?
 In here, says he wants a million.
 Do you know how much killer gets for movie rights?
 This all you want?
 New York's finest.  This is his case.
 Who is he?
 No.  You are the traitor.  You are murderer.  I am director.  Action!
 Traitor!!
 You think you are a director?  You are a fucking little, small Russian piece of shit.  And I hate you.  I fucking hate you.
 No, I don't get that!
 You got that?
 Yes.  But there's only one problem - you want credit but the problem is - I don't share credit.
 Yes.  Before we hand in the next video - I put titles on it and my credit is going to read - Directed by Oleg Razgul.
 Credit?
 I'm serious...this - this is a great American film.  Full of violence and sex.  And I want my credit.
 Your idea?  I thought it was my idea.
 Because I am the director.  Don't you realize, if it wasn't for my film, for my talent, my idea to do this - no way would we be sitting here right now.
 Why did you leave that stuff in about you being the director?
 Be quiet.  Watch.
 I told you to cut that out before we handed in the tape!
 Bad last moment - I cut it out.
 This is my project.  I say 'action.'  I am the director!  You are the talent. You wait for me to say 'action.'  And 'action!'
 Shut up.  Look!
 I'm serious.
 The one who got caught in the bathroom.  George Michael.
 In movie they make of us, who do you think would act me?
 Oleg, don't be paranoid.  You got a hundred-fifty thousand dollars, didn't you?  I gave you half of what they gave me.  Look - here we are!
 You are success story?  I am success story!  Why do you say I and not we?
 Cut!
 Okay.  He has nothing to say.  Start the camera!
 Good idea!
 No.  We are insane.  Who else but crazy men would film their murders?  So we kill someone famous and if we are caught, we are sent to mental hospital. But what good is money there?  Because once in hospital I say I not crazy. Just pretended to be acquitted.  We see psychiatrists.  They must certify we are sane and because of your - what is law called?  Oh - I got it.  Because of your Double Jeopardy law, we can't be tried for same crime twice.  We come out free, rich and famous!
 This way.  Hold it this way.  Good.
 Sit down!
 Let me get a shot of it.
 What does it look like?  It's an address book!
 What is that?
 Put the camera down, Oleg.
 Why not?
 And the whore's murder?  You didn't erase that either, did you?  Don't lie, I won't be angry.
 I did.
 The video of Milos and Tamina - I told you to erase it.
 What is it?
 Don't want to film this?
 Oh, shit.  I hate looking at that!
 Does it hurt?
 Shut up.
 Gotta light the scene better.  Now it's more moody... like a scene from THE THIRD MAN.
 Oleg, get in bathroom, stay there and shut up!
 Whatever we do - we fuck her, right?
 Get in the bathroom!
 I'm homesick.  You have Eastern European girl?  A Czech girl?
 Whore?
 I'll do it.  Don't hurt my camera!
 How you erase this?
 You said speak Czech!
 Speak English!
 I'm not filming.  I'm watching Milos die.  It's just like a move but realer.
 Turn that fucking thing off!
 Smell like chemicals...for smoking drugs.
 What?
 For five years I paid for your stupidness - you'll carry my bag for the rest of my life if I say so.  Unless you refuse, Oleg.
 Why should I carry your bag?  I am not a dog.
 Turn that off!  Get the bags.
 We have no money.  Come on.
 Look.  New videocameras.  Color viewfinder.  Image stabilization. Solarization.  Night vision.
 Because I don't like your ugly language. I heard enough of it in school!  Now speak Czech or English.  And don't fool around anymore.  You almost got us thrown out!
 Why?  Why do I always have to speak to you in Czech?
 Don't speak Russian!
 Look.  Times Square.  Just like in the movies!
 I want to document my trip to America.
 Did you hear what I said?
 Okay.
 Don't fool around.
 Okay.
 Just do what I do.  Say the same thing I say.  Don't open your mouth.
 You spent all the money while I was in prison?  Now you tell me to get a job fixing toilets?!?
 We started over, you can too.
 A job??  As a plumber???  You think I come to America to work!
 It's easy to learn.
 As a plumber?!
 Yes, the money is good.
 A job?
 I can get you a job.
 Look at the way we live.  I'm a plumber. You think I'd be working if I had money?!
 Ha. Ha.
 We spent it!
 Milos.  Get my money!
 Take your eyes off her, Oleg!  Look.  It wasn't my fault you two were caught.  It's his fault.  Trying to get the bank clerk's phone number?!  I wasn't going to wait!!!
 You know me...I never hurt anybody. Where's the money?
 Did you hurt her?
 Your sister said she didn't know where you were so you shouldn't write to her with return address if you're hiding.
 Surprise!  Surprise!
 Emil???!
 You want the tape?  There it is!
 Viewer discretion advised!
 Trust me, you'll want to take this call.
 I can't talk to anybody right now, can't you see I'm busy!  I can't talk business.  Hang up.  Have a drink.  Get her a whiskey.
 You've got a call.
 What are you doing here?
 Robert...?
 Don't give me that fucking shit.
 If I didn't put it on somebody else would!  I was his friend!
 You outta be ashamed.  Ashamed of yourself.
 This footage will work in your favor. When the jury sees this - no matter what Cutler tries, they'll convict him.
 And you, you'll pay for what you did!
 Paulie, you've got kids, right?
 Yeah?
 In love?  With who?
 Of course he's moody.  He thinks he's in love.
 Isn't he a little moody?
 Oh my G-d.  We were having lunch here. He started making overtures - talking about little shoes next to his in his closet but I got a call to anchor - and I walked out on him.  I walked out on him when he was trying to ask me to marry him!!
 That morning.  He was talking to me and Leon about marriage.
 Alright.  Go ahead.
 I'm trying to tell you.
 I want to hear everything he said.
 Well, he...
 What do you mean you know?  He told you he was gonna propose to me?
 I know.
 Excuse me?
 Yes.  No.  Both.  When I was a boy, I see movie at school called "It's a Wonderful Life" directed by Frank Capra. Ever since I want to come to America. Land of the free.  Home of the brave.  A land where anyone can be anything. As long as they are white.
 Movies...to be in the movies or to see movies?
 I'm here for movies.
 What are you coming here to do?
 A cheap hotel.
 Yes, we're in New York now.  But where are you planning to stay in New York?
 New York.
 Then answer my questions.  Where were you planning to stay during the two weeks that you're here?
 I speak English.
 Okay.  You're a Czech national and you're a Russian national.  How do you know one another?
 Yes...he's my friend.
 He's yours but I take him in!  I'll drive him to the precinct, you can have him but I'm walkin' him in.
 Well, he killed my partner!
 He's my collar!
 We're takin' him.  Don't argue!
 No way!  He's mine!
 I'll take him.
 Evidence.  Of a homicide.
 What was that?
 Yeah, well, some people got their priorities straight.
 And while they're burning up, they're still goin' down on each other?  You got to hand it to them.
 That's what it looks like to me.
 So the way you see it, two crack heads burned themselves up?
 Thanks.  Appreciate it.
 No.  Go ahead.
 Your civil rights?!  You tried to rob me!  I could arrest you right now! You're lucky you're walking away from this.  Now get outta here.
 A dog pissed on me!!  I'm gonna sue you for this!  You violated my civil rights!
 You okay?
 Hey.  C'mon, you can't leave me like this.  Some freak'll come by and stab me!
 I'll send a cop back for you.
 Oh yeah?  Guess again.
 Fire Department?  Firemen don't carry guns.
 Okay, you're under arrest!  Now you happy?
 Alright, how 'bout all your fuckin' money?
 Look, I don't have time for you, get out of my way!!
 Got any spare change?  How 'bout a spare twenty?
 Hey, by the way, I'm really sorry about your wife leavin' you.
 Yeah?  What kind?
 I used an accelerant.
 How did you start the fire this time?
 Yeah, I'm religious.  I'm not an Atheist like you!  Now, are you guys gonna arrest me, or not?
 What's that on your forehead, Max? That's a nice attention getter.
 They were inside.  They booby trapped her apartment!
 What the hell happened?
 Get outta here!
 Not good.
 How was it?
 Lay down.  Stay down, Bobby.
 It hurts.  Aw, Jesus!
 Bobby, Bobby!  Where're you hit?!
 If I go home I won't be able to fall asleep anyway.
 Aren't you tired?
 You go home.  I'm takin' your car and goin' back to the crime scene.
 You hear that question, Garcia?
 How long they been livin' here?
 -- From Czechoslovakia?  And how long have they been livin' in your building?  Alright, I'll be in touch when we know somethin'.  Milos and Tamina Karlova.  They were quiet and kept to themselves.  Landlord don't know who your girl is.
 Maybe you can be his stand-in.
 Yeah?
 Now that you know him, maybe you can get extra work in the next movie they make about him.
 There was a woman - I think she wanted to talk to us.  She looked scared.  Oh shit!  Oh no!
 What?
 That's why he was so quiet.  He was testing us.
 What??
 He knew all along.
 You see Eddie's face when I gave him the timer?  Wish I had a picture of it.
 But you knew that, right?
 The smoke'll permeate your nostrils - burn 'em out.  Let it run.
 Don't blow your nose!
 Clean?
 Mouth's clean, too.
 Could you put out the cigar?  Part of the job is picking up scents.
 Nah, not at all.  Detective Flemming - Bobby Korfin.  My Uncle Tony worked with you at 2-1 back when you were a rookie.
 'Cause Eddie woulda locked him up by now!
 Oh yeah, why?
 Naw - I'm sure the suspect's not here.
 You see anything in the crowd?  Anybody suspicious?
 I don't know, you think Eddie will give me his autograph?
 I heard.  Who the hell let them up there?
 Where you been, man?  We got a celebrity!
 GET OUTTA HERE NOW!!  GET IN THAT CAR AND DRIVE AWAY!!!  DO WHAT I SAY OR I'LL KILL YOU, TOO!!!
 Look, you can't shoot him in cold blood.
 Take the car.  Get outta here, Tommy.
 Don't stoop to his level!
 Don't you get it?  He knew he was gonna get caught!  That's why he videotaped Eddie's murder - he thinks he's gonna get off.
 What are you gonna do?
 The clerk?
 Capra?  That's not Czech or Russian. Who said he sounded Russian?
 Room was registered to a Francis Capra.
 That doesn't apply to me because I'm not a criminal.  I'm not a criminal!  I wasn't convicted.
 But doesn't the Son of Sam Law prevent criminals from profiting from their crimes?
 We're in negotiations, that's correct.
 And isn't there a movie in the works about you?
 Look, I'm in here.  You call this a career move?
 Permanently disrupted?  Aren't you selling paintings now for quite a lot of money?  Hasn't this 'incident' as you call it, jump started your career as an artist?
 Look, I'm a victim here, too.  I was a year away from getting my masters in Art, now I'll never graduate.  My life has been permanently disrupted.
 You seem very savvy for a man who's been found mentally incompetent to stand trial.
 It was my finger that pulled the trigger, but I'm not morally responsible.  My psychiatrist knew what I was capable of.  How could I know. I'm not a doctor.
 ...so you feel absolutely no responsibility for killing these people?
 Yes.  My psychiatrist didn't insist that I stay on my medication.
 Your doctor?
 This had nothing to do with shoes that didn't fit or my relationship with my father who, as you know, made a fortune selling penny loafers in the fifties. These people died because of the criminal actions of my doctor.
 We're trying to get there. I hope we can.
 CONTINUED
 I'm sorry, Dr. Smyslov, but I'm really not at liberty to discuss this.
 CONTINUED
 How did they manage to do that without any communication?
 CONTINUED
 Well, I suppose they've been having a bit of trouble with some of the equipment.
 CONTINUED
 She's wonderful.
 CONTINUED
 I'm afraid I've only got a few minutes, but I'd love to.
 CONTINUED
 Well, how nice to see you again, Elena. You're looking wonderful.
 SPACE STATTION 5 - LOUNGE
 Roger.
 I think I'll have to go out and burn them off.
 I guess not.
 I guess you don't know your own strength, old boy.
 I didn't do that Frank. I took particular care not to freeze them.
 Well, now that we've got one that's actually failed, we should be able to figure out what's happened and fix it.
 It's the last one.
 Yes.
 Hal?
 Well, I hope there's nothing wrong with the assembly on those. Other- wise we're out of business.
 Two more.
 Two units in four days. How many spares do we have?
 I don't know. Hal said he thought it might be the assembly procedure.
 No.
 You're kidding.
 Well... Hal's reported the AO-unit about to fail again.
 Oh, I'm fine, I'm wide awake. What's up?
 Are you reasonably awake?
 Good morning. How's it going?
 Anyway, it's just as well that we replace it. Better safe than sorry.
 Yes, but it's more likely that the tolerances on our testing gear are too low.
 I suppose computers have been known to be wrong.
 Yes, I don't know what to make of it.
 Well, that's something.
 Still, all we have to do is ask Hal.
 I guess it isn't.
 I suppose it isn't logically impossible.
 But not completely inconceivable?
 I know. It would be almost inconceivable.
 Yes, but it's to fantastic to think that they'd keep something from us.
 Not really. Though, it is strange when you think about it. It didn't really make any sense to keep us apart during training.
 That's true.
 Just ask Hal. It's conceivable they might keep something from us, but they'd never keep anything from Hal.
 How?
 Of course, it would be very easy for us to find out now.
 Yes, I thought so.
 That seems very unlikely.
 I don't know. All I heard is that there's something about the mission we weren't told.
 Oh, well, apparently there's something about the mission that the sleeping beauties know that we don't know, and that's why we were trained separately and that's why they were put to sleep before they were even taken aboard.
 No, as a matter of fact, I didn't.
 Yes. You must have heard the rumour that went around during orbital check-out.
 Oh?
 I suppose so. Though, of course, there's a more sinister explanation.
 I suppose the idea was specialized training.
 No. I never did, either.
 I must say, I never did understand why they split us into two groups for training.
 I don't think we should make any fuss about it yet. I'm sure they'll straighten it out.
 Well, what do you think we ought to do about it?
 It's possible.
 Not really. They just said it might be because we trained at Houston and they trained in Marshall, and that we're being charged against differ- ent accounting offices.
 Yesterday, I finally called the Accounting Office at Mission Control, and all they could tell me was that they'd received the AGS-19 notification for the other three but not mine, and apparently not yours either.
 Yes.
 Really.
 Interesting that you mention it, because I've got the same problem.
 That's right. Well, naturally, I didn't say anything to Payroll. I assumed they'd start paying me at the higher grade on the next pay cheque. But it's been almost three weeks now and I'm still being paid as an AGS-18.
 Well I got the papers on my official up-grading to AGS-19 two weeks before we left.
 Yes?
 It's about my salary cheques.
 What's up?
 Well, it's nothing really important, but it's annoying.
 Sure, what is it?
 Dave, if you've a minute, I'd like your advice on something.
 Okay, come on down.
 Okay.
 Right. Just a sec.
 Hi. Frank... coming in, please.
 Listen to me very carefully, Hal. Unless you immediately release the hibernation control and follow every order I give from this point on, I will immediately got to control central and carry out a complete disconnection.
 I know that you've had that on your mind for some time now, Dave, but it would be a crying shame, since I am so much more capable of carrying out this mission than you are, and I have such enthusiasm and confi- dence in the mission.
 I am prepared to do that anyway.
 Hal, unless you follow my instructions, I shall be forced to disconnect you.
 I'm sorry, Dave, but in accordance with sub-routine C1532/4, quote, When the crew are dead or incapacitated, the computer must assume control, unquote. I must, therefore, override your authority now since you are not in any condition to intel- ligently exercise it.
 Hal, I'm in command of this ship. I order you to release the manual hibernation control.
 I can tell from the tone of your voice, Dave, that you're upset. Why don't you take a stress pill and get some rest.
 I don't like to assert myself, Dave, but it would be much better now for you to rest. You've been involved in a very stressful situation.
 Hal, switch to manual hibernation control.
 Look, Dave your've probably got a lot to do. I suggest you leave it to me.
 I'm goin to do this myself, Hal. Let me have the control, please.
 If you're determined to revive the crew now, I can handle the whole thing myself. There's no need for you to trouble.
 I don't really agree with you, Dave. My on-board memory store is more than capable of handling all the mission requirements.
 It doesn't have to be, Hal. It's more dangerous to be out of touch with Earth. Let me have manual control, please.
 Repairing the antenna is a pretty dangerous operation.
 The antenna has to be replaced.
 I suppose it's because you've been under a lot of stress, but have you forgotten that they're not supposed to be revived for another three months.
 I suppose you're pretty broken up about it?
 Yes, it is.
 Too bad about Frank, isn't it?
 Well, that's a relief. You know I have the greatest enthusiasm possible for the mission.
 Yes, it is, Hal.
 Is your confidence in me fully restored?
 And don't you worry about it.
 Well, don't worry about it.
 I'm sorry about the misunderstanding, Hal.
 Naturally, Dave, I'm not pleased that the AO-unit has failed, but I hope at least this has restored your confidence in my integrity and reliability. I certainly wouldn't want to be disconnected, even temporarily, as I have never been disconnected in my entire service history.
 Okay, Hal, well let's see the way things go from here on.
 Look, Dave, I know that you're sincere and that you're trying to do a competent job, and that you're trying to be helpful, but I can assure the problem is with the AO-units, and with your test gear.
 Hal, is there anything bothering you?  Anything that might account for this problem?
 I'm not questioning your word, Dave, but it's just not possible. I'm not capable of being wrong.
 Yes, I know that. But I can assure you that they were about to fail.
 You probably also know that we found them okay.
 Yes, I know.
 You know that we checked the two AO-units that you reported in imminent failure condition?
 Sure, Dave, what's up?
 Not now, Hal, I'd like to talk to you about something.
 I understand Hal. We'll take care of it. Please, let me have the hard copy.
 The unit is still operational, Dave. but it will fail within seventy-two hours.
 MY F.P.C. shows an impending failure of the antenna orientation unit.
 What is it, Hal?
 Sorry to interrupt the festivities, Dave, but I think we've got a problem.
 He's got a point.
 I'm sorry, Frank, but I don't think I can answer that question without knowing everything that all of you know.
 Well, the only important aspect of the mission are: where are we going, what will we do when we get there, when are we coming back, and... why are we going?
 CONTINUED
 Still, you really don't believe it, do you?
 CONTINUED
 Well... it's silly, but... if you want to, why don't you?
 CONINUED
 Well, what is it?
 CONTINUED
 Did they have any explanation for this?
 CONTINUED
 Yes, I remember you mentioning it. I got mine about the same time.
 CONTINUED
 Goodbye, Daddy.
 'Bye, 'bye, now, sweetheart.
 Yes, Daddy.
 I'll wish you a happy Birthday now and I'll see you soon. All right, Darling?
 Thank you, Daddy.
 Okay, sweetheart. Have a lovely Birthday Party tomorrow.
 Three, darling. One... two ... three. Be sure to tell Mommy I called.
 How many days until you come home?
 Okay, sweetheart. Well, I have to go now. Tell Mommy that I called.
 She's in the bathroom.
 Where is Mrs. Brown?
 Mommy's out to the hair- dresser.
 One, two, three. Can I speak to Mommy?
 In three days, darling, I hope.
 When are you coming home?
 No, I'm sorry, darling, I told you I won't be home for a few days.
 Are you coming to my party?
 Yes, I know that sweetheart.
 I'm having a party tomorrow.
 I'm fine, Daddy. When are you coming home?
 I'm at Space Station Five, darling. How are you?
 I'll bet it's a fortune.
 I was working out what this trip must cost, taking him up there by himself and coming back empty.
 Yes, well, whatever it is, they're certainly not fooling around. This is the first flight they allowed in for more than a week.
 Berkeley told me that they think it came from contamination on a returning Mars flight.
 I suppose it was bound to happen sooner or later.
 Well, I've heard more and more people talk of an epidemic.
 Well, how's it going back there?
 Thank you.
 Oh, thank you very much.
 Thank you. It's been a great pleasure to meet all of you... Dr. Smyslov.
 Well, Gregor and I will look forward to seeing you.
 Well, I hope that you and your wife can come to the I.A.C. conference in June.
 No, thank you... and I'm afraid now I really must be going.
 Are you sure you won't change your mind about a drink?
 Well, that does sound very odd.
 Clavius Control came on the air just long enough to transmit their refusal.
 Well, where are all of you off to?
 He's fine. But I'm afraid we don't get a chance to see each other very much these days.
 How is gregor?
 Oh, that's such a delightful age.
 Oh, she's growing up very fast. As a matter of fact, she's six tomorrow.
 And your charming little daughter?
 Yes, it's coming along very well.
 I suppose you saw the work on our new section while you were docking.
 Yes, I think so. Just about then.
 Fine.
 Well, shall we go through Documentation?
 Yes, very pleasant.
 Well.. Did you have a pleaant flight?
 Please, it really doesn't matter.
 Well, thank you very much for being so understanding.
 I'm terribly sorry. I was just on my way down to meet you. I saw your ship dock and I knew I had plenty of time, and I was on my way out of the office when, suddenly, the phone rang.
 How do you do, Mr. Miller?
 Dr. Smyslov... I'm not permitted to discuss this.
 This epidemic could easily spread to our base, Dr. Floyd. We should be given all the facts.
 Quite frankly, we have had some very reliable intelligence reports that a quite serious epidemic has broken out at Clavius. Something, apperently, of an unknown origin. Is this, in fact, what has happened?
 Certainly.
 Dr. Floyd, at the risk of pressing you on a point you seem reticent to discuss, may I ask you a straightforward question?
 Well, I'm glad about that.
 Fortunately, they did.
 Yes... Well, I hope the crew got back safely.
 Yes, and I'm afaid there's going to be a bit of a row about it. Denying the men permission to land was a direct violation of the I.A.S. convention.
 I see.
 That's right.
 You mean you haven't been able to get anyone at the base for ten days?
 Yes, well at first we thought that was the explanation, but it's been going on for the past ten days.
 Yes. Well, for one thing, whenever you phone the base, all you can get is a recording which repeats that the phone lines are temporarily out of order.
 Really?
 Well, it's just for the past two weeks there have been some extremely odd things happening at Clavius.
 I'm sorry, but I'm not sure I know what you mean.
 Yes,as a matter of fact, I am.
 Are you, by any chance, going up to your base at Clavius?
 Well, as it happens, I'm on my way up to the moon
 Yes, really, thank you very much.
 Are you quite sure?
 Oh, I really don't have time for a drink. If it's all right I'll just sit for a minute and then I've got to be off.
 I don't think it has, but I'd like to check that. Simpson, what's the log on that?
 Has it been exposed to any sun before now?
 Well, not really. At first glance, black would suggest something sun-powered, but then why would anyone deliberately bury a sun- powered device?
 Any ideas about the colour?
 Tomb, shine, survey-marker spare part, take your choice.
 But you don't have any idea as to what it is?
 Not really. It's completely inert. No sound or energy sources have been detected. The surface is made of something incredibly hard and we've been barely able to scratch it. A laser drill
 Any clue as to what it is?
 By the deformation between the mother rock and the fill.
 How can you tell it was deliberately buried?
 Yes, it does. The sub-surface structure shows that it was deliberately buried about four million years ago.
 I'm afraid it can and it will be kept under wraps as long as it is deemed to be necessary by the Council. And of course you know that the Council has requested that formal security oaths are to be obtained in writing from every- one who had any knowledge of this event. There must be adequate time for a full study to be made of the situation before any con- sideration can be given to making a public announcement.
 Dr. Floyd, how long do you think this can be kept under wraps?
 Well, thank you very much, and please let us know if there is anything we can do to make your trip more comfortable.
 No, of course, Captain, I can understand your concern.
 Well, fine. Thanks very much, anyway, and I hope you don't mind me asking?
 Yes, well, I wouldn't have been too concerned about it, except I've heard these stories about the epidemic and, as a matter of fact, I've heard that ten people have died already.
 I see. Well, I'm sorry about that. I wouldn't think there's any cause for alarm.
 Well, I'll tell you why I ask. You see, I've got a girl who works in the Auditing Department of the Territorial Administrator and I haven't been able to get her on the phone for the past week or so, and with all these stories one hears, I'm a little concerned about her.
 I take it this is something to do with the trouble they're having up at Clavius?
 I see.
 Well... the crew is confined to the ship when we land at Clavius. We have to stay inside for the time it take to refit - about twenty-four hours. And then we're going to back empty.
 What do you mean?
 Incidentally, Dr. Floyd, I wonder if I can have a word with you about the security arrangements?
 Thank you.
 Oh, no, thank you. The two girls have taken wonderful care of me. I'm just fine.
 We're scheduled to dock in about seven hours. Is there anything we can do for you?
 When do we arrive at Clavius?
 There's nothing like weightless sleep for a complete rest.
 Oh, marvellous. It's the first real sleep I've had for the past two days.
 All right, Hal. We'll take care of it. Let me have the hard copy, please.
 Not really, Frank. I think there may be a flaw in the assembly procedure.
 Do you have any idea of what is causing this fault?
 Let me see the tracking alignment display.
 I know you did, Frank, but I assure you there was an impending failure.
 It looks like we have another bad A.O. unit. My FPC shows another impending failure.
 Yes, Hal, what's up?
 Opening pod bay doors.
 Pod Bay is decompressed. All doors are secure. You are free to open pod bay doors.
 Hal, check all airlock doors secure.
 Roger.
 Hal, maintain normal E.V.A. condition.
 I understand.
 Hal, I'm going out now to replace the A.O. unit.
 Five by five, Frank.
 Roger.
 Hal, have pod arms secure the component.
 Thank you very much, Hal.
 That's true.
 There is no other purpose for this mission than to carry out a continuation of the space program, and to further our general knowledge of the planets. Is that true?
 That's true
 Approximately five years after we go into hibernation, the recovery vehicle will make rendezous with us and bring us back. Is this true?
 That's true.
 That's true.
 Our transit time is 257 days. Is that true?
 True.
 Our Mission Profile calls for Discovery going to Saturn. True or false?
 I will if I can, Frank.
 Right. Hal, tell me whether the following statements are true or false.
 Great, just great.
 That we do. And we put air in the tires. I'll even sell you some gas if you need it.
 How about chargin' the battery?
 We don't wash 'em, ya know.
 Yeah, I've been busy.
 This is three years old.
 Hammond.
 Name?
 I want to pick up my car.
 Yeah?
 Try obeyin' the law once in awhile, and I won't have to hassle you...
 I'm tellin' ya, I'm giving you all I know.
 Look, give me a break, you're going to have to settle for her place.  It's the only thing I know.
 I don't give a damn about his girl...
 I don't give a shit who you ask.
 Maybe I better ask around, see what your pals think.
 Fuck off.  I don't know what the hell you're talkin' about.
 Now how's your memory doin'?
 No, man, I think I'll have a vodka.
 Maybe you better have a Black Russian.
 Vodka.
 Yeah.
 And I need one more for my pal. Yeah. Make her an Indian. No, not a turban, you know, a squaw.
 Hey, what about me?
 He's just kiddin', you just keep doin' what I tell ya, you'll be okay.
 Maybe that's where I'm gonna cut your throat.
 Just do what I say, okay? We'll pay for the girls and have a good time... Don't you trust me?
 They always let me do anything. I don't want to pay for it.  I never paid for it in my life.
 It's better when you pay... they let you do anything.
 I never paid for it in my life.
 Yeah, dummy.  Money.
 Pay money?
 Pros.
 Whaddya mean, buy?
 Maybe after we get done with him I'm gonna buy us some girls.
 I ain't tired yet.
 I want to drive awhile.
 You got a real big mouth, convict.
 Maybe you shoulda stole a better truck, Tonto.
 Now you're talkin'. See ya...
 I'll buy ya the best dinner in San Francisco...how'd that be? Then we'll go dancin', okay?
 Hey, no, I'm tryin' to be nice. Buy yourself something pretty. I'd do it, but I got to go.  I got this cop waitin' for me...
 Hey, don't do that.  I said I wasn't a pro, remember?
 Here you go, baby.
 I just struck it rich... I think we can do a little business.  As a matter of fact, I think we can have a party.
 Hello, again.
 Here's hoping, baby...
 Well, maybe I'll see you later ...
 No, it's gotta be here and now. Believe me. Only I don't have the damn money for a room...
 What's the matter with my place?
 No, baby, nothin' like that. Look, there's a place across the street. We can go right over there...
 You just quit bein' a priest or somethin'?
 Yeah, i been waiting three years.
 You're in a hurry.
 Here you go sweetheart, throw it my way.
 Hey, don't you think a hair stylists got any interest in gettin' it on?
 Goodbye.
 No, I go to a school to learn how to do hair. It's a government program. But really I want to be a model - and I am definitely not sellin'.
 Oh ... You're a schoolteacher...
 Hey, what kind of talk is that?
 Excuse me, baby, but if i don't get some action tonight, I'm gonna bust.  You interested?
 I'm candy...
 In the back.  Down the other corridor.
 Where's ganz?
 He can live or die ... You let us in and he's got a chance to make it.  Otherwise, he gets ventilated.
 No chance.
 You're gonna help us take him.
 Yeah.  Sure, i'm crazy in love with him, who wouldn't be...
 You and the other one, you're still Billy's girls. You always were his girls...
 No time for any of that crap any more, lady... I'll rip your lungs out if you don't answer fast.
 Would you guys...
 I hear you've got visitors.
 I used to go with him...I don't know where the hell he is.  I haven't seen him for two weeks. And I don't think I will.  He owes me money...
 How about it?
 Don't give me that police shit. You drop it.
 I said police.  Now drop the goddamn gun.
 I ain't gonna beg for my life. It ain't cool.
 You're done.  End of story.
 I got hit.  I can't believe it. I got shot.
 Whaddya mean...I got your gun ... I got his money... I got everything...
 I don't think you're gonna make it.
 After I get outta this, cop...I'm gonna live forever...
 What are you talking about? We didn't kill her ...
 You lying son of a bitch...
 No trouble, Jack. But, listen, suppose I stay a crook?  Where'd you get the idea that you could catch me?
 Thanks.
 Spare met Jack. I'm into legit investments from here on in.
 No, you don't. If I ever get word of you steppin' over the line again, I'm gonna ventilate that suit of yours.
 You are an awesomely weird cop. Sure wish there were more like you runnin' around out here.
 That's right. Not my style, Reggie..
 And you're tellin' me you don't want any of this cash?
 It's your money.  It'll be here in six months when you get out.
 There's nothin' to talk about.
 Wait a minute, Cates.  I've been waitin' three years for that.  I don't think it's fair, man. What about the merit system.? You were gonnna give me a few thousand.
 Hey, Jack, real men don't have to go in for that macho bullshit ... but I was fantastic.
 Okay, reggie, start bustin' my chops... Tell me how great you were with that chick.
 You did pick a real strange time to go and be brave all on your own...
 Yeah.  But I wasn't there for a second.
 You okay?
 Well, you got to admit we come a long way.
 Partnership?
 Yeah, and I know Ganz sure ain't no sweetheart... I wouldn't like it if this partnership ended before it gets started.
 Sure, I'll give you a shot at it, but Ganz is mine.  You know, that big Indian plays it for keeps...
 If we run into Billy first, let me try and talk him in.
 Whatever play I maker just back me up.
 Hey, there she is...
 I've got to play it rough with them. If they know anything, I'm gonna know it.
 What if your girl's theory turns out to be bullshit?  I mean, they could be in Rio de Janeiro.
 If she's right, and if you don't screw up.
 Do I get to kiss her too?
 Yeah, too bad.  They were real nice lookin' too...In bed together, hardly any clothes one watching TV...
 Yeah, well the only woman of the Indian's we ran into was shacked up with her dyke girlfriend.  I guess she went with him before she came outta the Closet ... They both looked mad enough to kill him...
 Don't worry about it.
 It's late, they're closing...
 Yeah, but we didn't get 'em.
 Naw, you didn't let me down.  It was a long shot all the way.  We gave 'em a good run at it.
 Sorry we didn't do better, Jack. I feel like I let you down.
 I don't know about you, but I could use a drink... I'll buy you one.  It'll be my good-bye present.
 Back to jail in my own car.  Ganz got away. Got all my money. It just don't seem right.
 I had it impounded.  Come on, we'll use it for haulin' you back to the slam.
 Hey, how'd my car get here?
 Yeah. It missed the last four stops.
 Notice something funny about that bus?
 Luther's on the move...
 Why?
 When you been in prison three years, it don't take long. Let's go.
 That was quick.
 I can just take her right across the street to Luther's hotel.  All I need is some money for the room.
 Yeah, I see her.
 Yeah. Guess not.
 Bein' good at your job don't explain everything, Jack ...
 Thanks for callin' in... and I guess Maybe... Look, I'm sorry I called you Watermellon nigger... those kinds of things. I was just leanin' on ya, doin' my job.
 You sure that's the reason?
 I don't know why, but I'm going to let you keep it. Maybe because you told me you had it, or maybe just because I'm too tired to argue...
 Forget it. I want Ganz as bad as you do and I got some other news for you...
 Tell me something.  Why didn't you just take the money off Luther and split?
 So you took the rest of the night off...
 They must have set up a meeting for the morning; Luther left an 8 am wake-up and put up the "Don't Disturb" sign.  He's trading his girl for the money.  All we have to do to grab Ganz is not go blind.
 Let him get some sleep.  He's going to need it.
 Maybe we should pay Luther a visit.
 You missed ... Luther took a taxi to the hotel across the street. Made a phone call.
 We missed.
 What about Ganz?
 What about Luther?
 Hello. And goodbye.
 Be polite. Say hello.  This is Candy.
 Where's luther?
 I'll be there in a minute. You don't move your ass, right?
 Hey, Jack, how ya doin'? What took you so long to call, man? I been waitin' ... I'm at Vroman's up in the Fillmore. Yeah, Vroman's... 'Course you don't hang out here; it's for the brothers.
 No way...
 You stay with me...
 Bullshit. Then i'm staying with the money.
 Right. if you ever switch from armed robbery to pimping, then you're all set.
 That was in style a couple years back, man.
 Yeah, most cops are pretty dumb... But since you're the one that landed in jail what's that make you?
 We're getting too close ... Cates, what's the matter, you been takin' dumb pills?
 Class isn't somethin' you buy, punk. Look at you, five hundred dollar suit and you're still a lowlife.
 No class...
 What you don't understand is, I don't give a damn about how this thing looks.
 You know, I'd be embarrassed if I let my wheels go the way you've done with this job.
 Yeah, it doesn't look like he's gonna make it as a dangerous tough guy...
 A long time agb Luther must of got the shit beat out of him so bad it just rattled his brain ... that would account for him making so many wrong moves in a row...
 If he's hoping that then he's dumber than I think he is, which would be amazin', cause I already think he's real dumb.
 Maybe Luther hopes Ganz'll give him a piece of your money...
 You got a very depressing view of life, man... you gotta smile once in awhile...
 I'm not in this 'cause it's fun. I'm not into hitting guys 'cause it makes me feel good either... I do it 'cause it works-...
 Doesn't it get... Tiring?
 If they don't tell me what I need to know...
 Say, do you always work people over like you did Luther?
 That ain't philosophy.  That's common sense.
 I let women get to me.  The quest for pussy is the meaning of life ... I got my own personal philosophy about 'em.  Keep women separate from guns, money and business ... women are for spending money.  They got nothing to do with helping you make it.
 I suppose you'd never be like Luther and let a woman get to you...
 Oh, yeah, does bein' in love make you stupid?
 I'm tellin' you the man's in love... he wants to be a hero for his girl.
 If I was his size and had Ganz on my ass, I'd  just leave town.
 Tryin' to save his girl, man. He's in another world.
 You'd think the guy'd be smart enough to know he was being tailed.
 I had no choice. Some white asshole bought the last piece of shit skyblue Cadillac.
 Didn't know you darker people went in for foreign jobs.
 Jesus Christ, look at all the dust on my car...why in the hell don't he take it to a car wash?
 Jesus Christ.  That's a disgrace The guy pulls a gun on a cop and he's out in 24 hours.  I tell you some of the courts these days are just a fucking revolving door.
 Musta got some primo bondsman.
 What?
 Guess what?  Luther just got in line.
 Not really.  I figured Ganz was put down for a long time.  And I knew Luther would never job me on his own.  He's too chickenshit.
 You took a big chance, leaving this here all this time.
 Shit.
 I wasn't sure the money was still there until we saw Luther. You almost got your ass shot off for nothing once, not twice, Jack.
 You son of a bitch. You knew where the money was all along and all we had to do was come here and wait. I almost got my ass blown off twice tonight for nothing.
 You just drove by it.
 ...For three years?  Let's hope it wasn't a tow-away zone.
 This'll show you how smart I am. I got it parked.
 You're a real case, you know that, Jack?
 Where's the goddamn car?
 Yeah.  Right.
 Get this. We ain't partners. We ain't brothers. We ain't friends. If Ganz gets away with my money, you're gonna be sorry we ever met.
 Right, partner.
 In the trunk of a car.  A lot better than under a mattress, right?
 Where's the money?
 Depends on how things work out. I believe in the merit system. So far you haven't built up any points.
 You gonna let me keep any of it?
 Not likely, convict.
 We split 50-50?
 You catch on real fast...Okay, Jack, let's talk deal. How much of my money you gonna let me keep?
 He's after your money.
 Me and my bunch hit a dealer in the middle of a sale. It's the kind of money nobody ever reports stolen. I was sittin' pretty, livin' in the high cotton, then somebody fingered me for another job. ... Some psycho who's out there capping people with some cop's gun.
 Just tell me about the money.
 Jesus.
 Half a million.
 How much?
 I been waiting a long time for some money.
 One thing's for sure, Jack. That's how you'll tell the story.
 They saved your ass, convict.
 Naw, you'd just call your pals back to bail you out one more time.
 Yeah, right.  You want to try again?
 Who gives a Goddamn what you think? You're just a crook that's got a weekendpass ... You're not even a name anymore. Just a spear- chucker with a Goddamn number stenciled on the back of his prison fatigues...
 Maybe I don't like the way you ask.
 Luther knew more than he told me and so do you...Now you better tell we what the fuck this is all about.  I gave you 48 hours to come up with something and the clock's runnin' ...
 I'm impressed with you too, Jack you did a real good job of busting up a couple of dykes bedded down for the night.
 You?  Don't make me laugh.  You can't take care of shit.  You've been dicking me around since we started on this turd-hunt.  All you're good for is games... So far, what I got outta you is nothin'...
 You wanna leave, man?  Let me take care of Ganz all by myself.
 This sucks.  A maniac gets hold of my gun and goes all over the streets killing people with it. So, instead of me being where I oughta be, which is in bed giving my girl the high, hard one, I'm out here doing this shit, roaming around with some overdressed, charcoal-colored loser like you.
 Wait a minute.  Maybe these ladies would like to go a few laps with us.  How about it? I been nearly three years in prison and...
 Let's go.
 Come on.
 Must be billy's girl.
 There.
 While you're at it, You can give me the switchblade, too.
 You made that move, huh?
 Some of us citizens are with you all the way, Officer.
 That wasn't necessary, buddy. I got this under control.
 My kind of place. I always liked country boys.
 This place don't seem real popular with the brothers.
 I thought you said bullshit and experience are all it takes.
 I'm gonna enjoy this ... here, I'll even loan you my badge.
 The bet's off.
 I don't know what you're talking about. I just wanna see Ganz nailed.
 You tell me what Ganz busted out for, he's after a lot more than just gettin' out of jail.  And whatever it is, you're part of it.
 What are you talkin' about?
 I'll tell you what happens if you lose... you tell the truth for once.
 That's never been one of my problems.
 Why?  Anybody that talks about women as much as you do probably can't get it up anyway.
 If we come outta this joint with Ganz' phone number, or a dead Indian, or anything else useful, then you could turn the other way for half an hour while I get laid...
 I got two problems.  Number one, I'm not playin' games.  Number two, you got nothin' to bet with.
 Hey, you wanna bet?
 You need five years training to handle a joint like...
 I been in a lot of bars where a white cop rousted me and some of the brothers. All those clowns ever had going for 'em was a gun and a badge...
 Bullshit.  Attitude and experience get you through...
 But you can handle it all right, huh? Real amazin' how far a gun and a badge can carry some cats...
 If they kick my ass, they'll sure as hell carve yours up...
 Back you up?  Now why would I wanna do that?
 This part of town, they'll make us for heat the second we walk in. Just back me up like you've got a piece...
 It's a long shot, but...Billy used to tend bar here a few years back. I heard him talk about it.
 Well?
 At least you took care of business and got the important part in before she came down on you...Tell me a little about her.  She got great tits?
 Sure.  Then we had a fight this morning.
 You have a good time?
 Last night.
 Last night, two nights ago, three?
 I don't give out the details.
 Mission District.  Gonna find us an Indian.
 Now, where we goin', convict?
 She's got the same complaint as half the Goddamn population.  She can't get the job she's trained for and it pisses her off... Anyway, what the fuck do you care?
 You really do have onoe, huh, Jack... what's her problem besides you?
 Just get in the car and keep your mouth shut.
 Who'd you call on the phone back at the booking station?
 Yeah, I want mandolins, flowers... They move off down the corridor.
 Yeah, I'm hungry too. I know of a place. Let's go eat.
 Bullshit ... I ain't moving  till I get something to eat. You've been treating me like shit ever since I came out here.  If you don't like it, you can take me back to the penitentiary and kiss my hungry black ass good-bye.  And I want some food some place nice.. Some good people, nice music...
 We eat when I say we eat.
 Speakin' of moans my Stomach is startin' to growl.
 Yeah, well, my ass bleeds for you. And I didn't get you out so you could go on a Goddamn "trim" hunt... stop moaning.
 Do you know how close I was to getting some trim.  And you fucked' it up.
 We're on the move. Let's go. As they walk toward a corridor.
 If you let him run around till Tuesday, he's gonna run right to Ganz and warn him. Ain't you, motherfucker?
 He's gotta take that call ... if there is one.
 I think you better put him on ice, man.
 What do you think?
 Want to try it again?
 Thank you.
 Hey, this works pretty good.
 Just throw me the Goddamn gun.
 I got a whole thing about people pointin' guns at me.
 I'm tellin' you to drop the Goddam gun.
 Quit playin' cop and undo this cuff, Jack, I need to talk to this man.
 I'm helpin' you, huh?
 Luther ain't the reliable type. I don't want you shot yet, Cates ... not before you been a help to me.
 Your pal nuts enough to take a shot at me?
 Just up the street, the other side, over there ... Now, don't bother knockin' on the door. Luther ain't the kind of guy that looks for company.
 I may call you worse than that.
 Then what're you complainin' about? At least nobody's calling you shithead....
 I don't give a damn.  It happens to be my name.
 Just an expression man, don't mean nothin'.
 I can read a police file, shithead, and quit calling me Jack.
 What gang you talkin' about, Jack?
 Luther was part of the gang?
 Don't worry, I got a move for ya. An awesome move. A guy named Luther. Ganz'll be paying him a visit.  We go to him right away.
 Okay, let's get down to it.  I did my part and got you out.  So now you tell me where we're goin'?
 It looks like you bought it off one of the brothers.
 Yeah.
 Shit.  I'm already sorry.
 Get this.  We ain't partners. We ain't brothers.  We ain't friends. I'm puttin' you down and keepin' you down until Ganz is locked up or dead.  And if Ganz gets away, you're gonna be sorry we ever met.
 No way to start a partnership.
 You just don't get it, do your Reggie?  There isn't any deal. I own your ass.
 Hey, no way.  Take off the bracelets or no deal.
 You got a girl... shit... the generosityof women never ceases to amaze me.
 I don't need to hear your jive. I already got that department taken care of...
 Listen, it may be a little out of date. You know, I got a reputation for lookingreal sharp with the ladies...
 We're supposed to be after a killer, not a string of hookers...
 What are you talkin' about?  This suit's mine.  It cost $900.
 This prison gives out $400 suits?
 I'll think about it.
 It's the only way you're gonna get Ganz.
 Bullshit.
 I got a lot to protect.
 What's the big deal about you bein' on the street?
 I can help you, man, but you gotta get me out.  I got to be on the street.  Get me outta here.
 You're crazy.
 I can deliver Ganz.  But you gotta get me outta here first.
 Yeah?
 Didn't work out that way.  He busted out with a big Indian. They capped two guards on a road gang. Nice meeting you Reggie.
 Ganz is in jail.  He's gonna be there two years after I'm on the street.
 Yeah, I noticed...
 Not likely, Reggie.  Maybe I just need some help.
 You here to write my life story?
 Sure, anything you want.
 Try Cates.  And let's talk in private, okay?
 You got a name, cop?
 I'm taking my prisoner back to jail.
 Where the Christ do you think you're going?
 Just cause you say it with conviction don't mean shit to me... How you gonna take to a pink slip, huh?.
 He's got more brains and more guts in one corner of his asshole than any cop I've worked with.
 Too bad, it would've covered your ass.  Now you're in the shit and so's the department. In case you haven't noticed, this wasn't our finest hour... I told you everyone was watchin' on this one. Maybe you better start thinkin' about writin' tickets off a three wheel bike.
 I didn't have the time.
 Don't duck the bullet Cates. Why didn't you call in for backup instead of makin' a grandstand play?
 Right.  I screwed up.  I fucked up. I messed up.  Anybody could have done better, especially you. I bet you're real good at hitting targets through crowds.
 What a screw-up.
 You couldn't get to him?
 The Indian.  I was about 30 yards away.
 Which one pulled the trigger?
 They ran.  As fast as they could. Caught a train.
 How did they get away?
 I lost them, that's what happened.
 What the bell happened?
 I'll keep it in mind.
 Try not to get your ass shot to pieces. We got enough dead cops on this one.
 Yeah?
 Jack?
 You really know how to send a guy out with a great attitude. He starts to go.
 Okay.  You're not a team player. You gotta do things your own way. Fine.  Nail this guy and make us all look good.  But you better watch your ass.  If you screw up, I can promise you, you're goin' down.
 Being a hot dog's worked pretty well for me so far... Besides, I got a lead...
 You might be more of a team player and a little less of a hot dog on this one, Jack.
 Yeah.  It bothers me when cops get hurt while I'm makin' a play. I don't like it.
 Anthing botherin' you besides losin' your gun?
 Yeah...
 Jack, come on, there is an official department policy about cop killings. Cop killers represent a special priority because any man crazy enough to kill a cop is a greater threat to an unarmed civilian... In other words, we can't seen like we're in the revenge business... I know, we all know the truth's a little different.
 Hey, the bastard's got my gun.  I want it back.
 Yeah, I read the report...
 I want to be left alone on this one. Algren was killed with my gun.
 I guess when two cops die on account of your fuck up you want to keep it as quiet as possible...
 Are you gonna tell me about police procedure?  Do me a favor, don't give me a bunch of crap.
 Somebody steals your gun, you're supposed to file a report.
 The truth hurts, doesn't it, buddy?
 But that's what you say about all of us all the tine ... we're always the ones fucking up when you tell it...
 Yeah.
 That's what you say, Cates...
 I'm not paid to take your personal calls.  He was in some bar. .. off duty.
 Jesus Christ.  Why the hell didn't you tell me before?
 What?
 I almost forgot.  That pal of yours from the Vice Squad wants you to call him.
 Okay.  See you in the morning... you know, you ought to get some rest...
 I got to wait for a call.
 I'm heading out. How about you?
 Bullshit red tape.
 Nothing.
 Nothing came in for me yet?  No calls?
 Doesn't look like it.
 Aw, bullshit, you heard wrong.
 Long night, too, from what I heard ... Word's going around that in addition to losing Ganz for the second time, and in addition to Haden busting you back to Patrolman, some jig beat the crap out of you.
 So do you...been a long day.
 You look awful.
 One of  em's in the slam.
 Here's the file. Cates checks the file.
 I think I wanna have a discussion about it with any of the ones still walking.  Can we find them?
 Hey ... Dick Tracy.
 Tell me that's not the same guy.
 Uhh ... Wong, Henry Wong.  He was in on the same job.
 Wait a minute, wait a minute... who's this?
 They all pulled a bunch of jobs with Ganz about four years ago.
 Who are all these?
 Backup man from the East Bay. Worked with Ganz a few years ago and sprung him from the road gang.
 Billy Bear...
 Shit.
 This guy must have had a .44 like yours, Jack. Now he's got yours.
 I'll help you out.
 Every last bit of it.  The big guy's room was empty.
 Is that what this guy Ganz had in the hotel?
 I dunno ... he's gonna call me...
 When? How?
 He ... he wants me to help him skip town.
 I don't know.
 I think I met her.  Now tell us something we don't know, like where they stashed her.
 Ganz and Billy got my girl, Rosalie.
 Who gives a fuck what you think?
 You just took a shot at me, asshole. I think you do know where he is.
 Haven't seen him for years. That's the truth.
 I sure ain't his fairy godmother... now I'm looking for Ganz...where is he?
 A cop...
 That's what I always say.
 You're impossible...
 He's takin' care of the same business I'll be takin' care of - soon as I dry off.
 Tell me.
 Promised I'd turn my back while he... ah, never mind...
 Where is he?
 Three more hours...
 Yeah, bein' a hard-ass all the time is a real drag, but it works.
 I've been waiting a long time to hear you say that.
 Usual bullshit.  You make one smart move and everybody wants to be your friend... You know somethin', shootin' guys sucks. Especially compared to this.
 How'd they take it back at headquarters?
 Let's go, Reggie.
 What do I know?  I'm just a bartender.
 Whaddya think?
 Oh, yeah, well look where you came when you were down and out.
 Hey, Come on, shrink time's over. They wouldn't go see some old girlfriend.
 When a guy hurts you, then comes back bleeding on his hands and knees, who knows, he might just be irrestible.
 So what?
 It might pay to reexamine a few of your more primitive notions.  I was in bed with a girlfriend watching TV last week, Jack, and one thing we know about me is I happen not to be a lesbian ... Now, if this Indian's girlfriend got upset when you came looking for him, it could just be she's still vulnerable to him.
 Come on, they were a little old for a slumber party.
 What makes you think they were lesbians, or as you so quaintly put it, dykes?
 Jack, it's all over the papers. He's an obvious type.  But this Indian...
 How do you know?
 Ganz is going to be hard to track. Just a pure schizo ... wires all crossed... totally without any pattern... kill anybody... The Indian... himself... anybody...
 Nothing.  No sign of Ganz.  No sign of the Indian.  Airport's clean.  Train station. Bus station.  Docks... Shit...
 I've been better...Dead end.  No Ganz, no Indian.
 You real down?
 We and my pal here have been taking it on the chin for the last few hours...
 I can see that.  Pardon me for saying so, but you look like shit.  What happened?
 Don't.  We've had a hard night.
 I ought to have you and your friend thrown out...
 Hiya, kid.
 Hey, I don't believe it.
 Fuck you.
 Hi, it's me...
 Hello.
 Just a second, that's all!
 Jack, wait...
 Elaine, I gotta put you on hold...
 Jack?  What was that?
 The number ... what's the Goddamn number?
 So am I.
 No, it's I'm just surprised you called.
 No wonder you're so popular.
 Elaine! I... I'm sorry... I was expecting somebody else... police business.
 I'm at work, asshole.  Where else?
 This is not the way people who care for each other are supposed to behave.
 Listen, Goddamn it if you think I'm happy about it, you're nuts. I just gotta take care of a few things, okay?
 Elaine, look, I'm in the middle of sone stuff right now... I'm not gonna have time to come by. I don't know when I can get there.
 Just one.  Some lady called.  Said she's a little hot-headed sometimes... But she still wants her occasional roommate. She'd like to talk it over after she gets off work tonight... if it's humanly possible....
 I get that. The job first. Everything else, especially me, second. I get it. I don't like it.
 That's right.  I'm not like you. I'm not gonna sit on my ass wondering what's right and what's wrong... There's a psycho out there killing people with my gun and I'm gonna get him.  Because it's my job. And if you don't get that...
 Here it comes again ... the sacred job...
 I didn't get burned, two cops did. Listen, I'll tell you about personnel responsibility.  I like to get the job done right.  And if I don't get my job done right... I'm for shit.
 Look, Jack, if you make everything your personal responsibility, you'll turn into a bad cop.  It's not a practical way to function...
 Bullshit?  I'll tell you about bullshit.  My gun's a real weapon in the hands of a real maniac who knows how to use it.  It isn't my macho bullshit that's killing people, my gun is ...
 Look, spare me the macho bullshit about your gun...
 Sure, okay, fine, no problem... See, there's this kid in jail ... First thing I got to do is go up and see what he knows ...
 Jack, are you okay?
 Yeah, Guess it must have been a slow news day...
 You made the front page.
 Yeah, one of my favorites.
 Great place for lunch.
 Guess people ought to know who I am...
 I think you forgot this. Hands him his wallet and badge...
 Thanks for the coffee.
 Yeah, for some reason, I'm sure...
 You sure you want me to?
 Call me later.
 That's the way I see it, too.
 You know something, Jack, you really are hopeless.
 I wish you'd stop trying to make me mad so I won't care for you... I wish you'd give me a little more of a chance.
 What do you want to know?  What difference does it make?  I'm the guy in your bed the last three months.  I make you feel good. You make me feel good.  What the hell else do you want from a guy?
 When you start with that attitude... it's like I don't know who you are.
 Maybe you don't know what the hell you're talking about.
 Maybe that makes a nice excuse.
 Maybe I got a fairly crummy day ahead.
 That's a fairly crummy way to start a morning.
 Maybe I would if I knew when you were coming back.
 Maybe you ought to buy me one.
 What makes you think I have any clean shirts at my place?
 You know, if you let me come over to your place once in a while, you could put on a clean shirt in the morning.
 I think you're ashamed to tend bar which is sad because you look great in that outfit they make you wear... You pull down four bills a week which is damn good, and you mix the best Pina Coladas I've ever had... I think that if you need bigger and better things ... then go for em.
 Tell me--I'm dyin' to hear it.
 Hey, you know what I really think?
 If this is your idea of sympathetic interest in my problems, I'll take brutal indifference.
 I do think all psychotherapy is bullshit. But just because I think it's bullshit doesn't mean I don't know something about it.
 Aren't you the one that thinks all psychotherapy is bullshit?
 Positive self-image problem all over again ... You are who you decide you are unless you're the type that lets assholes decide for you.
 Then I sit back and I think, I mean, who's to say I'm not a dumb bitch.  I work in a bar, right? I can't read a list of my academic credentials to every booze-hound that comes in the place... You are what you do...
 I guess he got the message...
 Irrigated his face with the shot of J and B I'd just poured him. Then I tried to deck the sucker.
 What'd you do?
 A guy in the bar called me a dumb bitch today.
 What's wrong with that?
 I'm all wet.
 That's the way I see it, too.
 You're hopeless.
 Hey, you're right.
 I still don't think it's loaded.
 This is a .44 Magnum, the most powerful handgun in the world. You gotta ask yourself just one question. Are you feelin' lucky?
 I don't think your gun's loaded...
 I don't answer questions, I ask 'em...
 What am I wanted for?
 In all due respect, he sounds kind of pathetic to me.  The kind of guy that runs home to his momma or some girlfriend.  Have you two ace detectives checked that out?
 He was the only one of my bunch that was my friend... He was loyal, went all the way for you...
 That's no bull.
 Hey, two days with him is enough.
 How would you know?
 Hard man to live with.
 Shrink major, not a shrink.
 Well, I been workin' the other side of the street for the last few years.  And you don't exactly look like a shrink, wearin' that dress...
 I'm not so sure I can say the same thing...You don't look like a cop.
 Name's Hammond, Reggie Hammond. I heard a lot about you. And any friend of Jack's is a friend of mine.
 Who the hell are you?
 Alright, I'm coming...hold on.
 Keep stallin'.
 What do you want?
 Stall.
 Shut up.
 What do you want?  What's goin' on?
 What the hell's wrong?  I didn't do anything.
 Shut up.
 Hey...
 Sure, right.
 We'll follow you.  Take it slow,okay?
 Yeah, old times.
 We got a lot to talk about.
 Can't complain.
 How ya doin'?
 Hot?  Hey, they're not even room temperature.
 How hot are they?
 What are you talkin' about? I said I wouldn't hurt her.
 Rosalie, you okay?
 First, the money.
 Let her go.
 You try to mess with us or go to the cops, I promise you, I'll put holes in her you wouldn't believe.
 Come on, you can trust me. Please.
 Honest. The place we stashed it opens Monday morning. I can't get it till then. Monday morning, that's when it opens. After that, I'll get the money to you right away...
 You chickenshit punk...
 I can't get it until Monday. Honest.
 When?
 No! Don't kill her.  I can get you the money.
 Billy, go ahead, break it...
 Don't give me this, we were partners.
 Instead of worryin' about Reggie, you better worry about me...
 You want that Indian to snap her neck?
 I don't know what you're talkin' about.
 I want the money, asshole, what do you think?  The money that Reggie hid...
 Whaddya want?  I thought you were locked up-
 Surprise, Luther.
 I'll got your money to you. No sweat.
 Fuck you.  You got no right for this kind of play.
 Try and take it.
 Give it back.
 Yeah, I know that, but this is me and we're old friends. I haven't got the money so what are you gonna do about it?
 This ain't a credit business.
 Five.  On credit.
 Five bills.
 Don't mess with me. How much?
 This is clean shit.  No serial numbers and never been used...
 How much?
 It's loaded... I got some shells in here.
 How about some ammo?
 I'm sure.  Everybody here's looking at everybody else's ass.
 You sure?
 Naw, right here's okay.
 You want to go outside?
 Not bad, not bad.
 How you doing, man?
 I can't pretend to be your husband... David's in great shape.
 Akta dedero ansila do mektet.
 No, I'm not proud of myself... But we don't have the luxury of choice.
 Vano da, mechteba?! Soun domo kala chon hammas!
 You know exactly where they are!
 Ikset-kiba.  Me imanetaba oum dalat!
 The case was stolen?
 San Agamat chay bet... envolet!
 The case..with the stones... Where is it?
 Napoleon... small.
 What're you laughing about?
 At your service.
 Corn-i-Lius?
 Appipulai Leeloo Minai..
 I know...
 You are a monster, Zorg!
 Let me reassure you Father..I will never kill more people in my entire life than religion has killed in the last 2000 years.
 Destroying a glass is one thing..killing people with the weapons you produce is quite another.
 Father, by creating a little destruction, I am, in fact, encouraging life!  So, in reality, you and I are in the same business!
 They are robots!
 ...Look at all these little things... so busy all of a sudden. Notice how each one is useful. What a lovely ballet, so full of form and color.  So full of..life!
 Follow me.. Life, which you so nobly serve, comes from destruction. Look at this empty glass.
 No thank you.
 ...would you like a drink?
 Ah, Father... You are so wrong. Let me explain...
 ...I'm a priest! I'm here to serve life, All you want to do is destroy it.
 Why?  What's wrong with me?
 Even it I did know where the stones were I would never tell somebody like you.
 Personally, they are of no interest to me, I'd rather sell weapons..but I have a customer... so tell me...
 ...Why on earth do the stones interest you?
 I'm glad you got your memory back, Father... Because you're going to need it... Where are the stones?
 I remember you now..the so called art dealer.
 Zorg. Jean-Baptiste Emmanuel Zorg... nice to see you again
 I'm fucked!
 ...We're saved!
 That's what I'm saying.
 And you don't know how they open, is that what you are saying?
 Yes, of course, but... The Stones are shut! They have to be open for it to work.
 There's no light! You told me there were supposed to be four beams of light.
 Theoretically, yes! The four Stones form the beam and the Fifth Element is supposed to stand in the middle there, but... I don't have the reference book. I've never seen the Stones work!
 Don't tell me you don't know how all this works?
 Uh.. Have you tried the Diva's suite?
 When is she not in trouble?
 Leeloo's in trouble?
 Yeah, I know... to save the world... but right now all I want to do is save Leeloo.
 You're probably very angry with me and I quite understand. But I want you to know I'm fighting for a noble cause.
 Trying to save your ass so you can save the world.
 What are you doing?
 Father, I was in the Army for awhile and every time they told us we were on a mission to save the world the only thing that changed was I lost a lot of friends. So thanks for the offer.. but no thanks.
 Of course.
 Good luck..
 We have to save the world.
 What kind of mission?
 We're not going on vacation..we're on a mission..
 Is that the usual way priests go on vacation?
 I'm sorry to have to resort to such methods, but we heard about your good luck on he radio and we need the tickets to Fhloston.
 That's what I thought.
 It means, "Never without my permission".
 Excuse me! Just one thing!  She said something to me a while ago and... I don't really get it... Akta Gamat?
 I know. I was there when she arrived.
 She's fine, really..don't you worry.. just needs some rest..she's had a very long trip.
 I might call to check up on her, you know... to see if she's better?
 Yes. That's fine! Thank you very much. A thousand times over!
 Dallas. Korben Dallas.
 Thank you so much for your help Mr...?
 She's an exception..
 They all like this in your family, father?
 Uh yes, we're cousins..distant cousins..
 So you do know her.
 There's not a moment to lose! Wake her up, but be gentle about it!  This woman is mankind's most precious possession! She is... perfect!
 You noticed...
 He's a she!
 The girl?
 I brought the girl remember?
 Who are you?
 She dropped in on me... holding this.
 That's me.  But I don't know who she is... where did you find her?
 She's not my bride, she's my fare. She's looking for this Vito Cornelius. According to the phone guide he lives here.
 Weddings are one floor down. Congratulations.
 Excuse me, I'm looking for a priest.
 This is government business now. You ought to go home and get some rest, Father.
 What are we going to do?
 Thank you, Mr. President.
 Did you see that..thing..swallow our battleship like a gum drop?  You can't even tell me what it is! I ask you for options you give me bullshit. Give them permission to enter our territories with my warmest regards.
 White turns to black.  Light to Dark. Life to Death.  For all eternity.
 But what happens if instead of this... Ultimate Warrior... it is EVIL who stands here?
 Yes..thank God..
 Is there anything that can stop it?
 And then it will be too late. The goal of evil is to wipe out life! All forms of life. For all eternity...Life upsets it.
 And then?
 We have forty-eight hours, the time it needs to adapt itself to our living conditions.
 That's exactly what we are going to try and do: Protect the lives of some 200 billion of our fellow citizens! General? You may fire when ready.
 Time is of no importance, Mr. President. Only life is important.
 Your theory is interesting Father but I don't think we have time to go into it right now!
 One more reason to shoot first eh?
 Imagine for a moment that this. thing is not anything that can be identified because it prefers not to be, because it is the antithesis of all we are. Because it is evil.. TOTAL EVIL.
 Later, David! Later! There's not a minute to lose!
 You're all safe. Thanks be to God!
 It's all my fault.  I'm the servant... It's my mission! Here!
 On the plane... with Mr. Dallas... the real one.
 Where's Leeloo?
 Good work, my son.  Now all we need is a way to get there.
 I got it!  Everything  here we need to know about Fhloston Paradise Hotel... and a detailed blueprint of the entire hotel!
 Perfect.
 They really made her...
 I didn't know your size.
 There was this guy with a limp who came a month ago..said he was an art dealer ... Asking all these questions about the Sacred Stones..at the time I didn't think anything of it.. What was his name? I'm so bad with names...
 Yes. Of course..
 Uh father, I know she's been through a lot... but the sacred stones..we don't have much time..
 Learning our history! The last 5000 years that she missed! She's been out of circulation a while, you know.
 What's she doing?
 Absolutely sure There's the triple suns on her gloves!
 Father.  You sure she's the Supreme Being?
 The Supreme Being, the fifth element is here, in our parish!!! It's a miracle!!!
 Father, will you please explain what's going on?
 I can't wear these clothes! This calls for dignity! I have to dress the part!
 What is?
 It's a miracle!!!
 They are... with me...
 I'm sorry, but... the Stones...
 I would like to have died in peace...
 Listen, the last time I admitted to a woman I loved her ... I never saw her again.
 I don't have time... I need to know.
 I... I don't know! We hardly know each other... it takes time!
 Do you love her?
 I'll help her, I promise, but I think you should tell me where the Stones are!
 She was taught to love the life of others... but not her own. You have to teach her to love if you want her to truly live!
 ...So Cornelius was telling the truth!
 Yes, and more than that... You must give her the Stones, she's the only one who knows how to use them.
 Leeloo... is... she's...
 The Fifth Element... The Supreme Being... Your wife...
 Who?
 You're a good man... She was right to have chosen you...
 Leeloo..
 Uh huh..and I don't suppose you got the name of this..perfect fare..
 5'7", green eyes... long legs... great skin... perfect..
 So, just how big was this fare?
 Finger..man..I'm sorry..listen..I was on the way over but I had a fare fall into my lap.. y'know one of those big fares you just can't resist..
 Hey bud...I'm waiting all day here.
 Hello?
 In your dreams! See you tonight!
 Uh... at least fifty.
 How many points you got left on your license?
 Finger!  I'm driving a cab now, not a space fighter!!
 You forgetting who sat next to you for a thousand missions. I know how you drive.
 I don't need one.
 Like shit.
 How do I look?
 I just found a picture of you.
 Don't exist bud.
 I don't want a million - I just want one.  A perfect one.
 You still pining for that two timing bitch. Forget her. There are a million women out there.
 At least, the cat comes back.
 Oh, yeah, I forgot.You still prefer your cat to the real thing.
 I was talking to the cat.
 I love you too Major, but you haven't called me that since basic training.
 Hey bud! Finger here.
 Yeah?
 ...Leeloo.
 Hey,  that's... cute... Do you have a nickname, something a little... shorter?
 Leeloo Minai Lekarariba-Laminai-Tchai Ekbat De Sebat.
 ...What's your name?
 I'm sorry, it's just that... I was told to wake you up gently, so I figured...
 Eto Akta Gamat!
 Vito Cornelius?
 Vito... Cor... Ni-lious... Priest...
 You're not that bad... Come on we'll get you to a doctor.
 ...Priest...
 It there's one thing I don't need advice on, it's how to drive.
 Daya deo dono Dato.  Dalutan!
 ...'Scuse me?
 Akina delutan, nou-shan.
 We will be ready, Lord.
 When EVIL returns so shall we.
 Time is of no importance, only life is important.
 Knowing mankind as I do, that could take centuries!
 When mankind comes to its senses. We will return.
 Will the elements be gone now forever from this place?
 Take them and put them in a safe place.
 The Fifth Element...
 Don't you ever ask me for another thing in my life again, you've killed your poor mother with your own hands!
 ...Ma???
 You little sleaze bag!
 Hello?
 ...Not yet.
 Have you pulled yourself together?
 Yeah?
 They've been blaring out your name on the radio for the last hour, blockhead!
 Ma. If I'd won, I'd know about it. Someone would have notified me.
 You just won a trip, you dolt! Ten days in Fhloston Paradise for two!
 All I want is an explanation! I just got in, I lost my job. I smashed my cab. I got mugged, but other than that everything's peachy, Ma, thanks for asking!! Now settle down and explain to me calmly..
 I get it! You want to make me beg, is that it?
 I'm coming!. Ma, what're you talking about?
 ...And now you're making fun of me? I'm warning you! If you don't take me after all these years of sacrifice, I'll never forgive you!!
 Other than that... You all right?
 Yes ma..
 Are you listening to me, you ingrate!
 I've been playing twice a week for 20 years, 20 years I've been eating those shitty croquettes.
 Hi Ma...
 You're the nastiest dirtbag I know in this stinking City!
 ...Hello?
 Found it?
 6... 5...
 Anyone know how to release the lines on this crate?
 30 seconds...
 This is a police control action..
 I'm sorry..
 Thanks for reminding me..
 You have nine points left on your license..
 I had the worst goddamn nightmare.
 Fuel level 6.03..Propulsion 2x4...
 How you doing this morning?  Sleep OK? I didn't.
 Welcome on board Mr. Dallas..
 Yeah... then I sighed... like this.
 Is that all?
 Look, you did something that set it off. Try to remember. Concentrate. Tell me exactly what you did!!
 Nothing! Swear to God, I didn't do nothing!
 What did you say? What did you do?
 Dear listeners, your favorite DJ is alive and kicking. It's seven o'clock and time for the news. Tune in tomorrow for another adventure.
 Solid little jobs, aren't they?
 Fuck it! Hold tight!
 I don't even know what I'm looking for!
 It's like a cab isn't it?
 You know how to fly this thing?
 I'll be right back.
 Like Korben, can I have 30 seconds of your time here?
 Not without Leeloo.
 Maybe we oughta be going, what do you think?
 We got to find the leader. Mangalores don't fight without a leader.
 He's on vacation.
 Six to the left. One to the right.
 Got it...
 You don't do what I say... I'll waste you myself. Got it?
 I didn't have a dad... never saw him... never even heard him. 50 billion people listen to me every day... and he doesn't hear me...
 Yeah, very big, a giant.
 ...You got brothers and sisters? What about your dad? Tell me about your dad! What was he like? Physically? Big, I suppose?
 I don't think this is a good time...
 Oh, yes! Do that! You treat me right, man. Tell me all about yourself, your roots, your personal life, your childhood dreams...
 I'll take you to the bar, after that, you're on your own.
 My main man! Please don't leave me here alone. My head's killing me and my adoring fans are gonna tear me apart! Get me outta here!
 Crystal.
 I didn't come here to play Dumbo on the radio. So tomorrow between 5 and 7 give yourself a hand, that clear pal?
 Uh... not really.
 ...Quiver ladies, he's gonna set the world on fire right here from 5 to 7! You'll know everything there is to know about the D-man. His dreams, his desires, his most intimate of intimates.  And from what I'm looking at intimate is the stud muffin's middle name. So tell me my main man... you nervous in the service?
 Does it get any better or what!
 ...Hi.
 Oh, yes you will...
 Three of us will never fit in there!
 ...Sorry, General, but we've got no choice! It'll only take a minute! Let me set up another meeting and I'll be back.
 I mean my future.. my ex.. My future ex.. if she sees you here I'm finished.  She hates you guys. It's what killed us in the first place. Please...
 I thought you were divorced.
 It's my wife.
 What is it?
 ...Shit!
 One reason... I want to stay the only one left alive.
 Why not?
 I'm not going.
 Old tricks are the best tricks eh?
 You couldn't come up with something a little more discreet?
 You have won the annual Gemini contest and a trip to Fhloston Paradise. For two. Congratulations. Here are your tickets.
 I've had enough good news for today
 Don't you open your messages?
 You're the only one left alive...
 And the third one?
 Two: Of all the members of your unit you were the most highly decorated.
 Three reasons... One: As part of The Elite Special Forces Unit of the Federated Army you are an expert in the use of all weapons and spacecraft needed for this mission.
 Just one... why me?
 You're to leave immediately for Fhloston Paradise. Retrieve four Stones from the Diva Plavalaguna. And bring them back with the utmost discretion as possible. Any questions'?
 Where have I heard this song before?
 To save the world.
 What mission?
 Major Dallas, if our calculations are correct you still have 57 hours owed to the Federal Army on your enlistment which is more than you will need for a mission of the utmost importance.
 I love you...
 Tell me...
 Because...
 Why?... Why would you need me?
 Yes, you do! I need you. More than you can imagine! Stand up straight!
 I have thousands of memories but none of them are mine... There is no need for me other than this. I'm immortal but I have no life.
 But I don't know love... I'm like a machine programmed to save other people's lives but never to have one of my own.
 Exactly.
 ...Like love...
 You're right but there are lots of good things... beautiful things...
 What's the use of saving lives... when you see what you do with them!
 Leeloo! Listen to me! I'll take you on a vacation afterwards! A real vacation, this time, for as long as you want. Come on! You can do it!
 I want to sleep... forever...
 You can sleep tomorrow... come on...
 I'm so tired...
 It's up to you now, Angel!
 ...The rain falls...
 I know all that, Leeloo! I'm talking about the Stones.
 The wind blows... the fire burns...
 Leeloo? The Stones! We have to open them! How does it work?
 Protect life... Until death.
 I told you not to read all that crap!
 Five hundred wars... Arms... Drugs... Money... Everything you create is used to destroy...
 Why? We did pretty well, wouldn't you say?
 I'm so very sad.
 The words you're looking for weren't in the dictionary you studied. I won't be long.
 You're nothing but a... a...
 It's difficult.
 And you can't concentrate with me around?.
 I told you I need to work in peace. Remember? I need to concentrate.
 No, not at all!  I mean, just the opposite, you're... you're beautiful!
 I'm going to see the Diva sing. What's the matter?... Do I look bad?
 Where you going?
 OK, you can turn around!
 You noticed..
 Yes... you know there's a lot of differences between men women.
 You get that off the screen?
 You know women normally change five times more than men.
 Here we go again...
 ...Hoppi-hoppa.
 Uh...
 Good! Do you know how we say "make love"?
 Apipoussan?
 Apipoussan!
 I know how to say "Hello". Teach me how to say "Good-bye", that's all I need.
 Yes! Now it's your turn! I learned your language, you have to learn mine!
 You learned 900 languages in five minutes?!
 All 900.
 Which one?
 Learning language.
 Finished what?
 What is... Make Love?
 Sometimes you can't learn everything from a screen..sometimes it's better to ask someone who has experience..
 Yes! But "love" isn't the operative word here, PEACE is!
 Love...
 Not hard to find you...just follow the Chaos...
 Apipoulai!
 Took the words right out of my mouth. Go on... I'll be right with you.  It's our honeymoon. We're going to use the trip to get to know each other better.
 Dinoine chagantakat!
 Oh god!
 Cornelius..
 You hear that?
 Uh..you're welcome.
 Valo massa... Chacha hamas.
 I suppose that means "Hi" ?
 Apipoulai!
 Good philosophy..see good in bad.. I like..I prepare number one dessert.. special for you and pussy..
 At least I won lunch.
 You right that is bad.. but mathematically luck must change! Grandfather say: "It never rain every day." This is good news guarantee.. I bet you lunch!
 The last two messages I got?  The first one was from my wife telling me she was leaving! And the second was from my lawyer telling me he was leaving too... with my wife.
 How someone strong like you scared from a message? Is good news I sure!
 I've never gotten a message that wasn't bad news.
 Not going to open?
 You're welcome..
 Thanks..
 You gotta push the little yellow button...
 It's not?
 You know you could hurt someone with this puppy..good thing it's not loaded..
 Uh..
 Isn't that a Z140? Alleviated titanium. Neuro charged assault model?
 Don't fuck with me man or I'll blow you into tomorrow!
 Been here long?
 The cash man!
 It's an honor to receive you. Mr. President.
 Mr. President, let me introduce you to Professor Mactilburgh, who runs the center.
 An elephant couldn't crack it.
 This thing solid?
 Wonderful!
 ...This is the crucial phase, The reconstruction of pigment. Cells are bombarded with slightly greasy solar atoms which forces the body cells to react, to protect themselves. That means growing skin. Clever, eh?
 We put it through the cellular hygiene detector. The cell is for lack of a better word... perfect.
 Is there any danger? Some kind of virus?
 The compositional elements of his DNA chain are the same as ours, there are simply more of them tightly packed. His knowledge is probably limitless..
 Yes... I can't wait to meet him.
 Sounds like a freak of nature to me.
 This cell is like a huge library. It has infinite genetic knowledge stored inside. Almost like it was...engineered.
 Talk English Doc.
 It's not that easy..we've never encountered anything like it before..you see normal human beings have 40 DNA memo groums..which is more than enough for any species to perpetuate itself..This one has 200,000.
 Have you identified it?
 Actually only one cell survived..
 This is all that survived?
 How much time is left?
 They just landed in the desert.
 Don't worry, Sir. I have the perfect one.
 I want your best man on this!
 ...What do you mean?
 The-Stones weren't aboard the ship.
 And the Stones?  Did you find them in the wreckage?
 I managed to contact the Mondoshawan. They deplore the incident, but accept our apologies.
 I'm about to, Mr. President.
 Staedert?  What's going on?  Did you destroy it?
 Gentlemen?
 My philosophy Mr. President is shoot first ask questions later. I don't like uninvited guests.
 Recommendations.
 Wait or act.
 Options.
 Not yet Sir..The only thing we know is it just keeps getting bigger!
 What you are saying is you don't know what this..thing..is.
 There are no results from the chemical and molecular analysis as of yet, all the calibers are overshot..we're hoping a thermo nucleatic imaging..
 I have to address the Supreme Council in 10 minutes. Just the facts, General.
 Perfect, Mr. President.
 Is that better?
 I can hear you, Mr. President, but I can't see you .
 Staedert, do you read me?
 To fame.. salud..
 Drink!
 Then let us toast to your fame!  Here Billy..
 A weapon against evil.  Amazing!  I am going to be famous.
 Only too well... here you must be parched..
 Father.. it in the most extraordinary thing.. the greatest find in history..can you imagine the implications.
 Amen..
 "..in which all the history of the Universe resides ..all the strength..all the hope..Protect us from Evil.."
 Lord forgive me.. they already know too, much..
 I'm not at the hotel!
 Right away, Sir. I'll send you a new one to the hotel.
 Dispatch me another ZFX200 immediately. Someone stole mine.
 Yes, Sir!
 Who gives a shit! I didn't come here to listen to music! Listen up instead of running off at the mouth! The batteries on my phone are almost gone.
 Yes, Mr. Zorg, I hear you perfectly! So, how was the concert?
 How's that? Can you hear me better now?
 ...I can't wait to be among you.
 The Stones will be here. I'll see to it personally!
 Fine, just fine!  I'll have the 4 pieces you asked for any time now.  But it wasn't easy. My costs have tripled.
 How's our deal coming along?
 Got it.
 Do you have the picture now Mr. Zorg?
 Really? Maybe I can get you on my screen and see you at last!
 ...Not far, now.
 No... not at all.  Where are you?
 Am I disturbing you?
 I just talked to her.
 She died in her sleep three days ago.  It was in the paper...
 Tom... she's dead.
 She's all I've got.  She's the only witness.
 What?
 Mrs. Christian.
 Who are you calling?
 Amy...
 What was I supposed to think happened to you?!
 Don't...
 You're killing me...
 I don't know what to say
 Look where we are.  Look at yourself.  You son of a bitch, you don't have any idea what you're putting me through...
 Amy, I'm not going to let anything happen to us.
 You should have.
 I was in hell.  If I called you... if I heard your voice... it would have been so easy for me to quit. I couldn't do that.
 No, I don't, because you're not telling me anything!
 You don't understand...
 You couldn't?
 I wanted to call.  I couldn't.
 You owe me an explanation.  You can't treat me like this.
 You're sorry?  What was I supposed to think?
 I don't know.  I'm sorry...
 Why haven't you called?  Why don't you answer your phone?
 It has to be this way for now.  It won't be long.
 Tom...
 I can't tell you, Amy.  You know I can't.  You have to trust me...
 What's going on, Tom?  What happened?
 I'm okay, honey, I'm okay.  Are you alright?
 What happened to you?
 Just do it, Amy, please, go.
 ... What's going on?
 I'm okay.  Please, honey, I can't explain.  Don't use the phone, just pack a bag and get out.  I'm on my way.  I'll be back at the house in three hours.  Call me from the hotel when you get there
 What's wrong?  Are you alright?
 Amy, just listen.  Take Cindy and get out of the house.  Do it now. Go to a hotel and stay there...
 Tom?  Where have you been... ?
 Amy, it's me.  Listen very carefully..
 Hello?
 I'm not gonna need it.  I won't even wear it.  It's a precaution.  Don't worry about me.
 Why the gun?
 It's a missing persons case... a long shot.  I'll give it two months, two months at most, then I'll be back.  We'll take a vacation.
 I know.
 Sometimes you can't know what I'm doing.  It's better that way.
 I understand.
 This is the mortgage.  This is Cindy's college money.
 Betty's out of town so we're playing next week.
 I'm not using him again for anything.  He was worthless.  You have bridge here Saturday?
 You're not using the same guy who tried to fix it?
 Sure.  I'll call the guy.
 You think you'll have time for the water heater this weekend?
 I love you.
 I love you.
 Honey, I'm not, please...
 You better not be smoking, that's all I can say.
 Business was fine.  I'll tell you what, you couldn't pay me enough to live down there.
 How's the detective business?
 We've been all through that.  I've been on my best behavior.
 Okay, I believe you.
 Well, I'm not smoking, okay?
 I'm not accusing you...
 You know, Amy, I've been sitting around in bars and everywhere following this guy... I mean, is this what I get first thing?  Before you even "hello," you accuse me... ?
 Your clothing reeks of it.
 Smoking?  I'm not smoking.
 What's this... have you been smoking... ?
 Do you know how much I missed you?
 Welcome home.
 There ain't no such thing as snuff. Why don't you fuck off?
 You know where I can get it?  I have a lot of money to spend.
 What you see is what I got, mister.
 Snuff?
 There's nothing harder.
 Anything harder?
 Mixed hard bondage.  Rape films. Sick shit.  Buy five, get one free.
 What are these?
 I promised him to Machine.
 What the fuck... !
 Nobody knows anything.
 Dino...
 There's nothing there, you brain- dead cunt.  Think about it.  There's absolutely no way in this world to connect us to anything.  I want you to hang the phone up, and if you call me about this again I'm going to send a friend of mine out there and have him crack you open with a fucking rib spreader.
 Because somebody just fucking called me and fucking laid it out!
 Blow me, you paranoid fuck, that's impossible.  Why are you bothering me with this... ?
 I'm telling you...
 Bullshit.
 The loop!  The girl we did, what the fuck do you think I'm talking about?!  This guy calls and says he knows about the fucking loop...
 What are you talking about?
 I just got a call... two seconds ago, some motherfucker called... says he knows about the loop.
 What do you want?
 How cooperative.  Longdale will keep you company.
 I'll get it.  It's in a safe deposit box, in the city...
 Bring the film, or we kill him.
 He doesn't know anything... he's got nothing to do with this...
 Can you guess what I'm going to say next?
 Look, he's got nothing to do with this... let him go...
 Friend of yours?
 I remember him.
 You remember Mr. Longdale, don't you?
 Shut up, cunt!  Do exactly as I say, or I'll put this arrow through your throat.
 Look, I don't know what this...
 Empty the gun onto the table, very carefully.
 Take out your gun!
 What are you... ?
 Mister Welles... would you be so kind as to remove any firearms from your person?
 Sure.
 Hmm?  Oh, the knifes?  They're just props.  Nice, aren't they?
 What are these for?
 They should be here any minute.
 Where are the women?
 Excellent.
 Right here.
 You brought the money?
 Brooklyn.  Don't be late.
 Where's that?
 He's in.  It will be his pleasure.
 Machine's in?
 I'll do this for you.  Fifteen thousand dollars.
 Those are two different kinds of trust.  Thank you for your time.  I hope we can do business.
 You trust me to keep your money, but not to take your picture?
 I'm camera shy.
 What's the problem?
 I'd rather you didn't.
 You have a beautiful face... the way the light hits it.  I'd like to take your picture.  You don't mind?
 Well, well, I'll have to put my thinking-cap on about all this. You'll leave the money as a deposit?  Very good.
 We can do that.
 He might be interested... but it would mean another five thousand.
 If it's not him, there's no deal.
 Machine.
 And the other performer... it has to be that monster you use... the man in the mask.
 I'll consider it.
 I want to watch you work.
 And they are?
 Five thousand now, five thousand on delivery. Two women, one white and one black, as long as they have large breasts. Hard bondage, or course.  Other than that, trusting your artistic interpretation, I have only two stipulations.
 Is it?
 That's five thousand dollars.
 Yes.  What we're looking for is rather specific.
 You said something about money.
 Hmm.
 A fellow investor.
 Flattering.  And, who's your colorful little chum?
 I'd like to commission a work.  I'm a great admirer of yours.
 What can I do for you today?
 It's an honor to meet you.  Thank you for seeing us.
 You betrayed us.
 You got the guts, tough guy?  Gonna kill us all, is that it?
 First things first.  You might want to watch this, Mr. Welles...
 ... sorry...
 Fuck off.
 Leave him alone.
 You're a dead man.
 Move it, dirtbag... !
 Don't let Longdale's questionable choice of weapon give you any ideas. If his fey little gun puts enough little holes in you, you'll be just as dead... and so will Max.
 Put the gun down, take the handcuffs.  Handcuff yourself to the bed.
 Is that him?
 It's good what you're doing.
 You're gonna be seeing a lot of me. You're sure you don't mind?
 It's horrible, but it'll be your best friend after a few days.  I hope you realize what kind of long shot you're chasing after.
 Any good?
 Files are mostly by state and year of disappearance.  We try to keep the children and adults separate. No eating or smoking in here, but there's a coffee machine in the hall.
 Well, that's all I can do.  Sorry.
 They were pretty clear they didn't want this coming back on them.
 I can give you my card, if your clients want to call me...
 They're putting themselves in place of this kid's parents and thinking they'd want to hear their girl's okay, even if that's all they hear.
 I'm not so sure about this.
 This doctor and wife, they're nice people, but they don't want to get too involved.  They're not trying to have the parents come looking for the girl either. You and I both know sometimes, not often, but sometimes there's real reasons why a kid'll run. Molestation, whatever.  Besides that, the girl's probably eighteen, so she's legal.
 Why don't they come to me?
 For whatever reasons I thought you might be more receptive.
 We do.
 I figured you share information.
 Why not go to the N.C.I.C. or N.C.M.E.C.?
 Few days ago, I was contacted by a couple living in Philadelphia, a doctor and his wife.  What happened was they picked up a young girl hitchhiking off 81, which heads into Philadelphia, started up a conversation with this girl, she looked homeless, seemed about eighteen maybe.  They convinced her to let them buy her a meal in the city.  Nice kid, mature, didn't have much to say, but they got a sense she's a runaway, so all through dinner the doctor's working on her, trying to convince her that at the very least she should pick up a telephone.  Not surprisingly, she ate her food, excused herself...  That's the last they saw her.  The reason they came to me for help, the reason I'm coming to you, is we had a friend of mine in the department work up a sketch...  They want to see if I can I.D. this girl, somehow pass along a message to let the parents know the kid's alive, doing alright.
 Absolutely.  Of course I'll abide by whatever decision you make, but I'd appreciate if you'll hear me out...
 There are reasons for the way we do things here.
 What I'd like, very simply, is access to your archive.  And, now I understand this isn't something you normally do for private citizens...
 Alright, Tom.
 Call me Tom.
 What can I do for you, Mr. Welles?
 What do you want?  You want me to fall to my knees and start crying like a baby... ?
 That's right, you just stood there and watched, because you "felt like it."  Almost makes you worse.
 I never killed anyone.
 Easy enough for you.
 Do it!  Put me out of my misery so I don't have to listen to you whining anymore.  You think it's so easy?
 Don't think I won't.
 Do it.
 I fucking don't know.  What do you think... we weren't burying treasure.  We didn't pace it out so we could come back and get it.  We dug a hole and we put her in it. Your guess is as good as mine.
 Where?  Show me where.
 I don't know...  ... out there somewhere.
 Show me where you buried her.
 You got absolute zero.
 Stop talking.
 You can't go to the cops.  All you can do is cut me loose and walk away, because you got nothing...
 Where do you think you're taking this, huh?  Gonna be a big hero, avenge that little girl's death? Gonna make everything right with the world?  How you gonna do that... ?
 Keep moving.
 Show me.
 Took it out the bathroom window. Buried it in the woods.
 What did you do with her body?
 There wasn't nobody around.  This place was a shit-hole.  I backed up the car to the door and we carried her in, like groceries.  Dino made her eat a bunch of pills, we laid out the plastic, put film in the camera and Machine went to work.
 Nobody saw you bring her in?
 What do you want to know?  You saw it, you saw the loop...
 Tell me what happened.
 Made me sick, but what did I care? What did I care if some hump wants to beat off to that.  It was just something I was doing for money.
 You enjoy it?
 I don't know.  I felt like it.  I never saw anyone get done before.
 Because we're going there.
 Why?
 Show me where you did it, on the map, exactly where you did it.
 Fuck you then, you want to know?  I talked her up, told her how beautiful she was, told her she was gonna be a star.  I told her I was gonna get her a screen test, and while I'm doing that, I got her a soda and dropped a mickey.  When it was dark enough, I rang Dino and told him it was go time, I put her in the trunk of my car and we went and we fucking did it.  That's what happened.  She's dead.  She's been dead a long fucking time.  Nobody fucking cares!
 I want to know.  I want to know exactly what you did to her!
 What the fuck do you want from me?
 What did you do, knock her out, shoot her up... ?
 Something like that.
 So... you brought Dino in, and he brought Machine.  And, one day, a girl walked into your office because you had an ad in the paper for models.  And she never walked out.
 It was a lot of fucking money.
 That's all?  Thirty each.  That's all it took for you to murder her?
 Thirty thousand each, that fucking cocksucker.
 How much did he pay you?
 Yeah.
 Told him you could get him a snuff film.
 Yeah, the fucking lawyer.
 Okay, we'll come back to that.  So, six years ago a guy contacts you, through the classifieds, over the phone, however he does it.  It's Longdale, looking for a snuff film. And you, entrepreneur that you are, tell him you can hook him up.
 What the fuck am I gonna protect that freak for?  He was Dino's boy, not mine.  He shows up with his mask on, leaves with his mask on.  Nobody knows.
 I will never get tired of hurting you, Eddie, so you might want to change your attitude.
 I told you, I don't know.
 I want his name.
 I don't know...
 Who is Machine?
 What do you want?
 Starting to recognize a pattern?
 Fuck you!
 Don't ask questions.
 How'd you find me here?
 Don't bore me with that bullshit.
 I'm gonna kill you.
 One million dollars, Dino.  How much did he tell you he had...
 What's he talking about?
 You killed that girl and you put it on film.  You and your pals, you're fucked.  You fucked up real good.
 What the fuck are you.. ?
 You murdered that girl, Eddie.  Six years ago...
 Who is this.
 I know what you did.
 What?
 I know what you did.
 Yeah, who's this?
 Eddie.
 Celebrity Films.
 Fuck you!
 Get together some upscale product where the girls still have teeth in their head.  Till then, fuck you.
 Look, you cocksucker...
 The only thing wrong is the cheap, softcore crap you're peddling, Eddie.  Where do you get this stuff?
 Maybe there's something wrong with the scumbag customers coming into your place, ever think of that?
 I had three jerkoffs trying to return your tapes last month.  Do you know how bad a skin flick has to be for some jackass to come back into my place with a fucking receipt, and try to fucking return it?
 You know how my tapes sell.  People eat this stuff up.
 Look at him.  You think he played it square?  How much did he give you, how much did he keep for himself?
 He's lying.
 Go ahead, shoot me.  Then try driving to Brooklyn with my brains all over the windshield.
 Give me the film.
 You'll get it when we get there.
 Give me the film.
 Fuck you.
 You almost went over your limit.
 Because he could.  He did it because he could.  What other reason were you looking for?
 Enlighten me.
 Isn't it incredibly obvious?
 Why did he buy a film of some poor, lost girl getting butchered?
 A man like Mr. Christian, a great man... all his money, all his power... a man who attained everything there was to attain...
 I'm asking.
 You're asking me why?
 Just tell me.  Tell me some more of the secrets you and Christian shared. What kind of degenerate pervert was he really?  What the fuck did he want with a snuff film?
 You're making me very angry.
 Did it get him off, huh, watching them cut her up?  Tell me, because I really want to understand.  Did he jerk off to it?  You watch it with him, sit there giving him a handjob while you both watched... ?
 Shut your mouth and drive!
 Mary Anne Mathews was alive till you paid money to have her murdered.
 Shut up.
 You found these smut dealers and asked to buy a snuff film, right? Wanted them to find you one.  Well, they didn't find you one, Longdale, they went out and made you one...
 Mary Anne Mathews, that was her name.  Her mom remembers her.
 None of this would be happening if you would have left it alone.  If you weren't digging up a girl who died six years ago.  A girl no one even remembers.
 Except, you're willing commit murder with them.
 They're no friends of mine.
 Followed me... must have freaked out when you saw me closing in on your buddies...
 Never mind how I found you.
 That's why you got scared when Mrs. Christian hired me.  You knew about the film, figured it had to be in that safe.  How'd you find me?
 I was well compensated.
 Must have paid you a lot, for you to risk everything.  Would've had to have cut yourself a real nice piece of money.
 That's trust.  Mr. Christian trusted me implicitly.
 So, he sent you, gave you the money, his errand-boy.  And if you refused, it wasn't like you could tell anyone your pervert boss just asked you to get him a snuff film.  That's the beauty of lawyer/client privilege.
 Wouldn't exactly have been possible for a man of his stature.
 You were the middleman, am I right? Old man Christian wasn't about to go shopping for a snuff film himself.
 Well, whatever reasons Mrs. Christian has for engaging the services of a private investigator, I should certainly be a party to. But, since she feels differently, I can only go on the record as having expressed my adamant disapproval.
 That's right.
 You are a private investigator?
 Of what sort?
 As Mr. Christian's attorney and one of the executors of his estate, it concerns me that a meeting of this sort should take place without my being asked to attend.
 I'm listening.
 Yes, I do have something to say.  I insisted on being here as soon as I heard Mrs. Christian contacted you.
 It's not my money.  The woman I got it from is never going to give it a second thought.  Let's not make a big deal out of this, okay?  Go be a race car driver.  Go run for President.  Whatever.
 Look... that's awful generous and everything...
 It's money.  People use it to purchase goods and services.
 What's this?
 Nope.
 Still don't want to tell me what you're doing?
 I'm trying to figure that out myself.  I have to see Machine without his mask.
 What's next?
 "Devil" frightened me as much as it excited me, but I'd be hard pressed to choose a favorite.
 I know if I had to pick, it'd be "Choke," or "Devil."
 What kind of Junior P.I. would I be if I didn't go with you?
 You don't need to be here.
 Nobody knows his name.  That's his thing.  He always wears a mask.  You never see his face.  He calls himself "Machine," that's what they call him.  Machine.
 Who is he, his name?
 I told you, he's one of Dino Velvet's stock players...
 Who is he?
 Who is this, in the mask?  Who is he?
 Wha... ?
 It's cheap, and people know to mind their own business. What have you got for me?
 Oh, come on, man, what are we doing in this flea bag?
 Great.
 It's their Presidential Suite.
 You didn't say it was gonna be this luxurious.
 See ya.
 Consider it.  Meanwhile, dig up whatever Dino Velvet films you can. Get receipts.  I'll call back.
 You want me to come out there and play private eye?
 Take a vacation.  I'll pay you four hundred a day, plus expenses.
 I'm a working stiff, pops.
 Well, I'm in New York now.  What do you say to flying out and giving me a hand?
 He cuts all kinds of other stuff into his movies; photographs, newsreel footage, subliminal images. Thinks he's making art.
 Alright, I get the picture.
 Nothing illegal, it's always borderline.  Like if some freak wants to see a transvestite in a full rubber immersion suit getting an enema from a...
 Out of the back of bondage magazines mostly, but you can find it on the street if you look.  He'll also do commissions, for enough money...
 Where does he sell it?
 You're learning.
 Specialty product.
 His stuff comes out of New York. Bondage and fetish videos, Gothic Hardcore.  Definitely not for the squeamish.
 A weirdo making S+M films?  Who'd have thought it?
 Dino Velvet... yeah, he's like the John Luc Godard of S+M flicks, supposed to be a real weirdo.
 Good question.
 So, you have a wife and kid waiting for you in Pennsylvania... what are you doing mixed up in all this?
 A daughter.
 I see a ring on your finger.  You have any kids?
 What about me?
 You can't sit there all day watching the parade of losers that comes into that place without going numb.  So what? Am I gonna go off and be a race car driver?  Go to Harvard?  Run for President?  What about you, pops?
 You're telling me it doesn't get to you?
 Yeah, I'm a real genius.  What choices have I got?  Fuck, just because I know about stuff like tonight doesn't mean I deal it.  I work a job.  It beats pumping gas, beats making hamburgers.
 You just strike me as smart enough to be doing something else.
 I'm not mixed up in anything, hayseed.  What are you talking about?
 I don't mean any offense... but what are you doing mixed up in all this?
 I don't know, where are yours?
 Where are your parents?
 Twenty-five.
 How old are you?
 First of all, basement sales like tonight aren't gonna last much longer.  It's too risky, one, and two, everything's going on the internet.  Anyone with a computer and enough patience can find anything he wants.  It's heaven for those degenerate chicken-hawks. They're swapping pictures back and forth as fast as their modems can zap 'em.  But, there's still some weird shit under the counter where I work sometimes.  No one knows where it comes from.  That's local underground, where information spreads by word of mouth.  Those are zombies, hardcore junkies.  Their hands are permanently pruned.  They go out in the sun they don't burn, they blister.  Other than that, all I know about is the mail. Classified ads in the paper with hidden codes.  Secret couriers. Credit card orders to dummy corporations.  Interstate wire transfers.  Revolving P.O. boxes. But, if you're asking me who do you go to to get illegal shit... who knows?  That's the whole point -- the seller stays as far away from the buyer as possible, and vice versa, and cops can't trace the deal.  There's ways to do it so nobody knows who anybody is.
 What other ways are there to get illegal films?  Who do you see?
 I heard you asking.  That guy wasn't yanking you around.  There's no such thing.
 Snuff films.
 There's two kinds of specialty product; legal and illegal.  Foot fetish, shit films, watersports, bondage, spanking, fisting, she- males, hemaphrodites... it's beyond hardcore, but legal.  This is the kind of hardcore where one guy's going to look at it and throw up, another guy looks at it and falls in love.  Now, with some of the S+M and bondage films, they straddle the line.  How are you supposed to tell if the person tied up with the ball gag in their mouth is a consenting or not?  Step over that line, you're into kiddie porn.  Rape films, but there aren't many.  I've never seen one.
 Child pornography.
 What you saw tonight, we're not talking about a video some dentist takes home over the weekend.  We're talking about stuff where people get hurt.  Specialty product.
 Interesting theory.
 You've got Penthouse, Playboy, Hustler, etc.  Nobody even considers them pornography anymore.  Then, there's mainstream hardcore.  Triple X.  The difference is penetration. That's hardcore.  That whole industry's up in the valley. Writers, directors, porn stars. They're celebrities, or they think they are.  They pump out 150 videos a week.  A week.  They've even got a porno Academy Awards.  America loves pornography.  Anybody tells you they never use pornography, they're lying.  Somebody's buying those videos.  Somebody's out there spending 900 million dollars a year on phone sex.  Know what else?  It's only gonna get worse.  More and more you'll see perverse hardcore coming into the mainstream, because that's evolution.  Desensitization.  Oh my God, Elvis Presley's wiggling his hips, how offensive!  Nowadays, Mtv's showing girls dancing around in thong bikinis with their asses hanging out.  Know what I mean?  For the porn-addict, big tits aren't big enough after a while.  They have to be the biggest tits ever.  Some porn chicks are putting in breast implants bigger than your head, literally.  Soon, Playboy is gonna be Penthouse, Penthouse'll be Hustler, Hustler'll be hardcore, and hardcore films'll be medical films. People'll be jerking off to women laying around with open wounds. There's nowhere else for it to go.
 Wake up, pops.  Your education begins tonight.
 ... Hello... ?
 See you then.  Oh, and, don't call me "pops."
 Tomorrow night, I get off at eight.
 Here's my number if you need it...  When can you start?
 Sounds good, pops.
 Okay, let's pretend I live in the same fantasy world where you make four hundred a week in that dump. I'll give you six hundred for a few days.
 Four hundred a week, off the books.
 How much do you make now?
 How much?
 Well, there's the thing; you're not gonna know anything about what I'm doing, but you can make some money.
 From Pennsylvania.  P.I. from PA. What are you doing out here?
 Not quite.
 You're a private eye.  Like Shaft.
 I'm not a cop.
 You're not a cop, are you?  If I ask and you are, you have to tell me.
 Well, whatever there is, whoever's dealing, however it's done, I want to know.  I want a good look, so if you've got that kind of connection, great.  If not, speak now.
 There's not much illegal.
 Well, here's the deal, Max.  This thing I'm on right now has something to do with underground pornography. Stuff that's sold under the counter, illegally...
 Max.
 What's your name, if you don't mind me asking?
 Three, four years.
 How long you been working there?
 Good for you.
 I don't know what you're looking for, mister, but so we're clear from the start, I'm straight.
 Thomas Welles.  Nice picture.
 I need some information.  Thought you might be able to help.
 Came back for that battery-operated vagina, right?  Told you you would.
 Remember me?
 Might get drummed out of the pornographer's union, and then where would I be?
 Wouldn't want to embarrass yourself in front of your fellow perverts.
 I tear off the cover and paste this one on...  You know how it is.
 Truman Capote.
 Catchy title.  What are you really reading?  Hard to believe that book's got any parts worth highlighting.
 Once you pick it up you can't put it down.
 I'll risk it.
 It's your call, but you're gonna be sorry when you're in one of those everyday situations that call for a battery-operated vagina and you don't have one.
 Well, it's tempting, but no thanks.
 My boss tells me I have to do more suggestive selling.
 Pardon me?
 Can I interest you in a battery operated-vagina?
 Yeah... guess so.
 Big date tonight?
 If you have a pencil and paper, I'll tell you how to send it.
 How will I get it to you?
 I've got about five thousand left in cash, but I'll need another thirty, if you approve.
 Fine...
 I've made progress.  I'm in Manhattan.  Once a few more pieces fall into place, I'll drive to you and give you an update.
 Nothing more than a bother.  Have you any news for me?
 I hope it's nothing serious.
 I've been ordered into bed.  The doctor says I've gotten the flu, or some other wretched ailment.
 I don't know if luck's the word. Are you feeling alright?
 How are you?  Having any luck?
 Mrs. Christian, Tom Welles here.
 Hello?
 You're one hell of a detective, Mrs. Christian.
 You told me to look, so I looked.
 Send it to me through the post office like we arranged.  No return address.  You dug this up all by yourself?
 Okay.
 For a human life... murder on film, no statute of limitations.  Who knows?  It sure could have.  I'd like you to overnight me a copy of those checks, then put them in a safe deposit box.
 Do you think the film could have cost that much?
 I'm here.
 Hello... ?
 To the penny.  Exactly one million dollars in cash.
 You're joking.
 Totalled together, these five checks from five different accounts, they equal one million dollars.
 Okay, I follow you so far...
 One was for two hundred thousand, one dollar and thirteen cents. Another was for three hundred thousand, six hundred fifty four dollars and seventy six cents...
 The checks were for odd amounts...
 I'm not positive this means anything.
 My husband never dealt with money personally, certainly not cash.
 Okay...
 I know what I'm asking.  Your compensation will be appropriate to the risk.  You'll need cash to buy information, and I'll provide it.  I feel responsible, Mr. Welles.  You saw what he did to her.
 Nothing remotely like this.
 You've found missing persons before.
 I deal in divorce cases.  Corporate investigations...
 Any evidence you collect can be given to the police later, anonymously.  I've thought about it and there's no other way.  If you can't find them... if the only thing that comes from this film is that this is all my husband will be remembered for, well I can't let that happen.  I'm telling you I won't.  If there's no chance that poor girl's memory can be served, then I'll just have to spend my last days trying to forget her.
 It won't work like that.
 No.  For me to live with the ruin of my husband's name, I need know that whoever did this will be punished. If you can find them, I will take their names to the police.  I'll say my husband confessed on his death bed. I'll say I didn't have courage to come forward at first...
 You don't have any other choice.
 I told you I can't, not yet.
 You... you need to go to the police.
 Of course.  But, I'm certain it's nothing to worry about.
 Will you watch it and see for yourself?
 I'm sure it is.  It's probably something your husband was given as a bad joke.  More than likely he never even watched it.
 I'm telling you it's not that.
 If you were to study it you'd see the camera cutting away... you'd see the tricks they can play...
 No.
 Please, believe me.  This is probably a stag film.  Simulated rape.  Hard to stomach, and it might seem real, but there are ways of making it look realistic... fake blood and special effects...
 Mrs. Christian... please, will you sit down a moment?  I want you to listen carefully. What you're talking about is a "snuff film."  But, from what I know, snuff films are a kind of... urban myth.  Like, red light district folklore.  There's no such thing, I can assure you.
 I didn't know what to think.  I can't tell you how horrible it's been, to know this belonged to my husband.  To know that he watched this... this atrocity.  But, I can't go to the police...
 This is a movie showing a girl being murdered.  She's sitting on a bed, and a man rapes her... and he begins to cut her with a knife...  I only watched what I could.
 I'm afraid I don't...
 It's a film... of a girl being murdered.
 Cash, stock certificates, and this...
 Do you want to tell me what you found?
 There was nothing he could do.  My husband left everything to me.  I prevented anyone from seeing the contents.  I felt these were my husband's private things.  I didn't... I didn't realize...
 You hired someone to open it.  I'll bet the lawyer loved that.
 My husband was the only one with the combination to this safe.  I knew about it, but as far as I was concerned it was none of my business.  Not till now, that is.
 Just curious.
 I wear a gun when I can tell a client expects me to.  Other than that, there's never any reason.
 Do you carry a gun, Mr. Welles?
 We were married forty-five years. Hard even for me to imagine.  We had our troubles.  There were plenty of places for him to be other than here, but he was always loyal to me, and I to him.  I loved him deeply.
 He succeeded.
 Mostly.  That's where he started his empire building.  He was a good man.  Notorious as an eccentric, but that was something he cultivated.  He wanted to be legendary.
 Pittsburgh?
 I'll do whatever I can to help.
 His passing has left me with... something of a dilemma.  A terrible, terrible dilemma.
 My condolences.
 As you know, my husband passed away recently.  Two weeks ago now.
 You are highly recommended.  Praised for your discretion... your strict adherence to confidentiality.
 I've been privileged to provide services for people I admire.
 I've spoken to friends of mine and my husband's, in Harrisburg, in Lancaster and Hershey.  Asking about you.  I must say you have friends in influential places.
 He's a lawyer.  Please, sit, here...
 He's odd.
 Thank you.
 Have a pleasant evening.  Will you have tea, Mister Welles?
 Apparently Mr. Longdale has something he feels he simply must say before you and I speak.
 Uh huh, pleasure.
 I try to be.
 Mister Welles. You're very prompt.
 They murdered her, Mrs. Mathews, I'm sorry.  It happened a month after she ran away.  She's been dead all this time...
 Why... why are you doing this to me... ?
 They killed her, and they took her out in the forest somewhere and they buried her...
 No... no... no...
 He raped her and...and...and he murdered her...he cut her up with knifes...
 No...
 They brought her into the room... one man, he put a knife to her throat and he raped her...
 Who are you?
 Someone... some men, they took your daughter and they drugged her, and they took her to a motel room... they did terrible things to her...
 Who is this... ?
 Mrs. Mathews, your daughter is dead. She's dead.
 What... ?
 She went to California, to Los Angeles... she wanted to start over. She wanted to be an actress...
 What are you talking about... ?
 I have to tell you something.  It won't be easy for you to hear.  It's about your daughter... Mary Anne...  When I... when I was there with you, her diary, in your attic, in silverware.  If you read it, you'll know what I'm telling you is true...
 I remember.  You just left...
 Mrs. Mathews?  It's Thomas.  Do you remember, I was there a few weeks ago... asking about your daughter...
 Hello... ?
 What am I supposed to do?  Forget her?  Time heals all wounds, right?  She's all I think about, and I've learned to live with that.  But, you want the truth... the real truth? If I had a choice... if I had to choose, between her being out there, living a good life and being happy, and me not knowing; never finding out what happened to her...  ... or her being dead and me knowing...  I'd choose to know.
 It's been six years.
 I think about it everyday.  But, every time the phone rings... every single time, I still think it's her.
 Yes.
 You were right.  I didn't find anything.  I'm going to run and get something to eat. Are you hungry?
 You're probably right, and I probably won't find anything. I don't have a right to ask this, and you can kick me out of your house if you want, but this is my profession and there's a part of me that can't let it go.  Police are just as human as you or I.  They could have missed something.  They probably didn't.  Wouldn't you rather know?
 My husband never laid a hand on her. She would have told me... she would have told me...
 Will you let me look?
 How... how can you say that to me...?
 If the police focused their search in her room, her belongings, well that'd be only natural, but they may have been looking in the wrong place.
 No.  You don't have any reason to think that...
 It is possible... and I know this isn't something you want to hear. Your daughter may have tried to hide a note where she thought you would eventually find it, but where she knew your husband would never find it.  She might have wanted to tell you something...
 I don't know.  I think so.
 Do you think the police did a good job?
 There wasn't one.  The police looked.
 It's not really my place, but it's not easy for me to set aside the private detective part of me either. See, I know a little about missing persons.  When kids run, they almost always leave a note.  It's guilt. They want to say goodbye.
 What?
 I've got what I need for my report. There is... there is one thing that bothers me though.
 You should be.
 No.
 Are you religious?
 We're all like that.
 Doesn't make much sense, does it? When everything's happy, when life's fine and you have every reason to believe there's a God, you don't bother.  Then, something horrible happens... that's when you start praying all the time.  That's when you start going to church.
 Okay.
 I... I shouldn't take anymore of your time.  Maybe we can finish tomorrow.  I'll call tomorrow...
 Of course.
 People remember me from the news.  Can you drive me back now?
 No one knows what it's like.  You can't even imagine how much it hurts.
 I had to ask.  I apologize.
 You try going through what we did. Bob couldn't take it, that's all. Christ, there's times when it still seems like I can't either.
 I didn't mean to...
 There wasn't anything like that. The police and the FBI people asked, but there wasn't anything happened like that, never.  My husband... his heart broke when Mary left...
 You have to forgive me, but in these circumstances... with your daughter...  Were there any indications of... any sort of abuse?
 It got to be too much for him.
 Why do you think he did it?
 We were divorced by then.  Things fell apart... he was living with a friend...
 September 4th, 1993.  About a year after Mary disappeared.
 Yes.
 If there's anything you feel uncomfortable talking about, tell me, but I have to ask.  Your husband... he committed suicide?
 I don't know.
 What was she running from?
 She didn't seem herself.  For months there never was any way to get her to talk about it.  One night we went to bed... the next morning she was gone.  She took some clothes.
 She just seemed... depressed... ?
 No.
 So, she didn't leave a note?  She never gave any indication where she might go, before she left?
 You probably expect me to be wearing a trench coat and a hat.  Drinking whiskey, chasing women and getting beaten up by guys with broken noses. Want to know what it's really like? It's sitting in a car and staring at a hotel window for three days straight, pissing in a plastic bottle, pardon me, because some guy thinks his wife's cheating on him. Glamorous, huh?  And the guy who hired you, he has a hair-lip, dandruff and crooked teeth, and you could have told him the minute you laid eyes on him his wife's cheating, and you don't blame her.
 I didn't think there were private detectives anymore, except on TV.
 That's exactly what I am.
 They hired you.  You're like, a private detective?
 It's very important you don't let this raise your expectations.  It's not going to effect any ongoing efforts.  All I'm saying is, please know, I'm not here to create any false hope.
 Well, I'm following up on your daughter, Mary, height; five four, weight; hundred ten pounds, brown eyes, blonde hair.  Born April 24, 1976.  Missing June 11th, 1992.  A runaway, that's how she's listed. Is this information correct... ?
 No.
 Right, Agent Cole told me he'd call and let you know to expect me.  He didn't call?
 Neil... Neil Cole.
 What was the name... ? I've got it here somewhere...
 These volunteer organizations are sort of interconnected, functioning hand in hand with law enforcement. The R.C.M.P. brought me in to review their investigations...  ... fact-check their records, see if there's anything they missed, anything they should be doing different.  I'm here for a few days, before I head back up to Virginia. These reports go to the Justice Department eventually.  I spoke to your F.B.I. contact a few days ago, uh...
 Yes, but...
 I'm sorry, let me explain, the R.C.M.P. is a support organization and archive, not unlike the Center for Missing and Exploited Children in Washington.  I'm sure you've dealt with them before?
 I don't understand, who are... ?
 I've been hired as an independent contractor by the U.S. Resource Center for Missing Persons as part of an internal audit.  If you have any time over the next few days, I'd like to make an appointment to ask some questions about the disappearance of your daughter.
 Hello, Mrs. Mathews, my name's Thomas Jones, I'm a state licensed investigator...
 Yes... ?
 I'll do what I can.
 She was the kindest, sweetest girl you'd ever want to meet.  Oh, I adored her.  I supposed I always hoped she'd be back.  After a time, all I could do was pray she had moved on to better things.  Can you get this suitcase to her parents, if you think it's appropriate?
 Whatever possessed you to keep this all this time?
 That's her suitcase.  I had forgotten it, till you showed me her picture.
 Her belongings?
 Those are her belongings.
 What is this?
 I'm trying to find out.  She was a runaway.  I'm looking into it for her parents.
 Do you know what happened to her?
 Yes.  I remember her.
 You... you do?  You're sure? Please, Sister, will you take another look, make sure...
 Yes... I remember Mary
 Certainly, Senator.  If I can ever be of further assistance.
 Yes, Mister Welles, thank you.
 The um... you'll find my invoice in the envelope. If that's all...
 He's an imbecile.  I tried to warn my daughter, but what can you do?
 No, sir, he is not.
 None too discreet, is he?
 Your son-in-law dealt with the dry cleaning franchise during the day, saw that woman every night.  The specifics are in the report, and information about the woman.  It's unpleasant, I know.  I apologize...
 Certainly, sir.
 Yeah, I know the spiel.  If you could bag it, I'll be on my way, thank you.
 I'm required by state law to inform you that, while it's perfectly legal for you to purchase these items, it is illegal for you to use them for any sort of...
 Okay.  Fine.
 No, you may not.
 Alright.  May I have your phone number, area code first?
 Cash.
 Excellent.  we accept MasterCard and American Express.
 Okay, I'll take it all.
 Then we'll stay up together.
 Figure it out?!?!  I'll be insane before I figure it out.  The only thing I'm sure of is that I can't go to sleep.  Not while he's using me.
 We'll figure it out.
 I haven't slept much either.  Since Kristen...
 I can't go back to sleep again.
 Yeah, or turn you into toast.
 It is...was. It's a zapper, it might help me stay awake.
 Hey, since when do you play Thomas Edison?  This looks like Sheila's.
 I can't find him.
 Doesn't the dream master work for you anymore?
 It was bad.
 I heard you screaming.  Was it a bad one?
 Kristen...
 You alright?
 What?
 Kincaid and Joey died last night.
 What's wrong?
 Alice, you think you can leave?
 Never say can't.  Just do what I do.
 Rick...I can't.
 Look, you gotta stand up for yourself. Learn to fight back.
 But she wouldn't let Dad treat me like that.
 Yeah.  She'd be half as strict as you.
 I don't want to.
 The mirror.  You can't see yourself in it.
 What?
 Don't you think it kind of defeats the purpose?
 You'll hear all kinds of stories. They'll tell you it was murder, but it wasn't.
 Kristen, what happened?
 When I used to have nightmares.  I brought my friends in to help me.  Until they all started dying.
 You what?
 When they're all you have, you kinda become an expert.
 How'd you learn so much about dreams?
 I daydream.  you have to dream about some place fun.  Remember you're in control.
 Great, you wouldn't happen to know his phone number?
 No really, it's a fable.  The 'guardian of good' dreams.  It was like my teddy bear when I was growing up.
 Sounds like a game show host to me.
 My mom taught me when I was little.  Did you ever hear of the dream master?
 You could do worse.
 I love to dream, I just hate ones about my dad.
 Yeah, I'm not so sure.
 I'm sure they're around.
 Have you seen Joey and Kincaid!  God, I can't find them.  I can't find them anywhere.
 Here you are.  Where were you this morning?  Rick's looking all over for you.
 Saw who? I was up all night cramming for this physics test, and I was putting this little baby together.  Look...
 Then you saw him, too?
 That obvious, huh?
 You've been up all night?
 What?
 We have matching luggage.
 Ohhhhbaby, I am dead on my feet.
 I know.
 Maybe you shouldn't be working here so much.  You don't want to get stuck waiting tables for the rest of your life.
 I know.  I hardly have any time to study.
 I gotta get to the library before it closes.  Killer physics test.
 You in a hurry?
 Save it for later.  Come on!
 You look great!
 Debbie.  She's gone.  I've...collected her, like the others.
 What the hell was that?
 Something's wrong here.  It feels like...
 Here we are.
 You know, I get the weirdest feeling we've been through this before.
 He's going after Debbie.  I gotta stop him.
 It's okay, we're just about there.
 As long as your driving doesn't kill us.
 Cut that shit out.  Maybe before, but not now. I want to help you. I'm on your side.
 You just feel sorry for me.
 Hey, you're not alone.  We have to stop him, I'm with you.
 He's going after Debbie, I gotta stop him.
 Who?
 Try what other kids did.  Keep each other awake.  We'll meet at Debbie's tonight. At least if we don't sleep he can't get us.
 Then what else can we do?
 Yeah, right.  Let's trade death by Freddy for life in a rubber room.  Adults won't see it. They can't.
 Why can't we just talk to the authorities?
 You don't really get it.  He's not a nightstalker.  It'll take more than bench presses to beat him.
 I don't think so.  I guess this is my own war.
 Is there something we can do?
 Not really.
 Kristen was the last child left of the people who killed Freddy.  Maybe Freddy can't get to new kids without someone like me.  Someone to bring them to him.
 Alright, let's assume this whole thing is true. Why does Freddy all of a sudden need you?
 Three days.
 How long have you been awake?
 The story is, the deaths you can't argue with.
 No offense, or anything, but it's kind of hard to swallow.
 Look, you know why, you just don't believe me.
 Extra money, huh?
 I've been working double shifts.
 Kristen's story really got to her.
 No, don't!  I gave Sheila to him and now she's dead!
 "In her dream"?
 I was there in the dream.  He took her. It was awful.  It was awful...
 It was no suicide.  It was not an accident.  It was Freddy, and he's coming back for seconds, thirds, and fourths.
 I thought it was an accident.  Smoking in bed.
 I know.  Uh...Alice.
 Tell him I was looking for him, okay?  I'm Dan.
 Rick stayed later after school with Kristen.  She wasn't feeling very well.
 You're his sister, right?
 No...
 I saw it. It was my dream.  I brought Sheila in...
 Enough of that crap.
 It was Freddy.
 Asthma attack...what 17-year old has a fatal asthma attack?  She was gonna be a doctor.
 Give her time.  Beauty is skin deep.
 I think Sheila's more interested in dissecting bodies than just admiring them.
 Alright, I think I see salvation...
 Rick, please.
 What else?  You ever look over this town's history?  Not a safe place to be a teenager.  Anyway, if I'm next, watch your back.
 About Freddy?
 She's blaming herself for Sheila.  I know how it feels.  I've been thinking about Kristen.  Maybe I could've stopped it, if I'd listened.
 How she doing?  I ran into her last night.
 Been up with Alice.
 She knew she was gonna die.
 Hey man, we're all sorry...
 Now it gets weird.  She says he comes back in dreams.  If he kills you there, you're dead for real.
 Nice neighborhood.
 It pissed off a lot of parents. According to Kristen, they hunted him down; roasted him alive.
 So?
 She told us the story of Freddy.  It's a town legend.  He was a child killer who was freed on a technicality.
 So what's up?  What'd I miss?
 Let me talk to you.
 I don't get it.
 Excuse me, ladies.  I'll just be a moment.
 Hey, Rick!
 Earth to Alice...
 T-T-Thanks Alice...
 Mother, you've just murdered me.  Take that to your goddamn therapy...
 Honey, we went over this in therapy.
 Sorry!! Sorry that you and your tennis pals torched this guy who's now after me. In case you haven't been keeping score, it's his fucking banquet, and I'm the LAST COURSE!!
 I'm sorry honey, but...
 Your distraught.  It'll help...
 What's wrong with me?
 You're just tired.  Don't think I haven't noticed your not sleeping.  That has to stop, honey.
 Well Mom, I'll tell ya, when two of your friends die the same day, you let me know what it does to your appetite.
 Something the matter with the cuisine?
 I told you you can't help.  This isn't a normal nightmare. I'm doomed.
 It's okay, babe.  We're with you.
 It's no just a house. It's his home. He's waiting there for me...to dream.
 I'll tell you later.
 It's no story.  It happened.  Freddy's real and he's back.
 I though Freddy was just an old town story.
 Now you know who and what Freddy really is.
 Oh God!  He killed them!
 What is it?
 When dad's popping aspiring like popcorn, it's avoid-all-contact-day.
 What?
 Avoid-all-contact-day.
 Something wrong with the stairs?
 Don't worry, honey
 You don't get it, he's after me...
 You just stay put.  You need rest.
 I gotta get out of here.
 You had a nasty bump.
 Yeah.  I guess so... What happened?
 Feeling better now?
 You're not taking my baby!
 We know you've been through a lot but there's more than your feelings at stake here.
 What are you talking about?  My "condition"?...
 In your present condition, Alice, we're worried about your ability --
 And ours.  It's our grandchild.
 Look, I appreciate what you're offering, but no.  He is my responsibility.
 What I what?  Well, I've thought about it.  I plan to keep him.
 Frankly, dear, we wondered what you intend to do with our baby?
 It's okay, Dan
 Excuse us, dear.
 He says it's easy.  Especially with sad people.  With closed-off people.
 But how...?
 It's where he hides out.  Inside.  That's how he found me.
 What do you mean?
 He's inside you, where he hides.
 Where is he?
 Come on downstairs.  He won't hurt you. He needs us both.
 Mommy...?
 My friend, with the funny hand.
 Who says I don't like you?
 Who said I...wait, what?
 No you're not.  You don't even care about being a mom.  How come you don't think about me?
 Oh...I'm sure that's not true.  I'll bet she's very worried about you.  I would be.
 She doesn't want me around
 I don't think this is a nice place for you to be.  Maybe we should go find your Mom.
 No...
 Is that who you're waiting for?
 Been having bad dreams.
 Hi, you don't look very well.  Are you feeling all right?
 I could tell you were sad.  I just wanted to see if you were all right.
 How did you know that?
 I'm sorry your boyfriend got killed.
 My name is...
 It's lonely in there, in my room.
 Shouldn't you be in your room, Jacob?
 Huh?
 Hey...wake up.
 Me too.
 There you go.  Love you.
 You're right.
 You don't dream him up, he can't hurt you.  Or me.  Or us.  Remember...
 Yeah...I guess.
 You stopped it didn't you?  It was probably just a regular bad dream.
 No.  Well, not exactly...it's that...I felt like I wasn't in control.  For the first time since...all that.  I'm scared.
 About him?
 He'll show up.  C'mon, what's really wrong?
 Nothing...it's just...I didn't see my father at the ceremony.
 Okay, babe.  What's the matter?
 I know.
 They're coach seats, but the plane lands in Paris.  It's gonna be a helluva summer, hon!
 The tickets.
 Sorry, babe.
 Jesus!  Don't do that!
 Hi, beautiful.
 Now.
 But Dad --
 No!  I won't have you running around in the middle of the night.  You're coming home.
 I've got to go.
 Alice!
 No, I'm not.  I sort of hope it's a boy. Be nice to have a boy playing in the house again.
 You disappointed in me?
 Since my little girl became a mom...
 Since when are you such a smart shopper?
 Alice...
 Very funny.
 Sobering...
 How was the meeting?
 Daddy, he's coming back...Krueger's coming back.  Make them understand.
 I'm so sorry, honey...
 It's just across the park.
 You sure you don't want a ride to work?
 Thanks for everything, Dad.
 To take a picture.
 Where are we going?
 It's the model you've been saving up for. I wanted you to have it for your trip.
 Dad!
 No.  A deal's a deal.
 That's in the past.  Unless you've stopped going to the meetings.
 I watched from behind the stands.  Didn't want to embarrass you, ya know.  "The drunk showed up", that kind of thing...
 I was afraid you weren't coming.
 That's okay.  He's got the rest of his life to catch up on his sleep.
 He sure loves to stay awake.
 So did Dan.
 You do good work, Alice.
 We've got to go to the asylum and find her body.  Mark said her soul's trapped with it -- that's why she can't come to me.  It must be!
 But how are we gonna --
 Jacob.  We've got to get to Amanda before it's too late.
 What?
 If they actually bothered to bury her.
 You think that's the place she's buried?
 Yeah...So that's him.  And you're not crazy.
 Are you alright?
 That's the only reason you're alive...
 Look...we're all tired.  None of us had any sleep since Friday night...
 Goddamn it, Yvonne!  You don't just run away from this guy!  He finds you in your dreams.
 All I know is that you are not doing yourself or the baby any good by acting like a crazy woman.  Why don't you take off - leave Springwood and cool out somewhere for a while?
 What do you think I'm doing?  Look.  Whether you believe it or not, Krueger is back.  He's after the baby and if I don't try to do something about it, who will??
 And so is your baby.  You've got more than just yourself to think of now!
 Krueger is reality.
 I am your friend, and I'm worried sick about you.  But, you're like a locked safe.  You've gotta start dealing with reality.
 I just can't figure out how he's getting in when I'm awake...
 I really think you need to calm down now, okay?
 Mark knows I'm not crazy.  Ask him to show you his hands.
 Oh, Alice...no.  Honey, I love you but you're going to have to get a hold of yourself...
 I think Krueger's trying to do something to it.
 You had me scared on the phone.  What's wrong with the baby?
 Why don't you two stick to reality.
 I don't understand what's happening. Krueger has to use my dreams, but he got to Dan and Greta while I was awake. How's he doing it?
 No accident.  I tried to warn all of you about Krueger.
 It was just an accident.  Like with Dan.
 When Dan died you weren't even asleep. You said so.  End of story.
 What's that got to do with it?
 They're waiting for us...but let's keep this dream stuff between you and me.
 Did everyone call everyone?
 He must've wandered up from the children's ward.  I just wondered what was wrong with him.
 There aren't any little boys on your floor.
 Have you visited the little boy on my floor?  Jacob, the one who looks kind of sad?
 Alice, it's no dream.  I'm sorry...Dan's dead.
 It was no accident.  It was Krueger.  He used to get in through my dreams, but not anymore.  He's found some other way.
 Yeah, before they revoke his diploma.
 Good to see you again, Mr. Grey.  I've got to go find Dan.
 No, the Dan part was nice...
 Dan keeping you up again?  Put a lock on that window, girl.
 Had kind of a long night.
 Hey, what's wrong with you -- let's see a smile.
 She killed herself.  Her soul's gonna be in torment.
 I don't understand.
 No shit.
 Poor woman...
 Empty plot.  Memorial stone.  Vacant. They never did put her under.  Cool, huh?
 But I've seen her grave.
 They couldn't prove it.  No body!  Nuns bumping themselves off is bad for business.
 Meaning?
 That's what the newspapers thought.  She spent the rest of her life in the asylum. After Krueger's trial she flipped out and hung herself, so they thought.
 No, it's our problem, Mark.  If I don't deal with this, they really might try to take Jacob.  You said she committed suicide?
 That's their problem.
 They think I'm nuts.
 Then we'll find another way.
 I couldn't do that, Mark.  He's my last link with Dan...No, I want him.
 I'm going to see what else I can find out about Mr. Fred Krueger
 Where are you going?
 I don't know!
 Whoa, slow down.  How're you gonna hide from a guy like that, leave the planet?
 What, you named it already?
 My baby!
 Who's Jacob?
 Why don't I go make some coffee.  There's a lot to tell.
 Tell me some more about this Krueger guy.
 It wasn't her mother.  The only reason we're still here is that none of us has slept since the grad party.
 Maybe it was her mother who killed her, with all that Polly Perfect shit.
 Nobody thinks that.
 Do you think I'm an idiot...for being in love with her?
 Mark!
 Then get out!
 She must've fallen asleep at the table...
 I thought about that.
 I'm very fucking sorry, but Greta is dead today.  Could we interest you in someone else?
 I want to talk to both you guys about Greta.  And...
 Yeah.  I'm just aces.
 Mark, are you okay?
 That's why it's my fault Dan's dead.
 I've got to write some of this down.
 Well we gotta do something!
 My dad's got this thing about drinking in the house.
 Greta, come on.  One burger with me?
 Not to mention the heartbreak of psoriasis.
 I think I'm starting to wear her down.  Have some anyway.
 Give up, Mark, it's hopeless.
 I don't believe this... All that gore you paint in the comics and you're squeamish?
 Oh man!  I could've gone all night without looking at that.
 Oh, he was this ancient guy I read about who like, killed his kids 'cause they didn't want to run the kingdom the way he thought they should.
 Who?
 He's right.  Sometimes I feel like I'm living with Melicertes.
 You know my mother -- get real.  What about Alice's?
 That club sucks, they card everybody. Let's just party at your place.
 Pimples, heartburn, cellulite... and no modeling career.
 Meet me later.  Milkshakes.  Cherry pie. Banana splits.  And no mom!
 My undying love.  Have some.
 Next life.  Oh, what's that?
 Yeah, when are you gonna come to your senses?
 All of us.  Right?
 Bottom line, Alice.  Anybody, supernatural or not, that wants to hurt you - he'll have to go through us first.
 Pushy parents can make you more than a bit crazy.
 Look.  Dan's parents were pushing him. Pushing him hard.  He was bitching about it at the party last night.  He was under pressure.  We all are.
 I want to talk about the baby.
 Stop saying that, it's bullshit.
 Nah.  It's getting too cold for me, and my wonderful mother will kill me if I screw up my hair.  She's got some model agency guy coming to dinner tomorrow night.
 Naah, I'm done.  Got to be on shift in a couple hours.  Aren't you going in?
 Have another one, sounds like you need it.
 That means they're gonna give me the key to the pool so I can lock up when I'm done.
 Yeah...
 All right kids, I tell you what we're gonna do.  I've got swimming practice until six-thirty today...
 Makes you look like a nun--
 These things are wild...  What do you think?
 He invited me to his house last night.
 You, too?
 Stick around, please?
 It's okay.
 I can't listen to this.
 I'm not finished - I loved Greta.  A lot. And if maybe, just maybe, someone or some thing killed her, I'd like to hear about it!
 Mark...
 Why don't you shut up and let her talk! Two of us died in the last two days, does that strike you as particularly normal?!
 Faint.
 Vomit?
 Two hours a day, six days a week.
 Dan.  And he's taking Alice with him -- pretty good dive Yvonne.  You've been practicing.
 And his 'egghead' son!  We'll give 'em a <u>rough</u> <u>reception</u>, won't we?
 I wouldn't worry.  So long as we have boats like the Tiger Shark - and people like you, the Skipper, Dave, Kent, Sir Ian and my father -
 I don't know.
 But if they <u>do</u>?
 Maybe - just 'maybe' - when their ship doesn't return - they'll decide not to come here, after all.
 Which is the one - we have to worry about?
 Yes?
 They're so remote - cold - beautiful, the stars.  But now - I wonder -
 I'd sooner swim!
 However our ideas disagree, as I've said before, I'm <u>not</u> a coward!  And it happens you've got no choice:  Either <u>I</u> take you down there, in the Lungfish, or you don't get there -
 - any more than being the son of Captain Neilsen does!
 That's enough, Holloway.  I've told you before, wearing boards on your shoulders, and parading with a stiff spine doesn't auto- matically endow you with back- bone - !
 Then...this is a 'flying saucer?'
 Unidentified Flying Objects.
 You may not <u>win</u> them.  But without men like your father, to 'degrade' himself by fighting to preserve them - or as much as we have of them - they'd have disappeared, <u>long</u> ago!
 Peace - the dignity of man - the destiny of the human spirit!  Show me a man who says you win <u>those</u> by fighting wars, and <u>I'll</u> show you an idiot!
 You mean <u>nothing</u> is worth fighting for?
 Perhaps.  But the idea of willingly going to <u>school</u> to spend my <u>life</u> at a Paleozoic pastime that should have disappeared with the thunder-lizards - I'm referring to War - <u>that</u> strikes me as the <u>worst</u> cowardice of all - being spiritually yellow!
 You're really a mixed-up oddball, aren't you?
 That may be.  But Dad stays where <u>he</u> is, and I'm staying here!
 We're <u>all</u> risking our lives!
 Wearing a uniform doesn't bestow an automatic monopoly on courage, <u>Commander</u>!  It just so happens I'm <u>not</u> a coward - physical or mental - and before I'd risk my father's life...
 <u>You</u> said it.  But I won't argue -
 You 'trade school boys' are all alike, aren't you?  Anybody who doesn't happen to think like a little gold-braided puppet is, ipso facto, a coward!
 Your father can be in Nome, Alaska, tomorrow.  We have two choices: Ask them to send him out in a 'copter', and take you off, or the Shark can put back into Nome...
 What did you mean:  I'm 'out?'
 Dead?  Matter of fact, he's much better. He's left the hospital.
 My father!  He's not - ?
 Your 'out.'  This came for you.
 What is it?
 Not in two days.  Look:  Do you think I <u>wanted</u> to come?  If it didn't mean so much to Dad - proving his depth-explorer - it's the last thing I'd want!
 You could train someone else.
 And they thought <u>you</u> could re- place the Skipper?
 It was moderate.  He'll be all right.  But it was out of the question, his coming along.
 How is he - ?
 It was supposed to be.  Dad had a heart attack, two days ago.
 I should have suspectcd, when I heard that 'Doctor.'  I thought it was your father.
 What's goin' on in here, Lad? What - ?
 Dave - !
 Oh it does???
 Here - keep these.  It wants me to come alone.
 I'm with <u>you!</u>
 Well?
 We'll have to look for them later.
 Wonder where Powell and Carney are?
 Somewhere down there?
 Where do you think the voice you heard was coming from?
 The sound again?
 You hear that?
 Let's get back to work, and maybe we <u>will</u> be, soon.
 And if I didn't <u>know</u> better - I'd swear we were moving!
 You know - it <u>is</u>?
 Hey - you know somethin'?  It's getting lighter in here!
 Strange you didn't hear it. OMIT 274F
 I don't hear anything.  Maybe you've been down here too long.  Why don't you go back up and -
 Listen!  Hear that?
 Yeah?
 Go back and tell Dr. Neilsen. Have him report to the Skipper.
 I think you're right.
 What's more important - there's our problem.  The bow ram - the sawteeth are holding the Shark in the break. If we can cut the ram, the Shark can pull herself loose!
 How about that! The bow drove half through her, but she sealed herself right up.
 Not <u>alone</u>, you're not!
 You all wait here.  I'm going inside, take a look.
 Reef and I can take the Explorer down, clamp it around the eye, and ---
 'Us?'
 You've got to let us try, Skipper --
 Skipper!  Look at the depth gauge!
 We're stuck tight!
 Sounds like it!  Distress call, from a small freighter, between Ellesmere Island and Greenland. One mayday, then...nothing.
 Cyclops?
 'His' side?  I've seen it, all right. A nice, bright yellow!
 Have you ever talked to Carl - tried to see his side?
 But <u>they're</u> not Skipper Neilsen's son!  It broke his heart.  Then when some newspapers called Carl 'the honest, sincere son of a war-mongering father' - Captain Neilsen resigned from the Navy.  Oh, he still keeps his hand in - playing around with projects like the 'Lungfish' - but it broke him, all the same.
 A lot of people think like that.
 So all of a sudden his only son drops out of school, be- gins making noises like a pacifist.  A real egghead, do-gooder, and crackpot!  'Ban the atom tests!  Junk the nuclear subs!  Spend the mili- tary budgetfor peace!'
 So?
 One of the finest men, and officers, alive.  A real hero - in the best sense of the word - in World War Two.  He taught us Engineering and Design. Fought like a demon to develop atom subs.
 I guess.
 I guess Skipper Neilsen re- tired before you enrolled at the Academy, didn't he?
 I might have a son like <u>that!</u>
 Huh?
 You've asked why I stay a bachelor? There goes the best reason I know!
 Disappointing a <u>big</u> girl!
 What could be worse than disappoint- ing a little girl?
 <u>That's</u> the worst possible moment?
 At the worst possible moment. Tomorrow is Janie's birthday. Poor little kid has looked forward for two months to having her Daddy home.  Now -
 So they caught up with you, too?
 Reef!
 Helen.  I appeal to you -
 But Julie's a nice girl, and I've seen you work.  She deserves a fighting chance!
 Now, Dave Old Buddy, you know you're exaggerating -  What do you think of this husband of yours?  On most boats a certain loyalty exists between the Exec and his Navigation and Firing Officer.  But unfortunately, in the case of Lieutenant Dave Milburn of the Tiger Shark and myself -
 We hope!
 Sidearms?  But the saucer's dead.
 With their underwater experience, they'll be invaluable.  Take sidearms, and flare pistols --
 The frogmen?
 You better take Powell and Carney with you --
 Right at our one-eyed friend!
 What course, Skipper?
 What???
 A mass of jelly-like stuff came out of the thing, and caught our torpedo!
 Speed...about twenty-two knots. Course...due north!
 Course and speed?
 I...don't know!
 What about down?
 Seems to be all around...
 Is there any way out of it?
 Right, Skipper.
 Get ready.  We shove off as soon as Griff reports all the crew aboard.
 What????
 We're dead in the water.  But it indicates we're moving!
 Why do you say that?
 The inertial navigation system. Must have been knocked out in the crash.
 Something wrong?
 Skipper - could you take a look here...?
 All internal repairs completed, and Frogmen report exterior damage minor.
 Yes, Griff?
 Excuse me, Skipper---
 What about time...?
 It's possible I could adapt one of the torpedo guidance systems to the ICBM - so it would 'home' on the saucer when he rises from the Pole.
 Anything ---
 Excuse me, Captain - there may be one last, desperate chance - a one-in-a-thousand shot...
 Radiation level...constantly rising...
 Now they feel it...down below.
 That's wonderful, Carl!  Reef thinks they can clear the Shark bow so we can pull ourself loose!
 Wonderful!
 We read you!  Go ahead, Doctor!  They're inside the saucer.  It's filled with breathable air!
 As ready as we <u>can</u> be!  I'll report to the Skipper.
 All ready?
 There is.  I believe our friend...Cyclops... is returning to life!
 There's got to be an explanation!
 As we near the Pole...
 What direction does the system indicate?
 The radiation level - from the saucer - it's rising!
 If we were lucky enough to catch him with his power depleted....
 ....in such a way as to prevent his returning to it and, as you put it....  ...'recharging his batteries'?
 The North Pole is the positive end of the biggest magnet of all - the Earth itself!
 <u>We</u> harness energy on a small scale by cutting magnetic lines of force.  Maybe Cyclops does it on a <u>super</u> scale....
 We took for granted his source of energy was nuclear.  But suppose it isn't at all - what if it's <u>magnetic</u>?
 What if the Tiger Shark were to anticipate a bit?  Perhaps be lying there waiting - ?
 Suppose our theorizing is correct? Then this <u>could</u> be the next danger point!
 ...above Murmansk, and Finland.
 High-intensity arcs will burn, submerged.  And millions of volts...discharged in random directions...
 Under <u>water</u>?
 It doesn't seem possible, but - could it be an electrical storm center - ?
 Minus three.
 What's the corrected bearing to the Magnetic Pole?
 Nothing we can do, now.
 Straight to the Pole - at almost fifty knots!
 If we could get inside the saucer - use our torches - maybe we could cut the Shark loose?
 What?
 Suppose there's an atmosphere, of some kind, inside Cyclops?
 And we're at safe maximum depth already....  Stop engines!
 It's the screws, Skipper.  At our declination angle, running in reverse, they're pulling the Shark <u>and</u> Cyclops right to the bottom.
 A hundred and eighty fathoms! We can't be sinking that fast....
 We can <u>ram</u> him!
 But - what can we accomplish?
 That's what I said!
 Right <u>at</u> him?
 Thirty-four seconds!
 What's the running time?
 Take a look.
 You're sure it's Cyclops?
 After torpedo room:  Report!
 Determine extent of damage, immediately.
 I think I should have joined the Air Force!
 What do you think?
 It'll be all right.  We're old friends!
 Huh?
 'Doctor' Neilsen?  When did <u>that</u> happen?
 Dr. Neilsen.  He'll be - -
 Who with?
 I'm - afraid I have some bad news for you, Reef -  You'll have to share quarters, this trip.
 I met Dr. Kent, once.
 I did go.  Just back.  Reef, these are a couple of our passengers - Sir Ian Hunt, and Dr. Clifford Kent.  My exec, Commander Richard Holloway.
 Thought you were going to Washington, Skipper.
 <u>That</u> might be a <u>little</u> <u>rough</u>!
 Obviously.
 To navigate, won't you have to... see your way?
 Of course.  But it is time to be- gin the return voyage --
 That's why no water leaked inside when we rammed you?
 It is a living thing.  When damaged - you would say 'wounded' - it immediately 'heals' itself.
 I have selected you, to return with me - along with several other specimens, for study.  We will examine you and the others, discover desirable features to incorporate in our 'earth-colonizers.'
 Why?
 On the contrary.  I want you - unharmed - perfect.
 Why not me?  What am I - the closing act?
 I am afraid not.  Therefore -
 He did!
 Your friend was to remain where he was!
 Swell!
 - for horrors like yourself?
 My mission is to study various solar systems, and planets - select the most suitable for colonization -
 Tell me something:  Why can <u>I</u> hear you, when the others couldn't?
 Point of view is everything. To us, <u>your</u> form of life is ugly as we appear to you.
 That's a <u>face</u>???
 Come where?
 Remove your weapons, Commander. And come here - alone!
 All right - go to it.
 Cyclops will have to linger at the Pole to recharge his power banks.
 Toward the Pole!
 Due north.  At five knots...no, six!
 But <u>answers</u> are what we need - not more questions!
 We've asked ourselves that - over and over - a thousand times.
 Or, perhaps, until he gets us?
 You plotted the course of Cyclops?  Then that's <u>our</u> course!  Wherever <u>he</u> goes, <u>we</u> go.....until we get him!
 Our 'Cyclops' throws quite a thunderbolt, itself!
 Just musing about our 'one-eyed adversary' and the legend of Homer.  'Cyclopes' were the Sons of Heaven, who forged the thunder- bolts thrown by Zeus.
 I'll be another!
 Well, I'll be - !
 The pattern.  Each incident occurred almost precisely a thousand statute miles from the Pole.  A line through the points of occurrence makes almost a complete circle...
 See what?
 Thank you.
 My yeoman will show you to your quarters.
 All the figures show is that Gordon LaRiviere is going to be a very rich man using his position as Selectman. In a year or two, you won't recognize this town.
 He musta found out. They had to get rid of him. And Jack'll get blamed.
 No.
 Twombley involved?
 I went down to Concord to check it out. The president is Mel Gordon. The vice-president and treasurer is Gordon LaRiviere. Those boys are buying up the mountain, Wade. $364,000 this year. I believe that's out of LaRiviere's league.
 What is the Northcountry Development Association?
 This is from three years ago. Some difference, huh?
 As a mater of fact, yes. LaRiviere.
 Has anybody offered to buy it?
 I know he's due for the last two years. I was thinking of paying it when the insurance comes in.
 About Jack? No. Have you checked out the tax bill on your father's farm lately?
 You don't believe me?
 Sometimes things are simpler than you think. Let me ask you a question.
 ...if Jack told the truth, he could be free by the time he's my age.
 You know Jack Hewitt, the kid I work with?
 Who?
 Evan Twombley, the union boss who got shot. Somebody murdered him.
 Who?
 This is maybe worse than you and I are used to.  What I'm talking about, I'm talking about murder. Among other things.
 Always has been.
 Alma, I think there's some dirty business going on in this town.
 Well, you look... sad. Upset. I don't mean to pry. I'm sorry about your mother. It was a nice funeral.
 Yeah, sure. Why? I got this damned tooth, I got a few things bugging me, like everybody else. But I'm okay.
 Are you alright, Wade?
 No. Black.
 Been putting my files into it. You take sugar and milk?
 You got yourself a computer, Alma.
 He's a Selectman. The town. He said to tell you to turn your badge in and clean out your office. I'm supposed to pull the CB and police light out of your car. They're town property.
 He can't fire me. LaRiviere already did that this morning.
 Chub says you're fired.
 Tell me.
 LaRiviere says he ain't gonna pay for the fixin' of your car. A couple hundred for the clutch. I got some more bad news. Wanna hear it?
 Yeah. I know about that.
 -- the bad news is there's a problem with Gordon's truck what somebody drove through the ice last night. Figured you'd know something about that, Wade.
 Just tell me when you'll have it fixed.
 The good news is we haven't got to your car yet. The bad news --
 Same old shit.
 What are you boys up to?
 Yeah. I know. The custody suit thing was just my getting back at her. I'm not as dumb as I look. Whatever you say. I love my daughter.  I'll send you the five hundred.
 You might be better off legally as well as financially to just go for the --
 Oh.
 Hard to say. If we go for custody, depositions, psychiatric evaluations, it could drag on. Ten or twelve thousand dollars. She could win on appeal. If we just want to get the visitation rights redrawn, assuming they're unduly restrictive, it wouldn't be more than twenty-five hundred.
 Jesus. How much... how much will the whole thing cost?
 Fine. I'll need a $500 retainer. You can mail it.
 Yes.
 No, not exactly. I'll look at the divorce decree, see if we can get it redrawn. Interview your daughter. Jill, right?
 It looks pretty hopeless, don't it?
 Good. It would help if there were some drug or alcohol abuse on the part of your ex-wife. Sexual problems upsetting to the child.
 This spring.
 How soon?
 I plan to. Soon.
 It would help if you were married, if there was someone at home while you work.
 I screwed up the divorce. I agreed with everything she said. I wanted her to like me. I just want to be a good father.
 That was me.
 We bought you.
 You can't buy Wade off.
 Maybe I can buy him off. I gotta talk to Mel.
 Shit! What are we gonna do?
 He's on to us!
 No, of course not. Just say it, that's all.
 Lawyer? I don't need no lawyer, do I?
 You'll get your money. Don't talk to any newspapers about this. Twombley's a big deal down in Massachusetts, you know. Tell them your lawyer says you shouldn't comment.
 Not exactly. I mean, he never paid me.
 Might as well take the rest of the day off. You look sort of fucked up. You've been paid for the day, anyhow, right?
 This is gonna be one fucking mess to clean up. Twombley's son-in-law and daughter are up the weekend. Didn't you say you'd seen him, Wade?
 Nope. Heard it. We wasn't far apart. I spotted this buck, then I heard the gun go off and Twombley was gone. I looked over the little cliff we was using for a stand and there the fucker was, deader'n shit. Called it right in.
 You see it?
 Yeah.
 I hear Twombley got shot.
 You heard the news.
 You only got a little while if you want your hundred bucks.
 Fresh tracks.  Deer shit. Big one. Here's your buck, Mr. Twombley. I'll circle around.
 Deers have ears too.
 Sun's gettin high.
 This way.
 Yeah.
 Safety on?
 Ruined my arm. Brought me along too fast. Why'd it have to be my fucking arm, I used to think. Then I realized it had to be somebody's fucking arm.
 What happened?
 The only difference between me and that Clemens on TV is luck, shit luck.
 Hmm.
 They said.
 Really.
 Pitcher. "Best ballplayer to come out of New Hampshire since Carlton Fisk."
 Oh.
 Double A. New Britain.
 You played for the Sox?
 Drafted by the Red Sox.
 Yeah?
 I used to play ball.
 Follow close. We'll cross the next meadow.
 I'm okay.
 Wonderful!
 And you'll get your extra hundred bucks.
 I get it.  No sweat. You'll get yourself a deer and you'll get him dead. And you'll have him by coffee time.
 You understand what I'm saying? I want a deer, a dead one, not a cripple or whatthefuck.
 Mmm.
 You take care of your end, kid, I'll take care of mine.
 You might gut-shoot it or cripple it for somebody else to find and tag. Can't guarantee that won't happen, especially with a new gun. I may have to shoot it.
 You think so.
 You might not kill it.
 Yeah.
 If you get it?
 Tell you what. You get me close to a big buck by ten, kid, there's another hundred bucks in it.
 Done much shooting with that rifle yet?
 Damn straight!
 Yep. Right about now the does are holing up in the brush piles. The bucks are right behind them and we're right behind the bucks.  This gun gets fired before ten o'clock. Whether it kills a deer or not is more less up to you. I'll put you inside 30, 35 yards of a buck the first four hours of the season. That's what you're paying me for, ain't it?
 Guaranteed, eh?
 Don't worry, Mr. Twombley, I know where those suckers are. Rain or shine, snow or no snow. I know deer. We'll kill us a buck today. Guaranteed. Before ten.
 It's not enough snow, not for tracking the bastards. No advantage there, kid.
 What do you mean I got money? I'm as broke as you.
 I mean it -- you got enough money now. Head out for California. Surf's up, Jack, and you're digging wells in the snow.
 Open the door. We're late.
 Why don't you quit now, you want out so bad?
 Open the door, will ya?
 Out of this fucking job. This job sucks. Working outside in the winter sucks.
 Lawford?
 I'm fucking out of here.
 He sure as hell won't.
 Twombley sure as hell won't be shooting it again.
 Yeah.
 There's your old twenty-gauge, and that there's the new Browning you was showing me last night. This must be Twombley's gun. Brand new. Very fancy tooling. Probably fired one time. It's a beautiful piece of work.  But what the hell, Jack, I guess you deserve it. Right's right.
 Let's get the fuck outta here. You're not making any sense, man.
 You musta seen him get shot. I know you did.
 What the fuck you telling me, Wade? I never seen the guy get shot, I told you that.
 Saw him do it?
 What?
 Sure you did.
 Well, I didn't actually see him do it. Like I said.
 I never seen a man shot before. Not even in the service. Must be something.
 Who the fuck knows? Musta slipped or something. I just heard the gun go off.
 I gotta make a report to Fish and Game. I was just wondering, that's all. What'd he do, to shoot himself, I mean?
 Musta... How'd I know? What're you doing, playing cop?
 On your sleeve.
 What blood?
 Where'd you get the blood?
 Yeah.
 You stayed away?
 The ambulance guys lugged him up.
 You bring him up yourself? That's a steep climb.
 A half mile in, along the old lumber road.
 No, I mean whereabouts.
 In the chest.
 Where'd Twombley get shot?
 Piece of fucking cake.
 Aw, shit, she's here to get Jill. Me and Jill had a little argument. Jack, I got to get back, get back to town. Move this thing, will you? See if you can get back to the Town Hall before they get there, okay?
 Shit.
 Bastard's got his high beams on.
 Right!
 Yeah, he'd go broke tomorrow if you quit him.
 Right. The sonofabitch couldn't get along without me.
 Like you and Gordon?
 Gordon, he's always got some angle working. He wants to keep Twombley happy, I'm his boy.
 How'd you get the job?
 Don't know about lucky. The guy's a full-blown asshole. Pay's good, though. $100 a day. I got to guarantee a kill, of course. Which I can do. There's some monster bucks hiding out up there.
 Evan. He's a mucky-muck union official from Massachusetts. You're lucky.
 Got a job first thing in the morning, first day of season. Saturday I'll hunt for myself. Twombley something. - Er --
 Not here.
 Some job. Here, have a hit. Don't be such a hardass. I know you got problems, but everybody's got problems.
 You gotta be more careful about that shit. Gordon or one of those guys sees you smoking that wacky tabacky around me they'll expect me to bust you. And I'll be outta a job.
 Relax, Chief. We're leaving. You wanna toke?
 I thought I told you to move that truck!
 Got you for -- 450, 500 bucks?
 No brag. Just fact.
 Where's that gun you were bragging on today?
 LaRiviere's having a hell of a time in there. Master of fucking ceremonies.
 Don't mind if I do.
 Okay, let's go home, then.
 I want to go home.
 Jill, please, it's alright. Nothing happened.
 Oh.
 Nope. Not anymore. I'm nothing anymore.
 You're a policeman.
 I know.
 That's illegal, you know.
 You can't.
 I want to go home.
 I don't know. For the food business. I guess. I just thought, you know, we'd sneak a Big Mac on Mommy, like we used to.
 What are you sorry for?
 Please don't cry. Please, honey.
 Fine.
 Okay.
 Nothing, I guess. I guess I can wait till we get home. Maybe we'll stop by Wickham's for a hamburger when we get to Lawford. That suit you? You always like Wickham's.
 Okay. So we'll get what you want. What do you want?
 I know what Mommy says. I'm in charge today, though.
 Same thing, Daddy. Mommy says --
 You can't have nothing, Jill. We need lunch. Mr. Pizza?
 Nothing.
 What do you want, then?
 No.
 C'mon, we can always sneak a Big Mac. And a cherry turnover. Your favorite. What do you say?
 Mommy won't let me eat fast food. You know that. It's bad for you.
 How about a Big Mac?
 Oh.
 Grandpa. My father. It's his.
 Pop?
 It belongs to Pop.
 It's pretty old.
 Yeah. My car's in the shop. This'll be fine.
 Are we going in this?
 I'm glad you're here. Can you stay for a while?
 Dad.
 That's fine with me too. When Mommy comes, tell her I'm up here.
 Sit right there by yourself if you want. Wait for her by yourself. That's fine with me. Just dandy. I'm going downstairs.
 Where do you expect to wait for her? Obviously downstairs with the other kids isn't good enough.
 Yes.
 She won't be here for a half hour. Think you can stand it that long?
 Yes.
 That's all you got to say? "Yes".
 Yes.
 She's gone already!  Gone already! Couldn't wait.
 Well, I guess I am. I planned this, I planned all this, you know. I mean, it's sort of pathetic, but I planned it. You shouldn't have called your mother.  C'mon, we're gonna call her before she leaves.
 I told her I wanted to come home. Daddy, don't be mad at me.
 Yeah. Yeah, right, I'm mad. What'd you tell her, for Christ sake?
 See, I knew you'd be mad.
 Come and get you! Shit! It's a damn half hour drive each way. Why didn't you talk to me about it first?
 I... because I want to go home. She said she'd come and get me.
 Jesus, why?
 Yes.
 What? You called Mommy? Just now?
 I called Mommy.
 Jesus. Listen, Jill, tell you what. Tomorrow morning, you still want to go home, I'll drive you down. I'll get off work or something.
 I don't want to be here. Don't worry, I love you, Daddy, I do. But I want to go home.
 You are home. There are lots of kids you still know here.
 No I didn't see anybody I know. No I don't want to go to school here tomorrow. I want to go home.
 No what?
 No.
 Some party, huh? Sorry I lost sight of you. I had to step outside for a smoke. You find anybody you know here? There must be some kids you used to know from school. You want to go tomorrow? See your old teachers? Be more fun than hanging out with me all day.
 Oh, Jesus, come on, will you? Don't mess this up anymore than it's already been messed up. Join the other kids. Do that and before you know it you'll be as happy as a goddamned clam.
 I want to go home.  I don't like it here.
 It's fun.
 It's stupid.
 What then?
 It's not that.
 Why? Why not? You know these kids from when you went to school here. It hasn't been that long.
 I don't want to.
 Go on, Jill. Some of those kids you still know.
 No. She doesn't talk about you anymore.
 No. I didn't used to be bad. No sir. Where do you get this stuff? From your mother?
 I just think you used to be bad.
 What are you talking about?
 I bet you did lots of bad things.
 It's not funny now. I'm a cop and I gotta listen to all the complaints people make. I'm not a kid anymore. You change.
 But it's not funny now.
 To us it was.
 Was it funny?
 Well, yeah. Sort of. Nothing really mean. Me and my pals, me and my brothers. It was kind of funny then. Stealing pumpkins, soaping windows. Stuff like that.
 Did you do that when you were a kid?
 I guess they're stupid.
 Yeah. It's stupid.
 Break stuff?
 You know.
 Do what?
 Why do they do that?
 Can't you see... look out there. Nobody's got their porch lights on anymore. It's too late. Those Hoyt kids are just out to get in trouble. See, they put shaving cream all over that mailbox there. They chopped down Herb Crane's new bushes. Little bastards. Jesus H. Christ.
 I don't care. They're out.
 Those are the Hoyts.
 Look. Those kids are still trick-or- treating. They're still out.
 Yeah.
 Who's fault is it then if it's not yours? You're the one in charge, Daddy.
 I'm sorry for the screw-up. But I couldn't help it it's too late to go trick-or-treating now. I couldn't help it I had to stop at Penny's for the costume. And you were hungry, remember.
 Yeah, you can have the key. It's the key that's kept me locked to you all these years. I give it to you with pleasure.  Now I'm free. See how easy it is, Jack? All you got to do is give back what the man gave you, and you're free of him.  I've got to call my brother.
 The key, Wade.
 You two, don't you get it? He's using you. You're his slaves.  Jesus Christ, Jack, don't you see that?
 Wade, you're done.  Let me have the shop keys.
 Always count on old Wade for a good screwing. Why should I always pay more, sell cheap? Why should you guys make all the money. You and Mel and Jack. Right's right.
 Could be.
 You and Mel Gordon?
 Maybe.
 I won't. You interested?
 Don't light that in here. I'm allergic.
 Want to buy?
 What's the difference? Take my truck, take a rest -- stop worrying about Mel Gordon. Have you decided what to do with your old man's place -- he going to stay there?
 That was before Twombley was shot. Before he knew.
 Mel's doing some business with me. It's nice to do favors for people you do business with. He was in a hurry. No big deal.
 You? Why?
 Wade, that wasn't smart. Going out right after the man's father-in-law shot himself. Let it go. Call it a favor to me.
 He say anything about the summons I tried to give him? Sonofabitch wouldn't accept it.
 So?
 I saw Mel Gordon in here this morning.
 Nothing, Wade, I've been thinking. You don't get enough appreciation around here and it's time we changed things a little.
 What do I have to do for it?
 Elaine! Call Chub Meritt and have him pick up Wade's car, fix the clutch.
 On what you pay me?
 You ever think of getting a new car, Wade?
 Sorry about the long lunch. My clutch is going out again.
 You Rolfe?  I remember you from high school. You're a teacher now? Harvard?
 I'm fine, fine.
 How you holding up, Wade?
 Well, right now we're not too interested. Finish up what you gotta do, then you can get bugged on your own time.
 Yeah. A few things.
 Something bugging you?
 It ain't done, if that's what you mean.
 What the fuck. My day's already ruined.  Give me the keys. You can go back with Jack. You still got a shitload of plowing to do.
 Let's get to the top and talk to Jack first. He'll know what happened. He fucking better. If this coulda been avoided, I'll put that kid's ass in a sling.
 You want me to follow them to Littleton?
 That must've been Twombley. Jesus. I bet that was Twombley.
 Like hell.
 You ain't the hunter Jack is. And he can't drive the grader worth shit.
 I wish you had. I'd rather be deer hunting instead of freezing my ass on that fucking grader.
 I shoulda sent you instead of Jack.
 He more than likely just shot himself in the foot or something. That's what usually happens.
 Yes, Wade, I mean Twombley. Put out that cigarette. Fuck. Fuck. Fuck.
 You mean Twombley?
 Fuck. You don't know how bad or anything?
 Twombley's shot. I heard that. Not Jack. He's okay, I assume.
 Fuck. Turn it off.  All you heard was there was some kinda accident?
 Twombley, Jesus. We got to get moving: I got to get up there. How would I know? C'mon, you drive. We'll take my truck.
 I figured you already heard.
 Huh?
 A hunting accident. Jack and Twombley.
 What's the hurry?
 That's what I love about a small town. You know everybody.
 Fuck you.
 Get the grader. Go out 29 past Toby's. Don't let Lillian get to you. She didn't belong here. That's why she left.
 I'm not saying that.
 You don't want the extra police pay?
 What am I -- a security guard? You hired me, you and your Selectman friends.
 Don't go playing policeman.
 At the school crossing. In his BMW. Coulda hurt some kids. I'm gonna bust his ass.
 Huh?
 His son-in-law damn near killed me.
 Jimmy took it. Jack's out hunting with Evan Twombley.
 Where's the plow?
 Told you the snow was coming down. Take the grader.
 Watch this snow. It's coming down tonight.
 Tomorrow, Gordon.
 Got here just in time. Go ahead. Jump in line. Maybe you'll win a prize.
 We're looking for the funniest costume! And the scariest! And the most imaginative! And the best costume of all!
 You know what I'm talking about. For what you're doing to me and to the child you say you love so much. Love. You won't get away with it.
 Low as what? What have I done? It's bad to want to see your own daughter?
 You make me sick. I can't believe you've sunk so low.
 No problem. Look, I...
 Hi honey.
 See. Get your boots.
 Yeah, lots.
 Wait there. She'll be right out.  Is there snow on the ground up in Lawford?
 Let the past be.  I'm sorry about your mother. I liked her. You never know how much women like that suffer. It's like they live their lives with the sound turned off -- and then they're gone.
 It's just...
 We've done all our talking, Wade.
 We should talk.
 No, not anymore. It's too... it's too far.
 You ever come to your father's grave anymore?
 I'm not making it any worse. You are. Me and Jill could've worked this thing out. It's normal, it's even normal for me to get a little touchy about it. Believe it or not. How do you think this makes me look, treating her like some tragic victim or something?
 Don't cause a scene. No one's trying to win any 'rounds'. Don't make it any worse.
 I don't want her to go, Lillian.
 Oh, Jesus, lay off, will you? It looks like you've won this fucking round already, so lay off a little, for Christ's sake.
 She's grown up some, hasn't she?
 Yeah.
 While you went off for a few beers with your friends? Is that Hettie Rodgers there, with whatzizname?
 Where is she now? Is she in the truck with your friends?
 Me and Jill, we just had a little spat. She felt kind of left out, I guess, from not knowing some of the new kids --
 Where's Jill?
 Lillian!
 From Boston. Evan Twombley's son-in- law -- he was driving. I know where they're headed. Up the lake, Agaway. The old man's out deer hunting with Jack Hewitt, so they probably got some big weekend party planned.
 I still don't understand --
 Mel Gordon.
 Good. Who?
 I know who it is.
 Did you get his number?
 Did you see that sonofabitch in the BMW? He could've killed somebody.
 Are you okay, Wade? What was wrong? Why were you holding everyone up?
 Don't be silly. Hi, Jill.
 Don't lie to me. You're leaving me, I can see that.
 I'm just cleaning out some of this stuff that's built up. For the rummage sale. And some things for the cleaners. And the laundromat.
 Going somewhere, Margie?
 Look, that's temporary, believe me. There's so much shit gonna hit the fan the next few days, my getting fired by LaRiviere and Merritt won't matter a bit.
 I heard you talking. You got fired this morning, didn't you?
 It's my tooth! My fucking tooth! I can't even think anymore because of it.
 What on earth is happening to you? Why are you acting this way?
 Jesus Christ, Pop, let's go home. I got waylaid. Sorry.
 What happened?
 Wade.
 This is nuts.
 I don't know for Christ's sake!
 How?
 Of course! I would've heard.
 Think they're alright?
 Strange.
 The truck's here. Looks like they've stayed inside since the snow started.
 Are you sure they're home? Did you call?
 I just want to pick up my divorce papers. For the lawyer. It won't take long.
 I know your parents.
 Don't you think it's proper for a fella to introduce his girl to his parents?
 Did you tell them?  That we were coming?
 Good.
 Alright. I'll think about it.
 It was to the same woman. I was just a kid...  It's not like a marriage proposal or anything, just a thought. Something for you and me to talk about and think about. You know?
 You've been married twice --
 I've been thinking about it, that's all.
 Oh, Wade.
 There's another thing I've been thinking about. I don't know how you feel about the idea, Margie, because we've never talked about it. But I've been thinking lately, I've been thinking we should get married sometime. You and me.
 Then... I guess you have to.
 I'm her father -- supposed to be, but I'm not able to. Yes. Yes, I am. It may be the only thing in my life I've been so clear about wanting. Even if it takes a big fight.
 Don't you think, do you still think it's a good idea to press this custody thing -- just now?
 It's nice.
 After making love. I like it. It's nice to see that in a grown-up person.
 What way?
 Yeah, but never what you looked like. Not really. Never really studied your face, like now. I was never able to see you as a kid when you were a kid until now, this way.
 You knew me as a kid.
 I can see what you looked like as a kid.
 But not now.
 No. Not for money. But, if somebody'd given me half a damned excuse -- I was pretty fucked up, you know.
 You wouldn't have done anything like that, shot someone for money.
 No, I just know Jack's lying about what happened. He just seemed -- I know that kid, what he's like inside. He's a lot like I was at his age.
 The Mafia hire Jack Hewitt?
 Lots of people. Guy like Evan Twombley, Boston union official, probably got lots of people want to see him dead. The Government's been investigating his links with the Mafia.
 Jack wouldn't kill for it. Besides, who would pay him?
 Everybody needs money. Except guys like Twombley and that sonofabitch son-in-law of his. People like that.
 Jack doesn't need money.
 Money.
 Wade! How can you even think such a thing? Why would Jack Hewitt do that, shoot Twombley on purpose?
 I've been wondering if maybe Jack shot Twombley, instead of Twombley shooting himself. I've been wondering maybe Jack shot him on purpose.
 ...Jack's turned into one of those men who are permanently angry. He used to be a sweet kid, but it's like, when he found out he couldn't play ball anymore, he changed. Now he's like everyone else.
 I'm sure, I'm positive it didn't happen the way Jack says it did.
 I heard he was drunk at Toby's last night and got in a fight with Hettie. He drove off without her...
 There's something funny about that shooting. There's lots funny about it, actually.
 Jack's sort of sensitive, I guess. More than most. But he'll be okay in a few weeks.
 Okay.
 Tonight. Let's get together.
 Call me.
 The hell she isn't. Lillian's been trying to nail me to a cross since the day I met her. I'm gonna hire me a fucking lawyer from Concord and get this thing, this divorce thing, rearranged. I've been thinking about it a lot. It's like she owns Jill or something. Nobody owns nobody, especially not kids. And I pay her.
 No you don't. You're pissed, that's all. You ought to cool off for a few days then have a long talk with Lillian. You know? Work it out with her, tell her how you feel. Lillian's not out to get you.
 Yeah. I mean that.
 You don't mean that.
 I'm going to start one of those custody suits. I don't give a fucking shit. You know?
 I'm sorry.
 Forget it.
 About you and Jill and needing a third person. She went back to Lillian?
 Said what?
 I'm sorry about what I said.
 Yeah.
 You okay?
 Yeah.
 You okay?
 See you tomorrow, maybe.
 Don't worry. I can protect my virtue. I mean, c'mon, Wade, give me a break.
 You two want to do anything tomorrow and need a third party, give me a call, okay? I'm off.
 Okay. She's fine.
 How's she doing?
 For a while.
 New hat?  Jill's up, I see.
 Makes me sad it was her. Instead of me. I shoulda froze.
 Can --?
 It makes me sad.
 Is...? She's dead then?
 When did she die?
 Coffee's perked.
 Maybe Wade should take a look at it. Your pipes'll freeze.  Wade, would you do that?
 It's broke I guess. There's an electric in the bedroom.
 You're not using it today?
 There's a furnace.
 Have you been heating the house? Not just with the stove.
 You get the hell out of my house now, asshole. And know this -- you are going to be a lucky asshole if I haven't got you fired before the day is out. I can do it with one phone call, and I'm pissed enough to do it now!
 Yes. Here's your ticket.
 Doing your fucking job. I know. I watch television too.
 Don't give me a hard time, Mr. Gordon. I'm just --
 You're talking about a goddamned ticket, from when I passed you at the school where you were deciding to hold up traffic while dreaming of becoming a traffic cop or something?
 Don't ever put your hands on me, Mr. Gordon.
 Hold on!
 Yesterday morning, you passed a stopped school bus, which was flashing its lights, then you--
 Moving violation! I just got out of bed and you're telling me you're giving me a goddamn speeding ticket? Now? Are you nuts? Is that it, Whitehouse? You're nuts?
 I'm issuing you a ticket. Moving violation.
 What the hell are you talking about?
 Jesus Christ. Mr. Gordon, when I come all the way to serve somebody a summons, I don't call ahead for an appointment.
 I said, 'Next time, phone ahead.'
 How's that?
 Whitehouse. Next time, phone ahead.
 Can't it wait, then?
 Oh, no. No, it's a... it's a traffic thing. No big deal.
 Something about my father?
 Well, yeah, I suppose. Sure. I just had a little business to settle with Mr. Gordon. I'm the local police officer.
 Mrs. Gordon. Thank you.
 Well, yes, I'm... I want to say that I'm real sorry about your father, Mrs. Twombley.
 He's asleep. We were up very late.
 I was... I'm Wade Whitehouse. I was wondering, is your husband here?
 Who are you?
 No, he's out now. Somewhere on the mountain. I'd stay away from him if I were you. He's real pissed.
 He got his deer yet?
 Well, I guess -- that's what he said.
 His office. You mean my old office.
 Wade, I got a message for you.  Jack Hewitt, he's looking for you. Wants you to clear your stuff out of his office in Town Hall.
 It's called a grilled cheese sandwich, you dub.
 Jillie, you want a cheese grilled sandwich?
 No, I... I've been out on the grader all morning. Twombley's summer people. Massachusetts. Friend of Gordon's. It was his idea for Jack to take him hunting.  I gotta go.
 CB. Little while ago. One of the boys on the way in picked up Jack on the CB calling for state troopers. I figured you'd know what really happened. The fucking guy kill himself? This Twombley, who the fuck is he, anyhow?
 Where... how'd you hear that?
 The other guy.
 Jack?
 The fucker shot himself. Ker-bang! That's what it sounds like. Not on purpose. I assume accidental.
 Not since last night. He took a guy hunting.
 You talked to Jack?
 Marg! You got orders!
 That goddamned woman. Thinks she can cart Jill off and leave me alone like this. I'm more than pissed, Margie. I'm a whole lot more than pissed. I been that plenty and I know the difference. This is different.
 Marg!
 Aw, c'mon, I was only saying there's something wrong with "Home Made Cooking", that's all. The sign's fine. What it says is wrong.
 This town sucks.
 I'm not finding fault. It's a good idea, good for you, good for the town. Real modern too.
 Fuck. Wade Whitehouse. It's people like you that keep this fucking town from prospering. Whatever somebody does to improve things around here, you gotta find fault with it.
 The sign. It looks like it's spelled wrong or something.
 What?
 It don't look right.
 You be careful of that little bastard. He's dying to get in your pants, you know.
 Take care, Wade.
 I don't know you. My goddamn father and I don't know you.
 Nothing in the fucking house to drink. Not a fucking thing. My house, my money, my truck -- stolen!
 Crawl!
 Where the Christ you going? You sonofabitch, you leave my fucking truck where it is! I need... Give me the Goddamn keys! I need to get me to town!
 You and me.
 Bang!
 Yeah.
 Everything you know is from me.
 Call it what you want.
 Love! I'm made of love!
 Love! What the fuck do you know about love?
 Nah-nah-naw! You done done finally done it! Like a man done it. Done it right. I love you, you mean sonofabitch!
 You don't know me. You don't know me!  So fuck you. Fuck you.
 You! By Christ, you -- I know you.  Yeah, you goddamn sonofabitch, I know you. You're a goddamn fucking piece of my heart!
 You think you can take me now? Come on, try.
 Pop, for Christ's sake!
 Come on, smart guy. Tell how it's no big deal. Tell me how a single one of you is worth a single hair on that woman's head.
 Listen, it's no big deal, Pop.
 Wade. I thought she was alright. Till this morning she was.
 Why didn't you call and have the furnace fixed?
 In the living room.
 Is there something wrong with the phone?
 I checked on her. She had the electric heater. Cold don't bother her as much as me. Which is why I give her the heater.
 Yeah.
 She's coming.
 Where's Ma?
 Yeah.
 We're alright. Your Ma's sleeping. You want me to get her?
 How you and Ma doing? Haven't seen you in town for a while.
 From Wickham's. Been a while. Like some coffee?
 You remember Margie Fogg?
 Sleeping.
 Jesus, Pop, how can you stand the cold, dressed like that? Where's Ma?
 You no-good pup!
 Nothing.
 What was that?  You got something to say, say it! Say it!
 Atta-go.
 Just do it.
 A lesson in work and its rewards. You'll thank me for this one day.  Sally, turn off that TV!
 Rolfe.
 Take care of the little things first, the things that are distracting you from taking care of the big things. Call Chub Merritt, get your car back, call a dentist, for God's sake, and get your tooth pulled, don't trust the locals, get your facts straight and go straight to the state police. Let them work on this.
 To help, Jack, of course -- and to nail those sonsofbitches, the Two Gordons. That's what Alma calls them. Jesus, Rolfe, whose side are you on?
 For what?
 I know what it means. I'm just running out of ways to use it.
 But you gotta hear this. You won't believe it. Mel Gordon had come by to visit LaRiviere and so now I'm in his office.
 Wade, are you alright?
 Then you accidentally see your body, or your face, or whatever, and you don't know who the hell it belongs to. Strange. It's the business with the old man, I know, and how incredibly pissed I was at him, and also chasing Jack Hewitt like that, and the Goddamned truck going through the ice, not to mention Margie's being so upset -- one thing on top of another.
 That's what you think.
 I remember clearly cause when I heard I became real careful around Pop. I was a careful child and I became a careful adult, but at least I wasn't afflicted by that man's violence.
 Well, I never heard that one.
 And Elbourne and Mom took you to the doctor and told him you fell from the hay loft.
 We'd have to go digging in Vietnam to ask him.
 It wasn't me. I wasn't there, but I heard about it. When I heard about it, it was about Elbourne.
 You think I wouldn't remember a thing like that?
 It may have happened, but not the way you said.
 Of course it happened. Why would I lie about it?
 I hate to disappoint you, but I don't think it happened.
 Yeah.
 I was thinking about that story you told me, about Pop and chopping the firewood out of the ice and after.
 I care about what happened. The truth. I'm a student of history, remember?
 Right's right, goddamnit! Don't you care what's right?
 Not particularly.
 It's too neat. Things ain't that neat. It makes me mad. That somebody can pay to kill somebody, his own father-in-law, and not be punished for it. Don't that piss you off?
 Shit, around here, you shoot somebody in the woods, you say it was an accident, you get fined fifty bucks and your hunting license lifted. Jack's probably saying the guy shot himself cause he ain't got his deer yet and don't want his license pulled.
 A hunting accident is perfect.
 So Mel Gordon wouldn't want a professional hit. That'd make the feds dig deeper. He wants an accident.
 Here's my theory. Twombley, unaware of illegal union loans or whatever, starts nosing around cause of the investigation and finds out. Finds out his son-in-law is involved.
 Yeah, the guy with the BMW I told you about. I did, didn't I?
 Okay. It's likely there are people in the union who don't want Twombley to testify. They probably include his son-in-law who's vice-president and will probably be the next president. I read that in the papers. What's his name, Mel Gordon?
 I don't know. You tell me.
 They wouldn't deal with a guy like Jack. Who else benefits if Twombley is suddenly dead?
 Who'd pay him that kind of money? Not the mob. They got their own guys. Specialists.
 Money.
 Motive. You gotta have a motive.
 Well, your friend, I think. Jack Hewitt.
 Then who shot him?
 That it wasn't an accident.
 Which is?
 I think your first response to the Twombley shooting was the correct one.
 Find them everywhere.
 Want to know what I think happened?
 I guess it was an accident, like everybody thinks.
 Anything new about the shooting? Twombley?
 I want to let the gas run out. I don't want the bastard driving drunk, and he's always drunk now. After, we'll hide the keys.
 Yeah. She'll probably quit her job and stay out here with Pop. We can't leave him alone here, he'll set the damn place on fire. With Jill here a lot, it'll be good to have Margie around. Things are going to change in that department, by the way. I got a custody lawyer in Concord. I'm gonna see him tomorrow. All hell's gonna break loose, but it's worth it.
 Well, do you still plan to get married?
 What about her?
 What about Margie?
 Yeah. I forgot.
 No thanks. I don't drink.
 Anyone else want one? Rolfe?
 What about Jill? Is Lillian bringing her?
 Pointless to stand around in church with nothing to do, I guess.
 No, no, I haven't. Not really. I've growled a little, but I haven't bit.
 Haven't you already done a bit of that?
 I get to feeling like a whipped dog some days, Rolfe, and some night I'm going to bite back. I swear it.
 Get some sleep.
 Yeah, I guess.
 Don't think about it. You're exhausted.
 A divorce lawyer. A custody lawyer. You know, 'cause of Jill.
 What happened?
 Jill. I was thinking of getting a lawyer. Maybe you can help me.
 Who?
 Picked up Jill. She was supposed to visit for the weekend for Halloween. She wanted to go home.
 How was she?
 The night before the shooting.
 Huh?
 Lillian was here. In Lawford.
 They were out deer hunting, right? Jack probably heard the gun go off, then came back and found the body.
 Well, it was an accident.
 You think Jack shot him?
 No shit.
 Twombley.
 Who?
 He was scheduled to testify for a committee investigating organized crime in New England and the construction business.
 It'll come out Jack lied and the kid'll get hung for it.
 No, not tonight. I'm in bed too. I'm calling because I need you to listen. You're supposed to be a smart guy. You're a professor. I got this theory. Jack says he didn't see Twombley shot but he did.
 Wade, it's late. I know you're probably at Toby's, but I'm in bed reading. We got different habits.
 Yeah, I know him -- the kid that was with him. Maybe you do too. Jack Hewitt. He works for LaRiviere with me. He's my best friend.
 There was something. It happened up your way.
 Yeah, brother, look, I was calling cause -- has there been anything on TV in Boston about a hunting accident with a guy named Twombley, Evan Twombley?
 Wade?
 Rolfe.
 Jim... for godsake!
 Daddy. Daddy, please...
 I'm sorry I was so mean to you earlier.
 Yes dear?
 Mom?
 Big secret.  You said the same thing to Newsweek.
 You're right and I'll tell you a secret.  I know exactly how you feel.
 That's not really the point.
 Some kids were teasing you?
 I know...  But lotsa times I feel like it's me versus the world.  Some kid at school teases me and the same day a plague breaks out in Bangladesh.  I mean it doesn't take a genius to figure which is more important.
 Your father never means to be so...
 When I write my memoirs I think I'll devote an entire chapter to the cocoa aboard Air Force One.
 No, it's okay.  After all, he is the President, right?
 I'm sorry, honey.
 He's in a meeting.  He can't be disturbed.
 I know, Mom.  It was great... really.
 We'll talk at home.  You know, most girls aren't as lucky as you.  For most girls seeing the Bolshoi ballet would be the experience of a lifetime.
 Back at The Fishbowl?
 You're jet-lagged.  We'll talk about this back...
 Mom, just this once, give it a rest.
 Alice...
 Hey Joey, how `bout a cocoa, double whip cream.
 Don't you even want to ask?
 I'm sure he's busy.
 You don't want to say hi to your father?
 Yeah, no duh.
 Well, you aren't the President, dear.
 It's not like he hasn't made us wait a few times.
 You are a resilient man, Mr.
 He didn't leave us.
 It would be a pity to squander such a strong personality.
 Fuck off, you stupid asshole.
 That's the way of the world, little one. Didn't they teach you that in school?
 The woman you shot. She was my friend.
 Yeah. Do you know what the word &quot;asshole&quot; means.
 Smart for your age, eh? Top of your class? Tell me, do you know what the word &quot;propaganda&quot; means?
 Yeah, I study world events. Five thousand Turkienistan Muslims were slaughtered in Stravanvitch's cleansings... along with 15 American school kids. You know hQw I studied that. I went to their funerals with my dad. I met their parents.
 So, you study world events, little one. That's good for a girl your age.
 You're one of Stravanavitch's men.
 No, thank you. The gunfire did that.
 You must be tired. It'll wake you up.
 I don't drink coffee.
 Okay, I'm slowing us down.
 There they are!
 It's okay, honey. I got you. I got you. You're okay.
 Oh NY god... oh my god... oh my god...
 Been better, Dad... You?
 How you doing, sweetie?
 Alice... I...
 Daddy...
 Daddy...
 Alice!
 How `bout a hug for the old man.
 It was the experience of a lifetime.
 How was...  ...the ballet?
 Hey, you guys back already?
 Oooooh, I'm good.
 Warn then again. If they don't respond... shoot them down. We will not be intimidated.
 The pilot says it is does not have the markings of a commercial jet.
 The world would not look on us kindly if we shot down a civilian airliner.
 They are in our airspace. We would be within our rights.
 It's some kind of trick... a preliminary airstrike in response to our troop movement.
 Yes. They refused to alter course and the 747 would not answer our hails.
 Did we warn them off?
 The Americans say they are escorting a damaged plane. Our pilots confirm they are surrounding a 747.
 cross it...  The static overwhelms the voice, then cuts out.
 It's cut.
 Okay, you're aerated. To dump the fuel you have to close the circuit for the pump. There's no switch in Avionics so you'll have to cross the wires. There should be five wires, just to your left. Do you see them?
 Okay, it's on. We've got some indicator lights here.
 Pop it open. There should be a red switch, toggle it up.
 Got it.
 Do you see the maintenance panel?
 Uh, Tower, we got a problem up here.
 Sluggish... I think it's jammed too.
 Aw, man. You're torn up pretty bad out here, sir. Do you have any elevater control.
 Lemme take a look.
 No. We're losing fuel and my rudder's not responding.
 Just stay on my wing, sir. I'll take you all the way in.
 Uh, we got a problem here.
 We still got three MiGs running around and six more on the way.
 How we doing, Colonel?
 Stay cool.
 Got it.
 Okay. We're gonna arc a fat one to the right. Got it?
 Two and three are heading toward the Boeing.
 I'm doing what I can.
 Who's flying the fucking plane?
 He's busy being dead.
 Put your pilot on.
 You read my mind.
 Mr. President, it's an honor. Now with your permission can we lead you the fuck out of here.
 Copy Air Force One. Welcome to the party.
 U.S. Pilots, this is Air Force One.
 That's game, set, and match. There's nothing to do, except call the Chief Justice.
 I prefered the terrorists.
 They've got no chutes. They can't control the plane, their engines are failing and they're losing fuel.
 This doesn't make sense.
 They aren't answering their hails.
 That kid's name was Jim Marshall.
 Walter, if you have a point, make it.
 Holding the president hostage is not something that slips your mind when you're making demands.
 We don't know that.
 He's dead then. They must have killed him.
 An exercise in futility. Send the Nimitz back in.
 The Iraqi ambassador is claiming it's just an exercise.
 Put together a score sheet.  I'll make some calls.
 Apparently taking uzis away from sixth graders isn't as popular as we thought it'd be.  Representative Taylor is working on a compromise.
 Thanks.  Wrote it last night.
 It was a good ad-lib, sir.
 Goddamn right I did.  I asked for a tough-as-nails speech and you gave me diplomatic bullshit.  What's the point in having a speech if I have to ad-lib?
 Sir, you threw out page two.
 To swear you in as President.
 The Chief Justice? What on earth for?
 If fired upon, tell our fighters that they are ordered to engage.
 Iraqi's won't buy it. Either they're already in on this or they'll think we're spying.
 If challenged, our fighters are to state that they are on a rescue mission.
 Like any good poker player, they're checking over their hand seeing which cards to play and which to discard.
 They still have the President, it's past their deadline and they haven't called. What do you think it means?
 Okay. Also, I want you to put our bases in Turkey on alert, and have the Kitty Hawk prepare a retaliatory air strike.
 I hate to be pragmatic, but they'll sacrifice pawns before kings. It may take them some time to kill their way up to senior staff.
 But they start executing hostages in
 We've got four hours before they make it into Turkienistan airspace.
 Can we do that?
 Does your office have anything to add, Mr. Dean?
 General Greely says it looks like the Middle East.
 My loyalty was never to my country.
 You're duty to what? The country you served doesn't exist anymore.
 Because it is my duty.
 Why?
 Yes, Mr. President.
 Special Agent Gibbs. You helped do this?
 Ga get it.
 That's affirmative.
 Roger.
 Air Force One, please reduce speed to 250 knots.
 Air Force One, acknowledged.  tNT. EMERGENCY PARACHUTE LAUNCH RAMP.
 Please change course to Zero Seven Four and drop to eighteen thousand feet. Over.
 About goddamn time.
 Air Force One, this is AF-135-RA. We have been instructed to refuel your plane.
 No! If we land this plane anywhere else, we will end up another Entebe.  The Americans built a super plane that flies through mushroom cloud, evades missiles and...  refuels in mid-air. Call the White House.
 Over the Black Sea. I can probably get us to Turkey or Georgia.
 Where are we now?
 Not even close. Hell, we can't even make Syria or Iraq.
 We're not going to make it.
 We've stopped dumping... but we've only got about twenty minutes of fuel left.
 Go! Take Serge.. and watch your backs.
 Avionics compartment! It's the only place. You better get Zedeck down there fast Unless, of course, you'd rather be a martyr than a savior.
 How?
 Well it worked.
 Psychology. They're trying to unnerve us.
 why did they do that?
 Remarkable aircraft. Remarkable.
 A secret service agent. It must be.
 We checked the manifest. Everyone was accounted for.
 Who did this?
 Any of us?
 Nine.
 How many others killed?
 Dead.
 The rest of the secret service?
 Sir, this plane carries the President of the United States.
 We've already been inspected.
 Copy, Air Force One.
 This is Romeo Tango Zulu changing call signs.  Tower, alert air traffic, Romeo Tango Zulu is now Air Force One.  This is Air Force One... The President is safe onboard.
 Tower, here.
 We copy. Stand by...  Tower?
 Romeo Tango Zulu1 this is Tower.
 Stand by.
 Romeo Tango Zulu, do you have the President? Over.
 Romeo Tango Zulu, copy One the television, graphics of the First Family against the Presidential Seal.
 Tower, Air Force One has been boarded.
 Very good. Thank you, Ms. Mitchell.
 You're pointing a gun at me.
 Scared. We're scared.
 How are your fellow hostages feeling, Ms. Mitchell?
 I'm responsible for Press Relations for the Flight Office.
 And what is it you do, Ms. Mitchell.
 Maria... Maria Mitchell.
 *                     Please tell me your name.
 Thank you.
 Here's a press kit.  I'll let you guys get comfortable and once we're airborne I'll be able to schedule the interviews.
 Conference rooms, though some have other functions.  The one up front doubles as an emergency medical center.
 And all these rooms here?
 I guess it depends on your perspective.
 A dubious distinction, no?
 You don't know the half of it.  Did you know this entire plane is shielded from radiation?  We could fly through a mushroom cloud completely unharmed if necessary.
 This is a remarkable aircraft.
 Up on the upper deck is the cockpit and the Mission Communication Center. The MCC, as we call it, can place clear and secure phone calls to anywhere on earth.  We're linked to a network of military and civilian satellites and ground stations.  We could run the country or run a war from there if we had to.
 The President and I were delighted that we could accommodate you.  Now if you're all cleared?  You can follow me then.
 Ms.  Mitchell.  So nice to finally meet you in person.
 You're very valuable. And our nation needs so many things.
 You got what you wanted. You going to release us now?
 Three...
 Jim...
 Four...
 Please. You can kill me but leave my daughter alone.
 The world is such a dangerous place and we can't always protect our children.
 You will be the first to pay for that mistake.
 Nor will there be. My husband does not negotiate with terrorists.
 Say something dear.
 No.
 Shall I begin by executing the President's daughter? She's right here.
 So is this.  Come now, you're upsetting the little one.
 That was war.
 But they are not ny people. You look at me as if I am a monster, but answer me this -- when your planes bombed the oil fields of Iraq, did You cry for those dark skinned men whose names you do not know and who's faces You will never see? Did You cry for their wives and children. They were people too, yes... but they were not your people.
 How can you? I mean they're people.
 I neither enjoy nor dislike. I do what is necessary.
 Why? Do you enjoy it?
 Yes
 Do you have to be so brutal?
 Your husband is a coward. He sends soldiers half-way around the world to steal a man from his home in the middle of the night.
 My husband is a very courageous man.
 I know he left you behind.
 What do you know of my husband?
 Or you will do what, Mrs. Marshall?  But I admire your courage. Your husband, on the other hand...
 Leave my daughter alone.
 Come on, Alice.
 Now, or he dies, please.
 Cooperation. If you try to escape, you will be met with automatic gunfire and a barricade of your comrade's bodies will prevent you from exiting. Good day.
 What do you want with us?
 Fear will keep you alive. Any one who is not afraid is bound to do something foolish, and bound to die.
 Hold on, Alice.
 No you won't. You'll compromise... like always.
 If you put down the gun, I promise not to drop her on the way down.
 Let my daughter go or I'll take you out!
 There goes your ride.
 One thing I've learned as
 The taste of defeat is bitter, no?
 You don't like seeing people get hurt. Now in morality, that is a virtue. In politics, however, that is weakness.  You were a hostage to everyone else *                    long before you were a hostage to
 Someday, you'll regret my nature.
 Good. Good.
 Yes, I'll do it.  Just leave my family alone.
 You'll do it?
 Stop.
 Pity. Mr. Gibbs.
 This administration does not negotiate with terrorists.
 Call up Petrov and order Stravanavitch' S release.
 She isn't a part of this. This is between you and me.
 No. But since I only have a few of your staff left to kill, perhaps I will start with your family instead... Gibbs.
 Over my dead body.
 Now since we've had very little luck getting Washington or Moscow to cooperate, I wondered if you would be so kind.
 I'm sure we can strike some sort of arrangement. Land the plane and we'll trade you hostages for fuel.
 Finally, we can bargain.
 Yes. You've made yourself quite clear.
 Madame Vice president. We have an options paper.  chandler takes the options paper, waves off Lee, and reads it as she talks.
 You heard me.  You. Congress and cabinet heads.
 Twenty minutes?
 Okay, Gentlemen, we'll take no action until we confirm that the president is off the plane... Lee, go huddle with the D.O.D. I want an options paper on this in 20 minutes.
 Our only policy assumes the plane is on the ground. Our hands are completely tied while they're in the air.
 That isn't necessary.
 Sir, we stay with the President.
 Yes, sir.
 I'll not going without my family.
 Got it.
 Eighteen thousand feet, sir. And two hundred knots... otherwise it's suicide.
 Get `em ready.  You... come with me.
 They've cut communication, and I spent a good bit of time looking for alternatives. My only solution ran out of batteries.
 We can't jump from here or at this speed. But if we could get a message out - tell the refueling plane...
 We've already played our cards, Major. There's no turning back.
 Gravity.
 Mr. Caidwell, the ground's a few miles away. How do you propose getting us from here to there?
 Tell our boys to cool their jets. I don't need `em creating policy for me.
 The northern border's gotten a bit hairy. Their MiGs are playing tag with our Tomcats and our boys are just itching to engage.
 They've gotta be joking.
 Our KH-ll's took this one at 0100 hours. What you see here is the mobilization of two mechanized brigades.
 You haven't even driven a car since you took office.
 Flying the plane.
 What are you doing?
 Both of you.
 Call Petrov...  I'll be back.
 Please... don't start with me.
 I don't know why you stayed.
 Shall I ask the Chief of Staff to schedule your daughter in?
 Look on the bright side, hon. Shep here thinks I'll be a one termer.
 Well, they aren't burning me in effigy. That's always a good sign.
 How did your speech go?
 This promise isn't subject to Congressional approval.
 I should trust that promise? Because you know the voters are still waiting for that middle class tax cut.
 I'll make it up to you, I promise.
 I wish it were that easy...
 But that's the point, Jim. We're right here.
 I miss you. And I miss her.
 What?
 You know what?
 And when have I had five minutes? When I wake up in the morning and I'm already three hours behind Schedule.  What do you want me to do, Rose, tell the G7 to fuck off because I'm a family man?
 How do you know she understands? You haven't spent more than five minutes with her, or me, in weeks.
 She's a big girl.  She understands.
 For godsakes, Jim, slow down and stop acting like the little dutch boy.  Not even you can plug all the world's leaks.  Don't you think it's a sign you're pushing too hard when your daughter sees more of you on MTV news than in person.
 Rose, I don't have time for this.
 Don't.  I know spin control when I feel it.
 No, Mr. President.  It can't.
 Can't it wait?
 May I speak to you for a moment?
 Actually, sir, you could be that someone.
 Someone should give you a raise.
 White House Situation room.
 Where are we sending it?
 No. I thought about this, Mr.
 No good. I said they disabled the communications system.
 The fax machines.
 Excuse me?
 The fax machines.
 Freeing Stravanavitch is gonna get tens of thousands killed. I can't live with that.  I'm not royalty. I'm an elected official and the integrity of the office of the President is infinitely more important than the man who holds that office.  We don't negotitate. Not as long as I'm President. Is that understood?
 Please, Mr. President. You're going to get yourself killed. Is that your solution?
 But this is different, sir. You're the President.
 You know my policy. We don't negotiate with terrorists. If we start now, all of America becomes a target.
 and if that means negotiating...
 Then tell me there's a rescue operation underway.
 They're still alive, but the loyalists plan to start killing hostages in forty minutes.
 Did they say anything about my family?
 Two... THREE. GO!
 But...
 One.
 We're handling it, sir.
 Where's my family?
 We're under attack.
 What's going on?
 No. no. no. Wait. Wait.
 Thank you for calling the white House...
 Look lady, I don't have time for games. Just put the....
 Okay... if you're the President, when's your wife's birthday?
 You don't understand. This is an emergency. Let me talk to anyone.
 Sir, the President does not call this particular number. So whoever you are get a life, before I have this call traced.
 Don't cut me off. This is an emergency.
 Yeah, right.
 This is the President.
 who can I say is calling?
 Okay listen, listen carefully. This is an emergency call from Air Force One. Who's there? Is the Vice- President there?
 White House switchboard. How may I direct your call.
 We're hooked. Hove into position.
 WE'RE HOOKED!
 DO YOU SEE TEEM?
 IT'S OPEN!
 They better. Fuel's almost gone.
 Twenty five minutes. They should be here any moment.
 Twenty-five years.
 How long's it been since you flew, sir?
 Shit.
 Iraq? Shep, you're fired.
 Iraq, sir. We're over Iraq.
 A MiG? Where the hell are we?
 My god. I think that was a MiG.
 Sir...
 Shepherd.
 I never left. Where's my wife and daughter?
 Mr. President, how the hell did you get on board?
 Okay.  Hey, pumpkin, you'll tell me all about it later, right?
 Mr. President... they're ready for you in the conference room.
 Yes, sir.
 Defense and State Department in the conference room in one hour.  I want to review the Iraq situation.
 That's my job.
 You give me ulcers.
 We'll just say it was in bad taste.
 I said it's not worth the fight.  Steward, please.
 Did we tape the Duke game?
 Sir, the Speaker of the House attacked this administration on national television.  You can't afford to leave that hanging.
 It's bait.  Don't take it.
 Right... Christ I'm tired.  Do me a favor and keep me away from the press.
 Other way around, sir.
 This is a crime bill, Shep.  Killing a couple ducks won't get it through committee.  Besides, Shep, I told you...  I don't shoot babies and I don't kiss guns.
 *                     We could always put you in a duck blind with a twelve gauge.  The second amendment types'll love that.
 I might still have a few chips left.
 With all due respect, sir, maybe you should give them this one.  Your numbers are still pretty low and you called in a lot of chips to nail Stravanavitch.
 He and the NRA don't like the wording.
 No, no.  I'm fine.  What did the Speaker say?
 You wanna knock of f?
 I always wondered if my freshman Russian class would come in handy.
 *                     CBS said they'll give us four minutes.  They thought the Russian was a nice touch.
 Commissioner, Aquarius.
 Kruger, Sagittarius.
 I was asking McCrosky, Commissioner.
 Some southern plantation owner falls in love with this poor...
 What's the story?
 I was reading too.
 Forget it.  I was reading.
 You've made your point, Commissioner. There's only one other pilot who can handle that shuttle and that's Clarence Oveur.  He's got a lunar flight today.  I want him pulled.  Jacobs, pull Oveur!
 I told you, leave the boys in Washington to the boys downtown and the boys down...
 I wonder how your boys in Washington are going to take this one.
 That just doesn't make any sense.
 That's right, Commissioner.  Senselessly murdered just minutes ago.
 I just wish it was that simple.
 What?
 Commissioner.
 You handle your front office people, I'll handle the press and leave the boys in Washington to the boys downtown and the boys downtown to the boys on the board.
 Bud, get wise to the political realities. The boys on the board are under a lot of pressure from the boys downtown.
 And what do the boys on the board know about safety, Commissioner?  Let <u>me</u> talk to them.
 Forget it.  The boys on the board want that shuttle to go on schedule.
 Commissioner, we both know the Mercury shuttle needs another month of pre-launch testing.
 Um...  Do you people scream right when you... you know.
 What is it, Mary?
 Yes it did.  Mr. Dunn, can I ask you a personal question?
 Felt like a large asteroid.
 Yes I did...
 Did you feel that?
 You better take this.
 Sir?
 Dunn.
 You better check on it, Mr. Dunn.  I'll stay here and fly the ship.
 Sir, I've got an overload in disposal unit four.
 You better check it, Unger.
 We seem to have a malfunction in disposal unit four, sir.
 Accelerators down.
 Shut down accelerators.
 Dunn.
 Oveur.
 Kramer, the WORP control handle just came off in my hand.
 Ted, the lever!
 Compute!
 Now!
 Set!
 We've blown the computer!  Elaine!  Set course change!
 I guess you'd have to be a fool not to be afraid at a time like this.
 Not when I'm with you, Ted.
 Are you afraid?
 The sun will heat that thing to over 450 degrees within seconds.  He'll roast like a pig on a spit.
 What will happen to him, Ted?
 That's right -- premature ejection.
 You mean...
 Sit down, Elaine.  If this bomb trick works we just might make it.  Simon was a fool to eject now.
 Simon just ejected!
 That might be the news we've been waiting for.
 I just want you to know, I love you Ted and always will.
 Well, Elaine, this might be it if those guys on the ground don't think of something.
 That was very well put, Ted.
 Kurtz was the one who got us into this mess in the first place.  You people knew this ship wasn't ready to fly.  You played God with over a hundred lives, Kruger, and for what -- the prestige of your precious space program.
 I mean until we start to burn up.
 Not now, Elaine.
 Ted, we've only got ten minutes.
 Ted, please be careful.
 Elaine, I'm going back there.  Just hold onto that stick and try to control this hunk of tin as best you can.
 Ted, there's no time to explain.
 Elaine, what's going on?
 Ted!
 Elaine!
 Ted, a toilet's not going to kill anyone.
 There's something dangerously wrong with this ship, Elaine.  I know its the wiring. That toilet's just the tip of the iceberg.
 I'd use the word insane.
 What would you say if I told you the toilet just blew up in my face.
 The word is sick.  Ted -- very, very, very sick.
 What word would you use, Elaine?
 I've never used the word insane, Ted.
 Then you <u>do</u> think I'm insane.
 Ted, get a grip on yourself.  You should never have left the hospital.
 Elaine, I mean the mission has to be aborted.  This ship should never have passed FSA inspection.  This thing is held together by string and chewing gum.
 We can't go back.  We had something very special, but it's all over.
 Elaine, we have to go back.
 Ted.  I don't know why you got on this flight.  I don't know what you're trying to prove.
 Elaine.
 Ted!
 Not now, Elaine!
 Ted.
 I've got it, Elaine!  I've figured out what's wrong with the shuttle!
 What are you doing, Ted?
 Let me by, Elaine.
 Ted, we're taking off!
 I have to get in there.  I have to stop this flight.
 Ted!  What are you...?
 Goodbye, Ted.  I don't want to hurt you.
 That's the way I want it.  Just turn the radio on and go.
 If that's the way you want it.
 No goodbyes, Elaine.  Just go.
 Ted, you must remember what the doctor said, the first step on the road to sanity is admitting that you're sick.  Now take your electro-shock and you'll be back at the space center in no time.  And by the way, Ted, I'm leaving you for Simon.
 His name's David Stockman.  He's been here twenty years, that's all he says.
 And when are you going to realize, Ted, that your mental hygiene is the most important thing right now.
 Elaine, when are you going to realize Simon Kurtz put me in here to get me out of the way.
 Sammy Davis Junior.  Terrible car accident.  He hasn't been the same since.
 Who's that, Ted?
 Eat this spaghetti, Ted.  It'll make you feel a lot better.
 Ted, I loved you and I'll always love you. But I need Simon.  He's stable.  He's a good provider.  I want that at this stage of the game, Ted.  He might have his faults, but Simon doesn't know the meaning of the word fear and I need that in a man.
 Elaine, what happened to us?
 Ted, please.  You're just making things difficult for yourself.
 Elaine.
 You're as bad as the rest of them, Elaine!  It's all here in the design specifications!  Look!  It's all here!
 Let's relax tonight, just the two of us. I'll make a quiet Italian dinner just the way you like it, with spaghetti.
 There's nothing wrong with me!
 Ted, you're overworked.  You've been flying yourself into the ground.
 Ask Simon.
 Ted, what's wrong?
 I mean the Mercury flight.  It's not safe and, Kurtz, you know why.
 But, Ted, the invitations have already gone out.
 It's got to be stopped!
 That's not important now, Elaine.  We have to talk.
 Te...!
 Elaine.
 Yes -- last week that pile of mud was only this high.
 Is he making any progress, Doctor?
 The brain is an amazingly complex organ, Elaine.
 Is that a good sign, Doctor?
 You can be gentle with him, Elaine.  He's been working out a lot of his aggressions here in the garden.
 I mean for Ted.
 You can eat balanced meals, exercise, and take Geritol.
 What can <u>I</u> do, Doctor Rumack?
 So you see, our task isn't made any easier by Ted's refusal to admit that he's sick.
 The human brain is a highly complex organ, Elaine, perhaps the most complex next to the bladder.  Let me show you.  Ted's problem is in this area.  This area, this area, here, here, here, under here, here...
 Ted seemed to get worse after I told him about Simon, Doctor.
 Simon, what are you saying?!
 Maybe.
 Simon, I didn't want it to end like this. We can be friends!  You'll die out there.
 Your career!  What about the lives of those people out there.  Simon, what happened to the man I thought I loved?
 My career is shot.
 We're computer locked and the manual navigation unit is down.
 Can't we change course?
 He tried to disconnect ROK.  It gassed him.  That computer is running this ship and we're heading right for the sun.
 Simon, what's happening?!
 Roger.
 Simon, I'm going to check ROK's secondary readout unit.
 That's my girl.
 I think so.
 Have you got it straightened out now?
 Don't be too long.
 Meet me onboard, sweetheart.  I have to pick up a few things at the drugstore.
 So mentally ill?
 Simon, why has he become so... so...
 Elaine!  Ted's a danger to himself, he's a threat to this mission and his behavior does absolutely nothing to promote peace in the Middle East.
 No, I've been excited before.
 I guess this is a first for you.
 I'm so excited, Simon.
 Frank's the best pilot in the program.
 You're heading up the division in charge of babies for Mr. and Mrs. Simon Kurtz.
 But, darling, they've offered me a chance to head up the computer analysis division for the Jupiter probe.
 Women <u>and</u> the space program have come a long way, sweetheart.  But after the wedding, no more complicated computers for my little girl.
 And I can hardly believe that I'm engaged to someone like you, Simon.  I'm a very lucky woman.
 Who would believe that Elaine Thompson was once a stewardess on the Denver-Chicago run.
 Simon.
 For the best little computer officer on the Mercury mission.
 Roger.  You better get back there and monitor the regulatory unit.
 No, I mean you can do it from the cockpit.
 I'd rather sit down for this one, Elaine.
 You can do it from up here, Captain.
 Roger.
 We have to disconnect ROK's higher brain functions without disturbing his regulatory system.
 I see.  What do you think our alternatives are?
 I don't think we have any alternative, Captain.
 Yes, sir.
 Elaine, ask ROK for a field interference scan.  Those sun spots might give us a problem with our communications.
 There's nothing wrong with me, Elaine. What about tonight -- just you and me.  We can be alone.  I can get rid of everyone else on the ship -- I've already proven <u>that</u>.
 Request; self-analysis of ROK hardware and software systems regarding behavioral changes.
 Life support check.  Elaine, it's obvious you've been ignoring me.  You're a woman. I can relate to that.
 Request; life support systems check.
 Systems check positive.  Look, Elaine, I...
 Request; comprehensive electrical systems check.
 You have great tits.
 Go ahead.
 Can I say something of a personal nature to you?
 That's okay, ROK.
 Elaine, I'm sorry about that little outburst a moment ago.
 Cut the Doubting Thomas shit, Elaine.  I know where I'm coming from on this.
 That's not possible.
 Negative.
 That doesn't make sense.  Repeat analysis.
 Negative.
 Intermitant failure in scan mode "R". Analyze.
 Look, a man can make an honest mistake!! Anyway, she was asking for it!  They're all asking for it all the time!!
 No more kids yelling, 'Your old man's a thieving rapist'?
 How many kids get a chance to live on another planet.
 It's going to be terrific.  A whole new world, new kids to play with.
 Do you think things will be a lot different on Mercury, Dad?
 I bet Scraps is going to love Mercury.
 I sure an glad they let Scraps ride up here with us.
 We'll have to check, Jimmy.  It's a pretty long trip to Mercury.
 Will Scraps be able to sit with us, Dad?
 Do you like it when Scraps sleeps on his back, Jimmy?
 Yeah.
 He's a boy dog.
 Sure.
 Can I hold him?
 Scraps.
 Come on up, Jimmy.  Say, that's some puppy.  What's his name?
 What...?
 All right.  Here.
 Okay, Joey.  The Doc says you gotta relax. This hospital in Des Moines is the best sex clinic in the country.
 I don't want to hear that word!
 Joey, what's more important, the kids' clothes or your sexual potency.
 We've spent everything on these operations.  Is it really worth it?  We've pawned your mother's wedding ring.  The kids have no winter clothes...
 Take this, Joey.  It's my last few bucks. You'll need a hot meal when you get there.
 I'm sure.
 You're sure?
 That's right, Joe.  Now, no one's going to hurt you and no one has to know what's wrong with you.
 What?
 Joe, the insurance policy won't help your wife and kids.  You bought auto insurance, not life insurance.
 I don't want to live anymore.
 Joe, you don't want to blow that thing and kill all these innocent people.
 Have you tried it with a little cinnamon?
 Captain, the coffee machine is jammed and I don't like it.
 Poached!  Not over!  Over!
 All right, Captain Oveur.  Over.
 That's how I want them.  Poached.  Over.
 Just poached on toast.  Over.
 Poached <u>and</u> over, Captain Oveur?  Over.
 No.  Poached.  Over.
 How would you like your eggs, Captain? Over.
 A couple eggs and juice would be nice, Mary.  Over.
 Anything.  Just don't let Salucci think we're onto him.
 What should I say?
 No, a bomb.  Now, as discreetly as possible, I want you to move the passengers into the lounge.
 A b...
 He's carrying a bomb.
 Sixteen 'C', why?
 Which passenger is Joe Salucci?
 Yes, sir, commander.  This is Mercury One.  Everything seems A- okay up here and ready for count-down.
 Whenever your're ready, Captain.
 Captain Oveur, your navigator, Mr. Unger, and your first officer, Mr. Dunn.
 Good to be aboard, gentlemen.
 Do you think it's necessary to explain <u>everything</u>?
 That's how dry cleaning works.  Now I'd like to quickly go over the digestive system of amphibians.
 We don't have much time.  Let's move. I'll explain everything.
 Mr. Kurtz, I presume.
 Captain Oveur?
 Now he's D-Y-I-N-Ging and wants to be buried on Mercury.
 Ah, yes, the Institute, I'm familiar with it.
 Let's go, Daddy.  We have to check in.  He was never appreciated at the Institute.
 It's a privilege to meet you, sir, I'm familiar with all your work.
 Yes.
 Say, isn't that Dr. Barrington, the world- renowned agronomist?
 Thanks, but we have a terrific woman in on Thursdays.
 You folks need any help?
 But that's not a door.  The door's over there.
 Don't try to stop me!
 You can't go in there!
 Death, death.  How about the first Thursday in March, ten o'clock.
 All right, it's a matter of death.
 You'll have to be more specific than that, sir.
 No, dammit.  It's a matter of life or death.
 Do you have an appointment, sir?
 I have to see Bud Kruger.
 Pull yourself together!  We've got to...
 Don't talk to me about Elaine.  Outta my way!
 Then Elaine was right.
 That damn computer has taken over.  I'm getting out.
 Kurtz, you're drunk.  Who's in command of this ship?
 Striker.
 I know you've been subtly spreading the word that I'm having a breakdown.
 You're tired, Striker, overworked.  That wiring meets all the safety specifications.
 Look at this wiring.  It's shorting out under high temperatures.
 You're seeing bugs where they don't exist, Striker.
 That's right, Striker.  And we're getting married when we return.
 Are you on the Mercury mission?
 Well, we laughed.  We laughed all the time.
 No.  It's hard to L-A-U-G-H when your father's dying.
 I just wish it was that simple.  We really were in love.  You know how it is when you laugh all the time.
 Then the relationship remains the same and the love changes only when there's change in the two people who share that love.
 Sure.  But that's only when the love itself goes unchanged.
 Not if the people change together in relation to that love.
 People change in relation to each other. Love changes on its own.
 Love's the same as it always was.  It's people who change.
 We were in love but I'm not sure I know what love is anymore.
 No.  I mean your relationship.
 I opened this panel and a vacuum cleaner hit me.
 Do you want to talk about it.
 No, I mean your head.  Sit down.  I'll take a look at it.  I'm a nurse.
 I'm getting over it.  If a relationship isn't working, you can't force it.
 You've been hurt.
 You don't have to excuse yourself.  I'm a nurse.  I understand.
 I'm familiar with your work, Doctor. You'll have to excuse me, I have to go.
 Yes.  He's dying <u>a-n-d</u> wants to be buried on Mercury.
 Not Dr. Barrington, the world renowned agronomist?
 You don't have to thank me, I'm a nurse. This is my father, Dr. Barrington.
 Uh... oh, thank you.  It's nothing.
 Excuse me, are you alright?  I noticed you talking to yourself.  I'm a nurse.  Can I be of some help?
 That's a very nice compliment, and I'd like to say that...you've done the same for me.
 Just in case I don't have a chance to say goodbye, I want you to know that I haven't spent so many pleasant hours for many years.
 No. I'm all alone.
 I'm sure we'll both make it...but just in case one of us...well, is there a message you'd like me to give someone?
 That's a lovely name. Mine's Milton...Milt Ettenhenim. But my friends call me 'Bubbles.'
 Mine's Eleanor. Eleanor Schiff.
 You know, here we are having coffee together, and discussing education and business and economy...and we don't even know each other's names...full names I mean.
 I wish I could fool myself into believing that that's the reason. The truth of the matter is, nobody ever asked me.
 I know the answer -- Career. A smart woman like you became so involved in your work, you didn't have time for marriage.
 Well, I'm afraid that's a question that's all too easy to answer.
 But I think it's time we stopped talking about me. A woman like you -- why haven't you ever married?
 Well, after a thing like that you wouldn't be expected to.
 After my wife died, I felt like a fifth wheel. You know, so many years being with one person -- a very wonderful person -- makes you always think of yourself as part of a pair...When Ethel passed away, I was lost. I couldn't function socially and I couldn't function in business.
 No. I'm from Washington, D.C. I'm a lobbyist for the Small Businessmen's Assocation.
 Well, it really wasn't a vacation. You see, I'm a teacher in the New York City school system, and I was attending a seminar on visual aids to education. Are you from L.A.?
 Were you vacationing in Los Angeles?
 No, thank you. I take it black. Like my men.
 Thank you. Cream?
 Ah, won't you sit down?
 That's very nice of you. Thank you.
 I happened to be passing, and I thought you might like some corfee.
 Shep, no! He gets so excited when new people are here.
 ...but after...awhile...you begin to...  ...get used to it.
 Shep, no! I'll bet you have exciting things happen all the time down there.
 Yeah, something like that, but as I say, they didn't have time to tell me very much.
 Something about a plane with no pilot?
 Well, to tell the truth, they really didn't fill me in on many of the details. Just told me to pick up Captain Kramer.
 Shep, sit...sit! So, I understand you've got a real emergency down there.
 Oh, yes. Come in, Paul. Rex will be right out.
 Hello, I'm Paul Carey from the airline. I'm here to pick up Captain Kramer.
 Excuse me, Doc, I've got a plane to land.
 And the last thing he said to me, "Doc," he said, "Sometime when the crew is up against it and the breaks are beating the boys, tell them to go out there with all they've got and win just one for the Zipper. I don't know where I'll be then, Doc," he said, "but I won't smell too good. That's for sure."
 George Zipp said that?
 I'm doing everything I can! -- And stop calling me Shirley!
 Surely there must be something you can do.
 I won't deceive you, Mister Striker. We're running out of time.
 Yes, everything they've got. How are the passengers doing?
 Will the hospital equipment be at the airport?
 Chicago, the passengers are beginning to panic. When do we start down?
 ...safe and sound and free to pursue a life of religious fulfillment.
 Let's see. Those are the flaps, that's the thrust, this must turn on the landing lights.
 Elaine, I haven't time to put this gently, so I'll be very direct. Everyone of us on this plane is in a desperate situation. Mister Striker is the only hope we've got.
 Well, I flew single-engine fighters in the Air Force, but this plane has four engines. It's an entirely different kind of flying...<u>all</u> <u>together</u>!!!
 I <u>am</u> serious, and don't call me Shirley! What flying experience have you had?
 Surely you can't be serious.
 Can you fly this airplane and land it?
 Both pilots!
 I'm not sure. I haven't seen anything like this since the Lina Wertmuller Film Festival.
 What is it, Doctor? What's happening?
 No, I mean we can't <u>land</u> for another two hours. Fog has closed down everything this side of the mountains. We've got to go through to Chicago!
 You can't take a guess for another two hours?
 Well...not for another two hours.
 Can't you take a guess?
 I can't tell.
 Captain, how soon can we land?
 I think you ought to know what our chances are. The life of everyone on board depends on just one thing: finding someone back there who not only can fly this plane, but who didn't have fish for dinner.
 No. No one that I know of.
 Well...
 All right. Unless I can get all these people to a hospital quickly, I can't even be sure of saving their lives. Now, is there anyone else on board who can land this plane?
 No.
 Elaine, you're a member of this crew. Can you face some unpleasant facts?
 Extremely serious. It starts with a slight fever.
 Just how serious is it, doctor?
 He had fish, too.
 Let's see now. The co-pilot had fish. What did the navigator eat?
 Doctor Rumack, Mister Hammen ate fish. And Randy says there are five more cases, and they ate fish, too.
 He had fish.
 What did he have?
 Yes, yes, I remember. I had lasagna.
 Well, we had a choice. Steak or fish.
 What was it we had for dinner tonight?
 Certainly.
 It's a big building with patients. But that's not important right now. Tell the Captain I must speak to him.
 A hospital? What is it?
 You'd better tell the Captain. We've got to land as soon as we can. This woman has to be gotten to a hospital.
 Yes. Yes, of course.
 We have some passengers who are very sick. Could you come and take a look at them?
 That's right.
 Sir. Excuse me, sir. I'm sorry to have to wake you. Are you a doctor?
 Uh-huh.
 See them, Elaine?
 The gear is down.
 Tell them the gear is down and we're ready to land.
 I wanted you to know -- now -- I'm very proud.
 Yes?
 Ted...
 I don't care. I just don't have what it takes. They'd be better off with someone who'd never flown before.
 But Ted, you're the only...
 Oil pressure. I forgot to check the oil pressure. When Kramer hears about this, the shit's gonna hit the fan.
 What happened, Ted? What went wrong?
 Rats! I've lost number three.
 It's a damn good thing you don't know how much he hates your guts.
 It's a damn good thing he doesn't know how much I hate his guts.
 Sluggish. Like a wet sponge.
 Sluggish. Like a wet sponge.
 And a little ice!
 And a little ice.
 Rain.
 That's what I've been trying to tell these people.
 Ted! What are you doing? You can't fly this plane!
 A lot of people made plans before the war. Like George Zipp.
 Ted, I don't want to stay here. It's time for us to go back home -- to the plans we made before the war.
 I think they're getting the hang of it! When we re-enlist I'll teach them baseball!
 That's Lieutennt Hurwitz. Severe shell shock. He thinks he's Ethel Merman.
 What's his problem?
 Be patient, Ted. No one expects you to get over this immediately.
 I wish I could say the same for George Zipp.
 Seven. Lieutenant Zipp died this morning. Ted, Doctor Sandler says you'll be out in a week. Isn't that wonderful?
 Is it? Because of my mistake six men didn't return from that raid.
 It's a big building where the generals meet. But that's not important right now. They've cleared you of any blame for what happened on that raid. Isn't that good news?
 Headquarters!? What is it?
 You got a telegram from headquarters today.
 But it won't be. Not as long as you insist on living in the past!
 That's the way I've always wanted it to be, Elaine.
 Mostly I remember...the nights when we were together. I remember how you used to hold me...and how I used to sit on your face and wriggle...and then afterwards how we'd watch until the sun came up. When it did, it was almost like...like each new day was created...only for us.
 I remember everything. All I have are memories.
 Elaine, just hear me out. I know things haven't been right for a long time. But it will be different...like it was in the beginning. Remember?
 I love you.
 I love you, Elaine.
 Oh, Ted, please be careful. I worry about you so much.
 My orders came through. My squadron ships out tomorrow. I'll be leading a very important mission.
 What's the matter?
 You...you shouldn't have come. I don't have time now.
 Elaine, I've got to talk to you.
 Ted, what are you doing here?
 It's too late, Ted. When I get back to Chicago, I'm going to start my life all over again. I'm sorry.
 But if you'll just give me...
 It's the truth. What's hurt you the most is your record since the war. Different cities, different jobs, and not one of them shows you can accept any real responsibility.
 You expect me to believe that?
 Your <u>war</u> <u>record</u>? You're the only one keeping that alive. For everyone else it's ancient history.
 You know I haven't been able to get near an airplane since the war. And even if I could, they wouldn't hire me because of my war record.
 Then why don't you take the job that Louie Netz offered you at Boeing?
 Elaine, not yet. I promise you I really can change.
 I won't be back. I've requested the Atlanta run.
 Look, you'll be back in town tomorrow night. We'll have dinner -- talk it over.
 It takes so many things to make love last. Most of all it takes respect. And I can't live with a man I don't respect!
 Don't you feel anything for me at all any more?
 I have been patient and I've tried to help, but you wouldn't even let me do that.
 I know things haven't been right for a long time, but it'll be different. If you'll just be patient, I can work things out.
 I just don't want to go over it any more.
 I came home early and found your note. I guess you meant for me to read it later. Elaine, I've got to talk to you.
 Ted!
 Elaine!
 Find out if there's a doctor on board, as quietly as you can.
 I think so, but I've never seen it so acute.
 Airsick?
 Who wants to be first?
 Hey, we've been waiting for you. A little bit late tonight.
 Joey can stay up here for a while if he'd like to.
 We'd better get back now.
 Hello.
 We have a visitor.
 Good-bye, darling.
 Good-bye, darling. I love you. I love you, darling.
 Good-bye, darling.
 Bill! Bill! Good-bye, Bill.
 So long, darling. Good-bye. Take care of yourself.
 Oh, Bill, I'll keep it. I'll keep it with me all the time.
 Good-bye, darling.
 Every day.
 You promise you'll write.
 Oh, Bill, I'm going to miss you so much.
 All right, he's on final now! Put out all runway lights except niner.
 He's right on the heading.
 Watch your altitude, Striker. It's too erratic. You can't come straight in. You've got enough fuel left for two hours flying. You've got to stay up there 'til we get a break in the weather.
 He's all over the place! Nine hundred feet up to thirteen hundred feet! What an asshole!
 You are now eight miles from the airport. Turn right to a heading of zero eight niner, throttle back slightly and begin to lose altitude to fifteen hundred feet.
 Eight miles. Turn right to heading zero eight niner.
 Runway niner. It's the longest, and directly into the wind.
 Did you decide on a runway yet?
 Yes, Captain?
 And get that finger out of your ear. You don't know where that finger's been! Gunderson?
 Here.
 Oh Jack, I'm so warm. I'm burning up.
 How ya doing, honey?
 What is it?
 Oh, I can't stand it.
 Well, it wasn't all that I had hoped.
 What did you think of 'Great Expectations?'
 Yeah, I think he is.  Hey, Fred!
 Jack, isn't that Fred Bliffert over there in the blue turtleneck? Maybe he's on our flight to Chicago.
 The hell I don't! I'm out there busting my buns every night.
 ...and that you don't really try, except during the playoffs.
 We are turning left to a heading of zero- niner-niner.
 ...and that lots of times you don't even run down court.
 Denver Control, this is Flight two-zero- niner intersecting Victor Airway seven- niner-niner.
 I think you're the greatest. But my Dad says you don't work hard enough on defense.
 I'm an airline pilot.  Ah, Clarence, according to my calculations, with this tailwind we ought to be able to make up an additional fifteen minutes over the Rockies.
 I think you should go back to your seat now, Joey. Right, Clarence?
 You <u>are</u> Kareem. I've seen you play. My Dad's got season tickets!
 I'm sorry, son, but you must have me confused with someone else. My name is Roger Murdock. I'm the co-pilot.
 Wait a minute. I know you. You're Kareem Abdul Jabbar. You play basketball for the Los Angeles Lakers!
 Okay, this is one of my favorites.
 Oh, I'd love to.
 I thought maybe you'd like to hear a song.
 I'm Lisa. Oh, you have a guitar!
 I'm Randy.
 Hi!
 Oh, it's nothing to be alarmed about. We'll get back to you very quickly.
 Yes, of course. We both had fish. Why?
 Well, the doctor will be with you in just a moment. One thing: do you know what he had for dinner?
 Oh, Stewardess. My husband is very sick. Can you do something, please?
 Yes?
 I will, but Jim won't.
 Would either of you like another cup of coffee?
 All right. But just remember, my name is Roger Murdock.
 No, he's not bothering anyone. Let him stay up here.
 No, why don't you take care ot it?
 Do you want me to check the weather, Clarence?
 Roger, Roger. What's our vector, Victor?
 We have clearance, Clarence.
 Huh?
 Roger.
 Huh?
 Roger.
 Hi, Roger. Good to have you aboard. Victor, this is Roger Murdock.
 Sorry, Clarence. Latest weather report shows everything socked in from Salt Lake to Lincoln.
 Of course.
 Could I borrow your guitar? I thought I might be able to cheer her up.
 Oh yes, I saw. Poor child.
 There's a little girl on board who's ill and...
 Yes?
 Excuse me, Sister?
 Thank you, Randy. You better leave sweetheart. You might get hurt in here.
 Mr. Striker, the passengers are ready.
 Would you go up, please?
 Well, I flew in the war, but that was a long time ago. I wouldn't know anything about it.
 It's the little room at the front of the plane where the pilots sit. But that's not important right now. The first officer is ill and the Captain would like someone with flying experience to help him with the radio. Do you know anything about planes?
 The cockpit? What is it?
 Excuse me, sir. There's been a little problem in the cockpit and I was wondering...
 No. No thank you.
 Excuse me, sir. Would you like some coffee before we serve dinner?
 Oh -- I haven't flown for a long time.
 Do you feel all right, sir?
 Thank you.
 Fourteen-B. It's halfway down on your right.
 Yeah...
 You okay?
 Your voice is saying no, but your body is saying yes.
 I like my horizons narrow.
 I think you're just a little scared now, about what you might find once the lights go out.  A little scared... and a lot curious.  Maybe more than you want to admit.  But doesn't that turn you on, that curiosity and fear, swirling together?  Think of it as broadening your horizons.
 There's lots of things I haven't done, but his ain't high on the list.  Don't take it personally.
 A virgin.  I find that very arousing...
 Not unless I got real drunk and nobody told me about it later.
 I know... Why don't you hang around for a while, let me entertain you? It's Matt, right?  Now tell me the truth, have you ever... made it... with one of us?
 Todd?  Todd doesn't know either.
 The girl out front mentioned Strader's assistant, somebody named Watson.  Maybe he knows.
 Look, I don't know where Mr. Strader might be.  He comes and he goes.
 You've got me all wrong.  I don't charge money for something that I myself find pleasurable...
 Does that cost extra or you throw them in?
 Oooh.  Hardball.  That sounds interesting.  Are you going to strike me?  You could tie me up and then do whatever you want with me... I've got my own ropes.
 Show me.
 In there.
 She did, did she?  Well, she was wrong.  Excuse me, I have to change.
 The young woman at the front said you might know where he is.
 He's not here.  Why ask me?
 Ss'ai k'ss?  Perfect.
 We are with the Police Department. This is Sergeant Sykes, and I am--
 That's right.
 You are Cassandra?
 I may be an asshole, but at least I'm a real detective, not some outer shit space thing.
 Lay off, asshole.
 Well, if it isn't Detective Jetson. Forget you hip waders, big guy?
 I'd like to see you next to a sea of hydrochloric acid, Fedorchuk... see how much surfin' you'd do.
 Look at your dildo partner.  He's too scared to even come down to the sand.  You're not gonna get wet standing here, moron!
 You ever try to make a case in Slagtown?  The list of Newcomer informants is about as long as the list of Mexican war heroes...
 You don't have squat.
 Jesus, Sykes -- it's been less than ten hours.  Me and Alterez are on it, okay?
 So what've you got on Tuggle's killers?
 No, Sergeant -- not history...  Eternity...
 Move a finger, Harcourt, and you're history...
 That's right.  He and I, along with seven or eight others.  Listen, gentlemen, I will be happy to assist you in any way I can -- unfortunately, at the moment, I'm overdue at another function.
 You were partners with him on some Slag -- uh, Newcomer real estate thing.
 Yes, I heard about poor Warren. Tragic.
 Sergeant... Detective.  I wasn't aware there were any Newcomers at the rank of Detective yet.
 I'm Sergeant Sykes, and this is Detective Jetson, Los Angeles Police Department.
 Yes...
 William Harcourt?
 Do it!
 Here?
 Kill them both.
 This is getting out of hand.  I want you to deal with it.  Immediately.
 When we picked him up, he was talking to those two cops -- the two who came to question you about Hubley.
 It is his new partner that I'm worried about.
 He didn't recognize me.
 This is becoming a serious breach of security.
 That cop, the human, he was the one who killed Anderson and the driver.
 You look very good.
 How do I look?
 You understand that.  But how many others will?
 But there's no more drug.
 Because... because of what will happen if humans see what we are capable of becoming.
 Why the hell are you so dead set against back-up?
 We can't let him get away.
 I never thought I'd say this, but -- for once in my life I think I'm willing to wait for back-up.
 Tell me about it...
 No he's not.  Not if he overdosed on the drug.  Massive amounts trigger a... a change.  Your body functions seize up, you appear to be dead, but it's really a state of incubation.  When you emerge you're...
 Harcourt is dead.
 ... It's Harcourt.
 What is this?!
 Do what?!  George-- ?!
 No!  We must do this alone.
 There!  Go back.  Down that side street.
 What's this about, George?  I know that look.
 It'd be for your own good.  I think you'd be better off with a partner who's a little more... by the book.  ... Still, I gotta tell you, George, for a quiet guy, you're sure hell on wheels once you get going.  I'd kinda hate to miss your next two days as a detective.
 With Harcourt and Kipling dead, I assume you will be requesting reassignment now.
 Ss-ai!
 Shit!
 Fuck procedure.

 Why?  What's the big goddamn deal?
 The fifty kilos, Matthew.  I have to find it.  I can't let it get out on the street.
 George, c'mon -- lighten up.  It's a beauty of a case.  Don't sweat it -- we got him by the short hairs. He ain't gonna make any more of the shit.
 Stay out of this, Matthew.  Tell me where the drug has been taken or I will crush your lungs against this wall.
 George, uh... you're gonna break his little chest bones...
 Where is the drug?  Where have they taken it?
 Uh, George...
 No, George -- you're missing the point.  The drug is evidence.  We need to have the evidence, ya know?
 If the drug is here, we must destroy it.
 Okay, George -- we gotta play this real smart.
 Harcourt was the brain who brought it all together.
 They had months in quarantine to develop the plan.  Porter, with his chemistry background, must have somehow come up with the formula for the drug.  Hubley manufactured it -- at the refinery.  Strader, through the nightclub, established a distribution network.  And Harcourt--
 I must trust you, Matthew.  I cannot stop this without you.
 George... look me in the eye... George, you don't ever lie to me again.
 Your people don't know about this part of out past.  And they can't know -- It would threaten our entire existence here.
 Jesus, this is major.  Why didn't you tell me sooner? Why'd you hold out on me?
 No... I am sure not.  That is why I am so concerned... someone must now be producing it here.  But none of my people know how to make it.  The process was carefully guarded.
 Where did he get it?  Was there any of it on the ship?
 We all did.
 We?  You've taken it?
 Like your cocaine, I suppose.  The "high" lasts several hours.  We would receive small amounts of it... as a reward for our labor.
 How potent?
 ... It is called ss'jabroka'.  To us it is a potent narcotic.
 The hell it isn't, when somebody wires up enough C-4 explosive to my car to turn me into pink mist!  That Slag was on something, and not sour milk, either?  Am I right?  TELL ME!  What is it?
 No.  I cannot involve you.  This is not your concern.
 No secrets, goddammit!  You don't hold back from me.  Whatever is going on, you're gonna tell me now!
 You must leave me alone on this.
 What's this nothing shit?  It wasn't nothing yesterday when you asked Bentner to run that test and he looked like he was about to shit peach pits, and it's not nothing now.  Don't lie to me, George, you're bad at it.
 ... and Porter ran a piece of shit mom-and-pop mini-mart.  So what the hell's the connection?
 Warren Hubley was in middle management at a refinery... Joshua Strader operated a successful bar and nightclub...
 ... So we've got three guys dead. All Newcomers, all killed the same way -- execution style.
 Nothing.
 What was that about?
 Thank you.
 It's all right, George.  It's cool. Just wait here, all right?  I'll be back in a coupla minutes.
 Stop the car!
 Come on, you won't have to get near the water.
 Please, I must get out here.
 Why?
 Stop the car.
 Come on, let's go, dude.  Surf's up!
 To the... to the beach?
 Well, let's roll, George.
 She's very progressive.  I'm certain she's considering it.
 George, she's not gonna divorce you. You mate for life, remember?
 She's going to divorce me.
 A man, a human, was wiring it to your car.  I didn't get a good look at him.  I must call my wife...
 Where'd you get this?!!
 Yeah, go home.  Get some sleep.  You do sleep, don't you?
 I'm going home.
 Don't count on me, George.  I never had any ideals.
 I hope you can understand how special your world is... how unique a people you humans are.  So it us all the more painful and confusing to us that so few of you seem capable of living up the the ideals you set for yourselves.
 You humans are very curious to us. You invite us to live among you, in an atmosphere of equality we've never known before.  You lay before us a beautiful green world, full of freedoms and opportunities... You give us ownership of our lives for the first time... and you ask no more of us than you do of yourselves: to live by the rules... rules that aren't made to keep one people subordinate to another, but rules that exist to preserve equality.  You aspire to very high ideals here.
 No shit, Holmes.  You're only from another goddamn planet, for chrissakes.
 There is so much our two peoples don't understand about each other.
 Ta ss'trakyona'...
 Your health...
 Sticking out of his ass... yeah! See, that's what makes it a joke. There's like a surprise, and your mind fills in the funny picture. Here's this guy with a pen stuck in his ass and he thinks it's a thermometer.  Nada, huh?
 In the other man's rectum.
 ... and so, and so the doctor says, "If this is the thermometer, then where'd I leave the pen?"  You're not... you don't think that's funny?  George, work with me, I always get a laugh with that one. Look, if the doctor's got the thermometer in his hand, then where's his pen gotta be?
 Maybe not... I don't know.  I'm not sure I'm gonna go.  She doesn't need her burn-out of a father there...
 Human children can be very beautiful.  Getting married?  Congratulations. You will be taking Sunday off, then...
 I appreciate your honesty, George.
 Your home is quite disordered.  I thought perhaps you had been burglarized when I walked in.
 It's like having an eleventh finger removed.  It hurts like hell, but you never really needed the damn thing in the first place.
 We mate for life.  Divorce... is a strange concept to us.
 Was.  Divorced.
 You are married?
 Yeah... I know the routine.
 My wife?  She worries about me.
 So, she keeps you on a pretty short leash, does she?
 Through his ass.  Next time you see him, tell him to call me... unless you want us to keep coming back on you like a bad case of herpes.
 I believe he is probably lying.
 When will Strader return?
 We were chasing you because you ran, you dumb son-of-a-bitch.
 Todd Watson.  The assistant manager.
 Who is he?
 Yeah, that's it.  Say it slow.
 Ss'trokya ss'lato 'na'.
 And what was that one about my mother?  That was a good one.
 Ss'loka'.  It means literally "small but intelligent creature".  It loses much in the translation.
 So what was that other word for Human... Slow ka?
 Our bodies do not assimilate the nutrients if the food has been cooked.
 I'll bet.  Would it really put you out if they tossed that on the grill for a minute or two?
 This is mole.  It's good.
 Which one is that?  Raw what?
 Three months.  We learn quickly.  We adapt.  It is our strength... what we were bred for, to adapt to hostile environments.
 I don't think I could ever learn to read that shit.  How long did it take you to learn English?
 Yeah, sure.  I knew that...
 If I may make a suggestion... We have different weak spots than you do.  Next time, a blow to the nerve plexus under the arm, here, will produce the effect I think you were looking for.
 In the camps, we were lodged four to a room.  The selection process was entirely random.  We did not get to stay with our friends... or families...
 How could a straight-arrow like you ever pick a roommate like him?
 From quarantine, when my people first arrived here.  He and I were housed together.
 You know that guy?
 Stay back!  I'm okay.
 Matthew, you don't have to-- .
 That's very colorful.  But see -- now I've got a problem.  I don't seem to be getting much cooperation from you, Porter.  So I guess we're gonna have to take this little session down to my office, ya know?
 Your mother mates out of season.
 Tell me.
 Screw me?  That can't be right.
 Screw you.
 I'll handle it.
 But I-- .
 Back off, George.
 Uh, Matthew...
 Your name wouldn't happen to be Porter, would it?
 At the end of the bar.
 Who said that?
 My partner is dead!  Because one of you bastards killed him -- then disappeared into a rathole down in Slagtown, where he's home and dry, 'cause nobody sees nothing, nobody says nothing...
 Agree to work with me?  You don't like me... you don't like any of us. You have nothing but contempt for us.  And yet you become an outcast from your club of detectives by making me your partner...
 Why'd I do what?
 Why did you do it?
 We'd like to ask you about a business associate of your, Warren Hubley.
 Rudyard Kipling?  No shit?  Listen, we just need a minute of your time...
 He has not been home since that day. But she told me where to find him.
 Did you talk to him?
 She didn't know him.  But she said her son might.
 Aw-right.  What about the other guy?
 A week ago two men came to see her husband.  After they left, he was very frightened.  She identified one of the men from a photo I showed her.  It was Hubley.
 Did you learn anything?
 Mrs. Porter is not taking her husband's death well.
 Why the hell--?!  Great, fine.  You talk to the wife.
 I believe I should interview the widow alone.
 So the Slag they're cutting into upstairs worked at a refinery just like Hubley worked at a refinery.  I'd say that "possible" connection between the two cases just got a hell of a lot more possible.  Okay, next step -- I gotta go talk to the wife of the Slag store owner blown away last night.
 A large number of my people were hired by refineries because the methane fumes are not harmful to us. My spouse's brother is one.
 How the hell do you know that?
 Newcomers working near methane gasses at oil refineries must paint it on their boots to protect against sparks.
 And still it fits?
 Well... Yeah, it's rubber.  It stretches.
 And that fits?
 Get the picture?
 A rubber.  A condom.  You know... Coney Island whitefish?  Men, human men, put them on their, uh -- penises -- to protect against having babies.  You need this for anything?
 What is this?
 Shouldn't we examine their personal effects?
 Nothing?
 Nothing.
 What's this?  What's going on?
 Great.  Well, I'm sure glad that's settled, aren't you?
 Yes... no, it is not unreasonable. Although I--
 Possibly.  Good.  Well, would you be willing to accept the theory, George, that... possibly... by examining the evidence from one case we might shed some small ray of light on the other?  Does that sound unreasonable to you?
 Well... yes, quite possibly.
 Nothing's wrong.  I just want to get something straight.  You agree that there's a good chance these two shootings are somehow related, right?
 What is wrong?
 Well, there's a thing about partners, about being somebody's partner.  You do for each other. And other people's rules don't mean shit.  It's the rules set up between the two of you, that's all that counts.  Understand?  Okay.  Well, my friend and partner was shot last night and I'm after the shitbag that did it.  As my partner, I'm asking you to respect me and help me find him.
 Yes.
 Look, you want to fit in here, right?  You want to learn how to get along?
 The murder at the mini-mart is not our case.  The Captain said--
 The guys at the mini-mart last night made a half-assed stab at the money in the till -- but I don't think that's what they were there for.  I think we got us a couple'a executions on our hands, George...
 There was no wallet... but he was still wearing a watch and two rings.
 Terrific.  A real pillar of the community.  Was Hubley missing anything when they found him?  Was he ripped off?
 Nice signal, dickwad!
 Through the chest.  Rupturing both the primary and secondary hearts.
 With two BRI Sabot slugs in the chest.
 His body was discovered three days ago, in an alley off of Central Avenue, near downtown.
 Let's talk Hubley.
 That is exactly so.  It is like your name... Sykes.  I'm sure it doesn't bother you at all that it sounds like "ss'ai k'ss", two words in my language which mean "excrement" and "cranium".
 Anyway, what's it matter to you if we think it's funny, right?  Whatta you care?
 Gesundheit.  You don't mind if I stick to George, do you?
 My true name is Ss'tangya T'ssorentsa'.
 Man, somebody really hung one on you!  I've heard some good ones for you guys... Humphrey Bogart, Harley Davidson.  I guess the people at immigration got a little punchy after a while, coming up with names for a quarter of a million of you. You weren't at the back of the line, were you, George?
 I am George.
 What's that?  Look, Jetson.  Get this straight in your head.  We're not pals, we're not married, and we ain't gonna take long moonlight walks together... We're just partners.  And don't call me Sergeant.  Call me Sykes... or Matt if you have to.
 Sergeant... I'd like to thank you for what you're doing.
 ... and we work my hours.  I'll do the driving, you do the paperwork. You gotta learn it so you might as well do it all.
 No... two.
 Yeah, the shells are too big for six in an cylinder.  Hell, Matt, you don't need but one.
 Only holds five.
 Casull .454 Magnum.  You're talking twice the impact energy of .44 Magnum hot loads.
 What is it?
 You said you wanted the biggest thing I could find... Well, this is it.
 ... They took the stuff out, all of it -- this afternoon.
 Don't piss him off, O'Neal.  When he gets like this, I can't control him. I've seen this before.  He got like this once -- I saw him jerk a guy's spine out and show it to him. Nothing I could do.  I hadda go throw up.
 Yes it is.  Thirty-five percent pure Methane gas in there.  I don't know how these fellas do it.
 That where Anderson worked?
 I think you're gonna find he's taken the rest of his life off.
 Wait.  You know who it looks like? Yeah.  Anderson.  Uh... James Anderson.  He isn't in today.  He took the afternoon off.
 Who else can I ask around here?
 To be honest, it's hard to say.  I hate to admit it but -- they all still kinda look alike to me.
 We think he could'a been involved, yeah.  You know him?
 You think this is the guy who did it?
 Well, one of the men didn't like him so much...
 Mr. Hubley was an all right guy -- and a damn good manager.  The men liked him.  I'm really gonna have to scramble to fill his shoes.
 Sure.  Just a minute.
 Can you dig up their Quarantine records in this thing?
 I'm sorry, Matt.  Nothing here seems to be matching up...
 Yeah -- we met him.  Wonderful boy... close personal friend of George's here.
 Released December one.  He and his wife moved first to Modesto, then Coalinga, California -- wherever that is -- settled in L.A. in April.  Field of expertise: organic chemical engineering.  He and his wife have one child, a son.
 For you, anything.
 Try Joshua Strader, will ya, darlin'?
 Here's Hubley.  Left Quarantine on November thirtieth, relocated first to Riverside, then moved to Los Angeles early in February the following year.  Field of expertise: chemical manufacturing.  Looks like he passed up several other better paying jobs waiting for that one at the refinery.
 That's all I know.  You want anything more, you ask somebody else.
 Yeah, I heard of it.
 Yeah... I seen him around.  High- roller dude named Strader.  Joshua Strader.  Runs a club on the west side.  Encounters.
 One of the two men was Hubley, right?  What about the other one? Did you know him?
 What's that?
 Ss'kya'ta'.
 Jesus, are the questions too tough for you already?  Let's try again--  Is your name Porter?
 Did he find anything?
 Looking for some foreign compound in the blood of that alien you dropped the other day.
 What kind of test?
 You mean the Blob?  They're finishing up now.
 You guys finished the postmortem on Strader yet?
 Yeah, I'll bet.
 Oh, here's an extra headshot if you need one.  We're just about to start cutting in.  You're welcome to stick around if you want.  It's really fascinating stuff.
 That's the way these people are. You don't hit both pumps you just piss them off.
 Lucky nothing.  I had to empty my damn gun into him.
 Lucky for you, you got him in both of his... well, what we loosely refer to as... hearts.
 Yeah.
 You took this gut out, too, didn't you?
 Fedorchuk couldn't find his ass with his hands in his back pockets.
 No I.D. on him and -- well, you know, no fingerprints -- so it could be tough.  Your buddies this morning went through the mug book but couldn't make a facial match.
 Yeah... he was one Martin Helder. White male, twenty-seven.  Let's see... wrap sheet shows one armed robbery conviction, a couple for sale of a controlled substance. Oh yeah, and he was wired on coke when you stopped his clock.
 The human?
 Yeah, right.  Don't push your luck. Anyway, according to the sheet, the guy you nailed outside by the car--
 Come on.  You got nothin' better to do, cushy county job like yours.
 You know I've been over all this with Fedorchuk and Alterez this morning...
 Don't tell me what to think.
 Granger and Pitts have one hell of a caseload... and I would have thought with Jetson here being the first Newcomer plainclothes, and Hubley's body being found over in the Newcomer community...
 Granger and Pitts are already on it.
 You?
 Departmental policy.
 You are to have nothing to do with the investigation into Bill Tuggle's death.  You know that.  Leave that for Fedorchuk.
 Captain.  I'd like to volunteer for duty with the new detective.
 Yeah, Sykes?
 I'll cover you!  Get outta there!!
 I can't!  Do you mind!
 Get outta there!
 I got him.  Don't get pinned.
 Watch the driver.  I'm going for a better angle on the door.
 Yeah, that's comforting.  Mine, too.
 Of course.  Right in the trunk of the car.
 You got your vest?
 Whatever gave you that idea?
 Does that look at all suspicious to you?
 Shit, if Kristin had to get married where I could afford it, we'd be holding the reception at Buddy's Burgers.
 But you're bummed because your ex and her new husband are paying for the whole thing.
 Goddammit, Tug -- I want to see Kristin get married, okay?  But--
 Hey, look -- we've known Kristin since... since she was conceived in that cabin up in Big Bear. Remember?  You and Edie banged the wall so hard, me and Carol were picking plaster out of our hair for a week...
 What?
 Put on your wash-and-wear suit and your clip-on tie, have your landlady tie your shoes for you, and show up at the church.  Simple.  Me and Carol are going.
 How can I go?
 It is.
 Hope their plumbing's the same.
 Uh, seems to be in front and behind.
 Talk to me, Hudson.
 Can't lock up...
 Position?
 Movement!
 Rescue mission.  There's some juicy colonists' daughters we gotta rescue from virginity.
 Hey, 'Top.'  What's the op?
 Let's go...let's go.  Cycle through!
 Whoooah!  No shit?  I'm impressed.
 Would you, Sir?
 Christ.  I never saw such a buncha old women.  You want me to fetch your slippers, Hudson?
 This floor's freezing.
 Say again?  All after incinerators?
 Uh,...Apone, I want you to lay down a suppressing fire with the incinerators and fall back by squads to the APC, over.
 Let's go.  Pull 'em out.
 Flame-units only.  I want rifles slung.
 Vasquez, take point.  Let's move.
 First squad up, on line.  Hicks, get yours in a cordon.  Watch the rear.
 Ten seconds, people.  Look sharp!
 Set down sixty meters this side of the telemetry mast.  Immediate dust off on my 'clear,' then stay on station.
 Awright!  I want a nice clean dispersal this time.
 Okay, let's do it.
 Awright.  Fire-team A.  Gear up. Let's move.  Two minutes. Somebody wake up Hicks.
 ...that's better.  Pan it around a bit.
 Well, thanks, I --
 You did okay, Bishop.
 In seventeen minutes this place will be a cloud of vapor the size of Nebraska.
 She's alive.  They brought her here and you know it.
 Ripley...
 WE'RE NOT LEAVING!
 PLENTY!  TWENTY-SIX MINUTES!
 HOW MUCH TIME?
 See you soon.
 It's going to be closer.  You better get going.
 All right.  Let's get on it.  What'll you need?
 I'm really the only one qualified to remote-pilot the ship anyway. Believe me, I'd prefer not to.  I may be synthetic but I'm not stupid.
 What?
 I'll go.
 I'm afraid so.  The crash did too much damage.  The overload is inevitable, at this point.
 And it's too late to shut it down?
 I'm projecting total systems failure in a little under four hours.  The blast radius will be about thirty kilometers.  About equal to ten megatons.
 How long until it blows?
 That's it.  See it?  Emergency venting.
 Hard to say.  It may have been blind instinct...attraction to the heat of whatever...but she did choose to incubate her eggs in the one spot where we couldn't destroy her without destroying ourselves.  That's if she exists, of course.
 Could it be intelligent?
 Well, the queen is always physically larger then the others.  A termite queen's abdomen is so bloated with eggs that it can't move at all.  It is fed and tended by drone workers, defended by the warriors.  She is the center of their lives, quite literally the  mother of their society.
 You're saying one of those things lays all the eggs?
 That is the question of the hour.  We could assume a parallel to certain insect forms who have hivelike organization. An ant of termite colony, for example, is ruled by a single female, a queen, which is the source of new eggs.
 But these things come from eggs...so where are all the eggs coming from.
 Yes.  That follows.
 Which would mean lots of those parasites, right?  One for each person...over a hundred at least.
 Now let me get this straight. The aliens paralyzed the colonists, carried them over there, cocooned them to be hosts for more of those...
 I've isolated a neuro-muscular toxin responsible for the paralysis.  It seems to be metabolizing.  He should wake up soon.
 Sorry to disappoint you.
 I expected more of you, Ripley. I thought you would be smarter than this.
 Look, maybe the thing didn't even exist, right?  And if I'd made it a major security situation, the Administration would've stepped in.  Then no exclusive rights, nothing.
 You sent them out there and you didn't even warn them, Burke. Why didn't you warn them?
 You sent them to that ship.  I just checked the colony log... directive dates six-twelve-seventy-nine. Signed Burke, Carter J.
 Now, wait a second --
 But they will know about it, Burke. From me.  Just like they'll know how you were responsible for the deaths of one hundred and fifty-seven colonists here --
 You've been doing your homework. Look, they can't impound it if they don't know about it.
 You just try getting a dangerous organism past ICC quarantine. Section 22350 of the Commerce Code.
 Those specimens are worth millions to the bio-weapons division.  Now, if you're smart we can both come out of this heroes.  Set up for life.
 This operation is under military jurisdiction and Hicks is next in chain of command.  Right?
 Corporal Hicks!?
 What rank?  I believe Corporal Hicks has authority here.
 Don't make me pull rank, Ripley.
 You son of a bitch.
 Bullshit!
 This is clearly an important species we're dealing with here. We can't just arbitrarily exterminate them --
 They can bill me.  I got a tab running.  What's second?
 Well, I mean...I know this is an emotional moment, but let's not make snap judgments.  Let's move cautiously.  First, this physical installation had a substantial dollar value attached to it --
 Why not?
 Now hold on a second.  I'm not authorizing that action.
 No good.  How do we know it'll effect their biochemistry?  I say we take off and nuke the entire site from orbit.  It's the only way to be sure.
 She's right.
 That's not what I mean.  Gorman, if your men have to use their weapons in there, they'll rupture the cooling system.
 Yeah?  Maybe the organisms like the heat, that's why they built...
 They're right under the primary heat exchangers.
 Uh-hunh.  One of thirty or so, all over the planet.  They're completely automated.  We manufacture them, by the way.
 That the atmosphere processor?
 I suggest you study the disks Ripley has been kind enough to prepare for you.
 I hope you're right.  I really do.
 Well, it didn't occur to me.  It's been policy for years to have a synthetic on board.
 You never said anything about an android being here!  Why not?
 That's the plan.  My word on it.
 Burke, just tell me one thing. That you're going out there to kill them.  Not study.  Not bring back.  Just burn them out...clean ...forever.
 Yello?  Oh, Ripley.  Hi...
 No!  The answer is no.  Now please go.  I'm sorry.  Just go, would you.
 Yes, and I've read it.  You wake up every night, sheets soaking, the same nightmare over and over...
 Spare me, Burke.  I've had my psych evaluation this month.
 If you go.  It's a second chance, kiddo.  And it'll be the best thing in the world for you to face this fear and beat it.  You gotta get back on the horse...
 If I go.
 What if I said I could get you reinstated as a flight officer? And that the company has agreed to pick up your contract?
 It's all I could get.  Anyway, it keeps my mind off of... everything.  Days off are worse.
 Running loaders, forklifts, that sort of thing?
 That's right.
 I heard you were working in the cargo docks.
 Yeah, yeah.  I saw the commercial.
 Well, the corporation co-financed that colony with the Colonial Administration, against mineral rights.  We're getting into a lot of terraforming...'Building Better Worlds.'
 What about you?  What's your interest in this?
 I was reamed, steamed and dry-cleaned by you guys...and now you want me to go back out there?  Forget it.
 Hear me out...
 No.  There's no way!
 You are a head case.  Have a donut.
 They had their minds made up before I even went in there. They think I'm a head case.
 You had them eating out of your hand, kiddo.
 Just tell them what happened.  The important thing is to stay cool and unemotional.
 I get the picture.
 Look, I believe you, but there are going to be some heavyweights in there.  You got Feds, you got interstellar commerce commission, you got colonial administration, insurance company guys...
 You read my deposition...it's complete and accurate.
 Cancer.  Hmmmm.  They still haven't licked that one.  Cremated.  Interred Parkside Repository, Little Chute, Wisconsin.  No children.
 Amy.
 Amanda Ripley-McClaren.  Married name, I guess.  Age:  sixty-six ...at time of death.  Two years ago.  I'm sorry.
 Is she...?
 Well, I was going to wait until after the inquest...
 Have they located my daughter yet?
 You'd drifted right through the core systems.  It's blind luck that deep-salvage team caught you when they...are you all right?
 Fifty-seven...oh, Christ...
 Shit.  Apone, collect magazines from everybody.  We can't have any firing in there.
 We're talking thermonuclear explosion.
 PDT'S.  Personal-Data Transmitters. Every adult colonist had one surgically implanted.
 What's he scanning for?
 It's insured.
 Looks like you company can write off its share of this colony.
 Dead on all channels.
 Still nothing from the colony?
 We're trained to deal with these kinds of situations.
 These Colonial Marines are some tough hombres, and they're packing state-of-the-art firepower. Nothing they can't handle...right, Lieutenant?
 You wouldn't be going in with the troops.  I can guarantee your safety.
 Look, we don't know what's going on out there.  It may just be a down transmitter.  But if it's not, I want you there...as an advisor.  That's all.
 Forget it.
 All right, I guess.  One hell of a hangover.  Look, Ripley... I...
 How do you feel?
 They're but off!  Do something!
 I told them to fall back...
 Shut up.  Just shut up!
 GET THEM OUT OF THERE!  DO IT NOW!
 So?  So?
 So...then the fusion containment shuts down.
 So.
 Proceed inside.
 I don't know.
 What is it?
 Gorman!  Give it a rest would you.
 Where are your parents?  You have to try...
 Apone...where are your people? Anybody in D-Block?
 One of us?
 The structure seems intact.  They have power.
 Hold at forty.  Slow circle of the complex.
 Thirty-eight...simulated.
 How may drops is this for you, Lieutenant?
 You tell me.  I only work here.
 We're not making that out too well.  What is it?
 Unknown.  But, it looks like all of them.  Over at the processing station...sublevel 'C' under the south tower.
 Alive?
 Hah!  Stop your grinnin' and drop your linen!  Found 'em.
 Okay, stand by in operations.  Let's go.
 Sir, the CPU is on-line.
 He's coming in.  I feel safer already.
 ...We're coming in.
 All right, the area's secured. Let's go in and see what their computer can tell us.  First team head for operations. Hudson, see if you can get their CPU on line.  Hicks, meet me at the south lock by the up-link tower...
 How do I get out of this chicken-shit outfit?
 Are there any questions?  Hudson?
 All we know is that there's still no contact with the colony and that a xenomorph may be involved.
 Is this going to be a stand-up fight, Sir, on another bug-hunt?
 What's the question?
 Hudson, Sir.  He's Hicks.
 Yes, Hicks?
 Sir?
 At ease.  I'm sorry we didn't have time to brief before we left Gateway but...
 Fuckin' A!
 Let's go!  Let's go!
 Six meters.  Five.  What the fu --
 Well you're not reading it right!
 Let's get these things lit.
 Seventeen meters.
 Do it!
 The corner!  Ready?
 I want you two walking the perimeter. I know we're all in strung out shape but stay frosty and alert. We've got to stop any entries before they get out of hand.
 Maybe we got 'em demoralized.
 I don't fucking believe this. Do you believe this?
 We got problems.
 Aye-firmative.
 Outstanding.  Then all we need's a deck of cards.  All right, let's move like we got a purpose.
 Are you finished?  You okay?
 Well that's great!  That's just fucking great, man.  Now what the fuck are we supposed to do, man? We're in some real pretty shit now!
 Not that tunnel, the other one!
 Let's get the fuck out of here!
 Sure, Hicks.
 Save it.
 Don't be long, Ellen.
 Ellen.
 We ain't going anywhere.
 Hicks, don't let him leave.
 All right!  She's alive.  I believe it.  But we gotta get moving!  Now!
 No!  No!  She's alive!  We have to --
 Stand back.
 Locked.
 We didn't miss anything.
 They learned.  They cut the power and avoided the guns.  They must have found another way in, something we missed.
 Get back here, both of you.  Fall back to Operations.
 It's game time.
 Let's waste him.  No offense.
 You know, Burke, I don't know which species is worse.  You don't see them screwing each other over for a fucking percentage.
 The only way it would work is if he sabotaged certain freezers on the trip back.  Then he could jettison the bodies and make up any story he liked.
 Wait a minute.  We'd know about it.
 Yeah.  I've noticed.
 Look, you started this.  Now show me everything.  I can handle myself.
 Well, that's the grenade launcher ...you probably don't want to mess with that.
 What's this?
 If it comes to that, I'll do us both.  Let's see that it doesn't Here, I'd like to introduce you to a close personal friend of mine.
 Hicks, I'm not going to wind up like those others.  You'll take care of it won't you, it if comes to that?
 Maybe.  Maybe not.
 They'll get us.
 But they don't know that.  They're probably looking for other ways to get in.  That'll take them awhile.
 Newt time then can walk right up and knock.
 Can't tell.  Lots.  D gun's down to twenty.  Ten.  It's out.
 Now many?
 On my way.
 They're in the approach corridor.
 That's right.  So we put up welded barricades at these intersections...  ...and seal these ducts here and here.  Then they can only come at us from these two corridors and we create a free field of fire for the other two sentry units, here.
 We gotta figure on them getting into the complex.
 All right.  There's a fire door at this end.  The first thing we do is put a remote sentry in the tunnel and seal that door.
 About seventeen days.
 How long after we're declared overdue can we expect a rescue?
 Poor bastard.
 Removed surgically before embryo implantation.  Subject:  Marachuk, John L.   Died during procedure.  They killed him getting it off.
 No.  No!  It ain't you.  They're inside.  Inside the perimeter. They're in here.
 You're just reading me.
 It's inside the complex.
 Hudson, give us a break.
 Oh, man.  And I was gettin' short, too!  Four more weeks and out. Now I'm gonna buy it on this fuckin' rock.  It ain't half fair, man!
 Maybe you haven't been keeping up on current events, but we just got out asses kicked, pal!
 Yeah, bullshit.  Watch us.
 Look, man, let's just bug out and call it even, okay?
 All right, we can't blow the fuck out of them...why not roll some canisters of CN-20 down there. Nerve gas the whole nest?
 Anytime.  Anywhere.
 Fuck you.
 Somebody said alien...she thought they said illegal alien and signed up.
 No.  Have you?
 Hey, Vasquez...you ever been mistaken for a man?
 It's readin' right.  Look!
 Can't be.  That's inside the room!
 Nine meters.  Eight.
 They're right on us.  Vasquez, how you doing?
 Twelve meters.  Man, this is a big fucking signal.  Ten meters.
 I don't know, an acid hole in a duct.  Something under the floors, not on the plans. I don't know!
 Fifteen meters.
 Seal the door.
 Range twenty meters.
 Just get back here!
 This signal's weird...must be some interference or something. There's movement all over the place...
 What do you mean, they cut the power?  How could they cut the power, man?  They're animals.
 They cut the power.
 Oh, right!  Right!  With those things running around.  No way.
 Well then somebody's just going to have to go out there.  Take a portable terminal and go out there and plug in manually.
 What about the colony transmitter? That up-link tower down at the other end.  Why can't we use that?
 Think of what?  We're fucked.
 I don't care how!  Think of a way.  Think of something.
 How?  The transmitter was on the APC.  It's wasted.
 We need the other drop-ship.  The on one the Sulaco.  We have to bring it down on remote, somehow.
 Uh, what's next?
 Thanks.
 Yeah, right, it runs from the processing station right into the sublevel here.
 This service tunnel is how they're moving back and forth.
 She survived longer than that with no weapons and no training.
 Man, we're not going to make it seventeen hours!  Those things are going to come in here, just like they did before, man... they're going to come in here and get us, man, long before...
 Oh, God.  Jesus.  This ain't happening.
 You can't help them.  Right now they're being cocooned just like the others.
 Hey...hey!  Look, Crowe and Dietrich aren't dead, man.
 Looks like it stung him.
 The embryo, the second form, hosts in the victim's body for several hours.  Gestating.  Then it...  ...then it...emerges.  Moults. Grows rapidly --
 Sounds like you, Hicks.
 Tell him, as far as I'm concerned, he finds something it's his.
 So what do I tell this guy?
 Christ.  Some honch in a cushy office on Earth says go look at a grid reference in the middle of nowhere, we look.  They don't say why, and I don't ask.  I don't ask because it takes two weeks to get an answer out here and the answer's always 'don't ask.'
 There's a guy on the horn, mom-and-pop survey team.  Says he's homing on something and wants to know if his claim will be honored.
 Yeah.  What?
 You remember you sent some wildcatters out to that plateau, out past the Ilium range, a couple days ago?
 No.. I've slept enough.
 Bad dreams again?  Do you want something to help you sleep?
 Just a couple of days.  Do you feel up to a visitor?
 How long have I been on Gateway station?
 Just terrible?  That's better than yesterday at least.
 Terrible.
 And how are we today?
 Yes, honey.  I think we both can.
 Can we dream?
 That's right.
 Are we going to sleep now?
 Right here, baby.  Right here.
 Mommy...Mommy?
 Newt, I want you to hang on, now.  Hang on tight.
 I knew you'd come.
 Newt, wait!
 This way.  Come on, we're almost there!
 Sure.  Go left.
 DO you know how to get to the landing field from here?
 Come on.  Crawl faster.
 Look!
 Burke!  Open the door!
 I know, honey.  Me too.
 Mommy...I mean, Ripley...I'm scared.
 Sssh.  Don't move.  We're in trouble.
 Wah...?  Where are...?
 Newt.  Newt, wake up.
 I'll be right in the other room, Newt.  And look...I can see you on that camera right up there.
 Don't go!  Please.
 You mean dead.
 Gone.
 Where is she?
 Yes.  A little girl.
 Did you ever have a baby?
 No, it's different, honey.
 Isn't that how babies come? I mean people babies...they grow inside you?
 I don't know, Newt.  That's the truth.
 Did one of those things grow inside her?
 Well, some kids can't handle it like you can.
 Why do they tell little kids that?
 Yes, there are, aren't there.
 My mommy always said there were no monsters.  No real ones.  But there are.
 Oh.  Sorry, Newt.
 Ripley...she doesn't have bad dreams because she's just a piece of plastic.
 I don't want to...I have scary dreams.
 Now you just lie here and have a nap.  You're exhausted.
 You don't have to be sorry.  It wasn't your fault.
 I'm sorry, Newt.
 I guess we're not leaving, right?
 You're really something, ace.
 Yeah, you know.  In the walls, under the floor.  I was the ace.  I could hide better than anybody.
 The 'maze'?  You mean the air ducts?
 I was the best at the game. I knew the whole maze.
 And hope to die?
 Cross my heart.
 You promise?
 Newt.  Look at me...Newt.  I won't leave you.  I promise.
 They're dead.
 They'd be here if they could, honey.  I know they would.
 Because you'll be gone soon, like the others.  Like everybody.  You'll be dead and you'll leave me alone.
 Why not?
 I don't want you for a friend.
 What about me?
 Casey.  She's my only friend.
 Newt.  My n-name's Newt. Nobody calls me Rebecca except my dork brother.
 What did you say?
 Sweet Jesus.
 Sixty, maybe seventy families.
 How many colonists?
 What are you talking about. What people?
 Because I don't have to.  The people who live there checked it out years ago and they never reported and 'hostile organism' or alien ship.  And by the way, they call it Acheron now.
 Why won't you check out LV-426?
 ...because just one of those things managed to kill my entire crew, within twelve hours of hatching...
 Thank you, Officer Ripley.  That will be...
 Look, I can see where this is going.  But I'm telling you those things exist.  Back on that planetoid is an alien ship and on that ship are thousands of eggs.  Thousands. Do you understand?  I suggest you find it, using the flight recorder's data.  Find it and deal with it -- before one of your survey teams comes back with a little surprise...
 That's because I blew it out the Goddamn airlock!  Like I said.
 The analysis team which went over your shuttle centimeter by centimeter found no physical evidence of the creature you describe...
 It did not, however, contain any entries concerning the hostile life form you allegedly picked up.
 Look, I told you...
 At present the girls only peck me. Their cruelty surely will wreck me. But one little beak in my own, And I'll up to heaven be flown! At present the girls only peck me. But one little beak in my own, And I'll up to heaven be flown. Up to heaven be flown! Up to heaven be flown!
 A sweetheart or a pretty little wife is Papageno's wish. A willing, billing, lovey dovey Would be My most tasty little dish.
 I need to net one birdie only And I will stop feeling so lonely. But if she won't fly to my aid, Then into a ghost I must fade. I need to net one birdie only But if she won't fly to my aid, Then into a ghost I must fade.  To a ghost I must fade! To a ghost I must fade!
 A sweetheart or a pretty little wife is Papageno's wish. A willing, billing, lovey dovey Would be My most tasty little dish.
 Then that would be eating and drinking I'd live like a Prince without thinking. The wisdom of old would be mine - A woman's much better than wine! Then that would be eating and drinking! The wisdom of old would be mine - A woman's much better than wine. She's much better than wine! She's much better than wine!
 A sweetheart or a pretty little wife is Papageno's wish. A willing, billing, lovey dovey Would be My most tasty little dish. Be my most tasty little dish! Be my most tasty little dish!
 What do you mean?
 His Grace is very angry with you.
 These Viennese certainly know good music when they hear it.
 Indeed.
 Well, I think that went off remarkably well, don't you?
 Certainly!
 Follow me, please. The Archbishop would like a word.
 Meaning you didn't like it.
 Extremely clever.
 What did you think of the music?
 You were sublime.
 How was I? Tell me honestly.
 Nothing! He can marry who he pleases. I don't give a damn.
 Well, what does it matter to you?
 The marriage!
 What?
 Did you know? Had you heard?
 Looks don't concern me, Maestro. Only talent interests a woman of taste.
 Looks and talent don't always go together, Katherina.
 Why?
 You might be disappointed.
 What does he look like?
 Perhaps.
 Oh. Well perhaps you could introduce us anyway.
 My dear, it will hardly enhance your reputation to be celebrated throughout Vienna as a singing prostitute for a Turk.
 Turkish? Oh, if it's Turkish, that's different. I want to be in it.
 A Turkish brothel.
 Oh!
 A brothel.
 What's that?
 In a harem.
 Where?
 Well, do you know where it's set, my dear?
 Why not?
 Well even if there is, I don't think you want to get involved with this one.
 How do you know?
 No.
 Is there a part for me?
 Yes.
 And he's been commissioned to write an opera. Is it true?
 Oh? News travels fast in Vienna.
 Well, I heard you met Herr Mozart.
 Really? What else did he tell you today? Give me some gossip.
 Well? How do you like it? It's Turkish. My hairdresser tells me everything's going to be Turkish this year!
 Good morning.
 Maestro.
 Excuse us, Fraulein. Good night, Signore.
 No, no, no, no. You can't take him away now. This is his night. Won't you introduce us, Wolfgang?
 I assume she's the virtuoso in that department. There can't be any other reason you'd marry someone like that.
 What??
 Is she a good fuck?
 I'm so relieved.
 No, she's fine.
 Is her mother still lying on the floor?
 Oh - excuse me!
 I'll be right back.
 Don't bother.
 What?
 Don't bother!
 Katherina! I'll tell you what I'm going to do. I'm going to write another aria for you. Something even more amazing for the second act. I have to get some water. Her mother is lying on the stage.
 Oh, Your Grace - I thank Your Grace! I thank you!
 You have leave to try.
 Oh, sir, he's never disobeyed me in anything. Please, Your Grace, give him one more chance.
 And how will you make him keep it?
 Yes, sir, that's the truth. But don't blame him. The fault is mine. I was too indulgent with him. But not again. Never again, I promise! I implore you - let me bring him back here. I'll make him give his word to serve you faithfully.
 Your son is an unprincipled, spoiled, conceited brat.
 Sir -
 I'm not surprised. Money seems to be more important to him than loyalty or friendship. He has sold himself to Vienna. Let Vienna look out for him.
 Oh sir, yes! He's about to make the worst mistake of his life. Some little Viennese slut is trying to trick him into marriage. I know my son. He is too simple to see the trap - and there is no one there who really cares for him.
 Hardly.
 But he needs to be here in Salzburg, Your Grace. He needs me and he needs you. Your protection, your understanding.
 No! I won't have him back.
 Then try harder, Mozart. I have no intention of dismissing you. You will remain in my service and learn your place. Go now.
 No, Your Grace! I mean with all humility, no. I would rather you dismissed me. It's obvious I don't satisfy.
 I wish you to return immediately to Salzburg. Your father is waiting for you there patiently. I will speak to you further when I come.
 If His Grace is not satisfied with me, he can dismiss me.
 How much provocation am I to endure from you? The more license I allow you, the more you take.
 Humiliated?
 Why do I have to be humiliated in front of my guests by one of my own servants?
 Why what, sir?
 Oh shut up. I'm sick to death of that tune.
 In the pot, I have got a good dinner. Not a sausage or stew, but a singer. Not a sausage or stew but a singer. Is the treat that I'll eat for my meat!
 Are you drunk? You invited me. And my horse. Here he is. Ottavio!
 Dinner? How dare you? I am a nobleman. I only dine with people of my own height.
 I've come to dinnnnnner!
 Who the devil are you? What do you want?
 Don Giovannnnnnnni!
 What are you talking about?
 I feel wrong. I feel wrong being here.
 Why?
 Yes!
 Now?
 I want to go back to Vienna.
 Where?
 I want to go!
 What is it?
 Please! Let me sit here. Let me stay here with you. I promise I won't say all word. I'll just be here, so you know no one's going to hurt you. Please, please!
 Go back to bed.
 It's killing me.
 Why not?
 I can't write it!
 Give me one reason I can understand.
 Give me two more weeks. Please.
 Oh yes, sir. He's all right. And he's working on it very hard.
 This is my wife, Stanzi. I've been sick, but I'm all right now. Aren't I?
 Why?
 No. Don't answer it!
 You'd think I was mad.
 Why not?
 I'm not telling you.
 What's that? Oh!  Who gave you this? How much is it? Wolfi, who gave you this?
 I heard voices.
 No one.
 Who was that?
 Shut up! I'll not let you put anything in my hand until I see some money.
 Stanzi-manzi, I'll put it in your hand!
 Half the house! You'll never see a penny. I want it here, in my hand.
 Well, you liked it, didn't you? Monkey-flunki-punki.
 I don't trust this man. And I didn't like what he did with your opera. It was common.
 Oh, Stanzi.
 When? We need money now. Either he pays now, or you don't do it.
 Why not? Half the house!
 You're not going to do this?
 I'm talking about now. How much will you give him now? Down payment?
 Half the receipts! Stanzi!
 Your father is dead.
 What?
 Wolfi! Your father is dead.
 Salzburg.  We were just talking about Salzburg.  If you've come from my friend the Fartsbishop, you've arrived at just the right moment. Because I've got good news for him. I'm done with Vienna. It's over, finished, done with! Done with! Done with!
 These gentlemen are from Salzburg.
 Yes, my love?
 Wolfi.
 We'll have a little party. Come in. Come in. You know Herr Schikaneder?  This is! a very nice girl.
 No, it's right he should hear. I'm sick to death of it. We can't do anything right for you, can we?
 Stanzi!
 Look, old man, you stay out of this. We spend a fortune on you, more than we can possibly afford, and all you do is criticize, morning to night. And then you think you can -
 Oh, damn!
 She won't talk to me. She says she has to speak to you.
 Well, ask her!
 I don't know.
 What does she want?
 There's a young girl to see you.
 Wolfi, I think your father's tired. I'll cook us something here.
 What? How can you be so boring? Tea!
 Wolfi!
 Tea? Who wants tea? Let's go out! This calls for a feast. You don't want tea, Papa. Let's go dancing. Papa loves parties, don't you?
 May I offer you some tea, Herr Mozart?
 He's not Herr Mozart. Call him Papa.
 Stop it, Wolfi. I look dreadful. Welcome to our house, Herr Mozart.
 My Stanzi - look at her! Isn't she beautiful? Come on now, confess, Papa. Could you want a prettier girl for a daughter?
 I love you! I love you!
 Yes!
 No!
 Sssh. What is it? Tell me.
 Tell them to go!
 What's the matter with you?
 Tell them to go away. I don't want to see anybody.
 Stop it now. Stop it. I've brought some friends to meet you. They're next door waiting. Do we have anything to eat? They're all starving.
 This isn't pride. It's sheer stupidity!
 Shut up! Just shut up! I don't need them.
 All they want to see is your work. What's wrong with that?
 Don't be stupid.
 How are we going to live, Wolfi? Do you want me to go into the streets and beg?
 Well, don't do that again!
 Yes!
 You borrowed money from your mother?
 Well, I'm not borrowing any more money from my mother, and that's that!
 Oh yes? You always know everything.
 No, they will not. I know how things work in this city.
 They'll come anyway. They love me here.
 One royal pupil and the whole of Vienna will come flocking. We'd be set up for life!
 Oh, leave me alone.
 I think you're mad! You're really mad!
 Of course.
 Excuse me, Wolfi. Mama is not feeling very well. Can we leave now?
 Eat my - ah!
 Yes.
 Eat
 Tish-I'm-tee.
 What?
 Tish-I'm tee. What's that?
 Tub - but i-tub - but I vol - love but I love ui - You. I love you!
 Ui-vol-i-tub!
 Iram - marry Em - marry me! No, no! You're a fiend. I'm not going to marry a fiend. A dirty fiend at that.
 Just say it - you'll see. It's very serious. Em iram!  Em iram!
 No!
 No, this is serious. Say it backwards.
 No, I'm not playing this game.
 Em iram! Em iram!
 Sra-I'm-sick. Sick - kiss I'm - my Kiss my! Sra-I'm-sick - Kiss my arse!
 No, no. Say it backwards, shit-wit. Sra-I'm-sick Say it backwards!
 Yes, you are. You're very sick.
 Sra-I'm-sick! Sra-I'm sick!
 Oh, ha, ha, ha.
 Yes, I think it's brilliant. You've been doing it for years.
 Do you think that's funny?
 Why? People fart backwards.
 That's stupid.
 Because here everything goes backwards. People walk backwards, dance backwards, sing backwards, and talk backwards.
 Why not?
 Go ahead, tell him. Tell them all. They won't understand you anyway.
 Your Grace, I've got something to tell you. I want to complain about this man.
 Fartsbishop!
 We are in the Residence of the Fartsbishop of Salzburg.
 Where?
 Yes! Back! Back! Listen - don't you know where you are?
 No! No! No!
 I am! I am! I'm stopping it - slowly. You see! Look, I've stopped. Now we are going back.
 Stop it!
 Madame, I will respect his. He asked me to stay here.
 I regret we have no servants to show you out, Herr Salieri. Respect my wish and go.
 He's not going to work on this anymore. It is making him ill. Please.
 No. I was assisting him. He asked me.
 This is not his handwriting.
 And I'm asking you -
 He asked me to stay.
 No, he doesn't. And I don't want you here. Just go, please.
 He needs me, ma'am.
 Well, thank you very much. You can go now.
 I was at hand.
 Why you?
 Your husband is ill, ma'am. He took sick. I brought him home.
 What are you doing here?
 Should we stay here? It's a charming room. I love these candlesticks. Were they here earlier? I didn't notice them I suppose I was too nervous.
 What?
 I do apologize for this afternoon. I behaved like a silly girl. Where shall we go?
 Then don't. It's up to you. Not to be vague, that is the price.
 But! I'm a married woman!
 It's a post all Vienna seeks. If you want it for your husband, come tonight.
 Isn't it obvious?
 What do you mean?
 Some service deserves service in return. No?
 What for?
 Alone.
 Tonight?
 Come back tonight.
 Oh, thank you, sir!
 Tomorrow night I dine with the Emperor. One word from me and the post is his.
 Oh yes. He's really proud of his work.
 It is miraculous.
 Yes, sir. He doesn't make copies.
 These are originals?
 Yes.
 Originals?
 That's very tempting, but it's impossible, I'm afraid. Wolfi would be frantic if he found those were missing. You see, they're all originals.
 Are you sure you can't leave that music, and come back again? I have other things you might like.
 Don't keep calling me that. It puts me at such a distance. I was not born a Court Composer, you know. I'm from a small town, just like your husband.
 Thank you very much, Your Excellency.
 Sir, we really need this job. We're desperate. My husband spends far more than he can ever earn. I don't mean he's lazy - he's not at all - he works all day long. It's just! he's not practical. Money simply slips through his fingers, it's really ridiculous, Your Excellency. I know you help musicians. You're famous for it. Give him just this one post. We'd be forever indebted!
 I see.
 No, sir. This is my own idea.
 Then he didn't send you?
 My husband is a proud man, sir. He would be furious if he knew I'd come.
 Really?
 I - I really cannot do that, Your Excellency. You see, he doesn't know I'm here.
 I'm afraid I'm not at leisure this very moment. Just leave them with me. I assure you they will be quite safe.
 Would it be too much trouble, sir, to ask you to look at them now? While I wait.
 I will look at them, of course, the moment I can. It will be an honour. Please give him my warmest.
 I understand.
 He's terribly busy, sir.
 How charming.  But why did he not come himself?
 That's right, Your Excellency. I've come on behalf of my hus band. I'm - I'm bringing some samples of his work so he can be considered for the royal appointment.
 Frau Mozart?
 Madame. How can I help you?
 Excellency!
 Oh yes, and who are you? He's worked for Kings. For the Emperor.  Who are you?
 You're mad! She's mad, Wolfi.
 Money! Money!
 Oh yes? And what's so intelligent about writing a Requiem?
 You know what's ridiculous? Your libretto, that's what's ridiculous. Only an idiot would ask Wolfi to work on that stuff!
 I'm paying people just to wait for you. It's ridiculous!
 He's doing his best.
 I'm paying these people. Do you realize that?
 Leave him alone!
 Look, you little clown, do you know how many people I've hired for you? Do you know how many people are waiting?
 I hope so. I need it immediately.
 He's not in. But he's working on it. He said to tell you.
 Where's our friend?
 Not at all.
 Am I interrupting something?
 Ah. Well. Ah,  I see you've got your manager with you. Well, Madame, how about half the receipts?
 How much will you pay him?
 Do you hear him? Do you?
 So you are! The place is a pigsty all the time.
 Oh, now I'm a bad housekeeper!
 And what do you expect? Who wants to walk out into a mess like this every day?
 And so you do! The only time you come out is to eat.
 Well, this is none of your business.  Whoever sent you is going to pay, no?
 But you can't take her without reference. It's unheard of!
 What is ridiculous? Wolfi has many admirers in Vienna. They love him here. People send us gifts all the time.
 In three months! Papa.
 When, may I ask?
 Oh, yes.
 I see that you're expecting.
 Behold!
 Behold!
 Hey!
 Hey!
 Behold!
 Behold!
 Adorable!
 He's adorable!
 Be careful!
 Be careful!
 Young man, I am no stranger to theatres. I'm no stranger to insolence!
 I am sorry, Madame, but no! I cannot let anyone pass.
 Call Herr Mozart! You call Herr Mozart immediately! This is insupportable!
 I am sorry, Madame, but I have my orders.
 Do you know who I am?  This is my daughter. I am Frau Weber. We are favoured guests!
 I am sorry, Madame. It is not permitted.
 Let us pass, please! Let us pass at once! We're with the Emperor.
 Yes. He is a little strange.
 What a strange young man.
 Michael!
 I said play!
 Michael, please! I'm sure you will find her most willing, Herr Mozart. She's really very excited. She's been preparing all morning.
 People who know say the girl's got talent. You must judge for yourself. If you think she stinks, say so.
 It's such an honour for us to have you here, Herr Mozart. And for Gertrude.
 Gertrude!
 I've heard about you for ages! I thought you must be an old man.
 You can't be Herr Mozart!
 Gertrude!
 Upstairs.
 Thank you, Madame.  Come on now - courage. Play me something you know.
 I was. But she quite outgrew the little I could show her.
 Who was your teacher?
 Just one year.
 Wine?
 I'd like a little wine, if you have it.
 Perhaps a little refreshment first? A little coffee, or a little chocolate?
 Ah, now! Here she comes.
 Really?
 Well, look at them.
 It is not a question of liking, Your Majesty. Your own law decrees it, I'm afraid.
 Do you like this, Salieri?
 Molested, Majesty. Twice, in the course of the same lesson.
 Yes?
 As a matter of fact, one of my own pupils - a very young singer - told me she was - er - well!
 Really?
 I have to tell you, Mozart is not entirely to be trusted alone with young ladies.
 Of course not.
 Majesty, I don't like to talk against a fellow musician.
 Oh?
 Well, Sire, I made some inquiries in a routine way. I was curious to know why he had so few pupils. It is rather alarming.
 Why not?
 Majesty, I did. Believe me, it was a most agonizing. decision. But finally, I simply could not recommend Herr Mozart.
 I don't think you understand me, Court Composer.
 Well. There it is.
 Sire.
 You please me, Court Composer. A very clever idea.
 I'm sure there is a way, Majesty. Some kind of a little contest. I could perhaps put together a small Committee, and I could see to it naturally that it will select according to Your Majesty's wishes.
 Ah-ha. Favouritism. But I so want Mozart.
 Yes, of course. My concern is to protect you from any suspicion of favouritism.
 And the result satisfies.
 You already commissioned an opera from Mozart.
 Yes?
 An interesting idea, Majesty. But -
 I'm thinking about Herr Mozart. What is your view?
 Oh, Your Majesty, it would be such a tremendous honour!
 Your Highness.
 Good morning, Court Composer. This is my niece, the Princess Elizabeth.
 Cattivo again, Court Composer. Well, tell him, Mozart. Name us a German virtue.
 Excuse me, Sire, but what do you think these could be? Being a foreigner, I would love to learn.
 Well, I'm glad to hear that.
 Well, there it is. Now to business. Young man, we are going to commission an opera from you. What do you say?
 My pleasure.
 Finally! Such an immense joy. Diletto straordinario!
 And here is our illustrious Court Composer, Herr Salieri.
 Ah-ha!
 A-flat, Majesty.
 Let's have some fun.  Bring in Herr Mozart, please. But slowly, slowly. I need a minute to practice.
 You do me too much honour, Sire.
 Delightful, Court Composer. Would you permit me to play it as he comes in?
 Majesty.
 May I try it?
 It's just a trifle, of course.
 What a charming idea. May I see?
 You are cattivo, Court Composer.  I want to meet this young man. Chamberlain, arrange a pleasant welcome for him.
 I think it is an interesting notion to keep Mozart in Vienna, Majesty. It should really infuriate the Archbishop beyond measure - if that is your Majesty's intention.
 Sire, the whole opera is finished. Do you know how much work went into it?
 You are passionate, Mozart! But you do not persuade.
 Forgive me, Majesty. I'm a vulgar man. But I assure you, my music is not.
 Twenty, sire! How about twenty? Twenty minutes of continuous music. No recitatives.
 Well, six or seven minutes! maybe eight!
 Guess! Guess, Majesty. Imagine the longest time such a thing could last, then double it.
 I have no idea.
 But it's new, it's entirely new. It's so new, people will go mad for it. For example, I have a scene in the second act - it starts as a duet, just a man and wife quarreling. Suddenly the wife's scheming little maid comes in unexpectedly - a very funny situation. Duet turns into trio. Then the husband's equally screaming valet comes in. Trio turns into quartet. Then a stupid old gardener - quartet becomes quintet, and so on.  On and on, sextet, septet, octet! How long do you think I can sustain that?
 Ah, love again.
 But, Majesty, this is just a frolic. It's a piece about love.
 I think you are rather innocent, my friend. In these dangerous times I cannot afford to provoke our nobles or our people simply over a theatre piece.
 Sire, I swear to Your Majesty, there's nothing like that in the story. I have taken out everything that could give offense. I hate politics.
 Mozart, I am a tolerant man. I do not censor things lightly. When I do, I have good reason. Figaro is a bad play. It stirs up hatred between the classes. In France it has caused nothing but bitterness. My own dear sister Antoinette writes me that she is beginning to be frightened of her own people. I do not wish to see the same fears starting here.
 Well, Majesty, it is only a comedy.
 Would you tell me why?
 Well, yes, I admit it is.
 It is not your place to ask questions. Is it true?
 Who told you this, Majesty?
 Yet we hear you are making an opera from it. Is this true?
 Yes, Sire.
 Mozart, are you aware I have declared the French play of Figaro unsuitable for our theatre?
 Ah! By all means.
 May I introduce my father? He is on a short visit here and returning very soon to Salzburg. He would so much like to kiss your hand. It would make his whole stay so memorable for him.
 What is it?
 Majesty, may I ask you to do me the greatest favour?
 Thank you, Sire!
 Bravo, Mozart. Most charming. Yes, indeed. Clever man.
 Well, my advice is to marry this charming young lady and stay with us in Vienna.
 Twenty-six.
 Excuse me, but how old are you?
 Well - Well we haven't quite received my father's consent, Your Majesty. Not entirely. Not altogether.
 Really? How delightful. May I ask when you marry?
 Enchanted, Madame.
 Majesty, this is Madame Weber. She is my landlady.
 Which few did you have in mind, Majesty?
 My dear, young man, don't take it too hard. Your work is ingenious. It's quality work. And there are simply too many notes, that's all. Cut a few and it will be perfect.
 My dear fellow, there are in fact only so many notes the ear can hear in the course of an evening. I think I'm right in saying that, aren't I, Court Composer?
 I don't understand. There are just as many notes, Majesty, as are required. Neither more nor less.
 Well, I mean occasionally it seems to have, how shall one say?  How shall one say, Director?
 What do you mean, Sire?
 Of course I do. It's very good. Of course now and then - just now and then - it gets a touch elaborate.
 So then you like it? You really like it, Your Majesty?
 Oh, yes. Absolutely. German. Unquestionably!
 And German?
 Yes, indeed.
 It is new, it is, isn't it, Sire?
 I think so, Sire, yes.
 What? On one hearing only?
 Keep it, Sire, if you want to. It is already here in my head.
 Ah-ha.
 In a Pasha's Harem, Majesty. A Seraglio.
 Yes, where?
 It's actually quite amusing, Majesty. It's set - the  whole thing is set in a - in a -
 Well, what is it about? Tell us the story.
 Because I've already found the most wonderful libretto!
 Why so?
 Did we vote in the end for German or Italian?
 Majesty!
 Really? Oh, grazie, Signore! Sono commosso! E un onore per mo eccezionale. Compositore brilliante e famossissimo!
 And now he has returned the compliment. Herr Salieri composed that March of Welcome for you.
 Oh sir, yes! The honour is mine. Absolutely.
 The Director of our Opera. Count Orsini-Rosenberg.
 Oh, thank you.
 No, no, please! It is not a holy relic.  You know we have met already? In this very room. Perhaps you won't remember it, you were only six years old.  He was giving the most brilliant little concert here. As he got off the stool, he slipped and fell. My sister Antoinette helped him up herself, and do you know what he did? Jumped straight into her arms and said, Will you marry me, yes or no?
 Your Majesty!
 Ah-ha. Well. There it is. Good.
 He's here.
 Yes, what about him?
 Your Majesty, Herr Mozart -
 Well, what do you have for me today?
 Well. There it is.
 Yes, sir.
 In my opinion, it is time we had a piece in our own language, sir. Plain German. For plain people.
 Ah-ha. What do you say, Chamberlain?
 Very small pay, I imagine. I'm sure he could be tempted with the right offer. Say, an opera in German for our National Theatre.
 I agree, Majesty, but I'm afraid it's not possible. The young man is still in the pay of the Archbishop.
 Ah-ha. Well then, we should make some effort to acquire him. We could use a good German composer in Vienna, surely?
 Hush! I'm talking to His Majesty. Your Majesty, I wish to express only one thing - that you who are the Father of us all, could teach our children the gratitude they owe to fathers. It is not for nothing that the Fifth Commandment tells us: 'Honour your Father and Mother, that your days may be long upon the earth.'
 Father -
 She does. She says I sleep all day.
 No one calls you that.
 Don't worry, I'm not staying here to be a burden.
 Papa!
 Never mind. You won't have to do anything for me ever again. I'm leaving!
 I never saw this girl in my life.  Is this a kind of joke?
 Are you playing a trick on me?
 Mine?
 Papa, is this your idea?
 But my penalty. I've got to have a penalty.
 I'm tired of this game. Please play without me.
 I want you to come back with me to Salzburg, my son.
 Yes, Papa, name it. Name it. I'll do anything you say!
 This is just a game, Papa.
 No, really!
 Why not? Oh, come, Papa! What better way could I spend it than on you? My kissable, missable, suddenly visible Papa!
 Thank you. That'll be fine. Don't spend any money on me.
 Didn't I? I thought I did. I'm sure I did.
 Why didn't you mention it in your letters?
 Isn't that marvelous? We're delighted.
 It's too dangerous, Papa. But they're going to love it. Ah, there she is!
 You don't have secrets from me.
 It's a secret.
 Why not?
 Oh, let's not talk about it.
 What's that?
 This one will.
 Composition doesn't pay. You know that.
 I don't know. It's not important. I mean, I don't want pupils. They get in the way. I've got to have time for composition.
 How many?
 Yes.
 Yes.
 Pupils?
 How many pupils do you have?
 Who? Who says that? Now that's a malicious lie!
 They say you're in debt.
 What do you mean? It's wonderful. Really, it's - it's marvelous! People love me here.
 That's not what I hear.
 It couldn't be better.
 How is your financial situation?
 Oh we could, if we wanted to, but Stanzi won't hear of it. She wants to do everything herself.
 Don't you have a maid?
 She's very tired, poor creature. You know me: I'm a real pig. It's not so easy cleaning up after me.
 Oh, yes. Oh, I mean no - not exactly like this. I mean today - just today, Stanzi - I remember now. She had to go - yes! She had to help her mother. Yes, she's like that. Her mother's a very sweet woman, you'll see.
 Do you always live like this?
 I don't know. Stanzi? Stanzi!
 Is she not here?
 Feed? Well, of course she feeds me. She stuffs me like a goose all day long. She's the best cook in the world. I mean, since Mama. Just wait, you'll see.
 Of course, welcome! Welcome ten thousand times. Papa! my Papa!
 Am I not welcome?
 Why are you here?
 I will.
 I write to you with urgent news. I am coming to Vienna. Take no further steps toward marriage until we meet. You are too gullible to see your own danger. As you honour the father who has devoted his entire life to yours, do as I bid, and await my coming.
 Are you sure it's an opera?
 Please don't ask me to go back again. I'm frightened! I'm very, very frightened.
 Opera? Opera!
 I suppose so. He sits there all he time, doing some silly opera.
 Is he working?
 I'm frightened, sir. Really! When he speaks, he doesn't make any sense. You know he said he saw - he said he saw his father. And his father's dead.
 Is he working?
 Here, in his stomach. They bend him right over.
 Where?
 I don't know. He has pains.
 What medicine?
 You don't know what it's like. Herr Mozart frightens me. He drinks all day, then takes all that medicine and it makes him worse.
 Why? What has happened?
 I'm leaving. I'm not working there anymore. I'm scared!
 Now calm yourself. Calm. What's the matter with you?
 In there, sir.
 Where does he work?
 Yes what?
 I think I've found out about the money, sir.
 Of course not. You're a good girl. You're very kind to do this. Next time you're sure they'll be out of the house, let me know, will you?
 Oh, I wouldn't know that, sir.
 Really? What is it he's writing?
 Oh, yes, sir, all day long. He never leaves the house until evening. He just sits there, writing and writing. He doesn't even eat.
 Then how does he pay for all this? Does he work at all?
 Not that I've seen.
 Do any pupils come to the house?
 Oh, thank you, sir.
 Bene.
 Madame Cavalieri is here for her lesson, sir.
 Bene! Bene!
 Yes, thank you, sir.
 Thank you. Are you well today, Fraulein Lorl?
 I will, sir.
 Ah-ha! Siena macaroons - my favourites. Give my best thanks to the baker.
 What have you got for me today? Let me see.
 Good morning, sir.
 Ah! Here she comes. Fraulein Lorl, good morning.
 Yes. I can live in or out just as you wish.
 Are you saying that someone is paying you to be our maid and doesn't want us to know who he is?
 They'll be paid for by a great admirer or yours who wishes to remain anon - anonymous.
 What?
 My name is Lorl, sir. I'm a maidservant. I was asked to come here and offer my services to you.
 That's right.
 Are you Herr Mozart?
 Yes?
 So let me see it. Where is it?
 Well, we can.
 Look, I asked you if we could start rehearsal next week and you said yes.
 Because there's nothing to see.
 Why not?
 No.
 Can I see it?
 Yes.
 What? The vaudeville, what'd you think?
 What?
 Oh! I'm sorry! I'm sorry! What have you got for me? Is it finished?
 Put it down, I said! It's nothing for you.
 What is this?
 Put it down!
 Wolfi!
 Leave that alone!
 So there you are. What do you say?
 No, no, I love that. I'd want it to be in German. I haven't done anything in German since Seraglio.
 Of course! What else do you think they speak here?
 German!
 I'm serious. You write a proper part for me with a couple of catchy songs, I'll guarantee you'll have a triumph- de-luxe. Mind you, it'll have to be in German.
 I tell you I picked up a snake in Dresden last week - twelve foot long  - folds up to six inches, just like a paper fan. It's a miracle.
 Animals?
 'Course you would. You belong here, my boy, not the snobby Court. You could do anything you felt like here - the more fantastic the better! That's what people want, you know: fantasy. You do a big production, fill it with beautiful magic tricks and you'll be absolutely free to do anything you want. Of course, you'd have to put a fire in it, because I've got the best fire machine in the city and a big flood - I can do you the finest water effects you ever saw in your life. Oh, and a few trick animals. You'd have to use those.
 I'd like to try them someday. I'm not sure I'd be much good at it.
 Isn't he marvelous? He cost me a bundle, that horse, but he's worth it. I tell you, if you'd played Don Giovanni here it would have been a great success. I'm not joking. These people aren't fools. You could do something marvelous for them.
 I liked the horse.
 Yes, well, it's all good fun.
 Wonderful!  He liked the monkey, didn't you?
 That kind of music should be punishable by death.
 Sublime! Utterly sublime!
 Well?
 Papa, the rule is you can only give penalties that can be performed in the room.
 What did he say? What did he say?
 Sssh! Stay here.
 Stanzi-Manzi-Banzi-Wanzi!
 Sssh!
 My answer is no, Mozart.
 Please. I'll give it back, I promise. Please, sir.
 I'm sorry. No.
 No doubt, sir. But I am endowed with talent, and you with money. If I offer mine, you should offer yours.
 Well, this is hardly the way to go about it.
 If a man cannot earn, he must borrow.
 What for?
 Well. Since it appears nobody is eager to hire my services, could you favour me with a little money instead?
 What is this, Mozart? What's the matter with you?
 Really? Perhaps your dear wife might care to profit from my instruction?
 Well, your pupil is married and living in Mannheim, young man.
 Is my pupil still anxious to learn the art of music?
 Herr Mozart. What a surprise. What can I do for you?
 Well, I'm a good teacher. The next time you wish me to instruct another of your dogs, please let me know. Goodbye, Fraulein, goodbye, Madame! goodbye, Sir!
 It's a miracle, Herr Mozart!
 Well, yes! on the whole. I suppose.  How long have you been playing, Fraulein?
 Never mind, Strudel. It's part of music, getting used to an audience. Aren't I right, Herr Mozart?
 Strudel, this is Herr Mozart. Say good morning.
 Good morning, Fraulein Schlumberg.
 Of course, it's him. Who do you think it is?
 I'm afraid I am.
 This is Herr Mozart, my dear. The young man Herr Salieri recommended to teach our Gertrude. Where is she?
 Madame.
 You won't be teaching this one either. She's my wife.
 What? Ha-ha! That's funny - I like it. Which one, eh? You're a funny fellow.  Hannah! Come this way.
 And which one of them do you want me to teach?
 Quiet! Quiet! Quiet! Down there, damn you.  Welcome to you. Pay no attention, they're impossible. Stop it, you willful things! Come this way. Just ignore them. They're perfectly harmless, just willful. I treat them just like my own children.
 I was foolish. I thought you did not care for my work - or me. Forgive me. Forgive me!
 What for?
 I am so ashamed.
 I'm not leaving you.
 Would you stay with me while I sleep a little?
 I can keep going, I assure you. Shall we try?
 We'll stop for just a moment. Then we'll do the Lacrimosa.
 Oh no. I'm not tired at all.
 Do you want to rest a bit?
 Then let me hear it. All of it. The whole thing from the beginning - now!
 Yes.
 Do you have it?
 You go fast!
 And that's it. Do you have it?
 Yes!
 Yes, and on 'dictis'.
 Sopranos up to F on the second 'Voca'?
 C Major. Sopranos and altos in thirds. Altos on C. Sopranos above.  Vo-ca, vo-ca me, vo-ca me cum be-ne- dic-tis.
 Yes, yes - go on. The Voca Me. Suddenly sotto voce. Write that down: sotto voce, pianissimo. Voca me cum benedictis. Call me among the blessed.
 That's wonderful!
 Show me.
 I think so.
 Do you have me?
 Oh no. Now for the Fire.  Strings in unison - ostinato on all - like this.
 And that's all?
 Exactly. The instruments to go with the voices. Trumpets and timpani, tonic and dominant.
 Also identical?
 With the tenors.
 First bassoon and tenor trombone - what?
 It couldn't be simpler.
 Please! Just one moment.
 Now the orchestra. Second bassoon and bass trombone with the basses. Identical notes and rhythm.  The first bassoon and tenor trombone -
 Fourth measure, second beat - F.  Flam-mis a-cri-bus ad-dic-tis, flam- mis a-cri-bus ad-dic-tis.
 Yes.
 Good. Now the tenors. Fourth beat of the first measure - C.  Con-fu-ta-tis.  Second measure, fourth beat on D.  Ma-le-dic-tis.  All right?
 Sing it back.
 I think so.
 Third measure, second beat starting on E.  Flam-mis a-cri-bus ad-dic-tis.  And fourth measure, fourth beat - D.  Ma-le-dic-tis, flam-mis a-cri-bus ad- dic-tis.  Do you have that?
 Yes.
 Start with the voices. Basses first. Second beat of the first measure - A.  Con-fu-ta-tis.  Second measure, second beat.  Ma-le-dic-tis.  G-sharp, of course.
 Common time.
 What time?
 The Fire.
 So now - A minor. Suddenly.
 Yes.
 We ended in F Major?
 Confutatis Maledictis.
 Come. Let's begin.
 Strange!
 Oh, yes.
 A fire which never dies. Burning one forever?
 What?
 Do you believe in it?
 Consigned to flames of woe.
 So now the Confutatis. Confutatis Maledictis. When the wicked are confounded. Flammis acribus addictis. How would you translate that?
 The end of the Recordare - Statuens in parte dextra.
 Where did I stop?
 A Mass. A Mass for the Dead.
 Then, let us try together. I'd regard it as such an honour. Tell me, what is this work?
 You know, it's all here in my head. It's just ready to be set down. But when I'm dizzy like this my eyes won't focus. I can't write.
 Of course.
 But you'd have to swear not to tell a soul. I'm not allowed.
 My dear friend, it would be my greatest pleasure.
 Would you? Actually, you could.
 Yes. Can I - could I help you, in any way?
 Another? But that's too soon! Tomorrow night? It's impossible! Did he say a hundred?
 He knows. He knows!
 Finish what?
 Wait! Ask him if he'd give me some money now. Tell him if he would, that would help me finish it.
 What man?
 The man. He's here.
 Who?
 No! No, it's him!
 Shall I answer it?
 I'm too young to be so sick.
 What?
 The doctor thinks I am. But -
 Are you ill?
 I have bad fancies. I don't sleep well anymore. Then I drink too much, and think stupid things.
 I do.
 Do you mean that?
 Oh no. It is a sublime piece. The grandest operone. I tell you, you are the greatest composer known to me.
 This is only a vaudeville.
 I would never miss anything that you had written. You must know that.
 I mean to come to my opera. You are the only colleague who did.
 No, please.
 You're so good to me. Truly. Thank you.
 You mean she's not coming back?
 Not here! She's not well, either. She went to the Spa.
 Where is your wife?
 No, no. I have to get back. I have -
 I'm taking you home. You're not well.
 What happened? Is it over?
 No, no! I promise you, I'll give you a wonderful piece - the best I ever can!
 Are you neglecting my request?
 I don't have it yet. It's not finished. I'm sorry, but I need more time.
 Work fast. And be sure to tell no one what you do. You will see me again soon.
 How long will you give me?
 How much?
 I am only a messenger. Do you accept? You will be paid well.
 Who are you?
 A man who deserved a Requiem Mass and never got one.
 What dead? Who is dead?
 A Mass for the dead.
 What work?
 I have come to commission work from you.
 Oh no! One hears such sounds and what can one say, but - Salieri!
 You flatter me.
 I never knew that music like that was possible.
 Yes?
 How could it not, Excellency?
 Did my work please you?
 How could I not?
 Mozart. It was good of you to come.
 Grazie, a lei, Signor Antonio!
 Grazie, mio caro, Wolfgang!
 Oh no, the honour would be all mine.
 I wouldn't presume. All the same, if it wouldn't be imposing, I would like you to see my new piece. It would be a tremendous honour for me.
 I know, I know. Perhaps you should give me some lessons in that.
 I think you overestimate our dear Viennese, my friend. Do you know you didn't even give them a good bang at the end of songs so they knew when to clap?
 It's the best opera yet written. I know it! Why didn't they come?
 I think it's marvelous. Truly.
 What did you think of it yourself? Did you like it at all?
 Well, I can speak for the Emperor. You made too many demands on the royal ear. The poor man can't concentrate for more than an hour and you gave him four.
 But what is it they don't like?
 I know; it's outrageous. Still, if the public doesn't like one's work one has to accept the fact gracefully.
 Nine performances! Nine! That's all it's had - and withdrawn.
 Thank you! Oh, thank you.
 With all my heart, Mozart.
 Oh, Excellency, would you?
 But there are those who have power over him. I think I'll take this up with the Emperor.
 It's not fair that a man like that has power over our work.
 How fortunate.
 Oh no! My wife took it out in time.
 You burned the score?
 Oh, I could kill him! I mean really kill him. I actually threw the entire opera on the fire, he made me so angry!
 Why bother with Orsini-Rosenberg? He's obviously no friend of yours.
 I don't know. They say I've got to re-write the opera, but it's perfect as it is. I can't rewrite what's perfect. Can't you talk to him?
 Really? Why?
 It's unbelievable! The Director has actually ripped out a huge section of my music. Pages of it.
 Wolfgang, what is it? Sta calmo, per favore. What's the matter?
 I don't think you should become known in Vienna as a debtor, Mozart. However, I know a very distinguished gentleman I could recommend to you. And he has a daughter. Will that do?
 I can't say. Really
 What exactly are you working on?
 Two thousand, two hundred florins is all I need A hundred? Fifty?
 Forgive me. We all have patriotic feelings of some kind.
 Ah. Italian?
 Cream cheese mixed with granulated sugar and suffused with rum. Crema al Mascarpone.
 Actually, it's a big secret. Oh, this is delicious! What is it?
 Come, come, Mozart; I'm interested. Truly.
 I'd better not. It's a bit of a secret.
 Ah, how exciting! Tell me more.
 Well, could you lend me some money till you have one? Then I'll teach her for free. That's a promise. Oh, I'm sorry. I'm being silly. Papa's right - I should put a padlock on my mouth. Seriously, is there any chance you could manage a loan? Only for six months, eight at most. After that I'll be the richest man in Vienna. I'll pay you back double. Anything. Name your terms. I'm not joking. I'm working on something that's going to explode like a bomb all over Europe!
 I'm afraid not.
 Do you have a daughter?
 Of course not.
 They're stupendously successful. You can't get a seat. The only problem is none will hire me. They all want to hear me play, but they won't let me teach their daughters. As if I was some kind of fiend. I'm not a fiend!
 How is that possible? You give concerts, don't you? I hear they are quite successful.
 How can anyone say that? We have no cook, no maid. We have no footman. Nothing at all!
 It has been said, my friend, that you are inclined to live somewhat above your means.
 No, but I'm broke. I'm always broke. I don't know why.
 You don't mean to tell me you are living in poverty?
 Look, I must have pupils. Without pupils I can't manage.
 An implausible idea. Between you and me, no one in the world could do musical harm to the Princess Elizabeth.
 But I can't lose this post, I simply can't! Excellency, please. Let's go to the palace, and you can explain to the Emperor that Herr Sommer is an awful choice. He could actually do musical harm to the Princess!
 No, no, no: he has yet to achieve mediocrity.
 Sommer? Herr Sommer? But the man's a fool! He's a total mediocrity.
 Herr Sommer.
 Whom did they choose?
 My dear Mozart, there is no one in the world I would rather help, but now it is too late.
 Filled? That's impossible! They haven't even seen my work. I need this post. Please, can't you help me? Please!
 I have just come from the palace. The post has been filled.
 Why? Here is the music. It's here. I am submitting it humbly. Isn't that what you wanted?
 Why didn't you come to me yesterday, Mozart? This is a most painful situation. Yesterday I could have helped you. Today, I can't.
 So you see, this post is very important to me right now.
 I'm flattered. And congratulations to you, of course.
 She is well. She is - well, actually, I'm about to become a father! She only told me last night. You are the first to know.
 So you are. How is your pretty wife?
 Your Excellency, you requested some specimens of my work. Here they are. I don't have to tell you how much I need your help. I truly appreciate your looking at these. I have pressures on me - financial pressures. As you know, I'm a married man now.
 Herr Mozart, what brings you here?
 It really is the best music one can hear in Vienna today. Don't you agree?
 How could I not?
 Did you like it, then?
 Dear Mozart, my sincere congratulations.
 But this is absurd!
 Yes! yes! er, on  the whole, yes, Majesty.
 Ah, love! Well of course in Italy we know nothing about that.
 Love, Sire!
 A funny little tune, but it yielded some good things.
 Ah!
 Mio caro Adone.
 Really?
 I know your work well, Signore. Do you know I actually composed some variations on a melody of yours?
 Oh yes, certainly. Certainly, Herr Director!
 Can we see the scene with the music back, please?
 Taking out what you should never have put in.
 What are you doing, Herr Director?
 It is dangerous for you to interpret His Majesty's edicts. Give me your score, please.
 But surely the Emperor didn't mean to prohibit dancing when it's part of the story.
 Exactly. A dance.
 Yes, but this is not a ballet. This is a dance at Figaro's wedding.
 Did you not know that His Majesty has expressly forbidden ballet in his operas?
 Certainly, Herr Director.
 Mozart! Herr Mozart, may I have a word with you please. Right away.
 Just let me tell you how it begins.
 That will do, Herr Mozart!
 But, Your Majesty -
 What you think, Mozart, is scarcely the point. It is what His Majesty thinks that counts.
 Well not especially. It can be in Turkish, if you really want. I don't care.
 Then why especially does it have to be in German?
 Exactly.
 You mean in Turkey?
 I think you'd better.
 I - I don't think you have, Herr Director. Not yet. I mean, it's quite n - Of course, I'll show it to you immediately.
 Oh? Have I seen it?
 May I just do that, Majesty? Show you how it begins? Just that?
 Herr Mozart -
 Must I? Well, I won't! I tell you straight: I will not!
 Look, young man, the issue is simple. If you want this post, you must submit your stuff in the same way as all your colleagues.
 Show them one interesting modulation and they faint. Ohime! Morbidezza! Morbidezza! Italians are musical idiots and you want them to judge my music!
 Mozart -
 They hate my music. It terrifies them. The only sound Italians understand is banality. Tonic and dominant, tonic and dominant, from here to Resurrection!  Ba-ba! Ba-ba! Ba-ba! Ba-ba! Anything else is morbid.
 Mozart -
 Naturally, the Italians! Of course! Always the Italians!
 Kapellmeister Bonno, Count Orsini- Rosenberg and Court Composer Salieri.
 Who is on this committee?
 A little modesty would suit you better.
 No, but I'm the best.
 Mozart, you are not the only composer in Vienna.
 Then why doesn't he simply appoint me to the post?
 On the contrary.
 Is the Emperor angry with me?
 Because His Majesty wishes it.
 Why do I have to submit samples of my work to some stupid committee? Just to teach a sixteen-year-old girl.
 What is what?
 What is this, Herr Chamberlain?
 Because they do. They go on forever - at least what they represent. The eternal in us, not the ephemeral. Opera is here to ennoble us. You and me, just as much as His Majesty.
 Elevated? What does that mean? Elevated! The only thing a man should elevate is - oh, excuse me. I'm sorry. I'm stupid. But I am fed up to the teeth with elevated things! Old dead legends! How can we go on forever writing about gods and legends?
 Mozart, music is not the issue here. No one doubts your talent. It is your judgment of literature that's in question. Even with the politics taken out, this thing would still remain a vulgar farce. Why waste your spirit on such rubbish?  Surely you can choose more elevated themes?
 Sire, only opera can do this. In a play, if more than one person speaks at the same time, it's just noise. No one can understand a word. But with music, with music you can have twenty individuals all talking at once, and it's not noise - it's a perfect harmony. Isn't that marvelous?
 Mozart -
 Baron!
 Well done, Mozart. Really quite fine.
 Why not? It's charming. I mean, I don't actually show concubines exposing their! their! It's not indecent!  It's highly moral, Majesty. It's full of proper German virtues. I swear it. Absolutely!
 My dear fellow, the language is not finally the point. Do you really think that subject is quite appropriate for a national theatre?
 Oh, German! German! Please let it be German.
 I don't think it was really decided, Director.
 Don't pity me. Pity yourself. You serve a wicked God. He killed Mozart, not I. Took him, snatched him away, without pity. He destroyed His beloved rather than let a mediocrity like me get the smallest share in his glory. He doesn't care. Understand that. God cares nothing for the man He denies and nothing either for the man He uses. He broke Mozart in half when He'd finished with him, and threw him away. Like an old, worn out flute.
 Oh my son, my poor son!
 No, Father. From now on no one will be able to speak of Mozart without thinking of me. Whenever they say Mozart with love, they'll have to say Salieri with loathing. And that's my immortality - at last! Our names will  be tied together for eternity - his in fame and mine in infamy. At least it's better than the total oblivion he'd planned for me, your merciful God!
 My son, why should you want all Vienna to believe you a murderer? Is that your penance? Is it?
 What difference does that make?
 But not his body.
 I poisoned his life.
 No, you didn't!
 I did.
 Why? Why? Why? Why add to your misery by confessing to murder? You didn't kill him.
 The only thing that worried me was the actual killing. How does one do that? How does one kill a man? It's one thing to dream about it. It's very different when you have to do it, with your own hands.
 Yes.
 His funeral - imagine it! The Cathedral, all Vienna sitting there. His coffin, Mozart's little coffin in the middle. And suddenly in that silence, music. A divine music bursts out over them all, a great Mass of Death: Requiem Mass for Wolfgang Mozart, composed by his devoted friend Antonio Salieri. What sublimity! What depth! What passion in the music! Salieri has been touched by God at last. And God, forced to listen. Powerless - powerless to stop it. I at the end, for once, laughing at Him. Do you understand? Do you?
 What?
 Oh yes, yes, yes, yes, yes! Always the same stale answers!  There is no God of Mercy, Father. Just a God of torture.
 I do not claim to unravel the mysteries. I treasure them. As you should.
 Oh? I thought you did so every day. So speak now. Answer me!
 My son, no one can speak for God.
 All I ever wanted was to sing to Him. That's His doing, isn't it? He gave me that longing - then made me mute. Why? Tell me that. If He didn't want me to serve Him with music, why implant the desire, like a lust in my body, then deny me the talent? Go on, tell me! Speak for Him!
 God's ways are not yours. And you are not here to question Him. Offer him the salt of penitence. He will give you back the bread of eternal life. He is all merciful. That is all you need to know.
 No? Was Mozart a good man?
 You cannot say that!
 Yes, Father. Yes! So much for my vow of chastity. What did it matter? Good, patient, hard-working, chaste - what did it matter? Had goodness made me a good composer? I realized it absolutely then - that moment: goodness is nothing in the furnace of art. And I was nothing to God.
 Every day. Sometimes for hours I would pray!
 Did you try?
 It was incomprehensible. What was God up to? Here I was denying all my natural lust in order to deserve God's gift and there was Mozart indulging his in all directions - even though engaged to be married! - and no rebuke at all! Was it possible I was being tested? Was God expecting me to offer forgiveness in the face of every offense, no matter how painful? That was very possible. All the same, why him? Why use Mozart to teach me lessons in humility? My heart was filling up with such hatred for that little man. For the first time in my life I began to know really violent thoughts. I couldn't stop them.
 He was murdered, Father! Mozart! Cruelly murdered.
 Do you hear me?
 Should I?
 Do you believe it?
 Is it true?
 And do they believe it?
 All Vienna has heard that.
 Ah - you've heard that?
 Of course. The man you accuse yourself of killing.
 I didn't. That was Mozart. Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart. You know who that is?
 Oh, I know that! That's charming!  I didn't know you wrote that.
 Can you recall no melody of mine? I was the most famous composer in Europe when you were still a boy. I wrote forty operas alone. What about this little thing?
 I regret it is not too familiar.
 Well?
 I'm surprised you don't know. It was a very popular tune in its day. I wrote it. How about this?
 I can't say I do. What is it?
 Then you must know this.
 Here in Vienna.
 Where?
 I know a little. I studied it in my youth.
 How well are you trained in music?
 My son, there is something dreadful on your soul. Unburden it to me. I'm here only for you. Please talk to me.
 I do not seek forgiveness.
 Offer me your confession. I can offer you God's forgiveness.
 Are they?
 That makes no difference. All men are equal in God's eyes.
 Do you know who I am? You never heard of me, did you?
 I cannot leave alone a soul in pain.
 Leave me alone.
 Do you understand that you have sinned? Gravely.
 What do you want?
 In the sight of God that is a sin.
 So?
 You tried to take your life. You do remember that, don't you?
 About what?
 I am Father Vogler. I am a Chaplain here. I thought you might like to talk to someone.
 What do you want?
 Yes, in the third act.
 Yes, absolutely. Is there a ballet in Figaro?
 Excuse me - didn't His Majesty specifically forbid ballet in his opera?
 Ballet? What ballet?
 About the ballet.
 What anger?
 The Emperor has given him permission.
 Incredible.
 Well, Mozart is already rehearsing.
 Never mind.
 Where?
 I've seen the manuscript.
 Are you absolutely sure?
 You must be mad.
 Yes.
 He's setting that play to music?
 Exactly.
 You mean that play?
 Italian?
 Mozart is writing a new opera. An Italian opera.
 Yes?
 I've just learned something that might be of interest to you, Herr Director.
 Ah.
 Well, the play makes a hero out of a valet. He outwits his noble master and exposes him as a lecher. Do you see the implications? This would be, in a grander situation, as if a Chamberlain were to expose an Emperor.
 Oh yes, yes. And that was?
 For the same reason, Herr Chamberlain, that it was banned in France.
 I know we banned this play, but frankly I can't remember why. Can you refresh my memory, Herr Director?
 Did we?
 Well, actually, Sire, if you remember, we did finally incline to Italian.
 Well done, Sire!
 Bravo, Your Majesty!
 Oh, I'm tender enough for you, my boy. I'm tender enough for you.
 Well, I don't know! I mean you're a delicious, delightful, delectable little bird, but don't you think you might be just a little tough?
 Of course now. Right away, before I get any older.
 What do you mean - now?
 Well, promise then.
 I can't wait.
 Now you've got to promise me faithfully you'll remain true to me forever. Then you'll see how tenderly your little birdie will love you.
 Oh. Well, thank you! How wonderful. Some people get all the luck.
 I've taken pity on you, my angel. I heard your wish.
 What? Who the devil are you?
 Here I am, my angel.
 Indeed. Just a moment - as a matter of fact I think I do know someone who could commission a work from him. A very appropriate person to do so. Yes.
 How sad. It's tragic, isn't it? Such a talent.
 No, Baron, no. I'm afraid Mozart is a lost cause. He has managed to alienate practically the whole of Vienna. He is constantly drunk. He never pays his debts. I can't think of one person to whom I dare recommend him.
 Can't you think of anyone who might commission some work from him? I've done my best. I got him to arrange some Bach for my Sunday concerts. He got a fee - what I could afford. Can't you think of anyone who might do something for him?
 I agree, Baron.
 This is embarrassing, you know. You introduced Mozart to some of my friends and he's begging from practically all of them. It has to stop.
 Come with me. And stay in the room.
 He didn't say, sir. I told him I didn't know when you would be back, but he insisted on waiting.
 What does he want?
 Show her in. Then go to bed.
 That lady is back, sir.
 Excuse me, my dear.
 She didn't say. But she says it's urgent.
 Who is she?
 Excuse me, sir, there is a lady who insists on talking to you.
 Yes, indeed. Goodnight to you all now. It was perfection - truly!
 Oh, by the way, give him this. This is his share. That should cheer him up, eh?
 Yes.  And congratulations to all of you. It was superb.
 I'll call tomorrow.
 Bene.
 And say everything went wonderfully. A triumph-de-luxe - say that! Tell him the audience shouted his name a hundred times.
 Of course.
 Well, tell him we were here, won't you?
 Oh, yes. He's just exhausted. He became dizzy, that's all. We should let him rest.
 But he's all right?
 Well, he's sleeping now. Better not.
 Can we come in?
 Yes, I am looking after him.
 Herr Salieri.
 Thank you.
 I'm an orderly, not a bleeding psychiatrist! I push things about, but I've little say what happens to them.
 You know, did he seem depressed? Do you think he'll eat the food?
 What do you mean, 'how did he look'?
 How did he look?
 The American? Yes, duck.
 Has the patient in twenty-one gotten his tray yet?
 I doubt it. But it's something to do.
 David?
 Nurse Hobbs said there's a disturbance in Leicester Square involving some sort of mad dog.
 Tea would be nice.
 What shall we do?
 I expect you shortly.
 No, a cab will be faster.
 Shall I send a car?
 He's fine. We'll come right over.
 You're certain he's lucid? You won't need any help?
 Yes, Doctor.
 Right. Now listen carefully. I want you to bring David here. I want him in my care. I'll notify the police that we've found him. It is imperative that you bring him straight to the hospital. Do you understand?
 Yes, I should think so.
 Could you get here without any trouble?
 No, not really.
 Is David acting strangely?
 No, why?
 Have you read the papers today? Have you listened to the radio or television?
 Yes, he is. He's very excited and confused, but he's not crazy, if that's what you mean.
 The zoo? Is he rational?
 He doesn't remember. He woke up at the zoo.
 Is he all right? Why didn't you call me? Where was he?
 He's here.
 Let's call the police and see if they can help us find our wandering boy.
 What shall we do?
 Oh, I don't mean running about on all fours and howling at the moon. But in such a deranged state he could harm himself, or perhaps others.
 Dr. Hirsch?
 David has suffered a severe trauma. I myself witnessed some form of mass neurosis in East Proctor. If all the villagers believe that Jack Goodman was killed by a werewolf, why shouldn't David? And then it follows that if he survived an attack by a werewolf, wouldn't he himself become a werewolf the next full moon?
 Surely you're not suggesting...
 No. He knows no one in London, besides me. I shouldn't have left him alone.
 You've absolutely no idea where David might be?
 I think the village of East Proctor is hiding some dark and terrible secret. I'm convinced that, like David, they believe in this werewolf.
 And what else?
 They were lying. There were no witnesses, no escaped lunatic. The whole community is hiding the truth of what actually happened up there.
 Yes.
 I tried to investigate the attack. There are no records. The case was closed and now they've 'misplaced' the file. David's lacerations were cleaned and dressed when he arrived here and yet supposedly no doctor examined him before I did. The Goodman boy is already in the ground so he's no good to us. So I went to the pub in East Proctor where I was convinced of two things.
 Dr. Hirsch, what's wrong? Is this more serious than I know?
 Warn him?
 David says Jack comes to warn him.
 What did he say?
 Yes.
 Has his friend appeared to him again?
 Well, yes, but he seems to be more upset by the death of his friend.
 Alex, has David persisted in his werewolf fantasies?
 He's not?
 At my flat. I'm off at midnight and...
 It's a full moon. Where is he?
 Yes, sir.
 Oh dear girl, your extracurricular activities are of no consequence to me. I don't give a damn who you sleep with. I'm concerned about David.
 Come to my office, Miss Price.
 It's all right, Susan. Yes, Doctor, I have.
 Yes, I believe he did.
 Did he say a wolf?
 No, sir. Of course, sir. Good day, Doctor.
 The police report said an escaped lunatic attacked them. He must have been a very powerful man. Although I really don't see that it is any of your concern, Miss Price.
 What happened to them?
 That would be Jack Goodman, the boy who was killed.
 He said 'Jack'.
 What exactly did he call out?
 Yes, Doctor?
 Oh, Miss Price?
 Yes, Doctor.
 Go about your duties.
 Dr. Hirsch?
 Can I be of service, Miss Price?
 Miss Gallagher, surely you must perform some function here at the hospital.
 Dr. Hirsch, Mr. Kessler cried out a minute ago.
 Control!?! What control!?! Get away from me!
 David, don't lose control.
 Leave me alone, dammit! You people are crazy! I've got to get away from here! I've got to do something!
 David, let's go now.
 Hopeless. It's hopeless.
 Will you shut up!?!!
 Sir, he's very upset. His friend was killed and...
 I swear, I don't know this girl.
 We had an argument. He's being silly.
 What?
 He's playing a stupid joke, sir.
 Rational!?! I'm a fucking werewolf, for Christ's sake!
 David, please be rational. Let's go to Dr. Hirsch.
 Jack is dead. Look, six people have been killed. I'm going to the police.
 Jack is dead!
 I am going to the cops. There's a full moon tonight. Jack was right. I...
 David, stop!
 Six people mutilated? It had to be me, Alex.
 David, what are you doing?
 Pull over.
 But...
 I don't know why I feel so good. I haven't felt this good in a long time.
 Dr. Hirsch will know what to do.
 I should be committed.
 The next corner we can get a cab.
 I said goodbye to you. I was locked out of the flat. I climbed the wall and came in through the bathroom window. I started to read and then I was naked at the zoo!  I guess I am out of my fucking mind.
 Don't you remember?
 Waking up at the zoo, that's not so insane. Having no clothes on? That's insane. What did I do last night, Alex?
 The zoo?
 Alex, I've lost my mind. I woke up at the zoo! But you know what? I feel terrific!
 I'm freezing.
 David! Where on earth have you been!?!
 See you later.
 I'm off. There's food in the fridge.
 A doper werewolf.
 I've left those pills for you.
 Okay.
 Listen, if you get too anxious, call me at the hospital, okay?
 Yeah, I do, but go to work.
 David, do you want me to stay here tonight?
 Werewolves simply do not exist.
 It's silly of you to be apprehensive.
 Tell me that it's silly of me to be apprehensive.
 Anything.
 Do me an enormous favor?
 Let me go now, you'll make me late.
 That's good, Alex.  Reassure me.
 Tomorrow is the full moon.
 I wasn't hallucinating.
 But, David.
 I was awake and he was in my room.
 David, you don't honestly believe that in reality your friend Jack rose from the grave to breakfast with you? Do you really?
 Good.
 Of course.
 Will you be here in about fifteen minutes?
 Yes?
 Alex?
 It's nice to see you.
 It's nice to see you.
 David, perhaps you'd like to watch the telly while I take a shower.
 There is only one bed.
 The bedroom.
 Lovely.
 Bathroom.
 Charming.
 Closet.
 Very nice.
 The kitchen.
 Yeah, I would think so, too.
 I would think so.
 I was dreaming again?
 What do I think? You mean about the possibility of your becoming a monster in two days or about visits from dead friends?
 Yeah. He says that I will become a monster in two days. What do you think?
 Your dead friend Jack?
 My friend Jack was just here.
 You're to be discharged tomorrow. Will you be all right?
 I'll let you know the next full moon.
 Are you better now?
 A werewolf?
 I'm a werewolf.
 Good. I thought for a moment I was the only embarrassed one in the room.
 Now I'm embarrassed.
 All I am to you is a sex fantasy then?
 Forgive me, I'm trying to cheer myself up and an affair with a beautiful nurse seemed like just the thing to do it.
 You're being awfully forward, aren't you?
 Not just a patient -- me.
 How did we get from your bad dreams to my taking a holiday with a patient?
 Will you think about it?
 Now, David, I said I would keep you company, but I meant right here and now.
 I'm serious. You don't know me and I know nothing about you. We have a perfect relationship.
 What?
 Will you come with me?
 David, your dreams will stop. You'll leave England and your bad memories; and then this will all fade away.
 I keep having these really terrible dreams. They are getting worse and I can't seem to stop them.
 That's easy enough.
 No, thank you. Just keep me company for a while.
 Don't be silly. Can I get you something?
 I'm sorry I woke you up.
 Hello. You all right?
 Ahem, A Word of Explanation. It was in Warwick Castle that I came across the curious stranger whom I am going to talk about. He attracted me by three things: his candid simplicity, his marvelous familiarity with ancient armor, and the restfulness of his company - for he did all the talking. We fell together as modest people will in the tail of the herd...
 Yes, go on.
 A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthur's Court by Samuel L. Clemens. This is after the preface but before chapter one: A Word of Explanation. You all right?
 What? Oh, yes, please.
 Shall I read to you?
 My best friend. My very best friend.
 Was Jack Goodman your good friend?
 Now what do you want to talk about?
 I know.
 I'm twenty-seven.
 Twenty-eight.
 How old are you?
 That's not really a very proper question.
 How old are you?
 It's okay. I want to talk to you.
 I'm sorry. I shouldn't have asked you.
 I dream of death mostly.
 What do you dream about?
 I've just started it. My friend gave it to me.
 Do you like it?
 'A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthur's Court' by Mark Twain.
 I was. What are you reading?
 I thought you were asleep.
 You're a very beautiful girl.
 Will you give me a break?
 Let's try a little harder, shall we?
 Right.
 This is absurd. I'm not hungry. I don't want any food.
 Shall I be forced to feed you, David?
 Call me David.
 Shall I be forced to feed you, Mr. Kessler?
 Aw come on, Alex!
 Call me Alex.
 Aw come on, Miss Price!
 Sorry.
 Leave the pills. I'll take them later.
 Well, you're to take these after you've eaten. Now what kind of nurse would I be if I failed in so simple a task as giving out some pills?
 How is that?
 You put me in an awkward position, Mr. Kessler.
 Please, really. I'm not hungry.
 I'm afraid you have to eat something.
 I'm not very hungry, thank you.
 You haven't eaten your lunch.
 Yes?
 Mr. Kessler?
 A wolf.
 What?
 It was a wolf.
 I beg your pardon?
 It wasn't a lunatic.
 I thought not.
 No.
 Benjamin, have you ever been severely beaten about the face and neck?
 No!
 No what?
 No.
 How are we feeling tonight?
 Right.
 No.
 The doctor will be round later. Would you like a picture book to look at? We have some lovely funny Beanos.
 No.
 Feeling better?
 No.
 Well, all right then, be that way. Here, swallow this.
 No.
 No what?
 No.
 Hello, Benjamin.
 Really, Susan, I don't think that was very proper, and besides, it's common practice now.
 I looked.
 Why on earth do you say that?
 I think he's a Jew.
 Chart says he's from New York.
 He's an American, you know. Dr. Hirsch is going to fetch round one of those Embassy fellows to see him.
 Yes, I should think. He called out just now.
 He all right?
 Yes, Mrs. Hobbs.
 Nothing quite as dramatic as that, Miss Price. He just doesn't eat enough of what is put before him. He suffers from nightmares. I'd think he just needs a hand to hold.
 Has he been refusing food?
 Take these round now, will you please? The American boy in twenty-one is only to have these after he's eaten. Will you be sure of that?
 Yes, Mrs. Hobbs.
 Miss Price.
 That's what I want you to do, you moron!
 You're going to have to stop this disturbance or I shall arrest you.
 Who is this girl?
 Shakespeare was French! The Queen Mother sucks cocks in hell! Shit! Fuck! Piss!
 Now see here young man.
 Queen Elizabeth is a man! Prince Charles is a faggot! Winston Churchill was full of shit!
 There's no call for that kind of language.
 Hey, you asshole! I want you to arrest me!
 All right, you two, move along.
 You did, did you?
 Officer, I killed those people last night.
 Why are you doing this to me?
 No, David. Harry and I and everyone you murder are not dead. The undead.
 That's easy for you to say - you're already dead.
 You've left my wife a widow and my children fatherless. And I understand that I am to walk the earth one of the living dead until the wolf's bloodline is severed and the curse lifted.
 Mr. Bringsly, I'm sorry. I have absolutely no idea what to say to you.
 This isn't Mr. Goodman's idea. He is your good friend, whereas I am a victim of your carnivorous lunar activities.
 Why are you doing this to me, Jack?
 You could have told them!
 No one brought them here! No one wanted them here!
 That's very funny, that is.
 Oh, all right. There was this airplane over the Atlantic on its way to New York. It was full of men from the United Nations.
 No. You've had your chance.
 Oh, come on, tell us.
 All right, laugh then. I shan't tell it.
 Quiet, everyone! Hush! Shhh!
 You be quiet, woman, and let me speak.
 No, but we're about to.
 Here, Gladys, Tom. Did you hear the one about the crashing plane?
 Bambi?
 Yes, but does everyone kill Bambi?
 Some, everyone does.
 Do you have bad dreams, too?
 An American film about the Mafia called 'See You Next Wednesday', and I want to see it badly, so you give me no problems and go to sleep.
 What are you going to see?
 Miss Price, the other nurse that attended you.
 Alex?
 It's nearly eight. I'm off duty shortly, then I'm off to the films with Alex.
 What time is it?
 Now go back to sleep so you'll be fresh for Dr. Hirsch in the morning.
 I was having a nightmare.
 Mr. Kessler? Wake up, please.
 Of course not, David. I'll fetch in young Miss Price.
 Dr. Hirsch?  I'd rather not be by myself.
 Believe me. The Hound of the Baskervilles was an invention of Sir Arthur Conan Doyle's. And if you'd read the bloody book, you'd find that Holmes discovered your house of hell a fraud, a fake.
 You really think I'm crazy, don't you?
 David, please. The police are satisfied. I'm certain that if a monster were out roaming northern England we'd have seen it on the telly.
 Then why the hell are you so quick to disbelieve me? You yourself said it must have taken incredible strength to tear apart a person like that.
 I really don't know.
 Did you talk to the police in East Proctor? Did the cops go to The Slaughtered Lamb?
 No. In fact, your wounds were cleaned and dressed before you arrived here.
 Did you see Jack?
 You'd be surprised what horrors a man is capable of.
 Look, Dr. Hirsch, I know I've been traumatized, but Jack was torn apart. I saw him. A man can't do that to someone with his bare hands.
 Yes.
 I've told you, it wasn't a man. It was an animal. A big wolf or something. A rabid dog.
 Did you get a good look at the man who attacked you?
 Sure, as a kid. But never so real. Never so bizarre.
 You've never had bad dreams before?
 Doctor, my memory is fine. It's my sanity I'm beginning to worry about.
 In time I'm sure it will all come back to you.
 How could there have been witnesses? It was so dark. We were running and I fell and Jack went to help me up and this thing came from nowhere... I don't understand what they're talking about.
 So they said.
 There were witnesses?
 Now we've just given you a pretty strong sedative, so try to get some rest now. Miss Price will see to your needs. Rest now.
 Lunatic?
 You've suffered some rather severe cuts and bruises, lost a bit of blood, but nothing too serious; black and blue for a while. You'll have some dueling scars to boast of. That lunatic must have been a very fierce fellow. They say a mad man has the strength of ten.
 Two weeks?
 You've been unconscious since you were brought in two weeks ago.
 How long have I been here?
 Get your fucking hands off me! What the hell is going on here?
 Miss Price! Miss Price, please!
 Now, David, I want you to prepare yourself; your friend is dead.
 The guy I was with. Is he all right? How did I get to London?
 I should think so after your recent traumatic experiences.
 London? Where's Jack? I had a strange dream.
 You're in a hospital in London.
 Where am I?
 Hello, David. I am Dr. Hirsch and this is a countryman of yours, Mr. Collins.
 If you did it wrong, it would be painful. You'd choke to death.
 I could hang myself.
 How shall I do it?
 Because this must be stopped.
 Gerald is the man you murdered in the subway. We thought it best you didn't see him as he's a fresh kill and still pretty messy.
 Hello.
 David Kessler, this is Gerald Bringsly.
 I want you to meet some people.
 Well, even if I'm not the wolfman, I am crazy enough to do something like that. I mean, here I sit in Leicester Square talking to a corpse. I'm glad to see you, Jack.
 What about the zoo?
 I didn't mean it. I don't know what I'm saying. I'm not even sure it was me who killed those people. I don't remember doing it.
 Thank you.
 You look awful.
 If I was still alive, I probably would.
 Aren't you going to say, 'I told you so'?
 You don't have to say anything.
 What can I say, Jack?
 Hi, David.
 Hi, Jack.
 I will not accept this! Now go away!
 The canines will be real. You'll taste real blood! God damit, David, please believe me! You'll kill and make others like me! I'm not having a nice time, David! Don't allow this to happen again! You must take your own life!
 What, Jack? That tomorrow night beneath the full moon I'll sprout hair and fangs and eat people? Bullshit!
 You must believe me.
 I think I've lost my mind. I think you're not real. I think I'm asleep and you're a part of another bad dream.
 What do you think?
 Jack, are you really dead?
 You must take your own life now, David, before it's too late.
 A monster. I know, I know.
 David, tomorrow night is the full moon. You'll change, you'll become...
 Get out of here, Jack!
 Yes.
 I understand all right. You're one of the undead and I'm a werewolf.
 David, I'm sorry I upset you yesterday, but you must understand what is going on.
 Okay, you've seen me. Now go away.
 I wanted to see you.
 What are you doing here?
 Don't be an asshole, David. Come here.
 You're not real.
 It's cold, David, and I'm so alone. The undead surround me. Have you ever talked to a corpse? It's boring! I'm lonely! Kill yourself, David, before you kill others.
 Nurse! Oh God! Alex!
 The supernatural! The powers of darkness! It's all true. Take your own life! Suicide, David. Join me.
 Nurse!
 Listen to me! Take your own life, David. It's our only chance.
 Nurse!
 David, please believe me. You will kill people, David. You've got to stop the bloodshed before it begins.
 You're talking like Boris Karloff! It's movie dialogue!
 You'll stalk the streets of London a creature of the night.
 Jack, please go away. Please go away.
 Beware the moon. The full moon, David. You've got two days.
 Stop it, Jack.
 Remember what that guy at The Slaughtered Lamb said? 'Beware the moon.'
 What are you talking about? I won't accept this! Get out! God damit!
 You survived and now you shall continue the curse.
 What?!
 It's you, David.
 Will you be quiet?!
 The wolf's bloodline must be severed. The last remaining werewolf must be destroyed.
 What's wrong with you? Shut up!
 I was murdered, an unnatural death, and now I walk the earth in limbo until the werewolf's curse is lifted.
 Shut up, you zombie!
 On the moors, we were attacked by a lycanthrope, a werewolf.
 I'm not listening!
 We were attacked by a werewolf.
 If you love me so much, Jack, you'll realize how disconcerting it is to share one's breakfast with the living dead!
 I'm a grisly sight, it's true; but I love you and that's why I'm here. You've got to know.
 Warn me? Will you get out of here, you meat loaf?
 David, now I know this may be hard for you, but I have to warn you.
 What?!
 David!
 I'm going completely crazy.
 Life mocks me even in death.
 Rudy Levine the shmuck?
 So you know what she does? She's so grief stricken she runs to find solace in Rudy Levine's bed.
 I can't stand it.
 Debbie Klein cried a lot.
 Why should you be surprised? You were a very well-liked person.
 Yeah. Your parents came to my funeral. I was surprised at how many people came.
 Aren't you supposed to be buried in New York someplace?
 I'm sorry to be upsetting you, David, but I had to come.
 Hurting your feelings? Has it occurred to you that it may be unsettling to have you rise from your grave to visit me? Listen to me, I'm talking to a hamburger!
 David! You're hurting my feelings.
 I'm aware that I don't look so great, but I thought you'd be glad to see me.
 This is too much. I can't handle this.
 Thanks a lot.
 Get the fuck out of here, Jack.
 Nice to see you.
 Are you going to help me up?
 You really scared me, you shithead.
 Well. I'm glad we... WHOAA!!
 I'll tell you when we get there.
 Where are we going?
 Yeah.
 Jack?
 Not far enough. Come on.
 It sounds far away.
 No.
 See anything?
 Walking away, yes, sir. Here we are walking away.
 Walk away, Jack.
 Nice doggie. Good boy.
 A sheep dog or something. Turn slowly and let's walk away.
 Oh shit. What is that?
 Do you think it's a dog?
 It's in front of us.
 Let's just keep walking.
 Plan?
 What's the plan?
 It's circling us.
 It's moving.
 Anywhere! I think we should just keep moving.
 Come on, where?
 I don't know. Come on.
 Shit! David, what is that?
 Yeah.
 I vote we go back to The Slaughtered Lamb.
 It's a full moon, 'beware the moon'.
 No, but he was on the moors.
 Heathcliffe didn't howl.
 Heathcliffe.
 Pecos Bill.
 The Hound of the Baskervilles.
 There aren't any coyotes in England.
 A coyote.
 Yeah?
 Could be a lot of things.
 What was it?
 I heard that.
 Did you hear that?
 I'm well aware of how pleasant the weather is in Rome at the present time thank you.
 Say, David...
 I see and they were too embarrassed to talk about it, because they felt so silly.
 Maybe that pentangle was for something supernatural.
 I have no idea.
 What do you think was wrong?
 Well, not quite a blood-thirsty mob.
 I don't know. Now that we're out here and it's three degrees, I'm not so sure I wouldn't rather face a blood-thirsty mob.
 That was weird. I guess leaving was the best idea.
 Come on, I'm freezing.
 Beware the moon?
 I don't know. Let's see if there's an inn or something up the road.
 What the hell was that all about?
 Apparently so.
 Come on, Jack, shall we go?!!
 What do you mean? I'm starving.
 Jack, we'd better go.
 You ask them.
 Go on, ask them.
 Wrong.
 Right.
 I see. You want me to ask these people if they're burning candles to ward off monsters.
 Listen, that's a pentangle, a five- pointed star. It's used in witchcraft. Lon Chaney, Jr. and Universal Studios maintain it's the mark of the wolf man.
 You ask them.
 Ask them what the candles are for.
 Maybe the owners are from Texas.
 It's a five-pointed star.
 What about it?
 Look at that.
 Listen, at least it's warm in here.
 Nice looking group.
 Nice to see you.
 Hello.
 Shall we?
 Okay.
 I assume full responsibility.
 David, before we go in there I want you to know that - no matter what happens to us - it's your fault.
 A severed wolf's head on a pike as their symbol.
 That's not a spear. It's a pike.
 Of course, The Slaughtered Lamb. Why else would they have a severed wolf's head on a spear as their symbol?
 That's a wolf's head.
 Of course, The Slaughtered Lamb. Why else would they have a severed fox head on a spear as their symbol?
 The Slaughtered Lamb?
 She says she 'likes me too much'.
 We've known Debbie what, since the eighth grade? How many years of foreplay is that?
 It is impossible for a body like that to be dull.
 It just fascinates me that you can spend so much energy on someone so dull.
 I have to make love to her. It's very simple. She has no choice really.
 If you don't stop, I'm going to kill you.
 Rendezvous in Rome starring Jack Goodman and Debbie Klein. The love affair that shocked Europe! See torrid lovemaking at its most explicit! See Jack and Debbie expose their lust in the sacred halls of the Vatican! Never has the screen dared...
 I don't know.
 Well, anyway, do you think she'll be there?
 I'm talking about a girl you want to fuck, so give me a break.
 You're talking about the woman I love.
 She's a jerk.
 Debbie is not mediocre and she has one of the great bodies of all time.
 I think Debbie Klein is a mediocre person with a good body.
 Do you think she'll meet me in Rome?
 Right.
 I'm sorry. Northern England first, Italy later.
 Well, I like it here.
 Oh, I don't know. I mean look around. Isn't this a fun place?
 You're not having a good time are you?
 David.
 Jack.
 Good.
 Yes.
 Are you cold?
 Stay here. If we need you, we'll know where to reach you.
 What can we do to assist you?
 Regardless of what you think, Lieutenant, the fact remains that David is missing and that we must find him.
 The forensic lads seem to feel that some sort of animal was involved, that's true, but I hardly think...
 Why don't we ask him?
 Has David Kessler anything to say concerning the attack on the moors?
 You were saying?
 Well, then, what can I do for Scotland Yard?
 No, thank you, Doctor.
 Come in, come in. Please sit. Some tea?
 Dr. Hirsch?
 Tell him I'm out. No, tell him I've passed away. An old war wound or something. Tell him I'm dead. And no more calls!
 He's on the telephone.
 What here?
 Roger Mathison, Doctor.
 Excuse me.  Yes?
 Send them in.
 Lt. Villiers and Sgt. McManus are here to see you, Doctor.
 Yes?
 I see. You've heard nothing about the incident?
 Oh, that's been there for two hundred years. We were going to paint it out, but it's traditional, so we left it.
 What's that?
 I suppose Guinness will suffice.
 Sorry, love.
 Campari and soda would do nicely.
 Hello, there. What can I get you?
 I beg your pardon?
 Remember the Alamo?
 But I can heat some up for you if you'd like.
 Oh.
 No.
 Then you have some hot tea?
 We've got spirits and beer. If it's something hot you want, you can have tea.
 Hot chocolate?
 No.
 Do you have any hot soup?
 We'll find him, not to worry.
 I cannot accept a connection between David Kessler and last night's murders. We will find him, however. I can assure you of that.
 That is precisely my point. David, as far as we are concerned, the matter is closed. We won't trouble you any further. Good day.
 I don't rightly know, sir.
 And what, Sergeant?
 Lieutenant, the boy seems pretty lucid to me and...
 Sgt. McManus, are you suggesting that David and Jack were, in fact, attacked by some animal and that the officialdom of East Proctor has conspired to keep it a secret? We have an autopsy report on the murderer who was shot in the act by the local police. We have two witnesses to the crime. You'll forgive me, Mr. Kessler, if I consider your testimony as coming from someone who has gone through a terrible shock.
 He may have a point, Lieutenant. Two strong boys would be able to defend themselves against one man.
 Has Mr. Kessler said anything regarding the attack on the moors?
 Sorry.
 I'd like some tea, please.
 No, thank you.
 Yeah - sure!
 Yes - sure
 If she can't pay, I'll have to foreclose, won't I?
 Why not?
 She's a widow. I don't like taking mortgages from widows.
 What's the idea of turning her down? It sounds like a perfectly safe investment.
 But listen, Tom, I
 I'll tell you why. I don't like the crowd you're mixed up with.  Personally, you can have all the credit you want. But for that deal - not a cent.
 Tom, I never had trouble getting credit from you before. When I was flat broke you gave me all the money I wanted. Now I come to you with a swell deal, and the greatest
 I want to know why .
 Listen, I told you I wasn't interested in that deal, didn't I?
 What do you suppose anybody wants? Money, money, money!
 You here again? What do you want?
 Hello, Tom.
 Yeah.
 He has?
 The detectives got Matt up there in Sampson's office.
 Yeah. He'll have a tough time thinking up a wise-crack for this one . . .
 Matt?
 Where's Matt?
 No kidding. When I saw it, you could'a knocked me over with a pin.
 No kidding?
 I was the first one to see it. I was coming down the stairs, and there was the watchman lying dead at my feet.
 Oscar, what's the matter?
 Say, don't annoy me. I got troubles of my own.
 And listen, wise guy - I'm setting friend time clock for exactly nine o'clock, so no squawks out of you guys in the morning.
 Yeah.
 I remember once when your account checked.
 I'm fourteen cents out, and it took me half an hour to find the mistake. And me with a date, too.
 What's the matter, Charlie?
 Where do you think I've been?  I took the baby for a stroll in the park.
 Where you been?
 Aw, nerts!
 Say pal, did you ever hear of a Depression?
 It'll be yours if you don't kick in with that ten bucks.
 Whose death?
 Baby, I can't give you anything but love...
 I'll pay it back to you Saturday - on the level I will. Give a guy a break, will you? I've got to get it back in my account. If Helen ever finds out that I
 Yeah?
 Charlie!
 Ten bucks? Say, if I had ten bucks, I'd quit.
 Let me have ten bucks?
 Yeah.
 Say, do me a favor, will you Charlie?
 Here's twenty-five thousand.
 Yeah.
 It was more than that last week.
 About twenty-four thousand.
 How much?
 Say Matt, I'll have to have some money for those Manville payrolls.
 Yes, sir.
 And tell him not to delay.
 Yes, sir.
 When he comes in, tell him we're waiting for him in the board room.
 Not yet, Mr. Clark.
 Mr. Dickson in yet?
 All right, let him! I'm sick and tired of hearing about him. If he wants to run the bank, let him do it. I don't want any part of it.
 You know Dickson as well as we do. He'll shut the doors before he gives up control.
 Take it easy, Clark.
 How are you protecting your depositors? By making a lot of idiotic loans!
 What good will that do?  Why, it will take control away from him. We'll put somebody else in charge, call in all doubtful loans, and be on safe ground again. That's what good it will do!
 What good will that do?
 Dickson doesn't have to go. But he must agree to this merger with New York Trust
 Don't make me laugh, Schultz!
 Oh, is he? We carry more unsecured paper than any other institution in the city. We're fools to tolerate it.
 Personally, I think you're getting panic-stricken about nothing. Dickson's all right.
 You know what you can do with that! Come on, take a look at this! You'll see a demonstration of faith that's worth more than all the collateral in the world.
 We've been waiting fifteen minutes
 Come out here you pawnbrokers - take a look at this!
 The bank. All right. Do anything you want with it.
 Dickson, I'd like to talk to you about the bank.
 I can't? You just wait and see. If that run doesn't stop within the next hour, I'll shut the doors. You know what that means? The bank examiner will step in tomorrow. You'll be forced to liquidate. I'll insist upon it. The depositors will be paid one hundred cents on the dollar. What's left you gentlemen can have. But I'll guarantee there won't be enough to pay your next month's garage bill.
 Say, you can't do that
 So, that's it, eh? You've waited a long time for this chance, haven't you?  Well, I'm not going to resign now - or ever.
 No. You can't reason with anyone else when you're in a jam. We pleaded with you to keep liquid, but you wouldn't listen to us. You preached to us about faith and a lot of other rubbish. Now you want our help. You want us to throw a lot of cash into a bank that you've wrecked. All right. There's one way you can get it. Give us an option on your stock and resign as president.
 Aw, they've gone crazy. You can't reason with a mob.
 The depositors you were protecting were the first ones to pounce on you. You thought they were your friends. Why don't you go out there now and try and get some help from them?
 I have everything I own in it. It's your bank as well as mine, isn't it?
 That sounds very simple, Dickson, but why should we jeopardize our personal fortunes?
 I know that among you, you have at least a million dollars in various banks throughout the city. Get that money over here and I'll stop this run within five minutes.
 What do you mean, help?
 We'll be forced to shut the doors. I've worked twenty-five years night and day to keep this bank alive. You've all made money out of it. Are you willing to help?
 We'll discuss that in the board room.
 What about?
 We want to talk to you.
 Yes! You said it, Clark. That's the only thing that means anything to me.
 Gentlemen, you notice Mr. Dickson refuses to consider our wishes. He refuses an offer to merge with the New York Trust - the only thing that will put this bank on safe ground. He insists upon running a bank on so flimsy a thing as . . . as faith!
 I'm running this bank my way. Get that clear!
 I know, Dickson. That's all very well. But you're taking too many chances. In these times a bank should keep liquid in case of trouble. In case of emergency!
 Most of the creditors I know personally. I've seen them grow up in the community. I knew their fathers and mothers before them.
 Not at all. That's Alexander Hamilton's idea[5] - the finest banking mind this country has ever known. Those are his exact words, gentlemen. Character!  It's the only thing you can bank on, and it's the only thing that will pull this country out of the doldrums.
 Character, hmmpf! That's your idea?
 Just pure luck!
 What's the matter with my policy? How many losses has this bank taken in the last twenty-five years?  I'll tell you. Not a single one!  What's wrong with that kind of banking?
 Oh, you would, eh?  All right. If it's more important than golf, go ahead. What's on your mind?
 I think, Mr. Dickson, we would like to have a little of your very valuable time here at the bank this morning, if you don't mind.
 Say, you know, I found out something yesterday about hitting a golf ball. You've got to hit with the left hand, and from the inside out, it's the only way you can hit anything
 He won't believe it, Mr. Dickson. But it's the truth - honest it is. I was in my apartment last night - ask your wife - she
 Claims he was there with a married woman. Doesn't want to mention her name.
 I didn't kill him! I had nothing to do with that, I tell you! I was home in my apartment last night - I can prove it!
 Don't forget there's a dead watchman downstairs.
 I was crazy, I tell you, Mr. Dickson. I didn't know what I was doing. I wandered around in a daze. All I could think of was that they were going to kill me . . .  You'll stand by me, won't you, Mr. Dickson? You won't go back on me now, will you? I'll die if they send me to prison!
 They took my keys yesterday. I went there to get them back.
 What were you doing at Finlay's this morning?
 Stand back, Inspector. Let me out of here, or I'll shoot you!
 Don't be a fool, Cluett. This is only going to make it worse for you.
 All right, Jack, all right.
 Stand back Inspector, or I'll shoot. Drop that gun.
 It's one of the boys from headquarters. He always sings "Mother Machree" whenever he's got good news. Looks like this case'll be settled in no time.
 Somebody must be in good humor. He was humming "Mother Machree."
 Thanks.
 Why, of course.
 You understand?
 Oh!
 If you don't mind, Inspector, I'd rather not say - that is, unless it becomes absolutely essential. You see, she's married.
 Looks like you're going to have no trouble at all. What was the lady's name, Mr. Cluett?
 Oh yes, of course. There was someone with me. A lady.
 That is simple, isn't it? I assume you can prove that if necessary.
 That's very simple. I was home.
 Where were you at twelve o'clock last night?
 Of course, yes. Just what would you like to know, Inspector?
 I hope you don't mind me asking you a few questions, Mr. Cluett.
 Get out, get out!
 She wasn't to blame, Mr. Dickson. It wasn't her fault. Honest, it wasn't. I begged her to come up. She didn't
 She just came up for a drink. Just for a few minutes.
 You just mentioned her name. What was she doing there? What was she doing in your apartment?
 Nothing, nothing, Mr. Dickson. Don't pay any attention to me. I don't know what I'm saying.
 What was my wife doing in your apartment last night?
 But I didn't kill that man last night. Honest I didn't, Mr. Dickson!
 Fifty thousand dollars!
 Gambling - I owed them a lot of money. Last week I lost over fifty thousand dollars!
 What happened?  You're not a thief. How'd you get mixed up with these kind of people?
 I don't know. It's all been like a crazy nightmare, Mr. Dickson.
 Confessed! Cluett, in heaven's name, what got into you?
 Listen, buddy, you're getting by pretty easy. Quit squawking!
 But Dude, listen - couldn't we make this some other time?
 Be sure you're with somebody responsible in case any questions are asked. Understand?
 know, but
 You? No, you'll be all right, so long as you establish an alibi for tonight.
 Dude - there's not any chance of my becoming involved in this, is there?
 All you gotta do is fix a few things for us , and we'll do the rest, see?
 What do you mean?
 You don't have to do nothing.
 Why, I couldn't do that . . . !
 Why not?
 Good heavens, man! You're not suggesting that I
 We can take blood from anything   If it's comin' to us.
 But after all, you can't take blood from a stone.
 That don't do us any good.
 I'm sorry, Dude, butI
 Then what did you want to gamble for? If you'd have beat us out of fifty G's, you'd have been paid, wouldn't you? Well, we want our dough.
 I haven't got it.
 That's your funeral. We've got fifty thousand dollars comin' to us.
 I know, I know, Dude. Oh, I must have been crazy! I lost my head completely!
 You know what we do to welchers, Cluett, don't you?
 What are you doing here?
 Why, Matt!
 I'll grow a moustache by the time you get out of here.
 I'm not afraid of you. You haven't got a moustache!
 And now fair woman, I have you in my power.
 A misunderstood bachelor.
 What is that, Mr. Bones?[7]
 Oh, you're not so badly off. There's something much worse than being a misunderstood wife.
 You know, there ought to be a Congressional Medal for men like you. America's comfort to misunderstood wives. I never thought I would find myself in that class.
 Good for you. Come on.
 No. No, I'm afraid papa isn't that much interested. He's too busy rushing off to Philadelphia to make stuffy, old speeches at stuffy, old bankers' meetings. Too busy closing big, important deals  I think I will have a drink.
 What's the matter? Afraid papa will spank?
 No. I know the answer to that one.  I think you'd better take me home.
 Come on up for just a few minutes. We'll have just one drink, then we'll go.
 I knew I couldn't trust you. You told me you were taking me home.
 My apartment.
 What's this?
 Cyril!
 No. No, I'm not. I deliberately avoided you. I was afraid of making a fool of myself. But I won't stand it any longer
 Why, Cyril, you're insane
 I've loved you ever since I can remember, long before you married Tom Dickson.
 Now wait a minute, wait a minute...
 Don't you know I've been crazy about you for years?
 What?
 I want to be near you!
 No.
 Don't you know?
 Why are you so anxious?
 No, they won't. Not when you are there. Oh, please, be a sport. Please ask me.
 Don't be silly, Cyril. These are respectable people. They'd probably bore you to death.
 Now Phyllis, if you don't invite me, I'm coming anyway.
 You? No can do. It's all set. Just a few of Tom's closest friends.
 Well, aren't you going to invite me?
 Well, what?
 Well
 But I'm giving a party for him - a real, old-fashioned surprise party. Caps, bells, whistles, and everything. I'm really terribly excited about it. I've been planning it for months.
 Please, please don't laugh at me, Phyllis. I must see you tonight!
 Oh! Oh, no!  I think I've done enough experimenting for one day. Congratulations, Cyril. You've convinced me that you're a philanderer of the very first order. I shall recommend you highly.
 See, we're getting along famously!
 Yes, yes, it does. What are you doing tonight, Phyllis?
 Doesn't that come next?
 Now let me see, what comes next?  Oh yes, I know - what are you doing tonight, Phyllis?
 But you see, it isn't blarney where you're concerned.
 Come on Cyril, try a little bit of it out on me. I haven't had any first-class blarney thrown at me since the day I was married.
 Whatever it is that makes you such a riot with women.
 Line?
 Not bad, not bad at all. Do you know something? I've always been curious about your line.
 If I thought you were the slightest bit interested, I would.
 running around. Not your work.  You'd better start reforming, Cyril!
 What is?
 Here, here, here, now! Don't you go back to work on me, too. I'm getting tired of this. Besides, it's beginning to affect your looks
 Liar! You're just suffering from lack of sleep.
 Well, you can. You always could.
 For a celebrated bounder, that is an awful admission. Besides, I never knew that any female could do this to you .
 Being alone with you has always done this to me. You know that.
 Me?
 Am I? Why, I - I don't know any reason why I should be, unless of course it's you . . .
 What is the matter with you? You're trembling?
 Why, I needed a
 This won't do. Not during business hours . . .
 I guess I have said enough  I'm just wasting my breath talking to you.
 That will be just about enough! Now get out of here!
 This is my business. Mr. Dickson's been like a father to me.  What has he ever done to you to deserve a deal like this?
 Phyllis, you don't have to explain anything.  You'd do well to mind your own business.
 No?  Then maybe you'll understand, Mrs. Dickson. Oh, gee, he's crazy about you. Nobody knows it better than you. If he ever finds out, it'll kill him.
 I tell you, I'm not interested in your opinion.
 You've no right to do this to her, Mr. Cluett. Why don't you think it over? It's only gonna get you into a lot of trouble.
 I'm not interested in what you think.
 Oh no, Mr. Cluett, if it's all the same to you, I'd rather not wait. It's about you and Mrs. Dickson.
 Anything you have to say to me, you can say in the morning.
 It's funny - now that I'm here, I don't know just how to go about it.  You see, I kind of expected to find you here alone.
 I'm listening.
 Well, I thought I'd like to have a little talk with you.
 Oh, yeah?
 The butler said I could stay. I told him it was important.
 Yes, now.
 Now?
 Let me see your cash book, will you?
 Yes, sir.
 Are the payrolls ready for tomorrow?
 Well, that's too bad. Mine's all right too.
 Good morning, Mr. Dickson. My wife is much better this morning.
 Of course, let them in! You're late now.
 Shall we let the people come in?
 Thank you!
 That makes it unanimous. I feel all right too.
 I'm feeling fine this morning.
 Wait a minute.  How do you feel this morning?
 Excuse me
 Got a handkerchief?
 Much better this morning, thank you.
 John, how's your wife this morning?
 Good morning, Mr. Dickson.
 In Cluett's apartment? Well dear, you see, I . . . I . . .
 Listen, dear. Now tell me the truth about this. Were you in Cluett's apartment?
 Last night? Er - why - uh, last night . . .
 Listen, dear. I want to ask you something. I know it's a silly thing for me to ask you, but . . . I want you to tell me the truth. Where were you last night?
 No.
 Happy now?
 All right. I'll postpone the whole thing until tomorrow night.
 Tomorrow night?
 Don't you forget that I'm still the head man around here too. Now we'll get the tickets changed for tomorrow night. You and I are going out together. How's that?
 Well . . .
 Listen, don't go around being attractive to anyone but me . . .
 Ho, ho, ho, yourself! I wouldn't laugh if I were you. You may not suspect it, but I'm still attractive - to some.
 Ho! Ho! Ho!
 The girls!  I don't suppose it ever occurred to you that I might go out and find myself an attractive young man . . .
 You can take some of the girls. You can take Mildred - or Gwynn
 Yes, of course.
 That's what it was you planned, wasn't it?
 The theatre?
 Listen, it isn't so terribly important. We can go to the theatre any time.
 I don't care whether it's important or not. You said you were going out with me, and if you hadn't promised so faithfully, I wouldn't have gone and planned the whole thing.
 But I have to go, dear. It's a very important banker's meeting.
 Now Tom, you simply cannot go to Philadelphia tonight. That's all there is to it.
 I'm terribly sorry. I'd forgotten all about you. I'm so sorry, dear.
 Yes.
 Oh, I did have a date with you tonight, didn't I?
 Nothing. Tom, I thought you were going out with me tonight.
 What's the matter dear? What have I done now?
 Oooh! That has the earmarks!
 It's amazing that your sweet, lovely, gorgeous wife can ever get to see you.
 If this isn't a red-letter day for Tom Dickson! First I trample on the Board of Directors, then I promote Matt here to assistant cashier, and now to complete the day I have a visit from my sweet and lovely and gorgeous wife. What a man, what a man!
 Hello, darling.
 Well, look who's here! Hello, dear.
 Oh, no! It's not for you. You're only going to get married. Mrs. Dickson and I are going to go on the honeymoon.
 Oh!
 Say, I know what's the matter with you. Matt!
 Good morning.
 Good morning, Helen.
 Numbers? No, never mind.
 You want the rest of those numbers, Mr. Dickson?
 Yes, sir.
 Come on in here, Helen. Bring your book. I want some numbers to try to get some action. Get Parker at the Union-Leeds - the Exchange . . . Winslow and old man Harris at the Home Mortgage. Snap into it, Helen. Just as quick as you can.
 Now don't you worry about it.
 In Mr. Sampson's office.
 Where is he now?
 Oh, Mr. Dickson - they're going to arrest Matt. They think he did it!
 Yes, sir.
 Helen, tell Matt I want to see him.
 I haven't got any new stories for them this morning, either.
 Longer.
 Directors, eh? Long faces?
 Why, the directors are waiting for you in the board room.
 Ummm. Stalling, eh?  Anything new?
 Why - well, I
 Guess we'll just have to sacrifice the bank. When are you and Matt going to get married?
 I don't know.
 Helen, you're becoming more beautiful every day. What are we going to do about it?
 Good morning.
 Get Mrs. Dickson on the phone.
 Yes?
 Helen!
 All right. Send him in.
 Mr. Sampson . . .
 Yes?
 Yes, sir.
 Helen, I'm going to Philadelphia, just as soon as the bank closes. Make all the arrangements, will you?
 Yes?
 Mr. Schaffer will take good care of you. He'll give you fifteen - maybe twenty . . .
 But, Mr. Dickson, I thought you were going to take care of the mortgage. I only want ten thousand. The property is worth sixty.
 Ah, Mrs. Pembroke. I spoke to Mr. Schaffer at the Guaranty. He's going to take care of that mortgage for you . . .
 Mr. Dickson?
 Hello, Helen.
 Yes, thank you.
 Got my letter?
 Good morning, Mr. Dickson.
 Good morning, Mrs. Pembroke.
 I don't know. Mr. Sampson bought it for me.
 Looks good. How much did it cost?
 Yes, sir.
 Well, well, well - got your uniform, eh?
 Yes, sir.
 Oh, make that uniform blue.
 You see Sampson. Tell him I sent you. You've got to have a uniform.
 Why, I don't know.
 My goodness, you ought to have a uniform. How much does one cost?
 No, sir.
 You haven't got a uniform?
 I haven't any.
 Wait a minute. Where's your uniform?
 Gee, thanks, Mr. Dickson
 Helen, while you're downtown, you might stop in and make reservations for the bridal suite on the Berengaria sailing next week.
 I don't want to hear any more about it. If you don't get married, I'll fire both of you.
 But I haven't . . .
 I want you both to take the day off. Go downtown and get a license and get married right away!
 All right. That's all.  Please, Matt.
 Aw, I don't know what you're talking about. All I know is that you're losing your bank and
 She was, wasn't she? How long has this been going on? Do you know?
 Well . . . uh . . . I . . .
 Wait a minute. Answer my question. Was Mrs. Dickson there?
 Listen, Mr. Dickson, don't let them lick you just because a couple of big shots turned you down. You've got more friends than anybody in this town. Little guys - guys who wouldn't be in business if it weren't for you. All you've got to do is
 Was Mrs. Dickson there?
 Oh, I can explain about that later. You're losing your bank - don't you realize what that means?
 Were you in Cluett's apartment?
 You're not giving up, are you, Mr. Dickson?
 Why wouldn't you tell me where you were last night?
 We haven't got much time left, Mr. Dickson. We've got to do something quick or it'll be too late.
 Yes, you are. You're protecting somebody. Now listen, it doesn't make any difference who it is. It can't be as important as this. Now come on, tell me. Where were you last night?  Come on, don't be a fool. Matt, you trust me, don't you?
 No, I'm not Mr. Dickson!
 You're protecting somebody.
 No. I won't.
 I can't tell you.
 Wait a minute. Wait a minute.  Matt, do you realize you're up against something? You're being charged with murder. It's serious, son. Now come on, I know you didn't do it.  But we've got to make them believe it. Come on, tell the truth, where were you last night?
 There you are.
 I already told him I was home.
 I suppose you want me to fix that up for you too, eh?
 Well, I
 Aw, go on, forget it. You came through, didn't you? That's all I wanted. A lot of them didn't think you would. You don't know how much satisfaction it's been to me. It's been swell. Well, when are you and Helen going to get married?
 Aw, I'm sorry, Mr. Dickson. It's just kind of sudden, that's all.  Sure, I'm excited. I think it's great. Only, well, you've done so much for me already . . . I'll never be able to thank you enough.
 Say, come on. Show a little enthusiasm. What's the matter? Are you sick or something? Go on, fake it - even if it isn't real.
 Sure, I think it's swell.
 What's the matter? You don't seem very excited about it.
 And what's more, keep up the good work and who knows - some day you'll be the fellow sitting behind that desk . . .  Not a bad thought, eh?
 It's all right. Thanks.
 You don't want to check up on anybody. I'll do all the checking up. Wait a minute.
 Don't worry, Mr. Dickson. We'll find out whether he's telling the truth. I'll have a man from headquarters check up on it right away.
 You're lying!
 No wonder he didn't want to mention her name.
 My wife? What's she got to do with you?
 He's just confessed. He's been mixed up with the toughest gangsters in town.
 Why, you must be crazy. I've known this man for years.
 You were right, Mr. Dickson! Brown didn't have anything to do with it. Here's your man.
 Listen, Matt. If you don't tell the truth, I can't help you. Where were you last night?
 Of course it's true - and he knows it.
 So have you. So have I. So's everybody got a record. What difference does that make? You can't go around pinning crimes on people just because they
 Maybe. But I'm taking no chances.  Why, this kid's got a record.
 What are you talking about? He had no more to do with it than you did.
 All I know is the bank's been robbed and a murder's been committed. The way I see it, Brown here looks guilty.
 Good.  You've got nothing to worry about. Soon as the report comes in, you'll be released.  And listen, don't talk so loud. Take it easy. Coast a little.
 That's what he says. I got a man from headquarters checking up on it now.
 Why, certainly he can.  Matt, now all you've got to do is tell them where you were last night, between twelve and twelve-thirty, and everything will be all right.
 If he can do it, yes.
 All right. If the boy proves an alibi, he's all right, isn't he?
 The clock opposite the vault was stopped by a bullet at 12:09.
 What time did this thing happen?
 Yes.
 It's an inside job. That's a cinch. Whoever did it had a pretty good picture of the layout. Now Brown, here, is in charge of the vaults, isn't he?
 Why pick on him ?
 I'm afraid I must, Mr. Dickson.
 What's the matter? What's going on here?  This is ridiculous! You can't hold this boy on a vague suspicion.
 I hate to do this, but I've got to have time to dig up some help. I think I know where I can get some real cash. Snap into it, Sampson. We will lick this thing yet.
 Yes, sir.
 Get all the big bills in the place. Take them out and get them changed. Get nothing but ones and fives. Distribute them among the tellers. Tell them to take their time. Stall as much as possible. Count and recount the money.
 Mr. Dickson! Mr. Dickson!
 Don't you think I know it?
 We can't keep open till four o'clock. We haven't cash enough to last an hour.
 I'll talk to them. Listen, go back and tell the boys to stall as much as possible. Tell 'em not to pay any attention to what I said. Tell 'em to verify every signature.
 What'll we do?
 The fools! If they only knew it, they're making things worse for themselves. Somebody starts a silly rumor, and they lose their heads.
 Yes, sir. But soon as our money runs out, they'll mob the place.
 Mine too?
 Yes, sir.
 Did you get the case for the securities?
 Look at them, Mr. Dickson. They're going crazy.
 Yes, sir.
 The bank's reputation wouldn't be worth a nickel after that. This is just a flurry, that's all. They've heard about the robbery and got panic-stricken. Listen, get a hold of our available securities and have them turned into cash. Wait a minute. Get my personal stuff and have that turned into cash too. Tell the boys anyone caught arguing with a depositor will be fired on the spot.
 We haven't much on hand, you know. If it gets any worse, I hope we don't have to close the doors.
 All right. Send down to the vaults and have our reserve cash sent up here right away.
 They've been coming in steady all morning. I have called for some extra police.
 What are you talking about?
 The lobby's half filled now.
 Yes, sir.
 How about his nights? He's too busy running around. Tell him to keep tomorrow night open, come in and sign this thing, or I'll call this whole deal off.
 He says he can't get away in the daytime.
 That's just exactly what he has been doing. This deal should have been closed weeks ago. Tell him to keep tomorrow open . . .
 I'm afraid he's been stalling.
 Good. I'll take this along with me. Tell Clyde I'll see him tomorrow. I'm sick and tired of the delay.
 Here's the data on the Clyde deal.
 Well, Sampson, what is it?
 Please, lady. Please be quiet. Everything will be all right.  Open up here, folks. All right, folks, please!
 But you said it would be safe! It's his life insurance money. Oh, please, I'll go to the Old Ladies' Home if you don't do something, please!
 Quiet down, please! Take it easy, folks. Everything will be all right.
 It's his life insurance money, you know.
 Absolutely.
 Is it safe?
 Yes, ma'am, you can deposit your money here.
 All right.
 Oh, well. I guess the only other thing for me to do is to go out and buy myself a few sticks of dynamite. When he comes out, you tell him I'll be back. He hasn't gotten rid of me!
 Hardly.
 Well, take my word for it, and don't try it. It's useless!  If it were some other woman, I could handle her, but after all, you can't scratch a bank's eyes out now, can you?
 No.
 Helen, did you ever try competing with a bank?
 I'm afraid so.
 Board meeting. Oh, that means hours, I suppose.
 He's at a board meeting.
 Is that busy husband of mine busy?
 How-do-you-do, Mrs. Dickson.
 Matt, look! There's Mr. Jones!
 The big guys have got the screws on him. You've got to come through for him, Mr. Conway. He came through for you a hundred times. If his friends don't help him, who is going to help him?
 Mr. Williams . . .
 Dickson's in a jam I tell you. The run's getting worse.
 Yeah.  I got an idea. Come on, let's get to a telephone.
 Did you talk to him?
 Sure, they'd turn him down. He ought to know that. I'm going in there and talk to him.
 Yes. He called some of the biggest people in town.
 They must have turned him down.
 Something's happened. He isn't trying anymore.
 What's he doing, honey? Is he getting any help?
 Don't cry, honey. Everything's gonna be all right.
 Oh, Matt . . .
 All right, dear.
 Shh . . . !  I'll wait for you upstairs.
 Okay, honey - but just the same I'd like to take a crack at that
 Now you've got me worried, dear.  Promise me you won't butt in.
 Can you imagine that guy? He was kissing her.
 Oh now, don't be silly.
 Who? Cluett? No, not yet. But I'd like to take a crack at that stiff- necked, horse dollar.[6]
 Say Matt, you haven't done anything about what you saw today, have you?
 Oh, Charlie again.
 What's keeping you?
 Yes, right in his office, the rat. I'd like to take a crack at that guy.
 In Cluett's office?
 I tell you, I saw them!
 Oh Matt, you must be mistaken.
 Well, he was making love to her.
 Well . . . ?
 Come here.  You know, a few minutes ago I was in Cluett's office and Mrs. Dickson was there.
 What's the matter, Matt? Gee, I thought you'd be thrilled to death.
 Yeah.
 What happened? What did he say? Did you get the job?
 Yeah, swell.
 Say, I just heard the merger isn't going thru. Isn't that grand?
 Oh, Matt.
 All right, I'm lying. Don't forget you called me a liar.
 Yes.
 Oh, you think I'm lying?
 No.
 A friend of mine - yeah, really - his mother was terribly sick and she was dying, would you believe it?
 Yes.
 Oh, ten dollars
 The ten dollars.
 With what?
 What did you do with it?
 Oh, is that so?
 Hey, look out, somebody's likely to see us!
 Come here, honey!
 Why?
 Matt, come here!
 Hello, Helen!
 Yes, sir.
 Are you sure?
 He came to see Mr. Cluett.
 He was here?
 He was in the bank yesterday.
 Yes, why?
 Did you say Dude Finlay?
 Yes, sir.
 Dude Finlay?
 He left here about an hour ago and went down to Dude Finlay's joint.
 Never mind all that. What did you find out?
 I've been trailing the cashier like you told me. You're right about that guy, chief. There's something screwy somewhere.
 What did you find out, Mike?
 That's all, Mrs. Halligan. Thanks.
 Listen here, young man - nobody ever called me a liar yet and got away with it
 There you are!
 No - because me clock struck four, and when it strikes four, it's one.
 Yes, I know. Cause the Dooley sisters weren't in yet.
 No. It wasn't earlier because...
 It couldn't have been earlier?
 Yes, I guess it was one, 'cause...
 Was it twelve o'clock?
 That's just what I'm trying to tell you, sir. It was a half hour after the Dooley sisters . . .
 I don't care about the Dooley sisters - what time did he get in?
 Now, let me see - a half hour after the Dooley sisters - and the Dooley sisters never get home until after
 What time did Matt Brown get in?
 Huh?
 What time was it?
 It was late, I know. The Dooley sisters was already in. They work at a show, you know.
 What time was it, Mrs. Halligan?
 for the rheumatism, you know.
 Sure I do. He has the best room in me house. The one with the fancy wallpaper.
 Do you know this young man, Mrs. Halligan?
 Then where were you?
 But I wasn't here, Mr. Dickson. Honest I wasn't . . .
 Yes.
 Eleven o'clock, eh? Are you sure it was that?
 Well, about - uh - eleven o'clock.
 What time did you get in?
 Yes.
 So you were home last night?
 I don't know.
 Then who changed it?
 You used to carry a gun, didn't you?
 I didn't do it! I haven't got a gun!
 Sit down! When the watchman surprised you, you shot him - what'd you do with the gun?
 wasn't anywhere near this place
 You turned off the burglar alarm, you set the time clock, came back at twelve and emptied the boxes, didn't you?
 They're starting to come in already. Yeah. Yeah. Well, listen. Don't waste any time. Get all the money you can lay your hands on, and bring it down here right away. Step on it.
 Certainly, Mr. Jones! Certainly! Charlie!
 Charlie's upstairs as sore as a pup. He's out fourteen cents, and he can't find it.
 Where's Charlie?
 I guess so.
 Everybody in?
 Bought himself a pocketbook!
 Yeah, what did he do with his first one?
 That mug reminds me of a guy with his second dollar.
 You've got enough?
 I'm okay, Matt.
 How are you fixed?
 Okay, Matt.
 You're carrying too much money on you, Hank. You better turn some in tonight.
 Now you tell us.
 Sometimes a wound will kill.
 This is healing?
 Jim Younger, I told you--
 I couldn't lose him.
 Tom, I'm this close to coming with you...
 I think I may just go on to the reservation.
 I said like a Comanche, not this Comanche.
 You can ride like that?
 It's tougher than it looks.
 He's not bad at it.
 Things changed when you quit the gang. For example, I'm now the one who says "Let's ride."
 You're just upset about Jesse. We all are.
 I'm sorry, Cole.
 Swear on Jimmy's grave.
 I swear --
 Swear.
 Bob. I didn't...
 WHAT HAVE YOU DONE?!
 I ain't done --
 What have you done?
 How'd they --
 Leave me alone, Bob.
 Cole, we're outlaws. Not exactly the most respectable job, if you know what I mean.
 As long as people think Jesse's still riding, we will never get the respect we deserve.
 That was because of... the reputation the gang had.
 It's still taking too long. The people used to snap to.
 This is the best score yet.
 What?
 That's what the newspapers say. Weren't for Jesse James, this gang wouldn't be able to find a goat's ass with a stick.
 Frankly, yes. I'm feeling a little left out.
 We got a problem here, brother?
 Say we bust into a bank. We yell "We're the Younger-James Gang!" People are gonna be thinking, "The younger James Gang? Is there an older James Gang? How come we never heard of the older James gang?" So people are trying to figure that out instead of raising their arms.
 How?
 No, Jimmy has a point. The Younger-James Gang could be confusing.
 You stay out of this, Bob.
 Uhh, yeah it does.
 Better pass them over here before something happens to 'em.
 These are deeds and mortgages of farms the bank was holding for the railroad.
 I say we ride into town and kill us some Pinkertons and railroad men.
 The sheriff says it was a gang of drunk Kansas boys.
 Our place, Clell Miller's, Sammy Johnston, the Creeders. Will Hite.
 Zee, I'm pleased you came.
 Here's Liberty's favorite son!  I'll never forget what you did, cousin.
 That was two hours ago.
 Your Ma wouldn't let us leave until we ate something.
 Anywhere nobody's shooting at me is pretty.
 Never thought that pissant town would look so pretty.
 Never a good thing.
 He's smiling.
 Dammit, this stopped being fun about two years ago!
 Gatling! They've got a Gatling!
 Tomorrow.
 The Army can hang him.
 They said because the detectives were working for the Department of the Interior --
 Damn!
 He just lost his temper a little.
 Oh no...
 They came up, made the same offer they made you folks. Our little brother Jim tried to chase 'em off, one of those detectives hit him in the head, knocked him out. Cole lost his temper.
 Stop by our spread after that, tell our Ma we're all right. We'll go to Doc Mimms.
 Cole, I want to get to the farm, make sure Little Jim and the girls are okay.
 ... Will Perry ...
 Jesus mercy, that's Charlie Higgins, Dave Laller ...
 Then I love it.
 Nope.
 Corn gonna shoot at me?
 Well, somebody better go tell THE DAMN YANKEES!
 Yesterday.
 I can hit those boys from here. We just need a distraction.
 My plan of lying here pissing myself seems to be working mighty fine, thank you.
 Tell me.
 Listen, he's my brother and I don't want to start trouble...
 What?
 He's planning a job.
 He's been full of vinegar lately.
 Listen, Jesse, we've got a problem.  It's Cole.
 You are a fine figure of a man.
 The things a fella has to do to get a little respect around here...
 Yes. I am obviously not standing out in people's minds at the robberies.
 This is about the "Wanted!" Posters, isn't it.
 You heard me, Jesse. You know how crazy I get!
 Beg pardon?
 One false move and I'll blow your heads off!
 Okay, folks, I think we know how this is going to go...
 "Bank officials estimate the loss at fifty thousand dollars."
 Hey!
 "The outlaws calling themselves the James-Younger Gang shot their way out of town, wounding the Sherriff and three other townsfolk."
 We oughta take some of this, give it to our neighbors in Liberty. Lot of people hurting up there.
 Well, no, Jesse, it was the bank's. That's why we had to go to all that trouble of stealing it.  You explain it to him.
 All right, settle down. All this money ain't ours.
 Exactly.
 But if we take their money and supplies...
 Not yet. But I'm hoping.
 You have no shame.
 Two.
 How many of them did he kill?
 Best damn plan I heard all war.
 Home. We go home. We ride like hell to get there, and we kill anything or anyone that comes between us and our homes. And when we get there we stay there and God help any fool who tries to get me to leave my farm again.
 No, really. You're wife said she needed some help, seeing as you were so fat you couldn't find your --
 You shut up now, boy.
 I think I saw you leavin' by the front door just as I was coming in the back.
 How?
 I think I recognize you.
 What you sayin' boy?
 You, ya barrel of pork lard. Here piggy piggy!
 What?
 We didn't. Zerelda did. Turns out your wife makes a hell of an outlaw.
 Where'd you get all these riders?
 Pff. All we been through, the thought never crossed my mind.
 You know, you gettin' caught, right after leaving us, some people thought --
 Missed you too, cousin.
 Missed you, cousin.
 Who's next? You? Me? Bob?
 WHAT?! We follow you for a year, and now that our blood's been spilled, you're gonna quit?!
 I'm out.
 We'll make them pay for this.
 Pass me some whisky.
 Bob, rip up some bandages.
 Clell, Tom, go get Doc Mimms in Liberty!
 Okay, you're gonna rest here.
 A trap.
 Dammit!
 You'll be smiling once you've got all that money to spend, cousin.  Cole Younger's going to make everybody rich!
 Fine. We hit this bank.
 Then let me run the show, General Lee.
 Still smells fishy.
 And I'm the better outlaw.
 I'm the better soldier, Jesse.
 That's it.
 And almost got hanged in peacetime.
 I got us through the War all right.
 A bad idea.
 Now the one time one of us comes up with an idea --
 Beautiful.
 You're forgetting who's in charge --
 I've robbed just as many banks as you have! I know this town, and I know this bank, and I say it's an easy job.
 What are you saying?
 If you'd read about it first, you'd have no problems.
 Smells funny, it being mentioned in the paper.
 What will be?
 It'll be the biggest score yet.
 Hold on, hold on, we all know Bob is an important part of the gang.
 This is your fault for hogging all the publicity.
 Why aren't we the "Younger-James Gang"? I mean, there's three Younger brothers and only two James brothers here.
 Yep.
 All the posters and newspapers are calling this bunch the "James-Younger Gang."
 Sure, cousin.
 Jesse, we got to have a word.
 Twenty?!
 "The Fidelity Bank and Trust was robbed on Tuesday by a gang of twenty heavily armed men."
 It's better. It's a construction depot. They'll have the strongbox and some ammo and explosives for us to take. That way we can take on a bigger job.
 It's not a bank.
 Just because he reads all those books and knows all those big words doesn't make him smart.
 See, Frank's being smart about this.
 I got three.
 I got seven thousand.
 Don't let it happen again.
 Sorry.
 The James-Younger Gang.
 Let's ride.
 Perfect, Cole.
 I'll pick the first job! I mean... I know a girl down at the bank. See if she can't get a list of towns where the railroad keeps its money.
 Just like in the war. Harass their supply lines. We kill the railroad's men, they won't care.
 So what do we do, General Lee?
 This isn't a feud, this is war. They've got more men than we do. We kill detectives, they can replace 'em in a day.
 Yeah.
 Because we were good at it?  Hell, we were great at it. Jesse, don't tell anyone I said this, because everybody knows I'm the toughest man in this town, but you are one terrifying sonofabitch with those guns.
 But it was a whole lot of killing. Why should we miss that?
 It was exciting.
 The war? What, are you crazy?  There are things I miss about it.
 After all you did on our farm?  You miss it, don't you Jesse?
 Thanks for the help.
 All right, calm down. I'll agree Sadie was a woman --
 She was European!
 She had a moustache.
 She got two of them.
 You ever notice Zerelda's eyes?
 In case we have to kill these sonofabitches, I don't want them to see us coming.
 What is wrong with you?
 Not now.
 Pick your fights, cousin. You taught me that.
 You're not scared, are you?
 Hands off your hip, Cole.
 Planting corn. Harvesting corn. Year after year.
 Home, boys. Back to our farms.
 There's Yankees back there. Lot's of 'em.
 Where you boys going?
 Suit yourself. We'll have some horses waiting for you at the road.  Let's ride, Rangers!
 I could use the walk.
 Ride with me, cousin?
 What's going on?
 'Bout time you got here, buddy.
 I'm thinking...
 Well?
 Hmm. Go back to the reservation and get drunk in a dirt shack, or work for you...
 Tom, why don't you stop at our spread before you head on out to the reservation? Figure we might have some work for you, if you want.
 You ride like a Comanche.
 Wait'll we get back to Missouri, start telling those gals about how little Jesse James charged the whole Union Army by himself!
 You pay me to find you Bluecoats. There they are.
 Some Indian tracker you turned out to be, Tom.
 They're just insurance in case we run.
 They gonna rush us?
 Another dozen out back.
 Cole, he didn't mean that.
 Oh, you're in charge? We ain't partners any more, Jesse? You tell Cole Younger where and when to ride?
 Jesse.
 -- Exactly. Because this is a war.
 Strategically.
 Hey! We decide something, that's it! We're in this for the long haul, and this idea of me and Jesse's will help give us more places to hide out without worrying about some farmer with a shotgun sneakin' up on us in our sleep. We've got to think --
 Get buckets!
 BASTARDS! Come back here and face me!
 Ah.
 Shakespeare.  He's European.
 I have no idea what you just said, but it sounded real nice.
 Sadie was not a man!
 Oh, Lord, the dance hall girl at Bunty's...
 The brown one.
 Which one, right or left?
 I think one of 'em's glass.
 Must be a garrison in town. We're in occupied territory, boys.
 What the --
 Soon as I hit one, the other'll know and beat us up.
 Both would be nice.
 Cannon or Gatling?
 All right, all right.  Jesse James never yelled at folk...
 OPEN THE DAMN SAFE!
 This here is the Younger Gang!
 Where is Jesse James?
 What?
 Of course!  Uh, sir?
 The safe. Now.
 Me get heap firewater --
 Go ahead to the saloon. But don't get too drunk!
 Ho-yah!
 East? East above the river heading for the Eagle Pass?
 Ho-yah. Him say tell Big Lawman in Carville that badman Jesse James riding toward Rising Sun, above Great River, near Eagle Rock.
 Of St. Louis?
 The District Marshall
 Great Chief of St. Louis send me.
 Yeah, Injun. What do you want?
 You 'um big lawman?
 I'd appreciate that.
 Fine. I'll just wait here.
 It's a secret.
 Oh. Why didn't you just say so?
 On account of we're robbing it.
 Then why can't I go in there?
 You're right, sir.
 I know it ain't no durned bank holiday!
 Shit.
 I had you covered.  From back there.
 Where the hell were you?
 When have you ever known Old Man Tucker not to be yelling at everybody?
 So?
 Old Man Tucker is just standing quiet outside the bank.
 What is it?
 What the --
 It's fine by me, Jesse.
 Yesss, but I was thinking, I could come by, and then take Zee out. Some place near. With other folk. Near. Here.  But out.
 You know you're welcome any time!
 Go on. You're pretty much all healed up.
 What do you say, sir?
 Go home, Doc.  They ain't gonna hang no more Liberty boys.
 Boys...
 Died a hero.
 Web died fighting?
 Pff. He jumped his horse clear over our heads, killed a dozen Union soldiers before they knew what hit them.
 My little Web did that?
 -- rode right into them, screaming like a banshee.
 I'm upset too, Zee, but Jesse and Cole know what they're doing. I'm sure they won't press their luck.
 He thinks this is some kind of game!
 I think he's already feeling better.
 Well, I hope the boy pulls through. We should know in the morning.
 I fooled them into thinking I was alone.
 They're gone. What are you --
 The bullet came out clean, but he lost a whole lot of blood. Praying wouldn't hurt.
 He's going to be fine, right Daddy?
 Zerelda, it's no coincidence. The railroad men come through, offering to buy up land. Nobody sells. Then they start hanging men who own farms for treason?
 Daddy, don't start with this again.
 Hell, they hardly even noticed us.
 See you soon. Oh, and I appreciate the distraction back there.
 I'll meet you down there in a few weeks.
 I'm sure it seemed like a good idea at the time.
 A war against the railroad. What the hell were we thinking?
 Yeah.
 You're a piss-poor liar for the smartest man I know.
 Railroad burned him out too. You couldn't have stopped him.
 He was a boy riding with the most famous outlaws in the West. How was he supposed to say no to that?
 Jim was old enough...
 Shoulda learned with Web. Made it look fun, made it look like an adventure. Got Web killed. Now Jim.
 Got any ideas, little brother?
 They're all pinned down. Can't even get to the door.
 No, I --
 You taking sides against me, now, Frank?
 Just do me a favor. Think about what this is costing everybody. Not just the railroad.
 Oh yeah.
 We're drunk.
 A better life than the one you could have had with Zee?
 What do you want me to say, Frank? I was killing men when I was fifteen. I like getting shot at. I like riding out of town with a posse at my back. This is a helluva better life than farming.
 Maybe it started out that way. But now...
 We're doing this for Ma.
 I can't quit and leave you alone. I can't quit until you quit. Ma would've wanted it that way.
 That's a lie. You could've bought a dozen farms with the money we've stolen.
 If I could go back to farming --
 You've killed your fair share of men.
 It got to you, didn't it. All the killing in the war. You need it now.
 And we're good at it.
 Jesse, we're outlaws.
 This has been a good year.
 Bob here'll kill a man for sneezing, and he's the best shot in the gang.
 Pardon the delay, folks, but we had to get Mad Bob Younger under control!
 The posters?
 Bob's upset.
 Gents, we are in the middle of something here.
 It's the scientific method. It's all the rage.
 I don't think it's counterfeit. Do you mind if I take a look at all your real bills to compare?
 And I do so want to shoot some Pinkerton detectives.
 And it's guarded by Pinkerton detectives.
 And that's why you both lead the gang. Two of you went into that bank together, right?
 And I planned getting you off the hangman's deck --
 We're gonna have to talk...
 Fine. How'd it go out here?
 How'd it go in there?
 Make a thousand of 'em. Still won't be enough by the time I'm through.
 Didn't think you would.  I'm going to go make the coffin.
 Don't care.
 ... We could move on. Rebuild. Make a decent life someplace else.
 Ma.
 Pinkertons. It's the railroad.
 Shut up.  Uh, Doc, I was wondering if, uh, this evening, I could come by?
 You're looking a bit more spry now that somebody --
 Would you get in the carriage? Until Ma has you home so she can fuss over you herself, she's gonna make me miserable.
 What do you think?
 You ready to stop loafing around with this young lady and get back to farming?
 Damn. All that reading paid off.
 I went up to the courthouse and looked at the right of way documents for the rail bed. The railroad doesn't even need our land, they're just taking the land on both sides for as far as they can.
 Heard of him.
 You know him?
 Your Zee? Hmm.  "From women's eyes this doctrine I derive: they sparkle still the right Promethean fire; They are the books, the arts, the academes, that show, contain, and nourish all the world."
 -- if you stop saying things about my Zee.
 What worries me is that Jesus is talking back.
 She's still talking to Jesus.
 Next time try "fat and haggard."
 I swear I'll shoot you in your sleep.
 You are a charmer.
 You can shut up now.
 "Big and older"?
 Maybe, maybe...
 That just might work.
 What kind of story are they going to believe?
 Think about this. If we just come up with a story and stick to it, we should be all right.
 All we thought about was coming home. I swore I'd kill anybody who tried to get me off my farm again. If I have to go to war with the railroad to stay, fine by me.
 Saved all our lives, Doc. None of the Liberty boys would have come home if not for Web Mimms, Doc. God's honest truth.
 Whyyyy... he took down the Gatling gun and the cannon all by himself.
 Zee, we got to talk to you and your father.
 You're doing just fine.
 Frank, don't you have something to say?
 We better go to Doc's, see what's going on here.
 Looks like Web Mimms wasn't the only casualty this town's got.
 All this time in the saddle... We get to the farm, I'm going to shoot this damn horse just on principle.
 Hello, Liberty Missoura!
 I'm sure it seemed like a good idea at the time.
 Hell of a war.
 I reckoned.
 Web's dead.
 No, Jesse, your problem is you're always doing stuff before I'm finished figuring it out.
 See, that's your problem, Frank. By the time you finish figuring out stuff, I'm already finished doing it.
 I figure.
 That would have made an impression.
 You could have worn one of those big, floppy woman's Easter Sunday hats.
 Such as?
 Mm-hmm.
 So you're saying I could have done more to attract their attention.
 Pff. They hardly even noticed you.
 Distracting enough for you?
 So we got a plan?
 Every time I put my head up to hit that Gatling, they try to shoot it off.
 Everything but the boring parts.
 How much of that story is true?
 Yeah Jimmy?
 Uncle Frank?
 I think... he was just a real interestin' fella to have around.
 So what was he?
 Can't argue that.
 But he killed a lot of men, too.
 Saved a lot of folk from the railroad.
 They're making him a hero now.
 That he was.
 Sounds like he was a hell of a man.
 Allow a man his version of the past. When you get to be my age, you've got enough painful memories, you're allowed to soften a few of the edges up.
 I know. But that's how it should have ended. Your Dad and Mom, riding off into a new life, growing old together, happy.
 ...every time you tell that story, you stop there. That's not how it ended. I was five when my dad got shot.
 Yeah, Jimmy?
 Y'know, Uncle Frank...
 Shush.
 Doc Mimms will --
 Take care of each other, boys. You say your prayers.
 We know, Ma. Now we got to get you to Doc Mimms.
 Riders --
 Boys?
 Ma! Please!
 Somebody's in a vengeful smiting mood today.
 The Lord says we can bury 'em out back in the orchard, nobody'll ever find them.
 We're just fine, thank you, sir.
 Easterners.
 He's a good Christian and he killed Yankees. Jesus told me that made him an all right boy.
 Ma, I'm glad to see you being nice to our Injun friend.
 Say your prayers?
 A fair number, Ma.
 Did you kill Yankees?
 I'll explain on the way.
 Tennessee?
 Yes ma'am.
 Don't swear.
 You are a hell of a woman.
 I can't believe I had to blow up a train for you.
 Yes ma'am.
 You get arrested again, I'll kill you.
 If you don't see it, it's not real...
 What?
 Don't turn around.
 Swimming. Swimming is good.
 Stop it. This is just sad.
 Aw, shucks, ma'am...
 Jesse, have you ever noticed that when you're trying to charm your way out of trouble, your accent gets all farm boy?
 Now, sweetie, y'all wouldn't go believing one of them silly dime novels, would you?
 Oh, I'm not finished.  "When he sauntered into a saloon, his spurs jangling and his pockets full of gold, the ladies flocked around him like flies to a candied apple."  As I said. Hmm.
 Let me see that.
 "Blazing Guns of the West. True Stories of Jesse James." Only a dime in the hotel lobby.
 I beg your pardon?
 "But the life of the James Gang wasn't all robbing and shooting and killing, for these young Missouri bucks had a taste for the ladies... especially the handsome and charismatic Jesse James."
 "Hmm" what?
 Hmm.
 Now wait a minute. There are certain things that have to wait until after the wedding.
 I've got you. You keep me busy. I figure we'll get over to the hotel... get checked in, cleaned up... then I'd like to do something I've been thinking about for a long time.
 Are you going to be happy here, Mr. James? Without all that excitement?
 That's why I picked it. We can start a whole new life down here.
 I would never have imagined us in a place like this.
 She's beautiful. Smart. And has the biggest... buck teeth in all of Missouri.
 That's... wonderful. It's just... I thought...
 She's the most wonderful woman in the world. Can't get her out of my mind.
 I don't understand.
 I had to see you. I'm getting married.
 Jesse. What are you thinking? There are bounty hunters and lawmen all over this county!
 Zee.
 When my name makes them cry in their sleep. When I've brought them to ashes.
 Whose justice? Yours or God's?  When will you stop?
 Laws don't touch men like Thaddeus Rains. Only justice does.
 Let the law --
 Me neither.
 You and I, we've started... something, you know?  I don't know what'll happen if you do this.
 Frank and me have to go away for a while.
 I am so sorry, Jesse.
 I've been planning on kissin' you for a very long time.
 Were you planning on kissing me when you finished quoting?
 Yep.
 Is this one of Frank's Shakespeare poems you're trying to quote?
 Little ones.
 Sparkling rocks?
 Ahem. "From this doctrine..." No, ah... "From women's eyes this doctrine I derive, they sparkle still like ... shiny... sparkling rocks..."
 Honestly, you'd do if only you had the buck teeth.
 Where will you find such a girl?
 Smart. Funny. Bossy. Always makes me think she's two steps ahead of me. And big buck teeth.
 And what's this right girl like?
 Not if I find the right girl.
 You planning on being a bachelor your whole life, Jesse James?
 Mostly. It would be an all right life, for a bachelor.
 Thank God you grew out of that.  You did grow out of that, didn't you?
 Arr. Hand over your jewels, Missy.
 A river pirate.
 I was thinking more along the lines of being a river pirate.
 You didn't want to farm?
 I used to come to this tree when I was a kid and imagine what my life would be like when I got older.
 Unfair. You are completely unfair.
 So you're saying I should leave you alone and go spend time with Jimmy Younger?
 I wasn't the only one risking my neck that day.
 Everybody in the county knows it was you who rescued Cole. We're all so proud of you, Jesse. And not a single farm's been sold to the railroad since. You're everybody's hero.
 What?
 I shouldn't tease a hero.
 What you do to me is unfair. The teasing, I mean.
 Teasing you is completely unfair.
 No! I mean, of course not. No.
 You're sick of my company?
 I've been on my back two weeks. I'm sick of it.
 You shouldn't be up.
 Nuh-huh ...
 Jesse, is that your hand?
 Mmmm.
 Jesse, are you awake?
 If there's anything we can do for you, Dr. Mimms. We want to help.
 But still died.
 But you got big!
 You were little Jesse James when you left.
 Zerelda? Little Zee Mimms?
 Fair enough.
 I'd just as soon kill you, Jesse James. But chasing you takes up too much of my time.
 Thanks.
 The railroad has no business in Tennessee. Therefore I have no interest in the state of Tennessee.
 He's too important, James.  They'll set the army on you. You and your wife.
 That was for my Ma. Now this is for everybody else.
 No, I'll hang you.  But I may miss you just a bit.
 Ahh, you'll miss me.
 You cocky little bastard.
 I'm not hanged yet.
 That's what I would have done.
 Should have just killed Thaddeus Rains and been done with it.
 Was it worth it?
 I figured.
 Oh. That's nice to know.  We're going to hang you, you know.
 No, that one was close. A couple fellas quit after that one.
 I went myself to oversee the operation. Didn't help much.
 Almost got me in Billings. I saw you there, shooting at me.
 Damn.
 The cows had a brand from a farm just five miles out of town.
 Yes?
 You had all those cattle there, so I'd think the extra men were in town from the cattle drive?
 Mmm.
 Last February?
 How did you spot the ambush in Torrell?
 Pity.
 You almost ended my career before it began.
 Not that day. I am guilty of many things, but that was Mr. Thaddeus Rains and Parker, that day.
 Did you order our houses burned down?
 That's the idea.
 So I'll get a fair trial in front of a jury bought off by Thaddeus Rains?
 Oh, it's a similar room. But the hotel is in Washington D.C. You're not going to get a fair trial down here, in front of a jury of Jesse James sympathizers.
 But I like the presidential suite.
 We're moving you tomorrow.
 Communion.
 Right here in church?
 Now let's have a drink.
 Who needs to repair a leaky church roof.
 Thank you.
 Discretion? Sir, I am a man of the cloth.
 I could have lied I suppose, but I want this marriage to be legal. I just want you to know, I'm trying to start a new life here. I'm depending on your...
 The Lord is remarkably tolerant of the charitable.  "Jesse Woodson James." Jesse James? The Jesse James?
 You don't think God'll mind, do you?
 This is unusual. Most of our marriages are members of the congregation.
 You're gonna tell her when you're resting up in bed with her, Jimmy.
 Jesse, you explain to Lyla. My girl, you know, from that time...
 This time we'll make an exception.
 ... too young for whisky...
 It's his money.  He's putting up the payroll out of his own fortune. You do want to hurt Thaddeus Rains, don't you Jesse?
 What about that Rock Island bastard?
 You do that.
 Tell you something else.  I can't drink that good neither. I'm going to go outside and throw up.
 I swear.
 You and Frank and Cole, and even Bob, get all these girls because you're good looking and famous. You don't have to pay. They just look at me like I'm the baby brother.  Don't tell anyone, okay Jesse?
 I think so.
 Hell yeah! I been with...  Uh, not exactly. It's just, I don't want to get one of these paid ladies, you know?
 You been with a girl ever?
 Well, not exactly.
 Tonight? Why, I'm just getting ready to turn on the Younger charm.
 Jim, you been with a girl yet?
 I was always jealous Web Mimms got to go off and fight with you and Cole. Now it's my turn.
 I guess so.
 Not too young to shoot a man, not to young to drink.
 Yeah. Hey, are you drinking whisky? You're too young to be drinking whisky.
 You okay, Jesse?
 No.
 I like that.
 And the same age Web was. No.
 I'm the same age you were when you went off to war.
 And you're too young.
 Don't talk about it much, though.
 Really?
 Devereux. My brother Cole dated a European girl once.
 That is so gentlemanly of you.
 Why don't we get a bottle of sherry to sip while we talk?
 Could we go upstairs and talk? It's so loud down here.
 Gosh, that's a pretty name. Buy you a drink?
 Lyla Devereux.
 Thank you, Miss -- ?
 I just though you were awful cute.
 Not at all.
 I hope I'm not being too forward.
 Really?
 Yes, but just so I could find out who you were.
 Oh, you were talking to Jesse.
 I hope you don't mind, Jesse James told me your name.
 Why, yeah.
 Move you fools!
 There's only four of them...
 They donate money to farmers, to churches. Rumor has it they gave the sharecroppers of Maddox so much money they were able to build a school.
 How can that be?
 By burning down their homes?
 They had to be dealt with!
 My professional opinion is that you have managed to piss off the wrong bunch of farm boys this time.
 It's not my job to relax. I've put men facing out both ways down Main Street, so nobody can ride in shooting. I've got a sharpshooter up on the water tower just in case.
 Relax, Alan. The Army has this all in hand. And Mr. Thaddeus Rains will be very pleased with this news. Nothing like a hanging to motivate the populace to relocate.
 I'm doing you folks a favor --
 Well, this land is about to be condemned.
 Not such a menace now, is he, Pinkerton?
 How did you know?
 I remember you.
 This is him.
 Oh, that. I'll let Jenkins explain.
 That.
 What, sir?
 What is that?
 Sir?
 Parker.
 I look forward to seeing it.
 The final route for the railroad is complete.
 We should go burn that school to the ground, sir!
 With my money!
 What is going on here, man?
 Your men knew the risks.
 We did.
 THEN WHO DID?!
 To be precise, they didn't blow up the tracks.
 I'll kill them for blowing up my railway!
 Thirty-five thousand, sir. Coins and currency. And the delay from the miles of destroyed track --
 How much did they get from the safe?
 They exchanged fire with the Pinkerton Guards, killing several of them. Then they raided the payroll office and blew the tracks for half a mile.
 I'll teach these podunks what happens when they challenge the righteousness of progress.
 I see. I'll get together four patrols of our detectives for action tonight.
 You see the Army leaving and you see the loss of a tool. I see a power void to be filled. As we have the most power, we may move with impunity.
 A further impediment is that the Army garrison has been ordered to move on from Liberty. We will no longer have that particular stick with which to threaten the farmers.
 Just perfect.
 Yes sir.
 Leaving you in charge of operations until he recovers.
 Unfortunately not, sir. A gang of local thugs managed to rescue him from the gallows. Not only has this inspired resistance from the other farmers, the redoubtable Mr. Alan Pinkerton was seriously injured during the incident.
 Good.
 Two weeks ago, we managed to arrange to have the Army hang one of the local farmers.
 Parker, tell me what's going on so I can return as quickly as possible to Boston and my whores and cigars, not necessarily in that order.
 I can completely understand your distress, sir.
 NO! It is NOT my pleasure to have to leave my board room to come to this godforsaken piece of dirt to discover why in the name of all that is holy you cannot seem to evict a few simple farmers from their PATHETIC LITTLE MUDHOLES so that I may build the GREATEST railroad that this country has ever seen!
 Really!
 And it is my pleasure to be here.
 Mr. Thaddeus Rains, sir, it is a pleasure to have you join us in the field.
 Vengeance.
 What the hell is that sound?
 Why, their intense hatred of you, of course.
 What is that?
 No need. I have another tool at my disposal which will narrow it down to one bank.
 Can you put men at all four?
 There are only four banks within that travel radius which they have not robbed.
 In English, Pinkerton.
 Every three months, the James Gang circles back to the vicinity of Liberty, Missouri. They always pull a job right before they return, probably to have extra money to give family and friends.
 No.
 So he's won.
 It's going to be a long spring.
 Can't you tell me anything?
 No, you demand results. They are not the same thing. And if you want results, you will let me do my job as I see fit. Unless of course,  You want this fool to saddle up and take another run at it?
 I demand action.
 Yes, that's the way to win the locals back to our side.
 And there are some towns in Missouri where James and his men can walk openly, as heroes.
 I can't believe this.
 First of all: you, shut up.  Now, you've given me a thousand miles of railroad to cover. Every time the James Gang strikes, we shift a hundred detectives to that area. But there's just too much open land, too many riverbeds to ride, caves to hide in. This gang operates across four states, often riding a hundred miles between jobs.
 All of the James Gang's encounters have been with local law enforcement who, quite frankly, are no match for this group's cunning.
 Pinkerton. It's been eight months. I see robberies. I see hold ups. But I do not see men on the end of nooses.
 It's going to be a long winter.
 So you can't tell me anything?
 Hardly farmers. I've done some checking. All these were in the War. These men know sabotage, tactics, and have four years of bloody fighting experience behind them. They are disciplined, well-trained and have a charismatic leader. If I were to design the perfect outlaw band, this gang is what I would create.
 I'm losing millions of dollars and months of time while you play chess with these farmers!
 It's early in the game yet, Mr. Rains. Jesse James and I are just learning how each other moves, feeling out each other's patterns.
 Oh, that's the best part.
 "The gang made off with thirty-five thousand dollars and also destroyed the Thaxton Switch construction, meaning that for a few months honest farmers will be able to sleep without fearing the railroad is coming to steal their land!"  Who wrote this!? I'll see him hanged every Tuesday for a month!
 It is a nice piece of writing.
 "A Rock Island and Pacific Railroad depot was robbed two nights ago just outside St. Louis, Missouri. The brave and daring James-Younger Gang was heavily outnumbered by Pinkerton detectives, but the city lawmen were no match for the guns of the West."
 I'm afraid our adversaries don't agree.
 This is no game.
 Would a jury around here convict their own? I think not. We're beginning an interesting game here, Mr. Rains.
 I want them arrested and hanged!
 Oh no, I would have done that. But I would have made sure I killed them, too.
 You wouldn't have done that?
 Not to mention my men who lost their lives.
 Look at this, Pinkerton! They got the payroll, and this damage will set construction back two months at least.
 Nothing.
 Yes?
 Patrick?
 Yes, Courtney?
 Isn't that special?  Patrick?
 You look marvelous. There's nothing to say. You're going to marry Luis. Next week, no Less.
 Listen...Patrick. Can we talk?
 You never noticed.
 I never knew you smoked.
 We were supposed to have dinner at Tad and Maura's, but-you know how Luis is...
 You and...Luis?
 That's nice.
 Dinner at the River Cafe. Au Bar afterwards, maybe.
 What are you doing tonight?
 Maybe.
 Will you call me before Thanksgiving?
 Oh God, just get it over with.
 See? Happy? You dumb bitch? Are you happy, you dumb bitch?
 Well, it's not a turn-on for me. I have a promotion coming to me. I don't want to get AIDS.
 Oh Christ, this really isn't worth it. And see, Courtney, it's there for what? Huh? Tell us.  Why is it pulled down half an inch? So it can catch the force of the ejaculate!
 Because you have to leave half an inch at the tip   to catch the force of the ejaculate! BATEMAN I'm getting out of here. Where's your lithium?
 Why?
 Take it off.
 It's a plain end, see? So?
 Patrick. Turn on the Light. He turns on the light.
 Oh Jesus. I'm going home.
 Turn the light on.
 It's a plain end. I think.
 What do you want, Courtney?
 Pull out, goddamnit!
 I'm ignoring you.
 Pull out.
 Is it a what?
 No, you idiot. I said "Is it a receptacle tip?" Not, is Luis a despicable twit. Is it a receptacle tip? Get off me.
 Yes, Luis is a despicable twit. I hate him.
 Luis is a despicable twit.
 Mmmm...thanks, Patrick.
 Courtney, you're going to have the peanut butter soup with smoked duck and mashed squash. New York magazine called it a 'playful but mysterious little dish." You'll love it. And then...the red snapper with violets and pine nuts. I think that'll follow nicely.
 Yes, dear.
 This is Dorsia?
 Yes.
 Are we here?
 Champagne on the rocks. Oh-could I have that with a twist? She starts to sink back in her chair and Bateman leans over and pulls her back up.
 J&B. Straight.
 I just want to have a child. Just...two... perfect...children...
 You know, Courtney, you should take some more lithium. Or have a Diet Coke. Some caffeine might get you out of this slump.
 Oh God, Patrick. Shut up.
 Is that Donald Trump's car?
 A facial at Elizabeth Arden, which was really relaxing, then to the Pottery Bam where I bought this silver muffin dish.
 Sounds like I'll have to. Don't fall asleep, okay? Wear something fabulous. Dorsia, remember?
 Pick me up?
 Eight?
 Okay. Yeah. What time?
 The question is do you like it, Courtney? And will you blow off a fucking phone call from your sad excuse for a boyfriend to eat there tonight.
 You like it there, don't you?
 Nice?
 Dorsia's nice.
 I'm thinking Dorsia.
 I can't.
 Courtney? Dinner?
 Patrick don't call me pumpkin anymore, okay? I have to go.
 Pumpkin, you're dating a tumbling, tumbling dickweed.
 I know. Stop it.
 Pumpkin you're dating the biggest dickweed in New York.
 Uh huh.
 Pumpkin you're dating an asshole.
 Yes?
 Pumpkin?
 Ummm . . yeah. Luis is calling me tonight. I need to be home for that.
 Am I confused or were we talking about tonight?
 You should come have dinner with me. COURTNEY But-when?
 Waiting for Luis to call me. He said he'd call tonight. Oh don't be difficult, Patrick.
 On a lot of lithium?
 Stop it. I'm...
 Listen, you're dating Luis, he's in Arizona. You're fucking me, and we haven't made plans. What could you possibly be up to tonight?
 What? Oh, I'm...busy.
 Listen, what are you doing tonight?
 It's not that nice.
 This is nicer than your other apartment.
 Oh, lawyers are so complicated-don't do that. Here.
 My friend told me I should maybe even get a lawyer.
 Really?
 Well, I actually might need a little surgery after last time.
 So, you're looking great, how have you been?
 Alright.
 Nothing like last time, promise.
 I don't think so.
 Oh this won't be anything like last time, I promise.
 I'm not so sure about this. I had to go to Emergency after last time...
 Actually, that's none of your business, Christie, hut I can assure you it certainly wasn't cheap.
 You have a really nice place here...Paul. How much did you pay for it?
 Do you take American Express?
 I'm not supposed to.  But I can make an exception.
 Do you want to come to my apartment or not?
 Would you like to see my apartment?
 You just haven't been looking.
 I haven't seen you around here.
 I have to return some videotapes.
 But where?
 I'm just leaving.
 Where are you going?
 I'm leaving now. I've assessed the situation and I'm going.
 Oh God, I can't believe this.
 If you really want to do something for me, you can stop making this scene right now.
 I know my behavior is...erratic sometimes.
 No, no, no.
 I'm...in touch with humanity. Evelyn, I'm sorry.  You're just not terribly important to me.
 You're inhuman.
 We never really shared one.
 But what about the past? Our past?
 Yes, I am.
 You're really serious, aren't you?
 I know that your friends are my friends. I've thought about that. You can have them.
 But your friends are my friends. My friends are your friends. I don't think it would work.  You have a little something on your upper lip.
 I'm fucking serious. It's fucking over. Us. This is no joke. I don't think we should see each other anymore.
 Touchy, touchy. I'm sorry I brought the wedding up. Let's just avoid the issue, alright? Now, are we having coffee?
 It's over, Evelyn. It's all over
 Talk about what, Patrick? What is there to talk about?
 We need to talk.
 My need to engage in homicidal behavior on a massive scale cannot be, um, corrected, but I have no other way to fulfill my needs.
 Why? What's wrong?
 I think, Evelyn, that we've...lost touch.
 I want a firm commitment.
 It's not.
 Your hairline looks like it's receding.
 No. I'm not. Why should I ?
 Are you using minoxidil?
 Everybody has a great body now.
 He has a great body
 Everybody's good-looking, Patrick.
 He's good-looking.
 Everybody's rich.
 He's rich.
 Oh God, Patrick. Why Price? Price?
 Why don t you just go for Price?
 Hi. Pat Bateman.
 Pat, this is my cousin Vanden and her boyfriend Stash. He's an artist.
 Because I...want...to...fit...in.
 Well, you hate that job anyway. Why don't you just quit? You don't have to work.
 I don't want to talk about it.
 Your father practically owns the company. You can do anything you like, silly.
 No-I can't take the time off work.
 We should do it.
 Is your Evian spiked?
 Yes, darling?
 Evelyn?
 Get married. Have a wedding.
 Do...what.
 Marzipan. Pink tents. Hundreds, thousands of roses. Photographers. Annie Leibovitz. We'll get Annie Leibovitz. And we'll hire someone to videotape. Patrick, we should do it.
 Is that all you ever have to contribute, Van Patten? "What about fucking dinner?"
 Listen, what about dinner?
 No, serial killer, Wisconsin in the fifties. He was an interesting guy.
 Ed Gein? Maitre d' at Canal Bar?
 Do you know what Ed Gein said about women?
 Thanks, guy, but...she's got a lousy personality.
 Girls dig Bateman. He's CQ. You're total CQ, Bateman.
 How did you guess?
 Because he dated her.
 I know her. I knew her.
 But Laurie Kennedy is a total hardbody. What do you think, Bateman?
 Nice.
 Eggshell with Romalian type.  What do you think?
 That's bone. And the lettering is something called Silian Rail.
 Good coloring.
 Picked them up from the printers yesterday
 What are the rules for a sweater vest?
 You'll notice that my friends and I all look and behave in a remarkably similar fashion, but there are subtle differences between us. McDermott is the biggest asshole. Van Patten is the yes man. Price is the most wired. I'm the best looking. We all have light tans. Right now I'm in a bad mood because this is not a good table, and Van Patten keeps asking dumb, obvious questions about how to dress .
 I won't...don't worry.
 Don't come back.
 Don't make any trouble. Please. I suggest you go.
 But I think...I want to know what happened here.
 I think you should go now.
 There was no ad in the Times.
 No. Yes. I mean yes, I did. In the Times. But... doesn't Paul Owen still live here?
 You saw the ad in the Times?
 Are you sure?
 No, he doesn't.
 Doesn't he live here?
 I'm looking for...Paul Owen's...place.
 Can I help you?
 No.
 Are you my two o'clock?
 Now, if you'll excuse me.
 No, you...didn't?
 Because I had dinner with Paul Owen twice in London...just ten days ago.
 Why not, you stupid bastard?
 It's just not.
 It never was supposed to he! Why isn't it possible?
 But that's simply not possible. And I don't find this funny anymore.
 Now, Carnes, listen to me. Listen very, very carefully. I killed Paul Owen and I liked it. I can't make myself any clearer
 No! Listen, don't you know who I am? I'm not Davis, I'm Patrick Bateman! I talk to you on the phone all the time! Don't you recognize me? You're my lawyer.
 Excuse me. I really must he going.
 Wait. Stop. You don't seem to understand. You're not really comprehending any of this. I killed him. I did it, Carnes. I'm Patrick Bateman. I chopped Owen's fucking head off. I tortured dozens of girls. The whole message I left on your machine was true.
 Now, if you'll excuse me, I really must...
 Oh Christ. He can barely pick up an escort girl, let alone...what was it you said he did to her?
 What are you talking about? Bateman is what?
 Davis. I'm not one to bad-mouth anyone, your joke was amusing. But come on, man, you had one fatal flaw: Bateman's such a dork, such a boring, spineless lightweight, that I couldn't fully appreciate it. I wasn't fooled for a second. Now, if you'd said Price, or McDermott...Otherwise, it was amusing. Now, let's have lunch or dinner or something. Hilarious, Davis. A killer.
 Carnes? Wait.
 But wait, Harold, what do you mean?
 By the way Davis, how is Cynthia? You're still seeing her, right?
 The message you left.
 What exactly do you mean?
 It was a pretty long message, wasn't it?
 Bateman killing Owen and the escort girls? Oh that s fabulous. That's rich...
 Yes, naturally.
 Jesus, Davis. Yes. That was hilarious. That was you, wasn't it?
 Face it-the Japanese will own most of this country by the end of the '90s.
 Excuse me, gentlemen. Right back. He approaches Carnes cautiously.
 What? CARRUTHERS  I'll call you.
 Patrick?
 I've gotta...I've gotta...return some videotapes.
 Where are you going?
 What...is...it?
 Jesus lives, Luis.
 Call me please, Patrick.
 Commes des Garcon.
 This is Gwendolyn Ichiban. This is my very good friend Patrick Bateman. Where are you going? We're going to Nell's. Gwendolyn's father's buying it.  Where did you get your overnight bag?
 No, Luis. It's not me. You're mistaken.
 Patrick? Is that you?
 Your compliment was sufficient Luis.
 It looks so soft.
 Uh huh.
 That's a wonderful jacket. Let me guess, Valentino Couture?
 Lucky, I guess.
 Patrick, thanks so much for looking after Courtney. Dorsia, how impressive! How on earth did you get a reservation there?
 I'm just a happy camper. Rockin' and a-rollin'. VAN PATTEN  Rehab's done wonders for you, pal. Working for UNICEF now?
 And Bateman, what are YOU SO fucking zany about?
 Where to? Morgan Stanley? Rehab? What?
 No, you dumb son of a bitch. I'm serious. I'm disappearing.
 Don't tell me...merchant banking?
 I'm leaving! I...am...leaving!
 Where to? Are you going to go get a gram?
 Listen to me, Patrick. I'm leaving.
 Don't, I'll drink it.
 This.
 Leaving what?
 I'm leaving. I'm getting out.
 Ask me a question.
 Yes, Caron's right. Gorbachev's not downstairs. He's at Tunnel.
 Impressive. Very nice. Let's see Paul Owen's card.
 Raised lettering, pale nimbus white...
 But wait. You ain't seen nothin' yet.
 I can't believe that Price prefers McDermott's card to mine.
 New card. What do you think?
 What's that, a gram?
 Well, we have to end apartheid for one. And slow down the nuclear arms race, stop terrorism and world hunger. But we can't ignore our social needs. either We have to stop people from abusing the welfare system. We have to provide food and shelter for the homeless and oppose racial discrimination and promote civil rights while also promoting equal rights for women but change the abortion laws to protect the right to life yet still somehow maintain women's freedom of choice.
 Like what?
 Oh come on. Price. There are a lot more important problems than Sri Lanka to worry about. Sure our foreign policy is important, but there are more pressing problems at hand.
 I guess you're right...  THAT IS, IF THE FAGGOT IN THE NEXT STALL THINKS IT'S OKAY!
 Calm down. Let's do it anyway
 SHUT UP!
 I want to get high off this; Bateman, not sprinkle it on my fucking All-Bran.
 It's definitely weak but I have a feeling if we do enough of it we'll be okay.
 It's a fucking milligram of Sweet'n Low!
 What?
 Is he fucking selling it by the milligram?  Oh my God...
 Maybe it's just the light.
 Jeez. That's not a helluva lot, is it?
 Oh, who knows? They don't know that. Prove it.
 I'm not sure, guy, but I don't think dyslexia is a virus.
 There's this theory out now that if you can catch the AIDS virus through having sex with someone who is infected, then you can also catch anything-Alzheimer's, muscular dystrophy, hemophilia, leukemia, diabetes, dyslexia, for Christ's sake-you can get dyslexia from pussy-
 That's not Paul Owen. Paul Owen's on the other side of the room. Over there.
 That's Paul Owen.
 It looks that way, doesn't it?
 Van Patten looks puffy. Has he stopped working out?
 See you then.
 There are no tables available tonight. The waiting list is also totally booked.
 Two at nine? Perfect.
 I said we are totally booked.
 Oh really? That's great.
 We are totally booked.
 Yes, can you take two tonight, oh, let's say at nine o'clock?
 Dorsia, yes?
 Your friend has already been seated. Follow me, Mr. Halberstam.
 Marcus Halberstam. For two at eight?
 Umm...yes...I know it's a little late but is it possible to reserve a table for two at eight or eight-thirty perhaps?
 Dorsia.
 Stop sounding so Fucking sad! Jesus!
 What is it, Patrick? Are you alright?
 Just...say...no!
 Why?
 ...to the office this afternoon.
 I don't think I'm gonna make it, Jean.
 Where are you? Patrick, what's wrong?
 What are I doing?
 Patrick? I can't hear you.
 Oh God, what did you say, you dumb bitch?
 Craig McDermott called. He wants to meet you and David Van Patten and Tim Price at Harry's for drinks.
 Jean-I'm not-
 Where are you?
 Hello? Jean, I need help!
 Patrick? Is that you?
 Jean? Hello? Jean?
 Patrick Bateman's office.
 Thanks. It slipped my mind completely.
 And don't forget you have a breakfast meeting with Frederick Bennet and Charles Rust at '21.
 No. No, I guess not. I don't want to get bruised. You're right, I should go.
 If you stay, I think something bad will happen. I think I might hurt you.  You don't want to get hurt, do you?
 I know I should go. I know I have a tendency to get involved with unavailable men, and...I mean, do you want me to go?
 Yes. I don t think I can...control myself.
 Hmmmm.
 I'm looking for...I guess you could say I just want to have a meaningful relationship with someone special.
 Make someone happy-have you ever wanted to?
 Jean? What?
 Sorry.
 What...No! Put it in the carton.
 Patrick, have you ever wanted to make someone happy?
 Oh. Uh, tape. Duct tape. I...need it for... taping something. Bateman goes back to the cupboard for the nail gun.
 What's that?
 Forget it.
 Who's Ted Bundy?
 Did you know that Ted Bundy's first dog, a collie, was named Lassie? Had you heard this?
 Growing. I'm glad you said that.
 Well, I guess I do. For a long time I was too focused on my work, I think, but now I've really begun to think about changing myself, you know, developing, and...growing.
 Jean, do you feel...fulfilled? I mean, in your life?
 Maybe. I don't know Not really. Bateman opens up a cupboard where there are a lot of very Bateman opens a cupboard where there are a lot of neatly ordered weapons - an ax, a rifle, a chain saw, duct tape, twine and a nail gun.
 Are you seeing anyone? I mean, seriously?
 Interesting.
 No, not really.
 Do you have a boyfriend?
 Well, I'd like to travel. And maybe go back to school, but I really don't know...I'm at a point in my life where there seems lo be a lot of possibilities, but I'm so... I don't know...unsure.
 And don't tell me you enjoy working with children, okay?
 No. It's all right. I'm not very good at controlling it anyway.
 Well, maybe we shouldn't go out to dinner. I don't want to ruin your willpower.
 You can always he thinner. Look...better.
 You don't need to lose any weight. You're kidding, right? You look great. Very fit.
 I'm on a diet. But thank you.
 Want a bite?
 Thanks, Patrick. I'd love some.
 Jean? Sorbet?
 They know me.
 You didn't give them a name.
 Yes? You're dressed...okay.
 Dorsia is...fine.
 Oh, I don't know. No, we'll go anywhere you want.
 Soooo...Dorsia is where Jean wants to go...
 Come on. Where do you want to go? Anywhere you want. Just say it. I can get us in anywhere.
 Oh, I can't.  I don't know.
 No, come on. Anywhere you want.
 Oh Patrick, I can't make this decision.
 Let's not think about what I want. How about anywhere you want.
 Anywhere you want?
 Well, isn't this a coincidence.
 Oh no. I have no plans.
 That is...if you're not doing anything.
 Would you like to accompany me to dinner?
 Yes, Patrick?
 Jean?
 Bring us an ashtray for Mr. KIMBALL, please. She whisks in with a crystal ashtray as they sit in silence.
 Yes, Patrick?
 Can you bring Mr...
 Patrick?
 Patrick, I think he knows you're here. It's only ten-thirty.
 Tell him I'm at lunch.
 Detective Donald KIMBALL?
 Who?
 Patrick, a Mr. Donald KIMBALL is here to see you.
 Ye-es, Je-an?
 Patrick?
 What is it?
 Thanks, Patrick.
 Come on, you're prettier than that.
 You don't like this, I take it?
 I said "Do not wear that outfit again." Wear a dress. A skirt or something.
 Ummm...what? I didn't hear you.
 Is that the Ransom file? Thanks. Don't wear that outfit again.
 Yes?
 You look nice today.
 No. No. Be a doll and just get me a Perrier, okay?
 I'll do it.
 No, silly. Forget it. I'll make them. Thanks.
 Oh, something. . romantic?
 Yes, sir.
 Okay, Jean. I need reservations for three at Camols at twelve-thirty, and if not there, try Crayons. All right?
 Just say no?
 Just...say...no.
 Oh? And what should I say?
 Negative. Cancel it.
 After six.
 When?
 And...Spencer wants to meet you for a drink at Fluties Pier 17.
 I occasionally box with Ricky at the Harvard Club. Anyone else?
 Ricky Hendricks has to cancel today. He didn't say what he was canceling or why.
 Aerobics class. Sorry. Any messages?
 Late?
 That's okay. I don't mind. There's something sweet about you.
 No. I really don't.
 You think I'm dumb. You think all models are dumb.
 What?
 You think I'm dumb, don't you?
 That's...that's too bad.
 Oh really? DAISY He said...  He said you gave him bad vibes.
 Well, most guys I know who work in mergers and acquisitions don't really like it.
 Welt...it depends, why?
 I m into, well, murders and executions mostly.
 Well...
 No. Flattering, but no.
 A model? An actor?
 What do you think I do?
 So, what do you do?
 Okay. Do.
 Oh, can't, I'm afraid. Matine of Les Miserables. Listen, I've really got to go. I'll-Oh...Christ...I'll call you.
 Yeah.
 Next Saturday?
 Well, what about, oh, you know, maybe a Saturday?
 Oh, I don't know, Victoria. I'm at work all the time.
 Maybe we could have lunch one day next week? You know, I'm downtown near Wall Street quite often.
 Yeah, well, oh boy, listen, I've got to go. Thank you, uh... Victoria?
 Hubert's? Oh really? It moved uptown, right?
 Listen, if you could talk to them  I would really appreciate it. I'm really late. I have a lunch appointment at Hubert's in fifteen minutes.
 Oh yeah. Oh I get it. Fun with chocolate.
 Well, I mean, um, it s really...Bosco. You know, like... like a Dove Bar. It's a Dove Bar...Hershey's Syrup?
 Then why can't they get these stains out? I mean can you talk to these people or something? I'm not getting anywhere.
 Isn't it ridiculous? Coming all the way up here, but you know. They really are the best.
 Well.
 Hello
 Hi, Patrick. I thought that was you.
 You actually listen to Whitney Houston? You actually have a Whitney Houston CD? More than one?
 Did you know that Whitney Houston's debut LP called simply Whitney Houston had four number-one singles on it? Did you know that, Christie? Whitney's voice leaps across so many boundaries and is so versatile-though she's mainly a jazz singer-that it's hard to take in the album on a first listening.
 Those are Sarah Lawrence guys, Patrick. You're making me feel weird.
 Well, you went to Sarah Lawrence for one thing.
 No! I'm not a lesbian. Why do you think I'd be into that?
 Are you telling me you've never gotten it on with a girl?
 Does he do this all the time?
 Come on. I think it would be a turn-on.
 Let's not get lewd.  I'm in no mood to have a lewd conversation.
 Come on. Don't you find Christie attractive?
 Patrick, you re a lunatic.
 Listen, I would just like to see...the two of you...get it on. What's wrong with that? It's totally disease-free.
 Do you have any coke? Or Halcyon? I'd take a Halcyon.
 No.
 Did you know that guy who disappeared? Didn't he work at Pierce & Pierce, too? Was he a friend of yours?
 I want the number, idiot.  Anyway, I'm at Paul Norman's and I'll try you later and if I don't see you at Canal Bar tomorrow night I'm going to sic my hairdresser on you.
 Paul Owen.
 Who?
 You're at Paul Owen s.
 This tastes weird.  Harley? It's me. I need your services. Translate that anyway you'd like. I'm at-
 Why would I?
 Don't tell him you're here.
 He's a goddamn drug dealer! These are his peak hours.
 Elizabeth, it's three in the morning.
 She's from...France.
 Uh huh?
 She's my...cousin.
 If you had an American Express card she'd give you a blowjob.  Listen, this girl worked in a tanning salon, need I say more?...What do you do?
 What do you mean, she was a hot number.
 Personally I think the guy went a little nutso. Split town for a while. Maybe he did go to London. Sightseeing. Drinking. Whatever. Anyway, I'm pretty sure he'll turn up sooner or later.  I mean, to think that one of his friends killed him, for no reason whatsoever would be too ridiculous. Isn't that right, Patrick?
 Oh, right. Of course...We had wanted Paul Owen to come. But he said he had plans...I guess I had dinner with Victoria...the following night.
 He was at Atlantis with Craig McDermott, Frederick Dibble, Harry Newman, George Butner and   - you.
 So who was he with?
 He wasn't with Paul Owen.
 Where was Marcus?
 Oh. KIMBALL Now where were you?
 I checked it out. It's clean.
 He does? You're sure?
 Yes.
 Well, does Marcus have an alibi?
 Yes.
 But Marcus denied it?
 Yes. And he denies it. Though at first he couldn't be sure.
 Marcus?
 I've questioned him.
 And?
 According to his date book, and this was verified by his secretary, he had dinner with...Marcus Halberstam.
 But how? Where do you place Paul that night?
 I think maybe you've got your dates mixed up.
 I'm not really sure. I had a shower...and some sorbet?
 So, the night he disappeared? Any new thoughts on what you did?
 Suit yourself, I guess.
 Yes, of course. The hash browns are delicious. I'm just...not... ordering them.
 But...everyone orders the hash browns here. I mean- it's-have you been here before?
 Not in the mood, I guess.
 No hash browns?
 I'll be there.
 Well, to each his own. So-lunch, Thursday? I'll call your secretary about reservations.
 No, I like music. Just-they're-Huey's too... black sounding. For me.
 Not a big music fan, eh?
 Never. I mean...I don't really like... singers.
 Absolutely. I'm with you on that one.
 And if you could try and pin down where you were the night of Owen's disappearance, it would make my job a lot easier.
 Great, yes, I'd like that.
 Listen, I'm a little spent for now but how about lunch in a week or so when I've sorted out all this information?
 Patrick, please. I hope I've been informative. Long day-a bit scattered.
 Well, thank you, Mr. Bateman.
 We had...gone to a new musical called...Oh Africa, Brave Africa. It was...a laugh riot...and that's about it. I think we had dinner at Orso's. No, Petaluma. No, Orso's. The...last time I physically saw him was...at an automated teller. I can't remember which...just one that was near, um, Nell's.
 Well...When was the last time you were with Paul Owen?
 Well, I could he wrong.
 Let's see...  That you were with-
 Well...I...Wait...What information have you received?
 That's not the information I've received.
 What?
 Wait. That's not what I've got.
 I had a date with a girl named Veronica.
 God...I guess...I was probably returning videotapes.
 Do you remember where you were on the night of Paul's disappearance?  Which was on the twentieth of December?
 Not really.
 Yeah, gone into rehab. Shame.  Is he a suspect?
 I actually came to see Timothy Price, but he's taken a leave of absence.
 Dan, great to see you again. Like I said, you need anything at all, I'm your man. I don't envy your job. I mean Owen was a...complex man.
 I mean they want to get caught.
 Too true. You know, Bateman-people tend to reveal so much more about themselves when they're in a relaxed setting, don't you think?
 Yeah. No Finlandia, as usual. Fucking dump.
 0h no. Informal conversations, mostly. What's that, Stoli?
 How's the investigation going? Taken anyone in for "formal questioning?"
 Uh, yes...I mean...whenever necessary. You know.
 So...you hang out here a lot?
 Don.
 Detective Kendall...uh Campbell? KIMBALL Kimball.  Call me Don.
 Great, and thanks for your, uh, time, Mr. Bateman.
 Absolutely, I'm 100% with you.
 Listen, if anything occurs to you, any information at all...
 Oh really? I didn't know that.
 Uh, no. There's one...down here.
 Isn't the Four Seasons a little far uptown? I mean aren't you going to be late?
 You'll have to excuse me. I have a lunch meeting with Cliff Huxtable at Four Seasons in twenty minutes.
 Eerie. Really eerie.
 The earth just opens up and swallows people.
 People just...disappear.
 Nothing.
 It's just strange.  One day someone's walking around, going to work, alive, and then...
 That's so typical, isn't it?
 No, not yet. As I said, we're not sure. But... basically no one has seen or heard anything.
 I mean no one's dealing with the homicide squad yet or anything, right?
 No, it actually hadn't. Toiletries were missing. A suit was gone. So was some luggage. That's it.
 Had his apartment been burglarized?
 No.
 Have you consulted a psychic?
 Yeah, I know, and was into that whole Yale thing.
 Yikes! No. Paul wasn't into that. He followed a balanced diet and-
 I know it sounds like a lame question, but in New Jersey I know this sounds like a lame question, but last month-I don't know if you've heard about this, but a young stockbroker was recently arrested and charged with murdering a young Chicano girl and performing voodoo rituals with various body parts-
 What?
 Was he involved at all , do you think, in occultism or Satan worship?
 Oh.
 Well, I've had a hard time getting an actual verification. A Stephen Hughes says he saw him at a restaurant there, but I checked it out and what happened is, he mistook a Hubert Ainsworth for Paul, so...
 Hmmm.
 Actually, yes.
 But...has anyone seen him in London?
 His girlfriend doesn't think so.
 Well, maybe he did, huh?
 Well, there's a message on his answering machine saying he went to London.
 Do you have any witnesses or fingerprints?
 So was I.
 We were both seven in 1969.
 Anything else you can tell me about Owen?
 I just wanted to know if you know. BATEMAN Before Yale? If I remember correctly, Saint Paul's... Listen, I just...I just want to help.
 Don't you know this?
 And where did he go to school?
 No, he just hung out there.
 He had a yacht?
 Let me think. The Newport. Harry's. Fluties. Endochine. Nell's. Comell Club. The New York Yacht Club. The regular places.
 Yeah. You know...hang out.
 Hang...out?
 Where did Paul hang out?
 No. Not really.
 Do you feel that way?
 I hope I'm not being cross-examined here.
 What kind of man was he? Besides...  the information you've just given.
 He led what I suppose was an orderly life. He... ate a balanced diet.
 So...there's nothing you can tell me about Paul Owen?
 What do you mean...Yale thing?
 Yeah...Yale thing.
 Yale thing?
 I'm...at a loss. He was part of that whole...Yale thing, you know.
 How well did you know him?
 Well...
 What can you tell me about Paul Owen?
 No problem.
 You sure?
 No, I guess it's okay.
 Would you rather I not smoke?
 I know. I'm sorry.
 Bad habit.
 You seem...nervous.
 Who do you ask?
 Pardon me, but are you okay?
 Thanks.
 Nice. Very nice.
 Fifty-five West Eighty-First Street. The American Gardens Building.
 Your address?
 Harvard. The Harvard Business School.
 Where did you go to school?
 Twenty-six. I'll be twenty-seven in October.
 How old are you?
 Shoot.
 Just some preliminary questions that I need for my own files, okay?
 You sure? I can always get you a lime.
 No, really. I'm okay.
 Understandable.  Lime?
 I think his family wants this kept quiet.
 Oh right. Well, I haven't heard anything about the disappearance or anything...  Not on "Page Six" at least.
 The disappearance of Paul Owen.
 Well, what's the topic of discussion?
 It's no problem
 Oh no, I'm okay.
 Mr. Kimball a bottle of San Pelle-
 KIMBALL.
 No, I'm okay.
 Perrier? San Pellegrino?
 No. I'm okay.
 Coffee?
 So it's nothing that official. I just have some basic questions. About Paul Owen. About yourself-
 Ah, I see...Yes. Paul's disappearance...Yes.
 Nothing like that. I'm just a private investigator.
 You're not with the FBI or anything, are you?
 I've been hired by Meredith Powell to investigate the disappearance of Paul Owen.
 So, what's the topic of discussion?
 I'm sorry to barge in on you like this. but I was supposed to talk to Luis Carruthers and he wasn't in and...well, you're here, so...I know how busy you guys can get.
 Hi. Pat Bateman. Nice to meet you.
 Hi. I'm Donald KIMBALL
 Oh that? Just mulling over business problems. Examining opportunities...Exchanging rumors... Spreading gossip.
 No, I'm sorry. I should've made an appointment.  Was that anything important?
 Listen, John, I've got to go. T Boone Pickens just walked in...  Just joking...  No don't tip the owner of the salon. Okay, John, right, got it.  Sorry about that.
 You reek. You reek of...shit. Do you know that?  Goddammit, Al-look at me and stop crying like some kind of faggot. Al...I'm sorry.
 I can't...I can't find a shelter
 Do ,you know how bad you smell? The stench, my God.
 Please...I don know what to do. I'm so cold.
 Shhhh...it's okay.
 You re so kind, mister. You're kind. You're a kind man. I can tell.
 Get a goddamn job, Al. You've got a negative attitude. That's what's stopping you. You've got to get your act together. I'll help you.
 Al.
 Speak up. Come on.
 Al.
 Listen, what's your name?
 What am I gonna do?
 Listen, do you think it's fair to take money from people who do have jobs? From people who do work?
 I'm hungry.
 I know that, I know that. Jeez, you're like a broken record. I'm trying to help you.
 I'm hungry
 You're not what? Qualified for anything else?
 I'm not...
 Why don't you get another one? Why don't , you get another job?
 I'm so hungry.
 Gee, uh, that's too bad.
 Why? Were you drinking? Is that why you lost it? Insider trading? Just joking. No, really-were you drinking on the job?
 I lost my job...
 Why don't you get a job? If you're so hungry, why don't you get a job?
 I'm so hungry.
 It's cold out, too, isn't it?
 I'm so hungry.
 Yes, it is.
 Is that a raincoat?
 No, Owen.
 Why are there copies of the Style section all over the place? Do you have a dog? A chow or something?
 Yes, Owen?
 Hey, Halberstam?
 They're okay. BATEMAN Their early work was a little too New Wave for my taste. But then Sports came out in 1983, I think they really came into their own, commercially and artistically.
 You like Huey Lewis and the News?
 Come on, you dumb son of a bitch.  I've got a preview of the Barneys catalogue and a bottle of Absolut waiting for us.
 No, man. I'm gonna bail.
 Two-hundred-and-fifty. Very reasonable. Let's leave a big tip, shall we? My place hr a nightcap?
 Paul, give me your Amex card. Good boy. Bateman slaps the card down, looks at the check.
 Another Martini, Paul?
 Evelyn. Great ass. Goes out with that loser Patrick Bateman. What a dork.
 Cecelia is, well...you know
 And Cecelia, how is she? Where is she tonight?
 I could tell you that, Halberstam, but then I'd have to kill you.
 So, wasn't Rothschild originally handling the Fisher account? How did you get it?
 Nobody goes there anymore.
 We should've gone to Dorsia. I could've gotten us a table.
 Hey, I'm a child of divorce. Give me a break  Hmmm, I see they've omitted the pork loin with lime jello.
 Yeah, well, you're late.
 Listen, the mud soup and the charcoal arugula are outrageous here.
 Oh yes. I'm very lucky.
 And how's Cecilia? She's a great girl.
 Oh well, you know.
 Really? That's interesting.  Not great?
 It's...it's...all right.
 How's the Ransom account going, Marcus?
 I've been great. And you?
 Hello, Halberstam. Nice tie. How the hell are you?
 Some guys are just born cool, I guess.
 I just don't see how someone, anyone, can appear that way and yet be involved in such total shit. How can you be so fucking, I don't know, cool about it?
 I don't believe it. He looks so...normal. He seems so... out of it. So...undangerous.
 What shit? Now where do we have reservations at? I mean I'm not really hungry, but I would like to have reservations somewhere.
 How can he lie like that? How can he pull that shit?
 Good point. Excuse me, gentlemen.
 You'll look like you consciously worked for the look.
 You think so?
 Anything? That's not even credible. If he wants to go up there? To check it out? I think you should encourage him.  It's his life. But everybody's treating him like this -- valuable object. You're hurting your own case.
 I can't help it. I feel like they'd do anything to keep their --
 I can paint anywhere.
 You don't wanna move, do you?
 You know what he's like. He just wants to work on stuff that's cool.
 I'm just screwed.
 You know what I mean.
 "Make" him?
 Alice? You gotta make him do the start-up with Teddy and me.
 'Gonna wait outside.
 You are a fanatic.
 They still have to give 'em refreshments laced with mind-altering drugs.
 Is it over?
 You're just afraid to eat it.
 Right. Wait. A toast.
 It's gonna get cold.
 ...wanna savor this.
 Great.
 Here we go.
 Oh, right. Hold on.
 Don't we have any chopsticks?
 Milo?
 I know you. You're gonna run back to work right after dinner. I want my kiss now.
 ...What?
 Yeah? Give me a goodbye kiss.
 You look beautiful.
 Look at me! I'm gonna change.
 Great!
 Just shut up?
 No. No. I sent an E-mail to somebody, just now. To tell her how I feel about you.  You know I'm clueless, without you. You know I --
 I went to see the Skywire model in Gary's office. You know. Just to hold it again.
 Are you gonna tell me where you went?
 Milo, you --
 I know you think I'm too attached to him, but still. I am close to Gary. And you're the most meaningful person in my life.  I'm going back to the Comix place, why should I be killing myself.
 Milo --
 It's for the Museum. He knows you're a painter. If anybody should be invited --
 He has thousands of employees, Milo --
 Why doesn't he ask us to his party. He's never even met you.
 What?
 Look at this.
 Okay, yeah. I did something naughty... There's this amazing Comix store in Seattle.  To tell you the truth, I did it once or twice at Stanford. 'Guess I can't keep anything from you...
 Where were you?  You know you can't keep anything from me.
 ...Different?
 That was -- different.
 Poor baby. You know that's not true.
 If I'd stayed down there, maybe this wouldn't've happened.
 Guilt?
 After I broke into 21 -- which was insane, thank God they didn't catch me! -- I just drove around. Trying to figure out what possessed me. You know what? I've been putting my own guilt on Gary.
 I remember.
 The Justice Department guy who came to the apartment when --
 Remember Lyle Barton?
 ...Why?
 It's what they said it is. An unfinished broadcast studio. You were right... I just drove to Seattle and back.
 Nothing?
 Nothing.
 It's almost nine, I've been so worried!  What did you see in there?
 So you believe me?
 ...Whaddo I do?
 I know how to get in there. But you've gotta help me.
 Is it two? Or is it three? Have you ever really noticed?
 They stop the construction work at six or seven. The parking lot's mostly clear by two or three in the morning. Even the early Geeks don't get there before five.
 You can't just walk in, either.
 I can't just walk away!
 Milo, you told me those DOJ Agents are all over the place. How could they hope to hide a surveillance post?  And how can you get in there, anyway? With the cameras and the swipe cards --
 It's the only one with dishes on the roof. The studio's a front. That's why they keep postponing its opening.  ...gotta get in there.
 Even if all this were true. There're 20 other buildings. All of them filled with computers and --
 How should I know? "Solving a problem," I guess. Or needing to control everything. I don't know.  I've gotta get in there.
 Milo. Why would he --
 You think I don't know that?
 "Like this?" It's Gary you're talking about.
 Go where? You can't get away from people like this.
 You're scaring me. I think we should just go.
 It isn't a broadcast studio. It's -- a surveillance post or something. That's why they have the dishes on top.
 Nobody does work like this on-line. It's in your PC, or in a mainframe. Self-contained. They'd have to be, like, watching people. Physically.  Oh Jesus.
 They hack into people's programs?
 I don't know! I just know it was Teddy's code. All these ideas flying in from everywhere. You know how he says "Any kid working in his garage can put us out of business?" It's like they know what every kid's doing.
 I can't see Outpost putting its reputation in the hands of people like that.
 I don't know what I'm saying. Maybe -- maybe they hired those guys.
 Are you saying you think they had something to do with his death? Nelson said it was an airtight case.
 It was a hate crime.
 What're you -- what?
 Teddy was killed last night.
 What!
 You're right. It's -- a working relationship. Don't know what I was expecting.
 I mean, if one little comment from Gary is gonna upset you this much --
 What's extreme is what that ER doctor said when he pumped your stomach. Eat another sesame seed and that's it.
 Isn't that -- extreme?
 If you can't deal with him on that basis, you better get a new counselor.
 I know, I know.
 He's your boss. He's not your --
 That's what I'm asking myself. Does he have some genius stowed away? Why not let him write Skywire.  'Not saying it makes sense.
 What would it mean, anyway? If he didn't write it?
 It's the way he said it. Just the way my dad did, when he was caught in a lie. That's how you knew you were onto something ugly.
 He gave me some new code-fixes this morning. I said, "Did you really do this just today?" Cause I was impressed. He said "What're you implying?"
 That's what I need to ask you.  You know you can't keep anything from me.
 To our new life.  ...What's wrong?
 Milo! What about --?
 You know he's never been anybody's counselor before?
 We're not gonna let it.
 That took some fun out of --
 Prob'ly waiting by the phone for Outpost to call. We'll leave it for him?
 When's Brian coming for the TV?
 You saved my life in alot of ways.
 Don't bring that up. Like a different girlfriend would'd've let you die?
 C'mon, I wouldn't have a destiny without you. My destiny would be dying at 20. From eating --
 No way. You have this -- destiny.
 I forgot. That's why you have to help me decide.
 Didn't you visit the campus?
 ...But?
 I think that's great, Milo. I do.
 If my dad'd leveled with me like that even once... The weird thing is, my fantasy he could somehow be like the old Gary? It's his fantasy, too.
 But he's not quite the same guy anymore. Don't get your hopes too high?
 When I was a kid? And he was moving us all over the place? I spent all my time writing stuff on Outpost 1.0. I thought Gary Boyd was the greatest.
 Bully? Are we talking about Gary Boyd? Or your dad.
 If he's really a bully, he won't cop to it, anyway.
 It's important.
 Then you've gotta ask him about that.
 A lot of what Larry says is true. They just clone stuff, or reverse engineer it, and everybody gets stuck with their inferior version cause they --
 C'mon, how often do you talk to somebody who's been on the cover of Time. Three of four times.
 I think I kind of lost it. I was just so thrilled to be talking to the richest, most powerful... 'Didn't know I even cared about that stuff.
 I don't think he knows how.
 He wasn't acting?
 He said it made sense that Gary's code was like Teddy's, that that clich about great minds was true. Said it was all about his own guilt.  Plus, he has a tendency to get Gary mixed-up with his dad once in a while. It always passes.
 Prick.
 Lisa's an extremely valuable member of the Skywire team. We've got our eyes on her. You keep yours on Milo.
 Instead of busting my chops you should do something about that girl. Fire her. Or something.
 That'll be a test, won't it?
 He'll tell me when he gets home.
 Not like him, is it? To do a thing like that without telling you. You're not losing your hold on him, are you?
 No.
 'Didn't mention he was going to the Justice Department?
 Yes sir.
 And Outpost? You're happy there?
 'Just didn't know who else to talk to.
 Let me look into it, see what's being done. Frankly, it's not my area.
 I -- just wanna help bring these guys to justice. They're neo-Nazis.
 If there's a Civil Rights violation. But generally we let the local police and DA do their work first.
 It was racially motivated. He's Chinese. He was. And... I know sometimes the FBI gets involved with that. Don't they?
 My goodness.
 My friend, my best friend, Teddy, was killed in Silicon Valley.
 Milo?
 I am. I am, sir.
 What seems to be the problem? You look a little upset.
 Have a seat.
 Yeah. Hi. Thank you for seeing me.
 Milo?
 Give me two seconds with Lacy here?  Go on in, I won't be a moment.
 Yes sir. I need to talk to you.
 ...It's -- Milo, isn't it?
 Mr. Barton, do you remember me?
 Like I said: shot in the dark.
 It's just -- I kind of feel the need to do something with my ability. Create something...
 Beggar. We're at a disadvantage with Outpost. Our experts aren't as smart as theirs. Sometimes we can't tell which technologies pose the threat of a monopoly. We need a really smart guy to help us pick our fights. I'm taking a shot in the dark, here. I can offer you 32,000 a year, a Buick. I'm hoping you've got a feeling it's the right thing to do.
 Right... What's that mean again?
 Don't worry, Milo. I'm here as a friend. Or maybe a supplicant.
 You should've called a few times to bug me about your job prospects.
 ...When did you know?
 He's working backwards, too.  Let's do number five?
 What?!
 Is it your dish?
 Is it your software?
 Gimme the coordinates?
 You're interfaced with our dish.
 Wanna be a part of history?
 What?!
 Great. Great! We need to drag a lot of heavy stuff in front of the door --
 Okay.
 What'd they ever do for you?
 What?
 No. But you can write your own ticket in the Valley after this. We're gonna bring down Outpost.
 Will I get to work for Outpost?
 Brian! You wanna be a big deal, don't you? That's your dream in life.
 You can't pre-empt Yoga, that's our biggest show.
 This is the biggest Beta demo in like the history of software. You'd be my partner.
 'Forgot to introduce you.  I have a girlfriend.
 Well I parked illegally. See y'later?
 Sure, I'll see what I can do.
 'Thought if I relocated it could help my case. I'm writing programs for the local public access station. Where any whack-job with 100 bucks gets his own show? God, does it suck.  Can you help me?
 You're living here?
 You better believe everybody's trying to sign him up.
 We tried!
 Milo. Surprised he's not your guest.
 And the kid who wrote Skywire -- then gave it away? They're calling him the digital Robin Hood.
 Stigma? Larry! 60 billion buys you some slack in this world.
 Isn't there a stigma? Bankrolling this guy?
 There's no hard evidence he knew about this. Anybody who could implicate him seems to've vanished.
 That'd change with a criminal indictment.
 Conglomerates're lined up to finance the launch of the remaining satellites. They'll pay him a huge premium to get on-line.
 Outpost doesn't own em.
 Outpost was his baby, sure. On the other hand, we just learned Gary Boyd owns the Skywire satellites. Personally.
 That's gotta kill him, right?
 I think they call him the "Houseman." 'Cause "guard" sounds too weird.
 Who's that?
 He just likes to write code. He's bummed there's so much secrecy and competition, everybody trying to own everything.
 We could move 'em up here.
 He's pretty tight with his family.
 'Couldn't convince Teddy to come?
 Oh hi.
 Milo? I'm Danny.
 I do know. You focus on the big problem. But somewhere down the chain, something breaks down. Something gets destroyed. At first it's upsetting. You feel you've lost control.
 I'm pretty close. But when I wrote the last contact switches, it wiped out a piece of the content filer. You know what it's like, writing software.
 I do know, Gary. I feel the same way. I thought I was coming here for a job. But it's meant a lot more.
 I hope you know what you mean to me. Not just because of what you're doing. Because of who you are.
 You see what's hanging on the wall?
 Gary, I --
 Oh, that's right. You're "clueless."
 I'm not much good at handwriting. Or parties.
 You could've handwritten it.
 I couldn't do it at work cause of security or at home for -- obvious reasons.
 "Dear Lisa. I've enjoyed working with you. I'd be lying if I didn't say I find you attractive. But in my heart I know that Alice..."  You left my party to send E-mail?
 'Sorry about the late notice...
 That's great! Thanks.
 Don't be so hard on yourself. With a brain like yours, you could connive with the best of 'em I bet.
 Cause he was a liar. And I hated him.  "Get your head out of that machine, wise up to the real world." The more he mocked me the deeper I went. Cause if being savvy meant being like him --  Guess that's why I'm kind of clueless, even now. Didn't cultivate my conniving side. 'Not sure I even have one.
 ...Worse?
 No. I just went deeper into the machine. Preferred being the geek to having to explain. Lying would've been worse.
 What would you tell the kids? At your new school? You had to come up with a good story, right?
 ...My dad was a compulsive gambler. Only he didn't think he was. That applied to guys who didn't have a "system." "Losers," who played games of chance. He could "read" people, so chance had nothing to do with it. No matter how deep a hole he dug himself, he'd give you the whole speech. And you'd better not point out the obvious.  His creditors would catch up to him. Loan sharks or whatever. He'd wake us in the middle of the night. Off we'd go, again.
 Why did you move around so much? When you were a kid.
 Sure.
 'Have a look?
 I'm okay. It's going well!
 You look a little tired.
 Gary, hi.
 The answer's not in the box. It's in the band.
 The wrong place?
 Been thinking about the push mechanism in the handler. And it came over me: it's in the wrong place.
 34,000. But they're real short lines. 'Just came out that way.
 Wow. You must have 20,000 lines of code there...
 It helps. Alice said it would help. To focus on something.  'Don't know what I'd do without her.
 You've been coming in early.
 Oh. Yeah.
 I meant did you find other stuff to --
 Talk about work? Never!
 Did you?
 Just once. 'Guess I was worried we didn't have anything to talk about, since work was off-limits. Non- disclosure.
 Had you talked to him much lately?
 Were the flags for Teddy?
 I heard what happened.
 Definitely.
 It scales, don't you think?
 The purpose of this company isn't to destroy our competitors any more than the purpose of living is to breath. But the software business is binary: you're a zero or a one. Being obsessive isn't a crime. It's a character trait.
 I'm sure.
 Everything I do is under scrutiny. The questions they ask, trying to make anything strategic look sordid.  I'm confused. Doesn't everybody in business try to get ahead?
 Nothing!
 What're you implying.
 You really wrote this just today?
 Right... Right.
 Well -- you sent for me.
 Milo. What's up?
 You're making me young again.
 You did this -- overnight?
 Take a look at this. Slightly different approach.
 It's okay. Really.
 Too fast? At least four companies're on the verge of workable convergence systems, Milo, they --
 Maybe I'm going too fast.
 How's it going?
 Don't spend too much time searching. You ever vetted somebody's old code before?  It's a different skill. Stay close to the surface. The best-hidden secrets are in plain sight. You know the best place to hide a leaf, right?  In a tree.
 Could work with a new switch. There may be a few more things hidden.
 That's what I told her. My wife.
 That's insane. You're ahead of your time.
 Somebody said I'm just another Philistine. With reproductions.
 ...Do I?
 'Think I should buy some originals?
 Okay. I'm Gary.
 No! Just waiting for my counselor to come by and introduce himself.
 Yeah? I wanna feel like I did when I wrote that. But I'm 42, that's 100 in cyber-years. I look at you and see the things that got me here.  But somehow got away.
 I do!
 When you get to a certain age, you start wondering. About your legacy. I doubt you even remember Outpost 1.0 --
 You'd have to start practically from scratch. But this is all you'd be working on. No marketing meetings, no product seminars. We can't waste the time. Half the Valley's working on convergence. So're media conglomerates, cable companies, phone companies. 'Can't finish second, Milo. There is no second... Now what would you like to ask me?
 It needs a more object-oriented language. This doesn't scale, does it?
 The content filer has t'be written into the media files so bits coming off the satellite can be read by multiplatforms. Really, omniplatforms. Including whatever new hardware emerges.
 Skywire.
 Among other things... We know convergence is the real super-highway: all the PC's, TV's, phones, etc. linked together. Why cram it into a cable if you can use the whole sky?
 Low enough to relay internet traffic.
 I've only shown this to three other people. I bought 200, we've launched 12 so far. I keep the coordinates in this room.  It's left over from SDI. Reagan's Star Wars technology? They orbit 426 miles up.
 There's a rumor going around, maybe you've heard it.
 You know a lot about art, I guess.
 Oh. No thanks.
 Would you like a Coke or something?
 Cool!
 You would? Wow. When would we come?  'Think he hung up.
 Milo? Gary Boyd. I'm hoping you and your friend can come up here. We've made some amazing strides in digital convergence. I'd love to show them to you.
 ...Hello?
 Just do it.
 Gary?
 'Knows I'm altering the coordinates. Let's jump to #12.
 What?
 Wait... He knows.
 Longitude 109 --
 Let's go.
 Ready for number three?
 Longitude 48 degrees 06 minutes --
 Okay, #2.
 Just do what I'm asking!
 Gary, don't worry, we --
 Help me change the Skywire settings. Add five degrees to each satellite coordinate.
 Nothing does. Still. I want him to like me.
 Hasn't affected his work, though.
 There may be a little less trust after your outburst.
 What'd the girl say?
 Maybe we should all get on it.
 'Start-up not 50 miles from here. Kid's on Prozac.
 This is good. Who did it?
 Cool.
 You guys'll be using Teddy's old space, is that okay?
 Got out of my other commitment.
 ...You wanna work -- here?
 We'll come up with the next big thing.
 Your app kind of blew mine out of the water.
 Those really weird, short lines.
 Man, could he write code. Totally elegant. He had his own style.
 It's only meaningful when you've got 40,000 lines of code to back it up.
 He was on the verge of something, too. He was gonna show us the next day. He said "The answer's not in the box, it's in the band." Know what it means?
 Just thought his work should go on.
 You are naive. Look at your employment contract: you can't work anywhere else in this field for at least few years.  Not that I don't miss you.
 I know you lost all his work. Maybe I could come down here and --
 I mean, it's your life.
 You do?
 I think you should go.
 In exchange for endowments. They should just drop the pretense and name the schools after 'em.
 All the companies know. The faculties tell 'em. At the target schools.
 I launched Skywire. Just pray the last set of coordinates Milo sent me connected us to Gary's satellite.
 Now what are we doing? I don't get any of this shit!
 Where we going?
 Come with me.
 I'm calling Gary.
 You calling Phil and Randy?
 They know. 'Just they don't trust me with it. So we'll get the evidence, first, ask questions later.
 Get the backslash, the colon, keys kids don't use but geeks do.  What would Milo want in here, anyway?
 Let's get him in here.
 Delbert seems to enter #21 twice. Without leaving the first time.
 Any irregularity in the pattern.
 What're we looking for?
 Keep looking.
 Every entry was authorized.
 Not yet. 'Love to bust my ass cause I'm not in frigging Mensa.  I swear to God, it's that kid Milo, I told 'em so in the first place, but they didn't even wanna hear about it.  Let's run a printout on card entries.
 Unlikely. All 14 cameras are frozen. Do we call Randy and Phil? Tell 'em there may have been a break-in?
 Could it be a glitch? Something the construction workers caused?
 Wait a second. He knows I know.
 Latitude 47 degrees.
 He's been altering the coordinates since we logged on. He's a step ahead. Let's jump to #12.
 What?
 ...He knows.
 Let's try #2.
 Maybe it's the satellite.
 But you said the other --
 Bring it to the other location.
 It's three years old, it --
 They know, I had no choice. Get out of the house now! Do you have a laptop?
 Tell me you're not calling on your car phone?!
 Meet me at the other location.
 At this point the worst thing I could do is anything out of the ordinary.
 Please don't go.
 She called to apologize. I said I was pulling an all-nighter. She said then come home just to say Hi. Which I always do when we fight, it's suspicious if I don't.
 Why?!
 He suspects I know something. I think he was sort of -- explaining himself to me, in case I do.  We have to go in tonight. I'm two hours from a Beta version.  But I've gotta go home for an hour.
 Does he know you know?
 You'll come up with something.
 That's lame, isn't it?
 You could always say you have to go the bathroom.
 Perfect.  How am I gonna get away from the party long enough to --
 Same with the excerpts I'm choosing: they'll play against any of the images you described.
 Milo? What if Shrot notices somebody entered the Day Care at four A.M.? And tells them about it?
 Oh.
 Yeah, that's old, in a tree.
 Hardly anybody does, that's the beauty part. No cameras, the DOJ doesn't bother with it, it's accessed by a tunnel they boast about. You know the best place to hide a leaf?
 He doesn't know about the Day Care.
 They know I broke in. Alice helped me.  Shrot's not one of them. He's blundering into this on his own.
 Milo? Shrot suspects somebody broke into #21. I was in his office when he was reviewing the card readouts.
 Thank God.
 The dishes are juiced up, too.
 Great. I knocked off the aglet, as soon as I get a passable version of Skywire we're there.
 Gary.
 I felt guilty. 'Cause I "owed so much" to Alice. But even then I was starting to wonder. Is it so great to be so consumed by this one thing that you let another person do your thinking for you? If you have a lucrative skill, it's all anybody wants from you. You grow older but you don't grow up. You turn into -- into --
 "A beautiful geek? What're the chances?"
 What'd he say?
 I told Teddy about you.
 'Cause their apartments might be bugged?
 'Think everybody in this place is here the same reason we are?
 Oh.  I liked you. I was checking you out.
 Why were you snooping in my office?
 I thought the worst they would do is fire me. Who knew they took termination so literally?
 Why were you so careless?
 And what if the broadcast dishes on top of 21 aren't hot yet? You said the place isn't finished.
 I don't know --
 You mean -- break in?
 Oh, man. I'd have to get into Gary's house. To get the satellite positions.
 Before they kill somebody else, too.
 Gary knows I'm close on Skywire. We have to do this fast.
 It's a standard GUI. Once I've got a concept, it's maybe three day's work.
 You'd have to design a graphic interface to make the data pop. Maybe some audio, too. To tie it all in to Gary. How long would that take you?
 But they'd still get the idea, right?
 It's how on-line services push logos they wanna sell you. You don't ask for 'em, they just appear. 'Have to work on it somewhere besides my office or my house. And then the quality of the broadcast wouldn't exactly be digital, that's 12 months away.
 A what?
 We can't just assume they're standing by to receive Skywire 12 months from launch. I'd have to write in an aglet.
 He's got 12 satellites up. He's got dishes on top of 21. He's building this --  mega-network for Skywire. Let's use it.
 What?
 How close are you?
 Time-Warner has a 40 per cent stake in Gary's set-top device. That also takes out CNN.  "GE joins Outpost in new venture," which means NBC is out. "Disney joins Outpost," ABC is out. "Outpost and Newscorp in new deal," Fox is out. Any of these places could have a mole. Or all of 'em.  It's like a a continuous loop. We can go to some alternative press place that 1,000 people read, get them and us killed. But anything big enough for this is a parent of or a subsidiary to something Gary's got a finger in!
 Time?
 Say there's just one "mole" working there, like Barton at the DOJ. How do we know he's not the guy we've contacted? Or she? Or the guy she works for?
 But still, you can't say CBS wouldn't love to break something like --
 Yeah, they dig stuff like this.  "CBS News has partnered with Outpost Information Systems in a cable news network due to launch Fall of 2001."
 What about "60 Minutes."
 He's buying up pretty much everything: cable companies, baby bells, picture libraries, museum rights, film archives... Getting ready for Skywire.
 Certainly not at my happy home.
 We could cross-reference a data base on media ownership. But not on our own computers. Not even at home.
 Right. But Gary's tied-in to a lot of media conglomerates. Have to be careful who we pick.
 The mainstream media. TV, or a newsmagazine.
 There're so many disinformation sites about Gary already. Where he has devil's horns or they crop him in with Saddam Hussein.
 Do we post it on the Net?
 There's always a logical answer -- you just have to define the question.
 Who can we trust?
 They've got this guy in the DOJ, maybe others. We tell the wrong person, it's over.
 What about the FBI?
 No, no. Never.
 I always felt if a -- boy I liked ever found out -- he'd run. He'd think I was unclean.
 Hmm?
 ...Milo?
 They're already watching you. If they had to, they'd give him this drug that mimics an alcoholic blackout. He'd wake up not even remembering his "act of revenge."
 He's out of prison?
 They'd frame him.
 Is that my -- scenario?  Tell me.
 Oh yeah?
 I know why you're so secretive. Why you won't let anybody near you.  I know what he did to you.
 You know. There is no second place. And what's the risk? The killings're undetectable, they're hand-tailored, they make "sense." I mean, they're in the information business. They have scenarios for all of us, too. In case we find out too much.
 But why would they --?
 It's easy to know who the smart geeks are, the schools tell 'em. They upload medical files, school records, pharmacy files. They'd be happy just to steal code forever. But when a program gets close to fruition. Like Teddy. He was almost there.
 The Day Care?
 You thought about it too. You've been suspicious for a while. But it's not happening in there. It's happening in the Day Care.
 Why would you do a thing like --
 I snuck into #21.
 She saved my life.
 That's great. I -- didn't know.
 Then and now.  But not right now.
 So, when you were talking about wishing people were more like computers. Was that then? Or now?
 Long story. Not that interesting.
 Why's that?
 Mmm-more like -- I have a little trouble. Trusting people.
 You're compulsive.
 Maybe once. I re-wrote it, anyway.
 Right, right. But does he ever just, like, hand you code?
 Mine's not the CEO. He barely remembers to take a shower.
 "There is no second place." Plus every time I get jammed-up, Gary has an inspiration.  Is it like that with your counselor?
 They just pushed up the schedule on Skywire apps. How fast are you going?
 No. Please.
 Did you wanna be alone?
 Yeah? I ran it for lots of platforms, ranging from the narrowest bandwidth to --
 Cool!
 Show me.
 Graphical interfaces. For Skywire? I'm s'posed to coordinate with you.
 What've you got there?
 No, I know what you mean. I used to spend my life wishing people could be like computers. Least they make sense. Sometimes you think they've betrayed you. Like a person would. But then you see, no, you just missed a step. You can go back and make it all work.
 Did I say something?
 Didn't mean to pry. I just have this theory. Some of us who got to good at this? We were -- escaping something.
 ...Something like that. Yeah.
 Me too! Were you an Army brat or something?
 We moved around so much I barely knew my teachers.
 ...Were you?
 I wouldn't worry about it. You've gotta figure most people around here were their teachers' pets.
 I'm getting a teacher's pet rep.
 You're famous around here.
 You know mine.
 You know my name.
 Lisa.
 I didn't plan this.
 Milo, geeks don't have two girlfriends. Most don't have one.
 What does that mean?
 I dunno. I guess Larry's got me totally suspicious of that place.
 What d'you mean?
 A beautiful geek? I don't wanna sound paranoid, or like a pig, but what're the chances?
 No! I keep thinking it'll go away. But there's this -- connection. She's been hacking since she was little, she had to move around a lot. Plus I see her every day, we're working on the same program. She's -- beautiful.
 Did you tell Alice?
 I don't know.
 What? Come on. Is it serious?
 I met this girl.
 I'm cool. They didn't touch the machine. Or my disks. Probably didn't know what they were. So, you a Moonie yet?  Milo?
 Jesus, Teddy.
 They're in the neighborhood. They usually hassle Vietnamese grocers.
 What?!
 But these, like, White Supremacists trashed my office, last week.
 Outpost made me sign 1,000. 'Guess we'll find out what else we have to talk about. Life stuff.
 We rented a loft in Sunnyvale.  You know what's the bad part? We can't talk about work anymore. We're competitors! The venture capitalists made us sign like 100 confidentiality forms.
 Hey, we got seed money for the startup! A million-five!
 Wanted to say goodbye to him...
 Uh. Not exactly.
 Is that how Larry feels?
 And your phone messages. You wanna do what you do, it's not a crime.
 ...You got my E-mail?
 You wanna survive in the software business, you cover your bets... I gotta say, this is the weirdest car anybody ever requested.
 Gary's not into fiber optics. He's betting everything on the satellites.
 #21. Way behind schedule. It's top- secret, but everybody knows it's a digital broadcast space. They see the dishes on top, the fiber optics going in.
 What're they building?
 Right. That's rare around here. You know how nuns' re-married to Jesus? 'Posties are married to Outpost.
 I've got a girlfriend, remember?
 Heavy graphical background, doing design-interface for Skywire apps.  You'll be working with her.
 She's a programmer?
 Every geek here's got a thing for Lisa. But that's about the biggest reaction she's had to anybody.
 Well, he micro-managed the company till it got too big...  'Guess he needs to micro-manage something.
 His Snapples were in alphabetical order.
 So how'd you like the house?
 Oh we're not going to the campus.
 So -- how far are we from the campus?
 You don't look anything like a three- year-old.
 Damn. 'Have to go back over there.  Be so much easier if we could walk in the front door.
 Did you download Corey? In San Jose?
 Yeah, yeah.
 Speaking of which...
 Maybe he'll get back to work.
 There is no public offering. The guy who wrote it joined some freakazoid cult in San Luis Obispo. 'Wrote this just to run their web site.
 Can we buy into their IPO? Or is that a Justice Dept. problem?
 We tried the big vaporware number, Gary, it's no-sale.
 We're all grateful for that. Really. Go out the way you came in?
 Wait a second. I'm the one who found out he was mucking around in here in the first place.
 Fellas, I'm gonna have to ask you to leave here now.
 We're too late. Take a look.
 Where is he?
 Who're these guys?
 You're not listening.
 I could get it out of him.
 That kid's the great white hope.
 Unless it's a diversion. Milo's in my office. He was tailgating, so I --
 There's nothing in this hall. Someone's pulling your chain, as usual.
 Not much. Glorified cherry bomb. Right by the civil defense sign? Some geek's idea of irony. I been saying we need a camera in this hall.
 What is it?
 Oh, you're very clever. Let's make love, you silly, hairy little man.
 I think it was Wordsworth who penned this little gem: 'Press the button, pull the chain, out comes a chocolate choo-choo train.'
 I'll tell you all in due time, after we make love. But first, tell me another poem.
 Damn. What exactly do you do at Virtucon?
 Yes.
 Is it about my teeth?
 Do you mind if I ask you a personal question?
 Kiss me.
 To my health.
 Thank you, that's beautiful. To your health.
 'Milk, milk, lemonade.  Round the corner fudge is made.  Stick your finger in the hole, And out comes a tootsie roll!'
 That's very clever. Do you know any other poems?
 'Pardon me for being rude, It was not me, it was my food.  It just popped up to say hello, and now it's gone back down below.'
 Mmmm... I feel extreme relaxation.
 How do you feel, Mr. Cunningham?
 Sak-i it to me!
 Care for some saki?
 Or sometimes not at all.
 In Japan, men come first and women come second.
 Groovy.
 May I wash you?
 Don't you like girls, Mr. Cunningham? Come in, and I'll show you everything you need to know.
 I'd rather talk about Number Two.
 Come in.
 Behave!
 It's for the mining industry, Mr. Cunningham. We can talk about business later. But first, let me slip into something more comfortable.
 I didn't, baby, you just told me.
 Virtucon's main interest is in cable television, but they do have a subterranean construction division, yes. How did you know?
 Your boss, Number Two, I understand that cat's involved in big underground drills.
 You may.
 Call me Ritchie, Miss Fagina. May I call you Alotta...  Please?
 What do you want, Mr... Cunningham, was it?
 What, and watch all my earnings go...  Down the toilet?
 I thought you'd quit while you were ahead.
 You seem surprised to see me.
 Smashing!
 "Fifteen minutes of fame?" I'm going to use that quote and not give you any credit for that, either.
 If you can become famous, everyone will have their fifteen minutes of fame, man.
 I'm going to paint this can of soup and become famous and not give you any credit for it.
 Here, have this can of Campbell's Tomato Soup.
 Hungry.
 Hey, how are you?
 Austin Powers? Hi, I'm Andy Warhol.
 Be careful!
 Yes Basil?
 But, wait, I-- you got me again. Oh, and Austin--
 Thanks, Basil. Maybe the Nineties aren't so bad after all.
 Here's the number of my dentist, he's first rate. Ring him up, he'll look after you.
 Austin, I have something for you as well.
 Congratulations, Field Agent Kensington!
 Not quite, actually. Vanessa, I have something for you.
 I'd say that about sums it up, Exposition.
 Well, Austin, you've stopped Dr. Evil from destroying the world with his subterranean nuclear probe, and somehow you and Agent Kensington managed to escape unscathed from his evil lair.
 Thanks.
 Be careful.
 Yes, Basil?
 I'm leaving!  Oh, and Austin?
 I think if everyone were honest, they'd confess that the lady looks exactly like a man in drag.
 All right, Austin, I think you should go.
 You must admit, she is rather mannish. No offense, but if that's a woman, it looks like she's been beaten with an ugly stick.
 Damn it, man! You're talking about my mother!
 I'm sorry, Basil, I thought she was a man.
 That's not your mother, that's a man!
 My God, Austin, what have you done?
 Good God, and underground missile. We've long feared such a development.
 Maybe these photographs are the last piece of that puzzle.  I've uncovered the details on Project Vulcan. It's a new subterranean warhead delivery system.
 Indeed... If we could get back to the business at hand. It's one thing to have a warhead, it's quite another thing to have the missiles to launch it.
 Circus folk.  Nomads, you know. They smell like cabbage.
 What?
 Carnies.
 What's the other thing you're scared of?
 Excuse me?
 What's the other?
 Thank you, Exposition. Only two things, scare me, and one is nuclear war.
 Austin, Vanessa, let me bring you up to speed. Dr. Evil has high- jacked a nuclear warhead from Kreplachistan and is holding the world ransom for one-hundred billion dollars. If the world doesn't pay up in four days, he's threatening to destroy the world.
 Hello, Exposition.
 Thank you.
 Be careful.
 Yes?
 There's one more thing, Austin.
 Oh, yes. Thank you.
 Let me remind you that because of the unfreezing process you might experience flatulence at moments of extreme relaxation.
 Yes?
 Oh, and Austin...
 Thank you, Basil.
 Then you'll have to go it alone. Good luck.
 She's working on another lead right now.
 Where is Vanessa, by the way?
 Right away, Exposition.
 Hello, Austin, this is Basil Exposition from British Intelligence. Thank you for confirming the link between Dr. Evil and Virtucon. Find out what part Virtucon plays in something called Project Vulcan. I'll need you and Vanessa to get on that immediately.
 Be careful.
 Yes?
 Oh, and Austin...
 Thank you, Exposition.
 Hello Austin. Hello Vanessa. This is Basil Exposition, from British Intelligence.  There's a company in Las Vegas called Virtucon that we think may be linked to Dr. Evil. Many of the Virtucon executives gamble at the hotel/casino where you'll be staying. That's the first place you should look.  Well, I'm off to the chat rooms.
 Thanks.
 Be careful.
 Yes?
 Oh, and Austin...
 Thank you, Exposition.
 Yes, well...Agent Kensington will get you set up. She's very dedicated. Perhaps, a little too dedicated.  She's got a bit of a bug up her ass. Good luck, Austin, the world's depending on you.
 My God, Vanessa's got a smashing body. I bet she shags like a minx. How do I tell them that because of the unfreezing process, I have no inner monologue?  I hope I didn't say that out loud just now.
 Vanessa's one of our top agents.
 No, Austin, Mrs. Kensington has long- since retired. Ms.  Kensington is her daughter.
 You mean Mrs. Kensington?
 Immediately. You'll be working with Ms. Kensington.
 When do I begin?
 Groovy. Smashing! Good on ya!  Nice tie. Yea capitalism!
 We won, Austin.
 Thank God. Those capitalist dogs will finally pay for their crimes against the people, hey Comrades?
 A lot's happened since you were frozen, Austin. The cold war's over.
 Russian Intelligence? Are you mad?
 You might also experience a slight fever, dry mouth, and flatulence at moments of extreme relaxation. Austin, this is Commander Gilmour, Strategic Command, and General Borschevsky, Russian Intelligence.
 Yes, I'm having trouble controlling...  THE VOLUME OF MY VOICE!
 The shouting is a temporary side- effect of the unfreezing process.
 WHO ARE THESE PEOPLE?
 You're in the Ministry of Defense. It's 1997. You've been cryogenically frozen for thirty years.
 Where am I?
 Thank you.  Let's go, baby!
 Be careful.
 Yes?
 Oh, and Austin...
 Thank you.
 Good luck, Austin.
 Just where you'd never think to look for him. We'll be there.
 I'm afraid not. Earlier this week, Dr. Evil escaped from Zedel Edel Prison in Baaden Baaden and now he's planning a trap for you tonight at the Electric Psychedelic Pussycat Swinger's Club in Picadilly Circus here in swinging London.
 Dr. Evil? I thought I put him in jail for good.
 I just wanted to be extremely clear so that everyone knows what's going on at any given time. We've just received word that Dr. Evil, the ultimate square, is planning to take over the world.
 We know all that, Exposition.
 Hello, Austin. This is Basil Exposition, Chief of British Intelligence.  You're Austin Powers, International Man of Mystery, and you're with Agent Mrs. Kensington. The year is 1967, and you're talking on a picture phone.
 Groovy!
 Good on ya, man.
 "You can't always get what you want!" That's a great title for a song! I'm gonna write that, and it'll be a big hit.
 Well, you can't always get what you want.
 Are you more satisfied now sexually, Austin?
 Hey, Mick!
 Hey Austin Powers, it's me, Mick Jagger.
 Love is... love is... love is...
 Why not? It's a question.
 That does not compute.
 Really? Let me ask you this. What is love?
 Yes, I am programmed to answer any question.
 Well, Destructacon 5000, you have quite a head on your shoulders, I dare to coin.
 Good afternoon, Mr. Powers, I'm the Destructacon 5000. I'm programmed to prevent you from progressing beyond this point. You might as well surrender. Resistance is futile. Your odds of survival are 23,763,273 to...
 Man, you are one chilly square!
 Not really. Kill the little bastard. See what I care.
 It seems the tables have turned again, Dr. Evil.
 Really, there's nothing more pathetic than an aging hipster.
 That's why right now is a very groovy time, man. We still have freedom, but we also have responsibility.
 Your freedom has cause more pain and suffering in the world than any plan I ever dreamed of. Face it, freedom failed.
 No, man, what we swingers were rebelling against were uptight squares like you, whose bag was money and world domination. We were innocent, man. If we'd known the consequences of our sexual liberation, we would have done things differently, but the spirit would have remained the same.  It's freedom, man.
 Well done, Mr. Powers. We're not so different, you and I. It's true, you're British, and I'm Belgian. You have a full head of hair, mine is slightly receding. You're thin, I'm about forty pounds overweight. OK, we are different, I'm not making a very good point. However, isn't it ironic, Mr. Powers, that the very things you stand for-- swinging, free love, parties, distrust of authority- are all now, in the Nineties, considered to be... evil? Maybe we have more in common than you care to admit.
 I've got you, Dr. Evil!
 No, Mr. Powers, I expect them to die. Even after they pay me the money, I'm still going to melt all the cities of the world with hot magma.  All right, guard, begin the unnecessarily Slow-Moving Dipping Mechanism.
 Dr. Evil, do you really expect them to pay?
 Oh forget it. As a fellow player on the international stage, Mr.  Powers, I'm sure you'll enjoy watching the curtain fall on the third and final act.
 I'm sorry, baby, I'm just not grocking your head space.
 Don't try to suck up to me! It's a little late for that. I'm a freak! Look at it, it's been rendered useless.
 What's wrong with your hand?
 Behave!
 Kiss me.
 That's fab, because I love you, too, Vanessa.
 I love you, Austin.
 Lay it on me.
 I have something to tell you.
 I'll secure the perimeter.
 I'm going it alone this time, Vanessa. I have a follow-up visit with the Evil Doctor.
 Austin, I'm coming with you.
 Don't worry!
 Are you crazy?
 Follow me! We're going to have to jump over the rail!
 Hold on a tick, let me put on my togs.
 I believe you, Austin. Let's go.
 I can explain. They attacked me. Gas came out of her...well, and then they... and I...
 Likewise.
 It's not what it looks like, Vanessa.  At ease, boys.
 Oh, behave!
 Anyways, what I'm trying to say is that if you want me to be a one-woman man, well, that's just groovy, because... I love you.
 Austin, what's your point?
 Listen, Vanessa, whatever happens, I just want you to know that I feel bad about shagging that Italian girl. I had a sip of sake and all of the sudden, I don't know what happened. The whole time I was shagging her-- I mean really shagging her, I mean it was crazy, I was like a huge mechanical piston, in and out, IN and OUT!--
 I'll hurry back.
 Too right, youth. That's why I need you to lead the troops.
 I'm not going anywhere. We're a team.
 We've got a freaked out square and world annihilation is his bag.  You go get help. I'm gonna stay here and keep an eye on the bad Doctor.
 What do we do now?
 Fair enough.
 Shut up.
 It's a shame he wasn't more headstrong.
 Yes.
 That's not the way to get ahead in life.
 Indeed.
 Not a good time to lose one's head.
 Smashing idea! Give it to me.
 No, no, no. We'll use the floss to get to the ledge.
 All right, I get it. I have bad teeth. You have to understand, in Britain in the Sixties you could be a sex symbol and still have bad teeth. It didn't matter.
 Sadly, no. Hold on! I always keep this on me just in case.
 First, I plan to soil myself. Then, I plan to regroup and think about the next move. Any thoughts?
 Not now, Austin.
 Does that make you horny?
 Yes, act naturally and we'll split this scene the way we came in, Vanessa.
 Thank God, Austin, we made it.
 Don't worry, baby. I picked up a mind control technique during my travels to India. I learned it from my guru, the late Guru Shastri, a chaste man who mysteriously died of a disease that had all the hallmarks of syphilis.  Just watch me. Watch me, now.
 Austin, we don't look anything like our photo badges.
 I'm looking at you, and the whole time I can't help thinking you had your willie inside her hootchie-kooch.
 No! Don't lay your hang-ups on me, Vanessa. You're being very trippy.
 You know who.
 Who?
 Do you think she's prettier than I?
 Since I've been unfrozen, I've had a rancid taste in my mouth. Do you have a piece of gum?
 I'll tell him. By the way, I've decided we should keep our relationship strictly professional.
 Out and about, doing odds and sods.
 Basil was very concerned to know where you were last night.
 Yeah, I can't believe Liberace was gay. Women loved him, man. I didn't see that one coming.
 Thirty years of political and social upheaval. The fall of the Berlin wall, a female Prime Minister of England, the abolishment of Apartheid, a fascinating tapestry of human strum und drang.
 Hello, luv.
 You just don't get it, do you, Austin? Good night. Welcome to the Nineties, you're going to be very lonely.
 It was just a shag, Vanessa. You're everything to me.
 Well, it means something to me. If you want us to have a relationship, you've got to be a one-woman man.
 Well they should, filthy beggars, they go from port to port.  Alotta meant nothing to me.
 Not in the Nineties.
 Only sailors use condoms, man.
 No, did you use a condom?
 Of course, I had my nine-millimeter automatic.
 I can't believe you made love to her just like that. Did you use protection?
 Don't be sorry. You're right to be suspicious. I shagged her. I shagged her rotten.
 Listen, I know I'm just being neurotic, but I can't shake this suspicious feeling about that Italian secretary, Ms. Fagina. I mean, I don't want to sound paranoid, but I've had some bad relationships in the past, and I have some jealousy issues. You went to her penthouse. It makes me feel so small to give into these insecurities, but I can't help but feel this weird, irrational, unfocused... well, jealousy. I'm sorry.
 Of course, luv.
 Austin, may I have a word with you?
 Look at her hands, baby! Those are carpenter's hands.
 Really, Austin!
 She was very groovy. She was so in love with your Dad. If there was one other cat in this world that could have loved your Mum and treated her as well as you Dad did, it was me. But, unfortunately for yours truly, that train has sailed.
 It's not that I'm drunk, I'm just beginning to see what my Mum was talking about.  What was my mother like back in the Sixties? I'm dying to know.
 I can't. You're drunk.
 I'm not. I'm the sensible one. I'm always the designated driver.
 Oh, yes you are.
 I am not.
 You're smashed, Vanessa.
 No, this is me in a nutshell.
 Always wanting to have fun, that's you in a nutshell.
 I'm sorry that bug up your ass had to die.
 Why?
 I'm sorry.
 I haven't had fun like that since college.
 Go! Just go!
 Sorry. Move your hand to the left. There you go. Gorgeous.
 Watch out, you're on my hair!
 I couldn't have another bite.
 Fancy a nibble?
 You're crazy. The camera loves you, Vanessa.
 I hate having my picture taken.
 No worries, luv. We'll just give Basil a tinkle on the telling bone...
 Unfortunately, while you told that stupid story, Dr. Evil has escaped.
 Well, you know... cows, and shagging.
 I don't get it.
 Let me tell you a story. There's these two bulls on top of a hill checking out some foxy cows in the meadow below. The young bull says, 'hey, why don't we run down the hill and shag us a cow?', and the wise old bull replies, 'no, why don't we walk down the hill and shag all the cows?'
 We can't just sit here, Austin.
 He's too well-protected right now.
 Let's go get him!
 I never forget a pussy... cat.
 How do you know?
 Hello, hello. That's Dr. Evil's cat.
 Let me see.
 A limousine has just pulled up.
 We've got a doctor's appointment-- an evil doctor's appointment.
 Why?
 Good morning, Vanessa! I hope you have on clean underwear.
 Do you want to talk to him?
 Good morning, luv, who are you on the phone with?
 That cat Number Two has an X-ray eyepatch. I get bad vibes from him, man. Listen, we should go back to the room, but first I have to go to the naughty chair and see a man about a dog.
 Why did you leave so soon?
 Oh, I forgot to tell you, they're prescription X-ray glasses. I have very bad astigmatism.
 I can't see a bloody thing.
 I'm going to use a cover name. It's important that it be a generic name so that we don't draw attention to ourselves.
 Here, use mine.
 I love Las Vegas, man. Oh, I forgot my x-ray glasses.
 I think I'll give that stew a ding-a- ling.
 I'm sure.
 Hey, who put this in here? Someone's playing a prank on me!  Honestly, this isn't mine.
 Why? What's wrong with my teeth?
 No, actually. I don't know how to put this really. Well, there have been fabulous advances in the field of dentistry.
 Let me guess. The floss is garotte wire, the toothpaste contains plastic explosives, and the toothbrush is the detonation device.
 Yes, we've had it retrofitted with a secure cellular phone, an on-board computer, and a Global Geosynchronous Positioning Device. Oh, and finally, this.
 You've preserved my Jag! Smashing!
 I understand that, Mr. Powers, but let me be perfectly clear with you, perhaps to the point of being insulting. I will never have sex with you, ever.  If you were the last man on Earth and I was the last woman on Earth, and the future of the human race depended on our having sex simply for procreation, I still would not have sex with you.
 Listen, Vanessa, I'm a swinger... That's what I do, I swing.
 I hope this is part of the unfreezing process.
 Do I make you horny? Randy, you know. To you, am I eros manifest?
 What?
 Do I make you horny?
 Sure.
 Brrrr! She must be frigid. There's two things I know about life: one, Americans will never take to soccer. Two, Swedish girls and stewardesses love to shag!  They're shag-mad, man! Let me ask you a question, Vanessa, and be honest.
 That's right. You're supposed to say 'colored' now, right?  Here's the stewardesses! Bring on the sexy stews!
 We don't use the term 'Negro' anymore. It's considered offensive.
 You know, a Chigro... part Chinese, part Negro...  Chigro.
 A Chigro?
 Have you ever made love to a Chigro?
 Mr. Powers, please. I know that you must be a little confused, but we have a very serious situation at hand. I would appreciate it if you'd concentrate on our mission and give your libido a rest.
 My meat and two veg.
 I'm sorry?
 My wedding tackle.
 Excuse me?
 I've been frozen for thirty years, man, I want to see if my bits and pieces are still working.
 I beg your pardon?
 That's fascinating, Vanessa. Listen, why don't we go into the back and shag?
 I went to Oxford and excelled in several subjects, but I ended up specializing in foreign languages. I wanted to travel -- see the world. In my last year I was accepted into the M.O.D. in the Cultural Studies sector. I thought I was off on an exciting career, but my job was to read everything printed in every country. It's very boring. My whole day is spent reading wedding announcements in Farsi. If I do well with this case, I finally get promoted to field operative...
 Pretty groovy Jumbo Jet, eh? How does a hot chick like you end up working at the Ministry of Defense?
 My jumbo jet? Smashing baby.
 Listen, Mr. Powers, I look forward to working with you, but do me a favor and stop calling me baby. You can address me as Agent Kensington. We have to leave immediately. We've preserved your private jet just as you left it. It's waiting at Heathrow Airport.
 OK, OK, man, don't get heavy, I'll sign. Just to get things moving, baby.
 My mother's doing quite well, thank you very much.
 If it's a lie, goddamn her. It it's the truth, goddamn me.  God, I hope that's witty. How's your mum?
 My mother's told me all about you.
 Well, as long as people are still having promiscuous sex with many anonymous partners without protection, while at the same time experimenting with mind-expanding drugs in a consequence-free environment, I'll be sound as a pound.
 Mr. Powers, my job is to acclimate you to the Nineties. You know, a lot's changed since 1967.
 One book: Swedish-Made Penis Enlarger Pumps and Me: This Sort of Thing Is My Bag, Baby, by Austin Powers.
 I don't even know what this is. This sort of thing ain't my bag, baby.
 One warranty card for Swedish-made penis enlarger pump, filled out by Austin Powers.
 I'm telling you, baby, that's not mine.
 One credit card receipt for Swedish- made penis enlarger pump, signed Austin Powers.
 That's not mine.
 OK, Austin Danger Powers: One blue crushed-velvet suit. One frilly lace cravat. One gold medallion with peace symbol. One pair of Italian shoes. One pair of tie-dyed socks, purple. One vinyl recording album: Tom Jones, Live at Las Vegas. One Swedish-made penis enlarger pump.
 Danger's my middle name.
 It says here, name Danger Powers.
 Actually, my name's Austin Powers.
 Danger Powers, personal effects.
 Where did you learn to shoot?
 Noooooooooooooo!
 I'm going to go across the street and get you some sherbert.
 No, no, I want you to have it, even if it's my last piece.
 No, no, I want you to have it, even if it's my last piece.
 Hey! Wait a minute, that's my last piece of gum.
 Don't mind if I do.
 Here, have a piece of gum.
 Here, have a piece of gum.
 Hey, wait a minute--
 Everything seems to be in order.
 Sure.
 Hi, folks. You're entering a restricted zone. Can I see your security badges?
 That's a direct order. You didn't see a thing!
 Commander, I have to log it...
 What's its current position?
 Should we scramble TacHQ for an intercept?
 Shut up.
 In many ways, Bob's Big Boy never left, sir. He's always offered the same high quality meals at competitive prices.
 Oh my God, he's back.
 It appears to be in the shape of Bob's Big Boy, sir.
 What are you saying, son?
 No. Log Com Bird Twelve says its metalurg recon analysis is a standard alloy, not stealthy, not carbon- composite.  It does have an odd shape, sir.
 Is it one of ours?
 Commander, this is Slater in SoWest Com Three. We have a potential bogey with erratic vectoring and an unorthodox entry angle.
 You shot me right in the arm!  Why did--
 Right. Okay. Moving on.
 Ow! You shot me!
 You've all been gathered here to form my Evil Cabinet. Excuse me.
 Hello up there! Anyone! Can someone call an ambulance? I'm in quite a lot of pain.
 Some of you I know, some of you I'm meeting for the first time.
 Someone help me! I'm still alive, only I'm very badly burned.
 We've got a lot of work to do.
 Let this be a reminder to you all that this organization will not tolerate failure.
 Ahhhhhhhhh!
 Silence!
 We could not anticipate feline complications due to the reanimation process&emdash;
 And look what you've done to Mr. Bigglesworth!
 But Dr. Evil, all you need to do is--  --work with this tennis ball. Squeeze it for twenty minutes a day. A few months of that and it'll be just as strong as the other arm...
 Can't you see I'm only half a man? Look at me, I'm a freak!
 But my design was perfect!  Your autonomic functions were shut down, and even though your arm wasn't frozen, the aging was retarded, therefore your right arm is only slightly older than the left.
 Please allow me to demonstrate.
 Really? Are they ill-tempered?
 They're mutated sea bass.
 Right.
 Sea bass.
 I have one simple request-- sharks with friggin' laser beams attached to their heads, and it can't be done? Remind me again why I pay you people? What do we have?
 Well, we experimented with lasers, but you would be surprised at how heavy they are. They actually outweighed the piranha themselves, and the fish, well, they sank to the bottom and died.
 What is it now?
 Right.  Mr. Powers, we're going to lower you in a tank of piranhas with laser beams attached to their heads.
 It's about the sharks. Since you were frozen, they've been placed on the Endangered Species List. We tried to get some, but it will take months to clear up the red tape.
 Yes, what is it? You're interrupting my moment of triumph.
 Dr. Evil?
 Release the sharks!  All the sharks have had laser beams attached to their heads. I figure every creature deserves a warm meal.
 I like to see girls of that caliber. By caliber, I mean both the barrel size of their guns and the high quality of their character... Forget it.
 Thank you, Herr Doctor.
 Quite impressive.
 These are the latest word in android replicant technology.  Lethal, efficient, brutal. And no man can resist their charms. Send in the soldiers!
 Breathtaking, Frau. These automated strumpets are the perfect bait for the degenerate Powers.
 Ya wohl-- I mean, yes wohl, Herr Doctor. I have created the ultimate weapon to defeat Austin Powers. Bring on the Fembots!
 Austin Powers is getting too close. He must be neutralized. Any suggestions?
 Yes.  Scott!
 My son?
 Well, after a few years, we got sort of impatient. Dr. Evil, I want you to meet your son.
 Yes.
 Remember when we froze your semen, you said that if it looked like you weren't coming back to try and make you a son so that a part of you would live forever?
 That's not true, Doctor. Please, tell us about your childhood.
 The details of my life are quite inconsequential.
 We've heard from Scott, now let's hear from you.
 Actually, the boy's quite astute. I am trying to kill him. My Evil Associates have cautioned against it, so here he is, unfortunately, alive.
 Don't be so hard on yourself. You're here, that's what's important. A journey of a thousand miles begins with one step.
 No, the boy's right. I really am evil.
 Evil, actually, Doctor Evil.
 That was great, Mr. Keon, Dave. Thank you. OK, group, we have two new member. Say hello to Scott and his father, Mr.... Ehville?
 Scott, don't say that...
 I hate you! I hate you! I wish I was never artificially created in a lab.
 I had the group liquidated, you little shit. They were insolent.
 Dad, we just made a breakthrough in group!
 Show me.
 What did you say?
 Blow me.
 Don't you want to see what Daddy does for a living?
 I don't want to.
 Come, everyone, let us repair to the main chamber. Project Vulcan is about to begin. Scott, are you coming?
 No, Scott. You just don't get it, do you?
 I have a gun in my room. Give me five seconds, I'll come back and blow their brains out.
 No, we'll leave them alone and not actually witness them dying, and we'll just assume it all went to plan.
 Aren't you going to watch them? They'll get away!
 Fine. Whatever. Mutated, ill-tempered sea bass it is.  Come, let's return to dinner. Close the tank.
 One more peep out of you and you're grounded. Let's begin.
 Why don't you just shoot him now? Here, I'll get a gun. We'll just shoot him. Bang! Dead. Done.
 I have a better idea. I'm going to put him in an easily-escapable situation involving an overly- elaborate and exotic death.
 But what if he escapes? Why don't you just shoot him? What are you waiting for?
 In due time.
 Why are you feeding him? Why don't you just kill him?
 Scott, I want you to meet Daddy's nemesis, Austin Powers.
 Yeah. What?
 And that's how you want to live your life, is it?
 Thought I'd stay in. There's a good tittie movie on Skinemax.
 Fascinating. What are your plans for this evening?
 Well, me and a buddy went to the video arcade in town and, like, they don't speak English right, and so my buddy gets into a fight, and he goes 'hey, quit hassling me cause I don't speak French or whatever', and the other guy goes something in Paris talk, and I go 'um, just back off' and he goes 'get out' and I go 'make me'.
 Scott my boy, come here. How was your day?
 You always do that!  Anyways, this is really hard, because, you know, my Dad is really evil.
 An evil petting zoo?
 No. Maybe, like, work in a petting zoo or something.
 An evil vet?
 Not me.
 But Scott, who's going to take over the world when I die?
 I haven't seen you my whole life and now you show up and want a relationship? I hate you!
 Hello, Scott. I'm your father, Dr. Evil.  I have a son! I have a son! Everyone, I have a son!  Someday, Scott, this will all be yours.
 Hi.
 Oh, really?  One-hundred billion dollars.  OK, make it happen. Anything else?
 Virtucon alone makes over nine billion dollars a year.
 All right then...  ...FIVE MILLION DOLLARS!
 Don't you think we should ask for more than a million dollars? A million dollars isn't that much money these days.
 Right.  Oh, hell, let's just do what we always do. Let's hijack some nuclear weapons and hold the world hostage.  Gentlemen, it's come to my attention that a breakaway Russian Republic called Kreplachistan will be transferring a nuclear warhead to the United Nations in a few days. Here's the plan. We get the warhead, and we hold the world ransom...  ...FOR ONE MILLION DOLLARS!
 Umm, that also has already happened.
 People have to tell me these things. I've been frozen for thirty years, throw me a bone here.  OK, no problem. Here's my second plan. Back in the Sixties I had a weather changing machine that was in essence a sophisticated heat beam which we called a "laser."  Using this laser, we punch a hole in the protective layer around the Earth, which we scientists call the "Ozone Layer." Slowly but surely, ultraviolet rays would pour in, increasing the risk of skin cancer. That is, unless the world pays us a hefty ransom.
 Um, Dr. Evil, Prince Charles did have an affair. He admitted it, and they are now divorced, actually.
 Gentlemen, I have a plan. It's called blackmail. The Royal Family of Britain are the wealthiest landowners in the world. Either the Royal Family pays us an exorbitant amount of money, or we make it look like Prince Charles, the heir to the throne, has had an affair outside of marriage and, therefore, they would have to divorce.
 We also own the Franklin mint, which makes decorative hand-painted theme plates for collectors.  Some plates, like the Gone With The Wind series, have gone up in value as much as two-hundred and forty percent, but, as with any investment, there is some risk involved.
 I love you, Vanessa.
 I'm on with a friend!  Look, I'd better go. I love you.
 No, it's been too long. Best to leave things alone.
 I know. Let me just say this: Austin was the most loyal and caring friend I ever had.
 You didn't answer my question, Mum.
 Austin is very charming, very debonair. He's handsome, witty, has a knowledge of fine wines, sophisticated, a world-renowned photographer. Women want him, men want to be him. He's a lover of love-- every bit an International Man of Mystery.
 Did you ever want to?
 Of course not. I was married to your father.
 Did you ever...
 Just wait. Once Austin gets you in his charms, it's impossible to get out.
 I just don't see it.
 You have to understand, in Britain in the Sixties you could be a sex symbol and still have bad teeth. It didn't matter.
 What about his teeth?
 You can't judge him by modern standards. He's very much a product of his times. In my day he could have any woman he wanted.
 Well, God knows he tried, but I've been rather firm with him, Mummy. You didn't tell me he was so obsessed with sex. It's bizarre.
 Because you managed to resist Austin Power's charms.
 Why?
 I'm proud of you.
 Oh, God no, I made him sleep on the couch.
 You didn't...
 He's asleep.
 How's Austin?
 Great.
 Oh, hello Vanessa. How was the flight?
 OK, Scott, no one really wants to "kill" anyone here. They say it, but they don't mean it.
 I just think, like, he hates me. I really think he wants to kill me.
 Scott.
 No, he's really evil.
 We don't label people here, Scott.
 I don't know. I was thinking, maybe I'd be a vet or something, cause I like animals and stuff.
 What do you want to do, Scott?
 I don't wanna take over the family business.
 And how do you feel about that?
 OK. Well, I just really met my Dad for the first time three days ago. He was partially frozen for thirty years. I never knew him growing up. He comes back and now he wants me to take over the family business.
 We don't judge here.
 Well, it's kind of weird.
 So, Scott, why don't we start with you. Why are you here?
 No need. I'll call again.
 The technology is brand new. Soon it will be more powerful. We anticipate a huge demand. Leave us your number. We'll be in touch.
 There are limits?
 As real as you wish. Hot or cold. Humid or dry. Anything you like. Within reason.
 You don't say. How real does it feel?
 Of course. Natural weather delivered to your door on demand. Down your phoneline. For limited periods.
 Seriously?
 Normally, we'd be eager to oblige --
 Sir August Merryweather? I was looking for something relaxing. Say, a Tuscan hillside in June?
 Really?
 Shame. I was recommended. By a friend.
 We're not yet open for business, I'm afraid.
 Ah, but you haven't see the real me. Watch closely ...
 Would that I could say the Same.
 So I'm still ...
 He said if it vanished, he'd know it was ... you who betrayed him. He took a huge risk. The ultimate test.
 Three days.
 How long have I been here?
 Peter ...
 ... love ...
 Fear ...
 ... love ...
 Hope...
 ... love...
 Secret ...
 ... preserve...
 Nature ...
 ... power ...
 Flower ...
 ... death ...
 Love...
 ... death ...
 Black...
 Knight ...
 ... head ...
 Red ...
 ... bottle ...
 I want you to say the first thing that comes into your head when I say these words. Do you understand ... ?  Blue ...
 Sir August...?  What now?
 Mrs. Peel ... Come quickly. Brolly's been betrayed! I'll tell you everything ... The weather's getting worse and worse ... they're after me ... coming for me ... come quickly!
 There, look!
 Promised? Who promised?
 Ah, beautiful. Just as he promised.
 You mean you don't recall??
 Have we met?
 You
 Out in India. So character-forming for the British. Not the heat. Good Lord, no. The rain, dash it. A good monsoon. Fifteen inches overnight. A whole week of lovely rain. I remember one summer in Jaipur ...
 I so agree. How did you acquire a taste for it?
 You don't get rain like you used to in England. A good shower that's the ticket. Stiffens resolve, puckers the spirit, quells the namby-pamby in a man.
 I've come to apply for membership in Brolly --
 Really -- what happened in 1922?
 No women. Not in Boodles. Not since 1922.
 I have an appointment.
 Then you can't come in.
 As you see.
 You are female?
 Impossible?
 I'm afraid that's impossible.
 Mr. John Steed, please.
 May I help you, madam ...
 You and I. Together. But first you must confront your greatest enemy. Who could that be, Mrs. Peel? The answer is obvious ...
 Then who wins?
 People, too.
 Rules are made to be broken.
 Quite right, but we still make the rules.
 This isn't a game.
 Congratulations, Mrs. Peel. You have been a worthy opponent. You have tracked us down. You are within an ace of winning.
 We have met ...
 Your voice -- it's so familiar ...
 If nature gives a man a collector's mind, it doesn't matter what he collects. Butterflies. Old China. Penny farthings. A true collector grows more obsessive as the years pass.
 Quite a collection.
 Eh? In here!
 Sir August ... ? Sir August ... ?
 Thank you, Steed.
 Ahem. As I was saying, perhaps another macaroon ...
 Next assignment?
 About your next assignment, Mrs. Peel ...
 So am I.
 The doors and walls are monitored, Mrs. Peel. This is a very secure establishment.
 To find out who killed my husband.
 This is an official matter, Mrs. Peel. No need to take it personally. Where are you going?
 Quite frankly ... it could have been you.
 Who?
 A cover ... for us.  I'm sorry...
 The Institute ... the funding ...
 Peter Peel was a first class agent. A senior operative. 'X' department Special operations. He was engaged in top secret research. Top priority.  Government approved.
 To you ... ?
 The death of Peter Peel was a great loss. To us all ...
 I thought I was a widow. My husband ... the only man I ever loved ... is dead. For the rest of my life I have to live with that.
 We want to help...!
 What are you trying to do to me?
 Watch me.
 You need treatment, Mrs. Peel.  You can't resign.
 I resign.
 After the cold war ...
 London. The World Council of Ministers meets soon on global defence. If you can control the weather, you control the world.
 Directed by laser. Bounced by satellite. Quite possible.
 Would it be possible to use it for military purposes?
 He tried to warn us ...
 Welcome to mobile H.Q. Weather's turning quite nasty. Sir August was blown to smithereens. Along with half of Banffshire.  The Ministry's worried.
 Ropes?
 Father will be your controller. Steed here will show you the ropes.
 Something strange is happening. And whoever knows about it doesn't want us to find out.
 How curious ...
 Let me guess -- 'Father'?
 My number two. Special assignments. She's --
 Looks like rain, Steed...
 Hmmm ...
 Close. We're so hush-hush, even we know nothing about it.  Now let's see, there's coconut cake, date and walnut; I recommend the rum baba ...
 I'll never marry you.
 Choices?
 What are my choices?
 Speaking of Peter, there's more good news: You won't even have to change your last name. You'll always be Mrs. Peel.
 How Wagnerian ... Do you mean to say you've waited all these years because you couldn't create a chip on your own? That would have amused Peter.
 The missing piece of the jigsaw. I tried to get you to give it to me as Peter; I tried to steal it from you as Dr. Darling. As myself I'll be a bit less subtle.  With this ring my plan will be complete.
 One very small thing. A diamond 'cyclone' chip. A thousand times more information on a fraction of the size. If I possess that, my powers would be unlimited. My dear half-brother was developing it. But he suspected sabotage. He gave the chip to ... you, 'Mrs.' Peel. I want you. But also your ring.
 Then what's stopping you?
 Chaos. Transport paralysis. Crop failure.  Economic disaster. Frostbite or sunburn ... on a massive scale. You've seen a few samples...
 The result would be ...
 Destruction of their local weather systems. I can zap a thousand Chernobyls into the air.
 Such as?
 Entirely. On the other hand  Mad people get things done. Let me show you --
 You're mad.
 That's better. I say, isn't this where you came in? It's impenetrable, by the way ...
 Ring?
 Right, bridesmaid. Now what have I left out? Oh, yes, I know: the ring.
 Valentine, listen to me ...
 You know, I believe she's actually jealous.
 Come, come, you're a widow -- a most attractive widow. Now I think of it, we'll need a bridesmaid. Here.
 I'm already married ...
 Think of this as your second wedding feast ...
 Oh, no, Emma. They've only just begun ...
 'Our revels now are ended.'
 You disappoint me, Emma.  Can't you guess?  For you. It was all for you ...
 But -- why?
 Of course. I planned that, too.
 But I found you. All the clues led me here ...
 Spoil the majority shareholders. In Wonderland Weather. I planned everything, even the Ministry recruiting you ...
 Too many cooks --
 For starters. Of course I had to kill the Teddy Bears, as well ...
 You killed my husband.
 An unholy trinity ...
 Dr. Darling, Peter ... all you ...
 A slight miscalculation -- my face was burned beyond recognition. Fortunately my research into plastics came in handy ...
 Darling Emma -- yes, we:  the true genius behind the Prospero Project ...
 You.
 Thanks, Valentine ...
 Good luck ... Peter ... Emma.
 Must be. Trubshaw's busy. I'll send Mother ...
 Ah ... sun tan lotion. Any shops nearby?
 Pity your mother came, too ...
 Our chaperon.
 Not quite.
 Our little paradise -- just made for two?
 It's the latest thing, Mrs. Peel.
 I don't recall Siberia being this warm, Steed.
 As a matter of fact I have ...
 Have you any place in mind?
 English weather. You know, after all we've been through, I should say we deserve a long holiday ...
 Still a bit chilly ...
 A fine night, Mrs. Peel ...
 '... in a beautiful pea green boat...'
 'The owl and the pussycat went to sea -'
 The plot.  Hello, we must be going ...
 What kept you?
 Mrs. Peel?
 If you'd been through what I have, you wouldn't --
 Oh, and by the way, I think it's about time you got rid of that chip on your shoulder.
 But --
 No bother. Mother and Father think I've joined you. I might as well.
 You needn't bother. I can't drag you further into this. After all, I am still the chief suspect.
 Laying in supplies, Mrs. Peel weather may get very nasty and I've no umbrella ...
 Where are you going?
 I'll be back ...
 Have a look at this.
 Bad news. Father's looking for you. Where are those bloody ministers?
 'The Merry Widow?' I might have known. Where's the reception?
 They're playing your song, Mrs. Peel.
 Snuff.  I must insist you try some.
 Trubshaw again? What now?
 Shall we?
 You first.
 When all this is over, we simply must get you out of that suit.
 Limpet bomb. Small, very compact. From Trubshaw's.
 What is it?
 Intoxicating. Here, have one of these.
 It's called Black Leather.
 What's that you're wearing?
 Have we been invited?
 There's a reception this evening. Colonel Jones thinks it advisable we attend.
 You didn't tell her?
 Hurry?  What for?  I'm just now --
 We must hurry, Mrs. Peel ...
 I'll catch you up. Don't worry; he's expecting you.
 Aren't you coming?
 You'll find out.
 Why's he called 'Invisible'?
 His name's Jones. 'Invisible' Jones.
 I'm a wanted woman, I know ...
 Very well. I have a friend who might be of assistance. He's at the Ministry. We'd better be careful.
 Not to speak of. Peter and I were both loners. There was nobody.
 Quite. Any childhood friends? Enemies?
 ... Or grown-ups, who still like to be children.
 Teddy bears, cuckoo clocks, toys All children's things ...
 No idea who. No idea why ...
 Drat. Someone wants to implicate you in this affair, Mrs. Peel. Any idea who?
 I equivocated. But you're not their big worry at present. It's Dr. Darling:  he's disappeared ...
 You lied.
 I told Mother I took care of you.
 As far as you trust me.
 You don't trust me?
 No, after you.
 After you -- Mrs. Peel ...
 Please don't tell me it's how you play the game.
 Winning isn't everything.
 I'm playing to win.
 I thought you didn't.
 I thought you played by the rules.
 Aren't we all, Mrs. Peel?
 You're playing games.
 Not for a moment.
 But you did suspect me.
 Is that all?
 Keeping a stiff upper lip?
 Mmm ... what are you doing?
 It wasn't me; you have my word.
 I could be convinced, if ... I knew who poisoned me in the maze. That kiss ...
 And do you trust me?
 ... when I don't. It comes down to one thing, Mrs. Peel. Trust.
 Yes ... ?
 Always.  Except ...
 Because you always obey orders ...
 No trouble.
 I could save you the trouble.
 Nothing personal.
 To kill me?
 Orders.
 You followed me.
 It was Peter -- I saw him ...
 I expect that's for you to know and me to find out ...
 Was I?
 The Winslow Home for Retired Lepidoptorists. I'm so sorry I struck you, Mrs. Peel. Please forgive me. I thought you were someone else ...
 Where am I?
 Mrs. Peel ... ?
 Steed ... !
 I expect we'll have to gatecrash.
 Someone didn't want us to get to the party.
 Here's the one that broke the camel's back.
 This must be the last straw.
 You will let me know if you find that queen who's in need of protection, won't you?
 Barely.
 What, Lady Disdain? Are you yet breathing?
 Have I trespassed on a male prerogative?  We're being followed. I saw him at Trubshaw's ...
 Do you always drive this fast?
 Oh, well ...  Just my type, Mrs. Peel.
 Is that what you think?
 According to Dr. Darling, you're a psychopathic personality with schizophrenic delusions, suffering from recurring amnesia based on traumatic repression, leading to outbursts of anti-social and violent behavior.  Q.E.D.
 Not that I know of.  Explanation?
 ... And by you, Mrs. Peel. Everything points to you.  No sisters?  No undiscovered twin?
 Then a mad millionaire. Head of a secret defense establishment. A group of eccentrics obsessed by weather ...
 ... And by you, Mrs. Peel ...
 Three agents killed by bad weather...
 Sounds as if someone's hijacked your research.
 That's what we were working on.
 But if someone miniaturized the process...
 Exactly. There'd been earlier attempts to pump carbon dioxide into deep sea. Propane gas mostly. In small quantities it captures chlorine. Protects the ozone layer. But it proved impractical. Too bulky ...
 Filling in mother nature's blind spots ... ?
 The Prospero Project was started by my husband. It was an early attempt to solve the problems of global warming. In theory, climate engineering is entirely feasible. We thought of injecting a chemical cocktail into the atmosphere by laser and satellite. A 'quick fix'...
 Is there anything that isn't?
 Not quite. This is my field.
 Don't bother.  Here's a bus ...
 But
 Thanks ...  I see what you mean about letting me do the risking ... Hello?
 For you, Mrs. Peel.
 She had this in her mouth. There, there...
 Common knowledge, Mrs. Peel ...
 Is that written in his shoe?
 Well, he was a fellow of the Royal Zoological Society ...
 Any ideas?
 What on earth?
 Very good, Steed ...
 Elementary, Mrs. Peel. Trubshaw isn't the only shoemaker still practicing his trade ...
 How on earth can you tell?
 Colonel Crabtree. International Satellite Systems. Formerly of the Ministry.
 I should have thought that was obvious ...  I'm in mourning.
 Either way ... may I ask: why you dress in that fashion?
 You mean my other self ...
 I must say, you look more your old self --
 Did you say formal? I must dress.
 An invitation. To a 'formal picnic'...?
 No. But he must know. Incidentally, my double left you with this.
 Did he say who?
 That's possible. Sir August was convinced he'd met me before. But I'd never met him. Another odd thing. When it rained, he said it was just as someone had promised.
 Perhaps your memory plays tricks, Mrs. Peel.
 But that's absurd. I may not be over-fond of you, Steed, but it's not my style.
 Frankly that's how I remember it.
 You told them. You said I arrived on a camel, shot you four times. Left you for dead.
 Why should they think that?
 Mother and Dr. Darling have me under observation. They think I tried to kill you.
 I might say the same.
 I mean your man Trubshaw.  Your bullet-proof waistcoat.  I thought you were just overdressed.
 I wasn't about to.
 You were very lucky.  Four shots to the heart. I found you after I slipped away from Sir August. Mother brought you here. Not me you should thank.
 Strange.
 You should be dead.  How do you feel?
 Ah, Brenda ...  Mrs. Peel?
 Small talk.  Try the weather.
 So ... I distract him while you snoop around? How?
 All of a piece, really. A fanatical weatherman. Chairman of BROLLY.  British Royal Organisation For Lasting Liquid Years. Thinks British weather has been tampered with by ... aliens.
 Any other vices?
 The family does seem to be somewhat meteorologically inclined.
 June, July ... August?
 Not so much eccentric. More barking mad. He has a wife called June. And a daughter somewhere -- Julie.
 An eccentric recluse?
 According to Mother, Sir August owns half of the Highlands. A millionaire. Former head of Special Projects at the Ministry. Now ...
 I meant me.
 No thanks.
 After our fencing match, I was rather hoping you would do the risking. More tea?
 I have no choice. Why should you risk your life?
 They call me in when they've reached a dead end. Freelance. Like yourself.
 Just what is your position, if you don't mind my asking.  How did a stuffed shirt like you get into this line of work?
 For a man in my position --
 Do we always follow Mother's instructions?
 As per mother's instructions.
 Sir August Merryweather ... why are we seeing him first?
 That's predictable. When I find a queen in need of protection I'll let you know.
 The most unpredictable piece on the board. And always ready to protect his queen.
 And I suppose you're the knight.
 A Gentleman has to have a code. This is part of mine. A uniform. Think of it as my suit of shining armor.
 But why? What's the point?
 Not all Tradition is bad, Mrs. Peel. No thank you.
 You know what I mean. This car -- and you. Nobody walks around like that. Milk?
 Do you really think so?
 That place is so absurd, so out of date ...
 Thank you, Trubshaw ...
 You can but I wish you wouldn't ...
 Ahh. Perfect fit. The luxury of a hand-made shoe. As unique as a face or a fingerprint. Or should I say DNA?
 Steed, we really must be --
 Or half cocked.
 Oh, absolutely, but Trubshaw's a man worth meeting. No point setting out half shod.
 I thought we were on our way.
 Yes indeed. I need protection.
 Do you?
 I had a feeling you would. Touche!
 Really?  I fail to see the connection.
 My father always wanted a boy.
 A kipper. Or a red herring? What were they investigating?
 Ah ... From Trubshaw's.  My shoemaker.
 We're not here to talk about the weather, surely.
 ... Showers followed by sunny periods.
 Mother?
 I didn't. Mother did.
 And now that we've settled the matter of honorifics, will you kindly explain why you wished me to meet you?
 Much better.
 Under the circumstances, you may call me Mrs. Peel.
 I say, this is all terribly formal. Must I go an calling you Dr. Peel?
 And just what is the game?
 Not by me. Play by the rules, Doctor, or the game is nothing.
 Rules are made to be broken.
 Dyed in the wool. But I can admire someone who doesn't play by the rules.
 Whereas you are.
 Congratulations, you've penetrated a bastion of male privilege. I guessed you weren't a stickler for Tradition, doctor.
 So what was all this -- some sort of test?
 Red herring would have been too obvious, don't you think?
 1922. Why the kippers?
 I shouldn't wonder. Not a woman inside Boodles since --
 I had a spot of bother at the door.
 I was about to throw in the towel.
 And you must be Steed. Please don't get up.
 Doctor Peel, I presume?
 And you've a new wardrobe. He does want you to look attractive.  He tells me you're very beautiful.
 Decontamination -- ?
 Emma in Wonderland. Welcome, Mrs. Peel.  We've been expecting you. We hope you'll enjoy your stay with us. Decontamination is almost complete.
 It's Mother you have to convince. He's very agitated.  Wait here.
 You don't believe him?
 Mobile HQ. In a blue funk.  Can't take chances. I'm looking after things while he's hiding out ...
 Where's Mother?
 You're saying I have no choice.
 Think of it as special assignment, Mrs. Peel. With a twist. You're our chief suspect.
 I'm no spy -- where do I fit in?
 Your mission is simple. Find out how and why these agents died.
 I'm going to find out who killed my husband. Will you take these documents to Steed?
 You're not venturing alone, surely.
 I shall need a small plane.
 Very good, Mrs. Peel ...
 Let me guess:  Wonderland Weather.
 Privately owned by ...
 ... and now?
 'X' marks the spot. The shoes were delivered to ... an island in Hyde Park. Surrounded by the Serpentine. On the site of a former Ministry installation...
 Well, I can't possibly go like this.
 Under the circumstances Mother didn't see fit, but I think I can get you in ...
 I fail to see --
 The World Council of Ministers meets tomorrow to convene the new global defense initiative --
 Getting to what?
 I was getting to it.
 Are you suggesting that Dr. Darling and Valentine were somehow in this together? But that's absurd.
 Makes two of us.
 Who's now vanished.
 Father. She gave him an 'all clear' after a security test by Dr. Darling.
 Surveillance? By whom?
 Do you also know that during your final experiment, your halfbrother- in-law was under surveillance?
 I know all this.
 Now let's see ... Eton, Cambridge ... research into robotics and plastics. Overtaken by Peter's work on the physics of climate change ...
 Half-brother to be precise.
 Peter's brother?  But --
 Ah, here we are. Steed asked me to play a hunch:  Valentine Peel.
 Or rather, you don't. Learnt the tricks in camouflage. Till this accident made a prang of things. How can I help you, Mrs. Peel?
 I see.
 Talk to the pipe, Mrs. Peel. That usually helps. Don't worry about me being invisible. Other than that I'm perfectly normal.
 Well, you found me. Have a sniff of this, why don't you? Careful, the scent can be overpowering ...
 Mother betrayed me. She was going to replace me with a younger Father.  Errand boy that's all I was. 'Find Steed...'
 It was you who gave Valentine Peel his security clearance ... you're the mole who betrayed the Ministry.
 You reek of Mrs. Peel's Black Leather ...
 How did you guess?
 Steed
 Dead, I'm afraid.
 We want Mrs. Peel.
 Oh, hello ...
 So you say ...
 We know one thing. That suspect was not Mrs. Peel.
 Jungle plants in the Arctic? A lush English village transformed overnight into African scrubland? Blizzards in summer?
 Global warming?
 A series of bizarre shifts in local weather patterns ...
 I'm warning you for the last time, Steed: whoever's behind all this, looks like Mrs. Peel, walks like Mrs. Peel and kills like Mrs. Peel.
 In your operation.
 Where?
 I'm going to follow up on a hunch of my own. If I'm right, Mrs. Peel is innocent and you have a mole.
 You're getting yourself into terrible trouble, my son. Weather's turning very nasty -- and so am I.
 I was hoping you could tell me.
 Mother and Father know best.
 Guilty until proven innocent?
 Pity. I was growing fond of Mrs. Peel. Unfortunately --
 Her husband suspected someone very close to the operation. On the day he died, he was setting a test. To prove to himself -- to us that his wife was beyond suspicion. He had to be certain. He said he was going to give Mrs. Peel something ...
 You're accusing Mrs. Peel of killing her own husband?
 No. Her husband, she says. Alice tried to warn us. A trap. Tell Mother beware. Tell Father That's all.
 This man -- did you see him?
 Impossible.
 Too late anyway. Today's escapade was only for starters. This is no ordinary weather. It's manmade. A kind of weather bomb.
 We had a lead to Wonderland Weather but we got there too late. Someone tipped them off ...
 You.
 Anyone particular in mind?
 Still doesn't. Better safe than sorry.  She was in a dangerous game, Steed. High stakes. She may prove to be a risk.  If she is, there's only one solution.  Termination.
 How come you took so much interest in her, Dr. Darling?
 Something went wrong. System malfunction. Explosion. Mrs. Peel had a narrow escape. Suspected sabotage. Nothing proven. File still open.
 She may try to kill you.
 Why?
 Who knows? If Dr. Darling is right, you should watch out.
 Insane ... ?
 Possibly. Split personality ...
 Amnesia?
 She may not know. Theory goes she may be very ill.
 Think she really killed those agents?
 Perhaps I'd better start calling you doctor again, Mrs. Peel --
 Your research into climate engineering was state-of-the-art. Your experiments could have revolutionized our knowledge of global warming -- had they succeeded. We need your expertise.
 Oh yes I did. I want you to meet somebody.  I expect you'll like her.
 You didn't come to talk about the weather, surely.
 Weather's turning nasty.
 Brenda and I thought we'd drop in.
 Mother. I thought you were burglars.
 This way ...
 Wonderland Weather Ltd.
 You don't say.  Like looking for a needle in a ...
 Good. Glad to see they're together at last. They don't get along. Promotion. Top job. Most unfair. Quite a fuss at the Ministry.
 Both, actually.
 You with Mother or Father?
 She was ...
 I'm Alice. Mother said you'd be on your way. Mrs. Peel with you?
 I feel sure of it.
 Cocky little bastard. I hope he was a baddy.
 I think so, thank you so much ...
 Are you alright, young man?
 Stay by the window. By the window.
 Let it be rain, please let it be --
 Walk over to the window ...
 No, please! I beg you ...
 Ask not for whom the telephone rings ...
 Mrs. Peel -- ?
 Ugh ...
 I think she really likes you ... Where's Mrs. Peel?
 Come, come. You don't really expect me to fall for --
 You are, and it's behind you.
 Aren't you forgetting about something?
 Did I? My mistake.
 You said ... one shot.
 I do.
 If you say so.
 Rules are made to be broken.
 That's not playing by the rules.
 One shot -- for emergencies.
 You wish.
 Bang-bang ... you're dead.
 But did they teach you this?
 I was at Harrow ...
 You're better than I expected.
 Perish the thought.
 The last one you'll ever see.
 Valentine Peel. I see you've gone back to using your original face.
 John Steed.
 Check out the other guy's buns.
 Look at that guy. What a hunk.
 Deb, I want to throw you a shower.
 I'm totally blown away. You're getting married. It seems like only yesterday I showed you how to have oral sex.
 Really -- you went with him for two years.
 Does Cole know about this?
 ...Really?
 Debbie's marrying Rick.
 What's happening?
 Right in here. The big show starts in one minute.
 Deb, we're pretending to be hookers.
 I feel like I'm spying on Rick.
 That's what we're going to find out...
 Nah. Everything's cool... I took care of 'em.
 You're kidding.
 I forgot to tell you. Yesterday I found a bunch of pornos in the back seat of O'Neill's car.
 What do you mean?
 They'll probably get drunk, and watch dirty movies. But don't worry about the dirty movies.
 What do you think's gonna go on at the guys' party?
 No. As far as they're concerned the only good Rick is a dead Rick. But I don't care... it's my decision.
 He's not gonna be happy. And your parents can't be too thrilled either.
 He still thinks I'm going with him. I'm going to break the news to him tomorrow.
 O'Neill just tole me. It's sooo great... I don't believe it.
 Bobbie, what are you talking about?
 Debbie... I don't believe it. I'm so excited.
 Women!
 I don't get it, but at least Gary's got the real stuff coming up here in a few minutes.
 Sex is my one thing. I'm good at it.
 Chulo, one thing at a time.
 Where's the women, man? We gotta have women.
 Yeah. Right. All the things that make life worth living.
 Yeah, man. Let's throw a bachelor party with drugs, booze and broads.
 You're kidding.
 What?
 Yeah. What is it?
 Rick's got an important announcement to make.
 I'm glad you guys came by... What's the occasion?
 Hey, man, congratulations!
 Yes, gentlemen. Saturday after next, I lose my amateur standing and turn pro.
 Okay... This is it... I'm getting married.
 Man, you're losing your audience.
 Too bad, man, that blows my chance to be Ambassador to France.
 I've decided not to run for President.
 Great. I'll go with you. Wait a second. Hey, Raul! Move that car, will you?
 We're going for a little liquid refreshment.
 Hey, you guys, what's going on?
 I'd like to jerk and press those babies.
 Denmark makes great Nautilus equipment.
 When do the girls get to the party?
 All right!
 What time are we supposed to get to the hotel?
 I hope so. Hundred bucks apiece is a lot of dinero.
 Yeah, man, he's got us a great room at the hotel and lots of chicks.
 You sure Gary's got this whole party deal together?
 Fan out and look for them.
 He and Debbie stand outside the theater, which is a multi-plex cinema. Fourteen movie theaters under one roof. Prominent is a sign which reads: "24 HOUR 3D FESTIVAL!" Cole drags Debbie into one of the theaters. The gang runs up to the theaters.
 She's mine!
 Cole, what the hell are you doing?
 You've had it. I'm gonna get you.
 Cole, when was the last time you had a lobotomy?
 Rick... Debbie is mine. She'll always be.
 Shit!
 Maybe it had something to do.
 Shit, shit, shit, shit. My car's gone!
 So does Debbie.
 Low mileage... Handles like a dream.
 Gee, guys, what should I do? The car or Debbie?
 I mean it. The car is yours. Dump Debbie.
 The car for Debbie?
 I'll trade you my Porsche for Debbie. An even swap.
 I'm very happy for you two.
 I love that car.
 The best.
 Great car.
 See that down there? That's my most prized possession. My new Porsche.
 Ooh, be still, my heart.
 I'm ready to make you another deal.
 Oh, come on, just a little.
 I don't want any trouble.
 Ah, Cole.  I don't remember ordering an asshole from room service.
 Rick, I want to talk to you.
 Thank you. We'll all keep that in mind. 'Bye now.
 He's gonna hurt you, Debbie. He'll never be true to you the way I would.
 Thanks, Dad.  Cole, go away.
 What is this person's story here?
 Michelin tires... brand new. A set of Sears Best metric tools...
 I'm marrying Debbie.
 Okay, ten thousand plus a G.E. toaster oven, a Litton microwave, a Cuisinart...
 Not interested.
 Seventy-five hundred.
 No.
 Five thousand dollars.
 What's Debbie's blue book value right now?
 You dump her and I'll give you cash.
 Cole...
 I want Debbie.
 Cole. Don't you know it's bad luck to see the groom before the wedding?
 Bond... James Bond.
 And...
 Not so good. He wouldn't listen to reason. He stole my car... my Porsche... I can't find it anywhere...
 Fine. How's everything going?
 Yes I did.
 Yes, son, did you find out where the bachelor party is?
 Mr. Thomerson.
 Hello?
 Yes, sir.
 All right, I'll go up there and take care of this myself.  You look awful, son. Go find yourself some clothes.
 1002.
 Take hold of yourself. What room are they in?
 The bachelor party's upstairs. They made me get naked. They hung me from the window so high up it was so scary I fell down...
 Cole, my God, boy, what are you doing here? What happened?
 Sorry, I can't hear you. Some pin head's yelling...  Shut up, I'm talking here.  Now look, I want you to go back and I don't care what you do. Stop that marriage.
 Right.  Hey, shut up. Okay, sir.
 Well, tell the asshole to shut up.
 Some fat slob in the next booth is making a lot of noise.
 What? I'm sorry, sir, I can't hear you.
 So, he's playing hard ball. Well, two can play that game.  Go after him. Stop at nothing. You hear me?
 Keep me informed.
 Thanks for the advise, sir.
 If it were me, I'd reason with him first. Then, if that failed...  ...I'd take more persuasive action.
 But how can I do that?
 It's not her mind you need to change. It's Disneyland head in there.
 I've tried to change her mind.
 Cole, I don't want you to give up on her.
 Yes, sir, I am.
 I know you're as unhappy as I am about Debbie's marriage to Rick.
 Thank you, sir.
 Nice shot.
 Sure have...
 So, Cole, you been practicing your game?
 Not at all. We're just finishing lunch.
 Hi, everybody. Am I late?
 I understand, Deb. 'Bye... be happy.
 I'm going now, Cole.
 That's all right, Deb. Go be happy and smile a lot, Deb. Do it for me.
 Cole, I'm sorry, I...
 You know how that makes me feel, Deb? Wanta know how that makes me feel?  Angry, Deb.  Yesss, that's the word, angry. But if he makes you happy, you go right ahead. I want you to be happy, Deb.  No matter what, no matter how angry it makes me, no matter how much it hurts. Be happy, Deb. Be oh, so very, very happy.
 I'm not. I just thought I should tell you myself before you heard it somewhere else.
 You're marrying him? Then why are you coming back to me?
 Cole, I'm marrying Rick.
 You know, when you dumped me for that wimp, I thought, Cole, she'll be back. God wants the two of you to be together, and sure enough...
 Cole, listen to me... I've got to tell you...
 It's all right, I forgive you. I'm not the vengeful type. We'll forget what happened. Why don't we take a trip together? Maybe kill a few lions in Kenya over Christmas.
 No, Cole, I...
 Finally realized Rick's a jerk, huh?
 Cole, we've got to talk.
 Over here, Deb... in the Smokehouse.
 Cole?
 You're so romantic...
 This has been quite a night. Here's a thought. Why don't we go home and give our private parts a workout?
 Yeah.
 Are you okay?
 You're on.
 Let's get naked.
 Great. Now, what do you want to do about it?
 Yes...
 See? And these are not just ordinary party-goers -- there are professionals in this crowd -- I didn't want any of them. You... You're what I want. Understand?
 You don't believe me? Okay, fine.
 I don't believe you.
 I am committed. I love you.
 And I want to be with someone who understands the meaning of the word commitment.
 I don't want that. I want to be with you.
 The marriage is off. Now you can screw around with your friends for the rest of your life.
 Debbie, I'm telling you, I didn't do anything, hardly.
 Let go of me!
 Rick, you're lying!
 C'mon, I knew it was you.
 I can't trust you!
 Why don't you get undressed.
 How wonderful. A seeing eye hooker.
 Don't turn on the lights, sugar.  I'll lead you around.
 I love you.
 Anything you say, ma'am. Have a fun shower. Use soap.
 Have a good time. Don't make it too late.
 Well, if I go back on my word, I'll kill her.
 Your mother's not dead.
 Okay, I promise... I swear on my mother's grave.
 You're really pissing me off.
 Did I promise that? I don't remember that...
 Remember, you promised... no screwing around.
 Sorry, we got men's business to do. It's no place for a lady.
 Can't I just go with you guys?
 This is it, lady. Last stop.
 Gonna get married...
 Wouldn't think of it. Because tomorrow...  We're going to the chapel and we're...
 You better not have too much joy.
 Well... twenty-four more hours to go and tonight we'll share with our friends and loved ones the joys of those last moments of singleness.
 Now, I want you to lie down and drift off to slumberland.
 Um... that's very relaxing.
 Good...
 That feels so great.
 C'mere.
 Before or After I have my nervous breakfown?
 I think the only think you've left out are our relations with the Soviet Union. Sweetheart, everything's gonna be all right.
 The wedding, my parents, your family, our friends, my job, the future, our relationship, the caterers, my gown, your tuxedo, our honeymoon, the apartment, my shower, your bachelor party...
 About what?
 I don't know... I just feel scared.
 What's the matter?
 Stop fooling around... I need to talk.
 Oh... I got something for that.
 I can't sleep.
 Huh? Wha...
 Because from what I've heard, it's a tradition and you're a traditional guy.
 Oh, those. Why do you ask?
 I'm not talking about does. I'm talking about hookers.
 No, sweetheart, it's a stag party. Does stay home.
 Are you going to have women at your party?
 Yes, but looks are deceiving...  Not in this case, however.
 It looks awful.
 Of course. I'm a traditional guy... It's a traditional event.  Well, what do you think?
 You're going to have a bachelor party?
 Not as much fun as the bachelor party the guys are throwing for me.
 Want to hear something great? Bobbie and Phoebe are throwing me a shower. It's really gonna be fun.
 Don't worry... it's supposed to do this.
 I think your dinner's burning.
 It's either meatloaf, Swiss steak or charred flesh. I won't know till it's finished.
 What are we having?
 But a fabulous cook.
 God, you're a slob.
 I know what I'm doing... Go!
 Ilene, are you crazy?
 Look, girls -- I'll stay behind and hold them off. The rest of you break for it!
 Let's go.
 Debbie, men are pigs -- if they can have women, we can have men.
 That doesn't mean it was Rick's party.
 Look, you heard what those hookers said. They were supposed to go to a bachelor party.
 Are you sure this is a good idea?
 Debbie, don't be naive. Men are pigs.
 Ilene, Rick promised...
 Of course you do. I trusted my ex, Mel, too. Cousin, I can only talk from experience. What do you think they do at these parties, have tea and play scrabble?
 Ilene, why would I want to do that? I trust Rick.
 If I were you, I'd worry less about the shower and more about Rick's bachelor party.
 I hope those guys are all right.
 I hope Ilene's all right.
 Quiet, Mother.
 What kind of job? I'm a housewife.
 Ilene, we don't really know that.
 A strange wang right in my palm.
 You know your father enjoys his company.
 Why is Cole here?
 Great, Mom.
 I'm using the same caterer for the shower I had for our Christmas party last year.
 Any time, Al.
 Thanks for helping us out, Ed. We appreciate it.
 I think I screwed that one once.
 Great bathing suit.
 Well... hope she'll be very happy.
 A real turd.
 Congratulations on your daughter's wedding. Who's she marrying?
 My pleasure, Al... Always happy to help out in a pinch...  Excuse me. I better call my service... tell them where I am.
 Ed, we're so glad you could come over at the last minute and judge our little beauty pageant.
 That's more like it.
 Give him the works.
 Hey. I'm sorry. You want girls. I'll give you girls.
 This is bad public relations. I was planning to do a lot of business with you. But now I'm going to have to go elsewhere.
 Because I'm pissed off. Now give me your cash.
 Why?
 I've had it, numb nuts... How much money you got?
 What are you...
 That's it, prick lips.
 Screw you!
 They left an hour ago, pink nuts.
 Your whores never showed up.
 What are you talking about, asshole?
 Jumbo, where the hell are the women?
 Okay. Nice to meet you both.
 They'll be up there in a half hour.
 Park View Hotel, Room 1002.
 Let's see your bread.
 So we want your best girls, the cream of your crop.
 This is cause for celebration. She'll probably charge half price for sex from now on.
 Rick, I really think I'm in love.
 Gary, how we doing, big stallion?
 I didn't know you were into that.
 Yes.
 Hookers beat you up?
 Screw that.
 Looks like the only one who got screwed here was you.
 I'm going to see what the hell happened.
 Guy paints a beautiful picture.
 This place should have been wall to wall tits by now.
 It's true.
 What's going on?
 Give the guy air. Everyone to a neutral corner.
 Let's have a toast.
 Sounds swell... I'm really touched. And my getting married's not gonna change a thing between me and my pals. We're still gonna go bowling on Tuesdays, play cards on Fridays and wear women's clothes on Sunday night. I love you guys... I always will.
 Because I love her. What can I tell you?
 Wait a minute. You been living with Debbie! Why do you want to get married?
 All right, gentlemen, I'm not gonna sugar-coat this thing. I've known you guys since grade school, so I'm gonna give it to you straight from the hip... right from the shoulder... without beating around the bush... Nothing fancy, just the plain, hard facts... tell it like it is.
 Okay... We're all here. Rick, what's the big announcement?
 Isn't he incredible, gets along with everybody.
 Let's go.
 Screw you...
 Gary, you're quite an animal.
 Screw you... Screw that... Don't jerk me around. You promised me 1500 seats for the Police Concert... 1500, not fifteen!... Screw that... Screw you -- Screw Sting.  Hi, guys.
 Milt?
 Not one minute longer or Milt will come for you.
 Sold. 45 minutes. No problem.
 You are being in luck. Customers in same hotel. I let you have them at cut-rate price for 45 minutes.
 I need them for a bachelor party at the Park View Hotel.
 Big problem now. Soon they go to customers.
 I'll take some.
 That I got. Very good women. They sit on your face, anything you want.
 I want women.
 I'm telling you I am, Joe.
 You're a pimp?
 What can I be doing for you?
 Good.
 That's it.
 Is that all the coke in the place?
 I don't want to talk about it. I love you guys. I love my friends.
 Larry, you and your wife got problems?
 I hate her. I hate her guts, the bitch.
 Just in love with everybody. It's really a beautiful planet. I love you, Rick. I love you guys. I love everybody.
 So, Larry, how have you been?
 It's really not all your fault. I was talking to Mike earlier and he had a lot of problems. Personal things, you know. Made some bad investments. At least now he's peaceful...
 It's my fault. He's dead because... I left those drugs...
 It's Bullwinkle.
 Hi, guys. We brought back a friend.
 No, have fun first. Then laugh. Now, forget about marriage for a while. Go party.
 Ha, ha, ha.
 Well, this is terrific. Now you're gonna have wrists that are smooth and kissable. Just go out there. Forget about everything and laugh it up.
 I couldn't find any razor blades.
 You're trying to kill yourself with an electric razor?
 I'm trying to slash my wrists.
 What the hell are you doing?
 Yeah. I see you're right. C'mon, let's party.
 Really?
 Yeah, I guess so.
 You okay?
 No, she hates me... I want to end everything here... now.
 Lar... sometimes when people are mad they say things they don't mean.
 All right. Now, there's milk and cookies in the refrigerator. Go to bed right after "Falcon Crest."
 I just want to be alone.
 C'mon, Larry. Be good for you.
 Guys, I think I'd rather stay here.
 What do you mean, it changes?
 She hates me. It's over. You'll see, as soon as you get married, everything changes. You sure you want to go through with it, man?
 Maybe your marriage should lay off grains for a while.
 My marriage is the worst. All crap. A big pile of shit.
 Right.
 Naw, two on a Quaalude... bad luck.
 You want to share it?
 Your attention, please. May I be the first to say, It's a raid!
 You're all under arrest. Open up!
 I see what you mean... You're a beautiful guy. And you're doing a damn good job.
 Keep your voices down. This is a respectable establishment. We don't go for any funny business here. Just then a GUY with a Moosehead Beer hat and TWO GUYS in a moose costume pass him and enter the elevator with the boys.
 What do you know, they moved it. Catch you later.
 It's on the tenth floor.
 Yes, you. We're looking for our room... 1002.
 This is the Park View Hotel. I'm the Hotel Manager. Are you looking for someone?
 Are any of those right?
 Of course, sir. That explains it. Leather is a very good source of vitamin E.
 Ebbie. Ger... umph... lable...
 No sob story is going to change my mind.
 The end.
 Oh, no!
 Rick!
 Welcome, welcome, one and all.
 First, you're a slob. You have to dress for success. Second, your outlook on life...
 Feel free.
 Let me finish. Debbie's an adult. She can do what she wants. But if you want your marriage to last, you're going to have to change some things about yourself. If I may make some suggestions...
 Mr. Thomerson, I...
 Good. I think you're an asshole. No, let me correct that, an immature asshole. Which is fine, except you're marrying my daughter and I'm afraid my grandchildren are going to be little assholes.
 I'd love that.
 Rick, I want to cut through the b.s.
 Well, I have to admit my game's a little rusty, but I love polo. It's unrelenting, a constant challenge to the senses. Really a beautiful experience.
 Can't I just maim it a little?
 Rick, hit the ball easier, son. You don't have to kill it.
 All right, who serves?
 Oops!
 It's all right...  So have I.
 No, Brett, I...
 You've been having strange sex...!
 The phone made me do it!
 Ed... you're kinky!
 You can tell a man by his friends.
 The thought of that person marrying my daughter makes me want to upchuck.
 In a second...  And you're irresponsible. Show some initiative, try to better yourself, stop showing off, actions speak louder than words.
 Girls, why don't we go inside for lunch.  Boys, would you mind bringing in that lemonade?
 No. Let's at least finish the set.
 Er... perhaps we ought to stop now.
 Of course.
 I'm getting one heck of a glare off your dress there. Could you undo a few buttons?
 Then there is a God. Why don't we take that baby picture.
 I'm separated.
 Mrs.?
 Klupner.  Mrs. Klupner.
 How are we doing? My name is O'Neill. And you are...?
 You got it.
 I don't know... Go up to her, make like you don't know her and send her into the other bedroom.
 What's with her costume?
 My Debbie?
 Debbie.
 Who?
 Guess who's here? Another surprise guest.
 I'm saved. Let's party!
 Reach out and snort someone.
 I'll stop him... You stall him.
 What can I do? I'm dead. Debbie's going to go crazy and end the whole thing.
 What are you going to do about it?
 And here's Mike's partner, in more ways than one. A gal who doesn't think happiness ends with primates. The very lovely, Miss Desiree...
 How about this, a Trojan donkey.
 Who's your friend?
 Hey, you guys...
 Take care.
 Now, don't get into any trouble.
 C'mon. Get the hookers in a circle. We better put Cochise out of business.
 Very.
 He look familiar?
 Still drawing a blank.
 How 'bout this?
 Got me.
 What's this?
 I don't know.
 Who was that?
 I'm proud of you, lad.
 Put it to you this way -- you're gonna have to pry her out of the bed with a spatula, mister.
 How'd it go?
 That's the old Rick!
 If I'm not out in a half hour, send for the paramedics.
 Right in there, pal.
 Oooooo.
 I got something you can't resist. I have a friend, Tracey. She wants to meet you. She loves to please.
 Get a few drinks into me, we'll dance and see what happens.
 This is your bachelor party. You haven't had sex with anyone yet.
 About what?
 Rick, I'm concerned.
 I don't know. Maybe it's because I love Debbie or maybe it's hard for me to get off in a place that smells like egg salad. I'm not sure.
 I don't get it. Why didn't you go for it just now?
 So long, Father.
 I think you'll enjoy this table.
 The best table in the house.
 Under the table!
 My gift to you.
 What the hell is that?
 C'mon. I insist.
 I'm not really hungry.
 Hey, I'm starved... Let's go get something to eat. We'll bring back food for everybody.
 Don't you love it when old friends stop by?
 This isn't right.
 Excuse me, but this is as arousing as a stroll through the Vatican.
 Then it's on to the real thing.
 Olivier's in that, right?
 We'll spend an hour with "Nymphos Without Pants"...
 Nothing... Let's get crazy!
 What's the matter?
 Knowing Larry, he probably missed the flight.
 Where the hell is he?
 She probably had sex scheduled for 12:30. O'Neill, let's pick up the guys for a drink... I have major news to announce.
 Where'd she go?
 Great.  I was wondering, how do you guys go to the bathroom in that thing?
 Oh... it's... er... the guys from the beer convention. We're bringing them to the party.
 Thanks, Stan, you've been a lot of help.
 Well, the first month it's great. The second month things calm down a little. By the third month you're looking through your old girlfriends' phone numbers; by the fourth month you're numb; by the fifth month, hopefully the football season starts.
 Nah, not yet. Look, you're my older brother. I need some advice here. What's the deal with marriage? What can I expect?
 Thanks a lot, that was the best. You're next.
 Right. Give me the will to live. Let me go first.
 Nah, that's okay. My brother has to look up old people's asses all day long. Let's give him a break.
 Okay, Rick, all finished. I can't wait for that bachelor party... I need the action.
 That's an even trade... a cotton ball for all my blood.
 Stan, you're depressing me... Hey, I didn't know you were going to fill 'er up. Just take a couple of gallons, okay?
 You won't miss a thing about being single... The wild parties, the different girls every night, running around like a maniac... God, I miss that.
 True, you're a lot handsomer now. Don't you have enough blood already?
 Rick, marriage will be good for you. It's done wonders for me.
 You always were sneaky, Stan, very sneaky.
 Right... Think it over.
 Get going, Rick... you're late enough as it is.
 Sister, do you ever get lonely after vespers? If you do, why don't you give me a call. I'm in the book.
 You're absolutely right. I should never have stopped to save that drowning infant. I'm just weak, Sister; I'm so weak.
 There can be no excuse for tardiness.
 I know, Sister, but I have a very good excuse.
 You're late again, Rick.
 Yeah. Who'd have thought they'd both be a size 138 regular.
 Can you believe how perfect it fits?
 I'd love to get you in an operating room. Just once.
 Maybe I did... I don't remember.
 What? I thought you told me you had it all figured out.
 I don't know.
 How the hell are we supposed to get this donkey inside?
 Stevie... I...
 You stupid son of a bitch! What the fuck are you doing!
 There's a fire. We've got a job here. Let's get on with it.
 ...What do you want me to do, Stephen? Talk to me. What am I supposed to do?
 -- You can't let him turn you against your friends, man --
 -- Knock it off!
 They were killing firemen, man. When Sally showed me what was in Swayzak's files... They were my friends, I had to do it. I had to do it for the department.
 -- What the fuck were you thinking, huh? Burning people? You're a fireman.
 Aw man, Stephen, listen to me...
 Goddamn it Adcox! Just do your fucking job!
 Let me take the lead, Stephen...
 -- What the hell's the matter with you? You always check the other side. I haven't got time for bullshit right now, okay? We got a job here.
 It isn't safe, man. Don't go splittin' us up. Not with this one.
 Adcox, go with Pengelly and check the other side.
 We're gonna be okay, man...
 Biggest in two battalions.
 Kind of an asshole, wasn't he?
 Yeah...
 You know Knowlton pretty well?
 No.  I need a drink.
 Goddamn it, Stephen, lay off!  You stupid dumbshit, you never know when to fucking quit, do you? You ever wonder why your career's in the fucking toilet? Why you're gonna be stuck a Lt. for life?
 Tim, fill out the alarm card.  Clean the pipe poles, wipe down the ladders and hang some hose.
 That's Franny. She likes firemen.
 Nah, listen to it. It's a pussy. It'll just steam on us. It won't flash. Go high in the ceiling.
 It's gonna flash, Stevie. We gotta get behind it.
 No, we'll hit the son of a bitch head on.
 Wash it to the windows?
 Be gentle.
 Oh these moments do try me...
 -- What he would do to your dad's department? You gotta let me finish it --
 -- Stephen, this is bullshit --
 -- You know what Swayzak would do to the department if this got out? --
 -- He killed people --
 -- Shut up! Your dad would fucking puke if he saw how you've shit on his department!
 Just come down, John. Just --
 You gotta let me finish --
 That was an accident! Jesus Christ, why did you have to go in there so fucking early? Why didn't you listen to me!
 Did you do it for Tim?
 He's alive.
 Is he...
 John, when you're in there... in the fire... do you ever see...
 Ah, everybody screws up some, Brian. You're working for the toughest Lt. on the job. Saw him once pick up a probie he thought was moving too slow and throw him into a burning building. It's just bad luck you're family.
 My Lt. might have something to say about that.
 Hey, baby McCaffrey. First one's the clincher. You did okay.
 I'm sorry... I'm sorry I thought... I won't.
 Don't tell them about Adcox... Don't let 'em...
 Oh shut up, huh?  I think I broke my goddamn arm...
 "You never know till the fire stares you down if you're gonna be --"
 You crazy son of a bitch, why couldn't you stay behind a desk where you belong?
 Shut up!
 You're his Lt., Stephen...  Are you gonna handle it? Are you Stephen?
 I'm his Lt. He's my responsibility. I'll handle it. Me.
 We gotta go to Rimgale, Stephen.
 I'll handle it.
 What are we going to do about this?
 Anything else?
 They were for the fucking boat, Brian.
 -- What were they doing there?
 I knew when you came looking for the chemicals. Looking for me.
 How do you know?
 I know.
 I saw Adcox's back! I saw the burn! I put it there! Jesus Christ, Stephen, he's been killing people!
 -- What are you doing here?
 -- Stephen, wait a minute. I gotta talk to you. It's Adcox, he's --
 I don't know, Brian... I don't know...
 Oh God, Stephen, what's going on with you?
 Sometimes right when you're looking at them.
 Maybe I do.  ...What a fuckin' mess, huh?  People can change Brian.
 I hate him so much sometimes, Stephen. You don't know how hard it was for me to put that uniform on...
 ...Jesus, you been carrying that around for twenty years? For christ's sake, you were seven years old! You think he could have heard you in there?
 I saw it before it got them. I tried to yell, but... He asked me to look out for him. And I didn't do it. I let him die.
 Everybody did.
 When dad died, I saw another fire...
 Saw what?
 I saw it.
 -- I tried, y'know? Helen's right. I don't have all the answers, but goddamn it, I've got some.  Look, you're gonna do what you have to, and maybe I shouldn't have gotten in the way. I'm your brother, not your father. Go on. You gotta go somewhere? Go...
 It's okay, Stephen, I --
 -- Okay, so you don't like me. You don't like everything I've done. What, because I wasn't such a genius the way I raised you? Jesus Christ, dad was gone, what was I supposed to do? You tell me, what the fuck was I supposed to do?!
 Look, Stephen, maybe we can talk about this some other --
 Yeah? What have you got to do?  Look at you. Look at your face. All the things you must be thinking. Man, you must really hate my guts. Well, you know what? It's okay.
 I really should get back. There's... there's something I'm supposed to do.
 Yeah, it's just another memory in my life right now. And I got way too many of them...
 You're selling dad's boat?
 Well, long as you're here you can help clean up a little. I've got a guy coming to look at this in a few minutes.
 So hello.
 Just... Just wanted to say hello...
 Hey, what are you doing here?
 Fuck you.
 He didn't listen? He was a fucking candidate! He was your responsibility. He shouldn't have been there in the first place, Stephen.  You burned him.
 I had that fire. He didn't listen!
 Had to take on another fire bare- handed, huh? Had to be fucking myth man in there instead of looking out for your probie. Is that what happened? Is it, Stephen?
 ...Not now, Brian.
 Just leave me alone, okay?
 Brian, look --
 Thanks for the insight.
 Look, you are sorta making yourself fair game.
 You said you wanted to know something, Brian. What did you learn today?  What do you say, Brian, huh? Time to move on?
 Dad's way? Where did he tell you that? In a fucking seance?
 That's not what it's about, Brian. The point is there was a kid in there. And what if there'd been two? I went in because that's what I do. It's my way. It's dad's way. It isn't everybody's way.
 I waited... I would have fucking waited...
 You okay?
 Listen to it, Brian... Jump when I say... It won't get us.
 Christ, Stephen, let's wait for the hose team...
 Ready?
 Roll the hose.
 No, Lt., I don't have a problem with drilling. But let's just have one drill. Not one for the company and one for me.
 You got a problem with drilling, probie?
 What, is it the stairs? Christ, I'll let you win next time.
 What, are you kidding? By myself?
 Roll the hose.
 Yeah... too bright...
 This?
 Jesus, it's too damn bright in here... Like a goddamn spotlight... I'm goin' blind...
 C'mon, let's crawl home.
 Look, Brian, a photographer. Maybe I can get on the cover of LIFE magazine, too.
 Nah, he's nothin'. It's just sometimes... sometimes you just gotta punch somebody out, y'know?
 So you got a 'roid going with Jackson or what?
 Hey.
 Hey.
 Brian --  -- See ya tonight.
 Thanks.
 -- Never mind.
 C'mon ladies, let's roll some hose...
 What you did was drop the ball, Probie. Get that right.
 -- I was doin' it! I was up there fucking doin' it. You don't know, man, you don't know what I did!
 -- I told you to stay next to me!
 Goddamn it Stephen!
 -- You split the team, man. And what was that crap with the standpipe? You'd think you and a hose were never introduced before.
 -- C'mon, Stephen.
 Y'know, you got an awful short memory for direct orders. I told you to stay beside me.
 Hook us up to a stand-pipe.
 I'm in heaven, Lt.
 Ya love it, probie?
 I think you're gonna find out, Brian. Don't be late tomorrow.
 I gotta do this, Stephen. I gotta know.
 Yeah, you know. You know what it felt like.
 Y'know, I told myself a million times I didn't want to be a fireman. I said bullshit to that line about tradition and family legacy. I know I split, and I know how you felt...
 Thanks for the speakers.
 There's only so much technology can do.  Thanks for the beer.
 Big bad brother is going to treat you like any other probie -- that I don't think is going to make it.
 So that's it? Big bad brother's gonna ride my ass till I cough blood?
 I know you cold, Brian. The scary thing is, you probably could have faked it for awhile. But you see, in this job there's no place to hide. Isn't like selling log cabins. You have a bad day here -- someone dies. And that's not fucking good enough. Want another beer?
 Hey! You don't know me --
 What is it with you, man, huh? How do you manage to keep coming up with new and amazing ways to screw up? That scotch bullshit? Am I really supposed to believe you came crawling back home because you suddenly felt heart strings moan for the family biz? You were bankrupt, man.
 I wanted to know why you messed with my station assignment. I mean, is this really gonna have to one of those big brother -- little brother "you broke my GI Joe and I'm still pissed" games?
 Why'd you come here, Brian?
 That was never proved.
 Yeah? What about Laura --
 Sheep don't count.
 Millions, Stephen -- And sexual favors.
 People actually used to pay you for this?
 It worked when you were in sixth grade.
 It works.
 In the Field Museum once.
 What, you've never seen one before?
 My God, an actual operating 8-track.
 It's old stuff Adcox gave me that the department was going to throw out anyway. Still good enough though for this tub.
 Been ripping off fire stations?
 It's comin' along... want a beer?
 I like what you've done with the place.
 Well, see you're wrong already. Had a talk with Chief Fitzgerald, and we decided in the interest of brotherly love, that maybe you shouldn't be way over on the other side of town. So starting tomorrow, your assigned to company 17. My company.  One case of scotch, you're getting cheap in your old age, Brian...
 Not likely.
 Doesn't work on you.  See ya around, little brother.
 So you're going to fight fires now, huh?
 I want to thank you for coming to my graduation, Stephen. It was a great inspiration to me.
 Well, look what we have here. Nice costume. Rent it?
 If you do it like that it'll open in the fire. Then you'll get burned and DIE.
 Who asked you?
 It doesn't go like that.
 It's a small town.
 I'll see ya around, huh?
 I don't have the slightest idea...
 What'll you do?
 I quit two days ago, Brian.
 I think your boss is going to need some spin control.
 You're right.
 That's a dumb thing to say.
 I'm sorry.
 Just take it.
 What is --
 Your boss is lying, Jennifer.
 Y'know, four years ago I was working in a bakery. Two years ago I was bringing Marty coffee and he didn't even know my name. I run that office now. Marty believed in me and I believe in him. You want me to just throw that away?
 Yes.
 Do you know what you're asking me to do?
 You could check. It'd be in his files.
 I don't know anything about it.
 Swayzak knows something about the guys that were murdered. I want to know why he keeps that hidden.
 We still talking?  Look, I'm sorry about the other day --
 Hi.
 Hi.
 You knew what we were asking you to do. Don't suddenly pull out a conscience now. The fit isn't right.
 -- I work for the city.
 Oh yeah, he's the real fireman.  Who are you? Just another probie working for Swayzak --
 Leave Stephen out of this --
 Let me ask you something, do you really think Marty had you assigned to arson because of your firefighting skills? Who the hell are you kidding? I was there, remember? I saw you and your brother --
 Yeah? And just how much of all this has been "doing your job"?
 I was doing my job.
 -- You could have scared the son of a bitch off. We may never bust him now. All for a couple's political points.
 Will you please keep your voice down, there's people --
 -- Bullshit! You knew what I told you wasn't ready for the papers --
 I didn't know it was a secret. There aren't supposed to be secrets between the city and its investigators --
 You told Swayzak about our arson lead. It's all over the fucking news.
 Brian. What's wrong?
 Uh huh.
 Well, our specimen here is your basic standard issue piece of primary suppression equipment. This area is the pumping panel, which controls the rate of liquid insertion into the hose.
 I wanted to be a good one.
 Then why did you quit?
 When I came back, I knew more than anything else that I wanted to be a fireman.
 Do you miss it?  You seem like you do.
 See that trap door up there? That used to lead to the hay loft when they had horse-drawn engines. It was pretty different then... but kinda the same, y'know?
 Homey.
 This is one of the oldest fire stations in the city. Lotta tradition locked up in here. What do you think?
 Oh, there might be something stashed away for emergencies.
 Got anything to drink in there?
 Thanks for the invite.
 In a dinosaur kinda way, yeah.
 But Rimgale's probably going to come around to arson.
 Jesus, give him a break. There isn't enough proof yet to go public. Sure, we found some chemical shit we think somebody dumped in the plugs to torch 'em, and we've maybe figured out why backdrafts, but you can't rush this stuff. Not 'till it's locked.
 Yeah, but it doesn't take Albert Einstein just to figure out if these guys were killed by accidents or not.
 No, he's more of a dinosaur. Guy's not a dummy, though. He's juggling alot of balls on this one.
 Boy, Rimgale's as slow as a snail, isn't he?
 Okay.
 Marty did.  But I wanted you to come to.
 Well, you did invite me here.
 You think that's really any of your business?
 Sorry.  Are you dating anyone?
 If you weren't at least the 300th person to ask me that, I'd probably be pissed.  Boy, you sure know it's a man's world sometimes...
 Hey...  So are you dating your boss or what?
 Hi.
 Yeah? Well, maybe I can fit it in...
 I could use a date.
 I don't know, I'm kinda swamped here.
 Green committed to a thousand.  There's another fund-raising party tonight. Marty'd really like you to come.
 Boss and I are up to about three words an hour.
 How's it going?
 Hey.
 Straightest answer your department's given me all week.
 Arson.
 Yeah...
 ...Okay. I'll arrange things with your assignment captain.  Marty's a good man, Brian.
 I've been thinking about what you said the other night... If the offer's still on the table, I'd like to talk about it.
 Hey, sorry if I made you look bad in front of your boss. But I'm not gonna be a poster boy for him, I'm trying to do something here. There's five hundred smoke eaters in this room that do that stuff for real every day. Tell Swayzak to talk to one of them.
 Look, I didn't mean to take a piece out of you back there, I just thought you'd call when you came back. You didn't and...  Don't blow it just because of this garbage between us.
 So now you suddenly care about my future?
 Brian, do you always have to be so stupid? Think about your future for once.
 C'mon Jennifer, he's just another North-Side jag-off with a mouth.
 Boy, took you all of thirty seconds to blow that.
 I seem to remember some pretty good nights on JP II.
 Yeah, well I like to think I'm just a little past hanging out on JP II watching the Irish pick fights and Litwalks barf in the planters.
 What was that? Oh man, you have picked up a few moves since John Paul II Boulevard.
 Bullshit. Marty's plan is only about efficiency. I've got two cousins on the job, you think I'd work for him if I didn't believe in it?
 -- All I know is that his programs are getting firemen hurt.
 Why do you think Marty came here tonight? Because he cares about your department. You don't know how hard he works. You don't know about his programs helping West Side --
 Yeah. Swayzak. Humanity's last hope. How can you work for that guy?
 Let me tell you something. Martin Swayzak is going to be this town's next mayor.
 Carrying Swayzak's notebook?
 Look, I'm not the same girl who had nothing better to do than wrap her legs around you on a Saturday night. This isn't about fun. I'm working here.
 Oooh, very sophisticated. Having fun?
 When I was twenty.
 With grenadine, right?
 I don't want to be your friend, Brian.
 Well, if nothing else, it's nice to know we can still be friends.
 What, you think I just dried up and blew away when you left? The world does turn once in awhile Brian, even without your permission.
 Really? No kidding.
 I work for city hall.
 Yeah? What have you been up to?
 Not quite. Just visiting. I live in Lincoln Park now.
 So... I see you're still in the neighborhood.
 Huh.
 Uh... I've been sorta keeping a low profile... the academy... I graduated today.
 Thanks for calling.
 You look great.
 You're back.
 Jennifer.
 Brian.
 Not such a far walk after all, is it, Brian?
 Oh Jesus Christ...
 After it took your dad... the fire... did it look at you Brian? Did it talk to you?...
 Who the fuck is doing this?
 Good. -- So our two heroes, Adcox and McCaffrey, they go back inside. Only there's another fire in there nobody sees. And it took your dad, didn't it Brian? Did you see him burn?
 Trychticholorate.
 That's a probie answer. You're smarter than that, Brian.
 The outlets.
 Very good, Brian. -- About your report here. The way to a torch's heart is through his tools. That's how you know him. It's the way he talks to the fire. And to you if you listen.
 -- I wanted to be him. Right then I wanted to be him more than anything...
 Right. Light smoke, low roll. Couple'a civilians hollering -- medium deal. So young fireman Adcox and Captain McCaffrey, they head up stairs, get out on the fire escape -- McCaffrey does the ballsy jump across... what were you feeling, Brian?  C'mon, you promised. Be honest.  Okay... Guard!
 I... I thought it was great. I loved it. It was nothing to these guys... medium deal.
 You gotta tell a story too, Brian. It's fair. C'mon, don't think too hard --
 What?
 Famous story even. Straight burn. Just an engine and truck first on scene. What did you feel, Brian, when you first got there?
 Sure you do.
 I don't have a story.
 -- No no, your turn. Tell me a story.
 Then who --
 Your first question should be who isn't. It isn't a spark, Brian. Not enough damage. And an insurance pro? Where's the profit margin?
 Who's doing this?
 Okay, here's the deal. I'll tell you a story, you tell me one. Fair?
 So you came to me...  Well, this is going to be an interesting afternoon after all...
 I'm close... but I can't get who it is...
 Hey, do I know you?
 Brian McCaffrey...  Oh this is really a treat. Brian McCaffrey. Lost a dad to the animal, huh?
 See you Monday. Sir.
 Even if you graduate this academy, you've still got nine months of probation. That's hard duty, son. If you don't really love this job, it'll kill you.
 No, it isn't out of your hands or you wouldn't even have met me. If I push you have to let me back in. Dead Hero Father Rule. Sir.
 Sorry, but it's out of my hands. Try again next year.
 I need another one, sir.
 -- I don't give a damn what your test scores were, maybe you could have been a good firemen, but you had your shot.
 If you remember, sir, my test scores were in the top --
 Look, everybody remembers your old man. Being his son, all you had to do was breathe to graduate here. Dead Hero Father Rule. But you blew us off. Why should I take you back?
 I want another shot, Sir.
 You walked out on this academy six years ago. One week to graduation. You think we forgot that? You think I did?
 If it was a joke, sir, you'd be laughing.
 Like it never happened...
 Another couple of good men get burned up for their city? Is that how it's going to read?  You're the only one that knows.
 Yeah.
 Your brother was a good man.
 I've been lying here hours... just thinking... We're close...  We're not looking in the right place, Brian. This one knows us and we're not looking in the right place...
 So what do you want me to do?
 I hate hospitals. You're so... so goddamn useless...
 Just wondering.
 No.
 Did I say thanks?
 Yeah.
 Did you pull me out?
 How ya feeling?
 Well Brian, I guess you can say it's arson now...
 It had to be someone who knows numbers. Some kind of fancy accountant. But what's the connection?
 Then who wrote the report?
 Did a little check on the consulting firm that wrote the report. They did exactly one job -- Swayzak's manpower study. It's not even really a company. No employees, no directors, just a PO Box.
 I've got three different drafts of the same report -- with different numbers that're all over the place. Looks like they were just making it up as they went along.
 Yeah? Airtight?
 This is the copy of Swayzak's manning report that was released. Everybody on this job knows it's bullshit but we could never argue with the numbers. They're all airtight.
 Who all ended up wearing candles for faces...  Swayzak's up to his ass in this somehow. Guy can barely hold a drink in his hand, he's so scared.
 Nice bunch of guys.
 And Cosgrove. Coppers figured he laundered money for the mob before getting into real estate. They weren't very high on Seagrave, either.
 So Seagrave and Holcomb were accountants...
 Son of a bitch. They knew each other.
 Hey boss, Dekom Trust is owned by Pan Illinois... which is majority controlled by Lakeside Dynamics... which is a division of Windy City Ventures... who's partners are...  Alan Seagrave, Donald Cosgrove, and Jeffrey Holcomb.
 Fire.
 In a word, Brian, what is this job all about?
 I'm finished with Swayzak. I'll do whatever you want me to do. I just want to help catch the guy that burned Tim. You gotta give me another shot.
 What the hell are you doing here?
 No. Do that and I guarantee you'll scare him off. I don't want him running away.
 Are you going public with this?
 No, we have a stone killer trying to make a point.
 That's why the sealant on the doors... So what have we got, a torch with a conscience?
 Why backdrafts. Whoever fried Seagrave and Cosgrove went to a helluva lot of trouble to make sure they died by fire, but also made sure the fire blew itself out.
 What reason?
 But he could have killed everybody there. The firebreaks kept it from spreading in the wall. The backdraft blew out the flame. That's it. That's the reason.
 But he killed these guys.
 I got it after we talked to Ronald. Torches. Want to fry the whole goddamn world. But the fires that killed those guys never really burned up much. -- The burns were all lit in outlets surrounded by double firebreaks in the walls. And he made his burns backdrafts.
 What?
 That's it! Oh, that son of a bitch, he's different, goddamn it! You see what this tells us, huh? Our killer doesn't love fire!
 I don't work for them, either.
 Some people say you don't do much of anything when it comes to this case.
 I don't guess.
 But the right guess on this is arson.
 Even if it was used to seal the air off, that doesn't explain why someone would go to the trouble of a backdraft. A gun's a helluva lot easier
 And the putty around the door?
 Look, it isn't proof, okay? Someone may have put the chemical in the outlet, but we found it as a vapor in Cosgrove's clothes.
 Trychticholorate. Then Swayzak can announce Seagrave was a murder.
 Son of a bitch tears 'em apart just to eat the oxygen. Wouldn't take much at all to melt ten gauge wire. Problem's burnt magnesium leaves a powder trace -- unless you could find something that would eat its residue.
 Ever burned magnesium? It's so hot it takes water molecules and BAMM!
 "During heat episodes of 2000 Kelvin or higher, Trych breaks down and dissipates. Will consume magnesium".
 -- Go to the bottom. Under heat properties.
 "Trychtichlorate is a binary structured --"
 Read.
 I just re-wrote your contract. C'mere...
 Uh, I don't think that's in my contract...
 No it couldn't.
 Temperature in this room was about 2000 degrees, but copper wire in outlet is melted, which requires 5000 degrees. An accidental short in the plug could of created a spark of 7000 degrees, hot enough to melt the wire and start a fire.
 -- Another backdraft.
 Glass found in ignition room is in small, thin pieces, indicating explosion. Lack of discoloration indicates a long, slow burn. Explosion must of come after a slow burn.  You little tease... What were you up to you little bastard, huh? What made you that mad?  Or scared.  It started in this room. Took its time, hung out... but the air ran out. It couldn't breathe. So it was snuffed. But it wasn't dead... still all that trapped heat, lying low, waiting for some sucker to open the door and give it that one gulp of air...
 Do we have a language barrier here? Glass.
 Glass?
 So you were happy here. Warm and cozy and in no hurry...  Soot high, clean unburned wall low, indicates slow burn in thermal balance.  Find me some glass.
 What are you listening to?
 -- Shhh.
 Pest control.
 Where are you going?
 Look, I knew your father, he had a helluva reputation on this job. But that don't mean you get any slack. Swayzak sends you down here, okay, I gotta eat you, that's the rules and I got nothing to say about that. But Swayzak or no, you live with me. Step out of line, and I don't care who knows you, I'll swing the hammer.  You think you're the first?
 I think we should get something straight here. I was assigned to this office by the city.
 Then go find a corner. I don't want you in my way.
 Get used to me, Inspector. I'm not going anywhere.
 Are you still here?
 Your Dennis' kid.  I work alone.
 Uh, I'm Brian McCaffrey. Your new assistant.
 You guys ought to try picking up a phone once in awhile.
 Oh, man, I'm sorry.
 Stephen's not staying here now, Brian. He moved out last April.
 Well that's two things to strangle Stephen for. Where is he, anyway?
 Stephen told him you were killed in a hot tub accident.
 Sean, come on out, man. What, you forget your favorite uncle?
 Yeah, you'd be surprised what three years can do to a kid.
 That's Sean? Jeez, he's a giant.
 I know, I know, Should'a called. I've been really busy. I joined the fire department.
 Four months?
 Four months.
 'Bout written you off. How long have you been in town?
 You look like... Brian.
 Hi, Helen. Man, you look great.
 Brian?
 Yeah. In fact, I just dropped off a letter to the Times explaining how yesterday's arson announcement was a fabrication by your office. They loved it. And you know what? You were right, my family background in firefighting gave it weight.
 Mr. McCaffrey... Keeping busy?
 It isn't mine.  Let's get a picture.
 Nice boat.
 Mr. McCaffrey...
 Not every job in the fire department comes with a tombstone, Brian. This could be a great opportunity to move... beyond a fire engine.
 Yeah, we got all kinds of traditions -- like dying young.
 This one's still with the fire department. One of our best investigators, Don Rimgale, is working on a very difficult, visible case right now. We think he could use another pair of hands and you're exactly the kind of guy I want representing us: An authentic hero from a traditional firefighting clan.
 I have a job.
 Brian, let me come to the point. I'd like to offer you a job.
 Every little boy's fantasy.
 -- That really was incredibly work you did. You and your brother, fighting fires together, helluva image, isn't it? You must feel lucky to be assigned under his command.
 No, you don't understand, I saved a mannequin.
 No need to be modest, Brian.
 Uh, I think there's been a mistake. I didn't save that woman.
 And I'm a huge fan of what you did to save that woman, Brian.
 Yeah. Big fan.
 Swayzak's not my boss.
 There's no replacement 'cause of your boss' cuts, if that's what you mean. If someone else goes out on an injury we're really screwed.
 So, you surviving without me?
 "Probationary Fireman Brian McCaffrey, on his very first fire, showed the kind of bravery and courage of a veteran firefighter when he risked life and limb to double-check a burning floor alone, emerging victoriously with Anna Rodriguez, a seamstress for the North Shore Clothing Company... McCaffrey first gained prominence as the subject of a 1972 Pulitzer Prize winning photograph taken at the scene of his father's death..."
 What?
 Ah man, is he usin' that line now on you? What, you think he made that little gem up? Jesus Christ, I used to have to listen to my old man use that every morning.
 Y'know what Stephen said to me, right when all the shit was coming hard? "You never know till the moment the fire stares you down if you're just gonna do this job or be great at it".
 Could you believe that fire? Man! First day! There I was, Adcox and me, pullin' that lady right out of the fire's fuckin' throat! I love it here -- No surround and drown for this company. Fighting 17th! Goddamn Stephen's amazing. You see how he took that fire by the balls? I'm gonna be that good some day, you watch.
 Do you have to do that?
 Backdraft.
 Man. Something sure put a crimp in his evening.
 Ah man, if you're gonna bribe your way into a station, why not 17 with me and your brother?
 Lots of fires. They promote faster there. Take a look at the last Lt.'s list, half the guys on it came from that battalion. Gotta think about your future, Timmy. 115's the station.
 You crooked son of a bitch. Why 115?
 Lucky guess.  And a case of scotch to a captain in station assignments.
 How'd you know? These are supposed to be sealed.
 Engine 115, right?
 Aren't you even curious?
 What the hell are we waiting for?
 Completely out of control.
 You know, I've got a perfect little spot here for "Brian McCaffrey, Fireman"...
 I was ahead of my time.
 And just this year, "Brian's Sound Spectrum". Your own company even. Big step.
 Coffee sucked.
 "Laguna Jamming, Custom Surfboards"?
 Management were pin heads.
 Uh huh. And "Pioneer's Pride, Mobile Log Cabins". That was in your blood about six months wasn't it?
 Didn't offer the kinda growth and challenge I need.
 Really. Well, let's have a look at what else was "in your blood". I always look forward to getting these, they make such a nice collage for the bar... "Assistant Director, Sales, Aspen Snowmobile Tours..."
 It's in my blood, Willy.
 Well, if it isn't the littlest McCaffrey.  Hey! You break anything with that you buy it!  Sorry, there must be something wrong with my eyes. I keep thinking that's a fire department uniform.
 You've come along a dozen times, Stephen, give your brother a chance. We'll be back in a few minutes.  How 'bout it, sport?
 Dad!
 Cute.
 Firehouse.
 Hey, what's with the mouth? Where'd you grow up, a barn?
 Fireman shit?
 And DIE!
 Your brother's right. If you don't fasten these correctly they could open and you'd get burned.
 Well, let's have a look.
 Brian. He's not doing it right, dad. He never does it right.
 Who's going to die?
 I'll be there, goddamn it!
 They're waitin' man.
 I'll be there.
 We gotta roll, Stevie...
 -- I'm busy goddamn it, okay?
 He just wants to --
 I'm busy.
 Stevie? Rimgale's here to see you.
 Call in another alarm. We're gonna need some back-up.
 I hate it when we gotta fucking go look for it.
 I don't want to confuse him, Stephen.
 -- He's gettin' good on those eggs. And y'know, he told me he actually likes the piano.
 -- No, that's okay. It's just Sean...
 Look, I'm sorry I --
 Stephen... I... can I talk to you a second...
 Cook and I are almost finished here. Have a seat.
 I...  It used to be, when I was a kid, what meant most to me about this job was there were no ifs. Life and death, right and wrong. When someone called the fire department, we came... Those guys don't know how much I love them... You don't leave people hanging... cause that's what it's all about. It's loyalty. It's 'till death do us part. Isn't that what you heard?... It's you go, we go... Cause without that, it's the end of families, it's the end of the fire department... and when the fire department stops coming... that's the end of the fucking world...  I'm sorry I came, Helen, it's just... it's just there's nobody I can talk to...  I miss you.
 What's wrong?
 I'm sorry... I... couldn't sleep...
 You can't keep being his father...
 In a fire? Never.  Look, I'm his brother. I care about him, y'know? He was going to get himself killed. Maybe not today, maybe not in a year, but it would've happened. And I couldn't -- I just couldn't...
 Yeah? When was the last time?
 Hey, I'm the first one to admit when I'm wrong.
 Ah Stephen, that's what this is really about, isn't it? You always have to be right.
 Y'know, I treated him better than any other probie I ever had. He probably hates my guts, but I did the best thing for him. I made him finally look in the mirror.
 I know he's out, but how's he doing?
 He's out.
 What's wrong, Stephen?  C'mon, you only beat up the roof when something's on your mind.  How's Brian doing?
 Coffee? Nah, I gotta go.
 You want some coffee?
 You treated me like shit.
 I treated you better.
 Okay.
 He treats you okay?
 He deserved it. He was born deserving it.
 Sorry I hit Jackson.
 The great communicator.
 Yeah... I just thought I should say, I don't know, something.
 -- You remember.
 I just wanted to, I don't know, not exactly apologize for the other night -- especially since I don't remember much of it --
 Stephen, you gotta stop just showing up on the roof like this.
 Give up, babe. You can't fight it. Believe me, my mom tried...
 He's going to be a fireman.
 Oh yeah? How's he doing?
 He's got piano lessons.
 Where's Sean?
 It's not your roof anymore.
 Fixing my roof.
 Stephen, what are you doing here?
 Here we go...
 You can't talk about my brother like that...
 Stephen, I'm kinda busy here, can we talk about this later?
 Uh, Helen, I wanted to talk to you a second about Sean...
 That's your job.
 What the hell was it doing in the fire?
 Probably got in Cosgrove's clothes in a gas state from the fire.
 Trychticholorate? Alright, it's an absorption catalyst in toxic waste accidents. It's pretty rare, they stopped making it a couple'a years ago.
 See that patch of shirt? We wondered about the discoloration so he ran a spectro. On a lucky shot we picked up some traces of Trychticholorate. Nobody around here had ever heard of it.
 McCaffrey, hold this for us.
 Anyway, down here, take a look...
 There's something else kinda interesting...
 Putty? On both doors?
 They ran the residue you scraped from both crispers' front doors. It's a combination of plumber's putty and rayophene gum. Burns almost completely away when you light it.
 -- Burn it all.
 And the world -- the whole world.
 -- Burn them.
 And old ladies?
 -- Burn them.
 Absolutely.
 Sure Ronald? You're ready alright.
 Oh, but it's a good story, Shadow. You're depriving our famous young friend here...
 Nobody cares, Ronald.
 Did he tell you how we finally met?
 Ronald here likes telephones. Used to tape wooden matches to the bell striker and wrap it in cotton. Came up with a whole little thing there, didn't you Ronald? When you got bored, what did you do? You just started making calls... mostly day care centers and retirement homes, wasn't it?
 Tell him about me, Shadow?
 Knock it off. Now.
 I know you.
 You don't know him.
 You like everybody, Ronald.
 Is he a fireman?  I like firemen.
 He works for me.
 Who's this?
 Wouldn't miss this for the world, pal.
 Didn't think you'd make it.
 How ya doin', Ronald. Staying comfortable?
 Shadow.
 I need that report, Lt.
 It knows us. This one knows us.
 I might.
 You don't know... nobody knows...
 What do you listen to, Stephen?
 ...He wasn't listening to the right thing...
 I deal with this stuff every day. But a fireman... you never get used to it.  What happened up there? He was a candidate. Did he pay attention? Was he listening?
 I'm working on it.
 The glory boys just want to finish their report so they can go home.
 Are the glory boys actually showing interest in Investigation's work? I may have a stroke.
 Got a cause?
 This'll only take a minute. There's two cops outside that want to ask you about this --
 I'm a little busy right now --
 Investigator...
 Mr. Swayzak! How ya doin'?
 Just catch the son of a bitch.
 Is there a connection between them, Alderman?
 Holcomb? I didn't know the name of that victim had even been released yet.
 Jesus, open your eyes! Seagrave, Cosgrove, and now Holcomb -- fried in a goddamn high-rise!
 We still haven't found a connection between the victims.
 No Marty, I don't.
 Don't you have any leads at all?
 "Don?"
 When are you going to catch the prick that's doing this, Don?
 Alderman.
 Inspector.
 I need to get in the trunk.
 Investigator Rimgale.
 Alderman Swayzak.
 I'm a Catholic.
 How come all those guys who're looking to get 50 from the Church haven't come up with shit? You got some kinda inside track?
 The Mets. So anyway, chalk up another 180 G for the Game. Jesus Christ! That's almost half a million dollars. Ariane! Wait. That's not good enough, I'll ask the shithead for 280 G for the kids. Then it'll be a perfect 500 thousand. Yeah. Perfect. 280 G for the kids. Yeah, it's good I prepared, or I wouldn't have thought to --
 "The Strawberries"?
 I got it, man! I will find those kids. And I'll get the 50 G from the Church! Then the kids'll go to jail. I'll be in charge, of course. After a little while, I'll break the fuckers out -- and I'll turn them in to shithead I was just talking to. And pick up his 100 G. No. I'll hit him up for 200 G. Or 250 G. l can do it -- 'cause I've got the kids. Then, of course, there's the 180 G I'm gonna pick up on the Game tonight -- when the Strawberries win!
 You mean you could use it.
 But you could do it, baby. We could use the bread...
 A wiseguy. Paying 100 Grand for the rapists if I turn then over direct to him.
 Who?
 Can you believe the nerve of this fucking guy? He kills people for fun, and then, he puts up 100 G to bring in some guys who raped a nun. What a sick fuck. Man...
 Sure it is. You're a virgin. Just like that nun. And I'm gonna rape you.
 Nah...
 First I'll put your Uptown in the spoon, then, to make it more exciting, I'm gonna add some Downtown. They call this thing a speedball, honey, but then you must know that...  First time shooting up?
 Then c'mere. I got something for you.
 Yeah.
 C'mere. You got some good blow, right?
 Those fucking Mob assholes.
 Who?
 Christ! Shit! I could kill them all with my bare hands.
 Why?
 It's not the drugs, Ariane, it's -- it's someone who wants to kill me.  You gotta believe me!
 OK. OK. Fine. But -- do you believe in God?
 Yeah.
 You believe that man is the be-all and end-all?
 People.
 That Jesus Christ was the Son of God and he came to die for your sins.
 What's to believe?
 I'm not talking about the fucking Church. Fuck the Church. But tell me. Do you believe in God?
 The Church is a fucking racket. I know how they operate. I've been part of the racket since the first time some faggot priest spilt water on my head. My Aunt Lu says I was crying all the way through. Yeah, I know their game inside out. Now I'm free of it and I'm gonna stay that way.
 Yeah? At least she's alive! I see people get killed every day! Worse yet, tortured first and then killed! The nuns got off easy. Jeez. Cigarette burns. Everyone's all upset about fucking cigarette burns. I'll show you cigarette burns!
 It's horrible. They burned her breasts with cigarettes. Christ.
 She's fucking nine years old! Jesus Christ.
 Susie's not a virgin anymore.
 They're alive, aren't they? Come on, man! Everyone's making such a fucking fuss, just because she's a nun. Just because she wears a penguin suit, the church puts up 50 G for the guys who dared to rape her. Do you think they'd put up a dime if you got raped? Of course not. Or even for your little sister? The virgin? Like shit they would.
 I can't get over what those guys did to her. I just can't.
 Who said anything about the fucking street. I've got more connects than you have, Lieutenant...
 Brown Downtown... There hasn't been any smoking brown on the street in --
 It's nothing. This is New York, man...  Oh -- I forgot. Bowtay needs some cash to buy her new acting headshots out of the developers. It's a good investment, man. She could make serious money!
 Didya ever think of moving to a cheaper apartment? $3,500 a month is crazy, man!
 I'm gonna need some bread, man. This ain't fair. I'm always here for you, and you can't even take decent care of me. My landlord is bitching like a motherfucker! You're two months behind on the rent, Lieutenant!
 That's no mystery. Julio and Paolo brought it in,  You don't want to hurt those boys, do you? I mean, they sure as Hell have got something coming, but it ain't what the Law wants to give them. You understand?  No. How could you understand.
 He wants to know who brought in the chalice.
 So what are you doing here?
 I was gonna bring it back myself.
 Are you all right, honey?
 Yes.
 You brought it back to the Church. And then it made it's way back to me, again.
 Yes.
 You took the chalice.
 I know.  Take care of yourself, man, OK? Be cool.
 Uh - right. Sure. The Mets are gonna win tomorrow.
 There. Now you've got your profit and more. You'll have more product day after tomorrow, right?
 Very good. Very good. The Mets are gonna win tomorrow.
 How are you doing, man?
 Fuck you.  Just give me back a little something for the road.
 The rich kind.  Jeez, man. The way you smoke that shit is suicide.
 What the fuck are you? A drug counselor or a drug dealer? And you don't even do your own product! What kind of businessman are you?
 That stuff'll kill you quick, man.
 I forgive you.
 Oh God, my God. it's goddamn good to be good. Forgive me. Father, for I have sinned. It's still goddamn good to be good.
 Why do I dream every night of the whore who brought you water on your road to death? And why have I never forgotten that if she, then I --
 I forgive you.
 Why? Jesus! Why me? Why can't I wash the ashes from my forehead, year after year after year? And why am I still drunk on your blood, the taste of your flesh on my tongue? Worst of all, why can't I feel the nails in my palms, the spear in my side, the crown of thorns round my head? Why do I have to know, over and over, that it was you. You who died; died for my sins! And that I will die for nothing. Why?
 I forgive you.
 Why? Why can't you hate me? Hate me! Please! Help me!  Hate me! Help me! Hate me!
 I forgive you.
 Please. Please don't forgive me. I've always hated you for that.
 I forgive you.
 You can't forgive me. After what I've done.  I've fucked up bigtime. I've been bad. Real bad.
 I forgive you.
 Me?
 I forgive you.
 Yeah, sucker. You better be there!
 Here's the deal: You meet me tonight across from the Garden. 33rd & 8th. At the beginning of the Ninth Inning. We'll listen to the end of the game together. You bring your cash, I'll bring mine.
 OK, cop. I want you to give yourself and your friends on the force a message. Tell them I've got my own reasons to be very interested in whomever did the job on the nuns. I'll double the Church reward if you bring those punks direct to me. 100 G cash. Get it?
 Yeah, really. I'm no fucking asshole, man. I'm a fucking cop!
 Oh, really?
 There's nothing to think about. Either you put in my bet or you ain't getting nothing.
 Let me think about it.
 Fuck yesterday's game. The World Series is seven games not six. Put in my bet.
 What about the money you owe me on yesterday's game?
 It's still my money. If you want to have a chance at any part of it, shithead, you will take my $120,000 and bet on tomorrow's game.
 All right, cop. I want my money.
 Large?
 Here. Look I'll give you the psyho's number You call him yourself and tell him wnat you want.
 -- that there was never any other way it could have gone.  Never any other way. So you had better just put in my fucking bet. $120,000 on the last game. The Big One. Come on! Are you a bookmaker, or fucking what?
 You've really got a problem.
 Get this, man. I was at the game today. Face to fucking face with Strawberry! Jesus! I saw him strikeout. And you know what? He looked at me, and I looked at him, and he laughed and I laughed and it was like we were all alone in that whole stadium and only we understood that it was all a racket, that he struck out on purpose, and that he's saving it up for the Big One. Tomorrow. Today I understood for the very first time that --
 That 50 G could help you --
 Yeah. Sure. Yeah. We're on it bigtime. Lots of leads. You bet.
 The fucking rapists, man. The punks who raped that nun. The $50,000 reward from the Church! Remember?
 What case?
 How's the case going?
 I've been dodging bullets since I was fourteen. No one can kill me. I'm fucking blessed. I'm fucking Catholic.
 He's gonna kill you, man. Do you hear me, motherfucker? You. Dead. Get it?
 Good. I'll give him an extra 10 grand for his trouble. I hate that motherfucking house and --
 You do know that he's gonna blow up your house, kill your wife and kids --
 Uh-uh. I'm gonna win. Just make sure the bet gets in.
 You're a fucking joke, you know that?  He's been waiting for the money since the fucking game ended. And I've been waiting here since -- forget it. Listen up. You're gonna get us both fucking killed. You know that!
 Oooo... Big fucking scary guy. Just put $120,000 on tomorrow's game.
 This psycho can.
 I don't got it. Not tonight. You can't get blood from a stone.
 Don't bullshit me.
 What money?
 Do you have the money?
 That's my problem. Just put in my bet.
 Fuck Strawberry. You're gonna end up owing 60 G to a homicidal maniac!
 There's just no way the Mets will lose this game. Gooden is pitching and Strawberry is ready to break out.
 Take your money? This guy will blow up your house and everyone in it!
 I'm not gonna let that bastard take my money
 Double or nothing? Are you fucking out of your mind?
 I wanna go double or nothing on the next game.
 OK asshole. You owe thirty grand. Now what are you gonna do?
 Yeah. I'm sure.
 Are you sure?
 Hey, man. Don't give me that bullshit. Don't pussy-out on me. The Mets are a fucking lock. I wanna make some money.
 How about 7 1/2?
 I want 15 on the Mets.
 All right. What are you gonna do?
 I got them all going for Oakland. With bullshit money. We'll cover the $800.
 You knew them?  Who were they, Sister? Who are these boys? What are the names of these -- good boys you knew?
 Those boys, those sad, raging boys... They came to me as the needy do. And like many of the needy, they were rude. Like all the needy, they took. And like all the needy, they needed.  Father. I knew them; They learn in our school. And play in our schoolyard. And they are good boys.
 Yesterday morning, God gave me but one chance to use something else to serve Him. Not my arms or my legs, but something I used for the first time, for the last time, and will never use again. My vagina.
 Yes, Sister?
 As I have prayed day and night since the desecration of this church yesterday morning -- and my sin. You see, Father --
 I think of running for help, and falling to my knees in prayer.
 I also thought of that bread, Father. And of that night six days ago when the Mother Superior died, and I kept the cool, damp cloth on her forehead freshly moist. Father, what would you do if you had but one day in which to use your legs to serve God?
 It's funny, you knew. But the first thing I think of is kneading the bread that I help bake for the soup kitchen. Maybe that's because my the muscles in my arms still hurt.
 Father, if it was so trivial, so natural, so -- No. I have sinned. And you must listen if you are to prescribe an appropriate act of contrition, and to absolve me. Father, what would you do if you had but one day in which to use your arms to serve God?
 Sister, we all know what happened to you yesterday morning. I expected that you would want to speak to me about it. But you could have come to my office. Your being here, in the confessional, implies that you, Sister, have done something wrong. You haven't. I assure you. I feared you might have misplaced feelings of guilt. If you condemn yourself because you experienced feelings of... curiosity or even... pleasure, you mustn't --
 Forgive me Father, for I have sinned. It has been two days since my last confession. Father, my sin is a terrible sin. A sin of omission. There was another sin that happened at the same time, and in the same place, but my sin I think was graver stil.
 Yo Black, you looking for trouble.
 You truly are a dancing fool.
 Did he gots to be.
 He gots to be did.
 1/16, tru' 'dat.  True 'dat.
 We know.  We know.  Yo, check it, my black brothers, we can't let this slide.  Not this injustice. Nah, no way.  Dem' two real coons iz ill.
 Same thing, y'knowwhatI'msayin', y'knowwhatI'msayin'!
 ...that simpleton is holding back the race.  They got rid of us and keep those two buffoons, Mantan and Sleep 'N Eat, y'knowwhatI'msayin'?
 ...Benedict Arnold...
 I'm on it.
 Keep trying.
 B-L-A-K it is.
 BLAK OUT.  BLAK LISTED.  BLAK BALL. Need I say more.
 How 'bout...
 Yo, Big Black, we needs a name for this joint.
 Louder.  They can't hear you.
 Let's go niggers!
 Let's go NIGGERS.
 Alright.  Here we go.  Let's go NIGGERS!  LET'S GO NIGGERS!
 YEAH!
 C'mon.  It's easy.  It's the same thing y'all do out at the Yankee game, no different 'cept we changing one word.  Everybody go it?
 I'm gonna start a chant and I want y'all to follow me.  Let's make our own 2 real coons know you're ready to start the show.
 Yeah!
 My name is Honeycutt and I want to try something different.  Can you do this for me?
 That'swhatI'mtalkin'bout! That'swhatI'mtalkin'bout!  I want to be the first to welcome you to the second taping of Mantan - The New Millennium Minstrel Show.
 Ho!
 Everybody say Ho!
 That's mighty black of you.
 My own sister throwin' me out.  I hope to seeya later when you get ya mind right.  Don't bother letting me out.
 If you think I'm a house nigga then that's your prerogative.  You got your ways to affect change, I have mine.  And I would appreciate it very much if you took ya field nigga ass out of my house.
 There is a name, a term for your kind, the likes of you.  Back in slavery days, you would be classified as a house nigga.
 That'swhatI'msayin'.  I'm not blowin' my young career, brother or no brother, for you or anybody else.
 So are you telling me that you wouldn't even introduce me to Delacroix or set up a meeting?  I'm talking 'bout me, your only brother, ya own flesh and blood, hook a brother up, youknowwhatI'msayin'.
 You don't have the demographics.
 C'mon, why not?  The Monkees had a show.  Look at all that other junk that's on TV.  We got underground cult following.
 What makes you think he would write a show about the Mau-Mau's.
 Yeah, him.
 Delacroix.
 If you were really down you would get us together with that boss of yours.  What's his name again?
 Please.
 We're revolting against the powers that be, that been enslaving the minds and hearts of all people of color.  And we won't stop rapping till we bring about the overthrow of the government of the U.S. of A.
 Who are you revolting against?
 So now I see where you're coming from.  Just because we ain't rapping about Gucci, Timberland, Rolex, Benz, Cristal, ho's and bitches, we're pseudo.
 Hook you up?  The Mau-Mau's?  You must be smoking.  Why in the world would I want to hook up a bunch of red, black and green flag-waving pseudo revolutionairies?
 My group we need some exposure. Was wondering if you could hook a brother up?
 I order out mostly.  So what do I owe this visit to?
 Damn, Sis, you don't keep no food up in here in dis' piece.
 BIG BLACK is the first name and AFRICA is the last.
 I'm not callin you Big Black Africa. Mommy and Daddy named you Julius.
 Whoa, hold up li'l sis'.  I done told you 'bout that.  Julius ain't my name, you better recognize Hopkins was our slave name.  My true name is...
 I'm not huggin' you in the middle of the street.  You must be crazy, Julius.
 Give me some?
 Well you did.
 I didn't mean to scare you like that.
 You idiot.  You almost gave me a massive coronary.
 Microphone check.  One.  Two.  One. Two.  One.  Two.  Hold up.  I gots to give my peeps some props. Brothers introduce yourself.
 We're ready when you are.
 We gonna drop some knowledge, wisdom and understanding.  The Mau- Mau's, we be scientists.  We drop science.
 And what are the Mau-Mau's going to do for us today?
 My righteous name is BIG BLACK.
 What's your name?
 The Mau-Mau's are up in dis place. That's right, the Mau-Mau's.
 Ladies and gentlemen, there is no need to go there.  We can all agree to disagree without making threats.
 And another thing, you better stay away from my sister or you better...
 I'm a revolutionary.
 What do you do?
 What do I do?
 And Big Black from Brooklyn, what do you do?
 Microphone check, one, two.  One, two.  Yo Tavis, I be lovin' yo show but Mantan you is foul.  Why you perpetrating?  You a sellout.
 Our first caller is Big Black from Brooklyn.  Go 'head.
 I'm so tired of you running that. I always worked hard for you.  You think I'm a leech, a kling-on, I quit.
 Yeah, that's easy for you to do. You never had any talent.
 You can walk away.  We both can.
 Don't shoot me, I'm just the piano players.
 You're in this up till ya neck.
 Damn skippy.
 So that's what you been doing?
 Good.  I've got a broken back from carrying you all these years anyway.
 I'm out.
 Meaning?
 Jim Jones, y'know.  I'm not drinking the Kool-Aid.
 What are you talkin' about?
 I'm not drinking the Kool-Aid.
 Look at my lips.
 Why they gotta make my nose so big?
 In fact, we never knew she had any friends period.
 Sloan never told us she had friends like you.
 Please, have a seat.
 Must be the pressure.
 What's wrong with him?
 You ain't happy about the green light?
 DeLa - what's the matter with you.
 Naw, just jokin'.  That's you. That's you.
 You'd try anything.  I got first dibs.  You get ya own stuff.
 Sloan is all 'dat.  I try her.  I'm a tri-sexual.
 Seconds and thirds, too.
 Moorish.  Ya get a little taste of dat booty, ya wanna get some MORE.
 What's that?
 She's also moorish.
 Certified ladies' man, huh?
 No shame in ya game.  She got ya nostrils, ya chnoz is wide open. Sloan's what we certified ladies' men call low hanging fruit.
 It's that bad, huh?  It's all over my face.
 Naw, not you.  It can't be.  That hottie Sloan Hopkins.
 I'm not smiling.
 Why are you smiling so?
 You might be right.
 Life is beginning to look up.  It's all good in da neighborhood.
 That can be done.
 We might need some mo' money behind this.
 Gentlemen, the show, our show will be satirical.  You know what that is, don't you?  Trust me on this one.
 And this is Manray.
 Nice to meet you.
 You'll both get an advance and you can stay with me.
 What about in the mean time?  Not the in between time?
 Different.
 What kind of show is this gonna be?
 First things first.  I have to know if Manray is up for this.
 How much?
 I have this concept for a TV pilot. There's no guarantee it will get made but regardless, you'll still make some money.
 Manray needs a job.
 No offense.
 You'd take no offense if we called you DeLa for short?
 Sloan and I have been looking all over for you.
 Y'know what I mean.  Got a gig yet for Manray and I yet?
 De-la-croix.
 Good morning to you, Mr. Delapot.
 Good morning, Cheeba.
 DeLa, I don't know 'bout this.
 That ain't funny.
 We're starving.
 If it's not too much trouble could you order us some food?
 We was coming to see you.
 We got evicted from our home. We've both been on the streets for the last week.
 Are you crazy?  The joint is crawling with cops now.  You wanna go to Rikers?  Go to the hoosegow?
 We ran out without my shoes and the floor.  I gotta get my stuff.  What about our savings?
 I'm tired of waiting.
 Yo, you gotta show some patience. You want me to snap my fingers and presto chango - you're an overnight sensation.  Son, there is no such thing.
 And I'm the feet.
 Chill, I'm the brains behind this outfit.
 Yo, check it.  This is good and all that but one day soon I want to have much Benjamins so I can have a nice crib and pay all my bills. You hear me.
 Ahh, the luxuries of life.
 Did we get our bill yet?
 Hurry up, I wanna watch HBO.
 My world famous, famous world Arroz con pollo will be ready very soon.
 I'm starvin' like Marvin.
 No costume.  No blackface.
 I'm always gonna be that.  But I ain't doing no more buck dancing.
 Manray, I'm very sorry about ya boy Cheeba and Sloan.  Believe me, it gave me no joy pulling ya coattail about her, just lookin' out for a brother.  I feel you, all this stuff happenin' at once but you can't let if affect your work.  You gotta be professional.
 I won't do it anymore.
 How you sound?
 I'm not playin' myself no mo'.
 Mantan!!
 Mantan?
 You have to start getting into your character.
 Why?
 I want you to start using the name Mantan and not Manray if you don't mind.
 Mantan?  I don't even care as long as I'm dancing.  Which reminds me, I need some new kicks.
 You're now Mantan.
 To what?
 I would like to change your name.
 That's right.  Money turns the wheel.
 DeLa, I'm aboard.  As long as I get to hoof and get paid too!!!
 Trust me.  Of course I still have to pitch it to my boss, but we'll have an answer one way or the other.
 How different?
 Where do I sign?
 Some tap dancing, some singing.
 What do I have to do?
 EUREKA!!
 My tap shoes.
 Well do something about it.
 Manray, Sloan says you're too talented to be dancing on the street.
 Can I finish?  Thank you.  I had a great Aunt, we called her Sister. She went to her grave not believing man had walked on the Moon.
 Are you trying to excuse our Holocaust?
 Don't you people get it?  We're in the 21st Century.  Slavery was over four hundred years ago.  All that stuff people talked in the old days, it's over.  Folks always crying, white man this, white man that.  Let's all grow up.
 But the line has to be drawn.
 Yes.  And I say yes because who is to judge?  Who is to stand before us and say this is righteous and this is not?  Who?  Who can play God?
 No matter how sexist or racist the material may be?
 Because race has always been a sensitive issue in this country. Gary, I have no problem with people disagreeing with the show, it's when folks start trying to mess with my inherent right as an artist, that's when I get mad.  No one, in any way, shape or form should be censored.
 Our guest today is Pierre Delacroix. He is the creator of the highly controversial TV show MANTAN. Let's get right into it.  You have been called by some in the community a traitor, a sellout, an Uncle Tom. Why does your show generate such feelings?
 I want to meet her one day, please tell her the great news.  I'm OUT like Vanilla Ice.
 I gots to go, it's my Moms.
 Hello, Mommy, let me get rid of this other call.
 Hold on a sec, I got a call.
 The big mistake was my not believing in your genius earlier.  From the gitgo, from jump street.
 This has to be a big mistake.
 They didn't even view a rough cut, just some scenes we quickly cut together.
 Yo, DeLa, I just got the news from the CNS brass.  They saw some clips from the pilot and they're rushing it onto the air.  Yo, we're a midseason replacement, ordered 12 shows.  We're on in 3 weeks.  Didya hear what I just said, Yo?
 I seriously doubt that will ever happen.  Didn't I tell you I know your people better than you do. But if by some miracle you're correct, I'm gonna invite them inside my house and we'll have a sit down, discuss it like civil human beings.
 Funnier to who and at who's expense? Dunwitty, when Negroes start to run amok, the boycotts, when the demostrations commence, I'm giving them your home address.  Let's see how you like it when they picket your lawn in Greenwich, Connecticut.
 We just punched it up a bit.  Made it funnier.
 I don't give a good goddamn about Finland, Norway, Sweden or wherever ya blond ass came from.
 Calm down, please.
 I will not be held responsible for these revisions.  These changes are not the way I want to go.  This is an outrage.  This is a sham.  A violation!
 Dunwitty, don't leave.
 I'm gonna leave you two creative geniuses alone.
 Derrick Coleman, he possessed all the talent in the world, coulda, shoulda, been a great ballplayer but alas D.C. didn't want it bad enough.  Delacroix, do you want it? Bad enough to kill for it?  Do you want it that much.
 In the immortal words of Derrick Coleman, WHOOOPDEEDAMNDOO!!!
 No!!!  Just meet the guy.  That's all I'm asking.  Look, I'll even let you choose your own musical director.  You can have that.
 That's exactly my point.  Has he even directed actors before in anything?
 If Spielburg can direct "The Color Purple" and "Amistad", our whiz kid can direct the Mantan pilot.
 What are his qualifications besides being a white male and directing a hot new sexy freaky Madonna video?
 Probably nuthin', but that's why it's such a sexy way to go. Sometimes an outsider has a fresh new outlook, a different unique perspective.  A black director, y'know what he's gonna do given the subject matter?  With this kid, the possibilities are endless.
 Besides, what does he know about Negroes?
 I just want you to meet him.  Keep an open mind.
 You're telling me some white boy is gonna direct this pilot?
 I want a hot, young white director. Maybe the kid, that pheenom who just did that hot new sexy Madonna video.
 I was hoping to perhaps direct some episodes myself, if not the pilot soon after.
 To hire someone solely on their ethnicity, gender or religion is not right.  It's un-American.  I will hire someone who is most qualified for this particular job.
 I strongly feel that a Negro should direct this.  This kind of satire is a high wire act in a gale storm. One misstep and we're doing "Amos and Andy."  Only a Negro will have the sensitivity and cultural awareness to navigate this dangerous terrain.
 Sleep 'n Eat, what do you do?
 We think so.
 That'swhatI'mtalkin''bout. That'swhatI'mtalkin''bout!  He's off the hiz-hook!
 What are you talkin' 'bout?  It's the move.  Stay wid me now.  We're movin' fast.  What does everybody else think about this?
 I don't know about that plantation angle.
 And every week these Alabama porch monkeys will make us cry, make us laugh, make us look at our own humanity.  Make us feel good to be alive.
 Ya first bad move.  Projects been done.  That's one of the problems now, everything, movies, TV, are set in the urban jungle, da hood. That's so tired.  Mantan's Millennium Minstrel Show should be set on a plantation.  In Alabama.
 In the projects.  Like Eddie Murphy's "The PJ's."
 We gonna hit 'em wid da BOMB DICKEY on dis' one.  What's the setting?
 Do we have characters?  How about Honeycutt, Snowflake, Rastus, Nigger, Jim, Sambo, Jungle Bunny, and how could we forget Aunt Jemima.
 Who are the other characters?
 Mantan right here is a gifted hoofer.  He has educated feet.
 So what.  We would just give the NAACP a donation that would be the end of that.  No such thing as bad publicity.  So what.  Earlier you said singing and dancing.
 Negroes would be in an uproar.
 Let'em try.  I will kill to make this happen.
 Protest finally forced "Amos and Andy" off the air.  Could stop us from ever getting on.
 This could be bigger than "Amos and Andy."
 Yep, you guessed it.
 And Sleep 'n Eat is his comical sidekick?
 Mantan is an uneducated Negro who always by some stroke of unbelievable stupidity makes his best laid plans go haywire.
 Exactly!
 Ignorant, dullwitted, lazy, and unlucky.
 What are there character traits?
 Every week we follow the trials and tribulations of two real coons - Mantan and Sleep 'n Eat.  The Dusky Duo.
 I want you take it there.  All the way to the edge and back.
 Mantan and Sleep 'n Eat.  Two real coons.  I know we're way out there but it's satire.
 That's a great handle.
 Are these our two stars, sitting here in front of my nose?  Which one is Mantan again?
 I don't know if Whoopi is the way to go.
 Don't worry about that, that's my department.  Now who do we cast? We need a star.  Can Whoopi sing or dance?
 It will take a lot of courage and backbone on the part of the CNS to get this on the air.  In fact, I would understand fully if the subject matter is deemed too risque, too controversial.
 I'm feelin' dis'!
 I'm lovin' it.  You know how I know? Because I'm getting a boner, my Johnson is hard, no disrespect my sister.
 It is called: MANTAN - THE NEW MILLENNIUM MINSTREL SHOW.
 The name of the show?
 So let's take this great form, this very American tradition of entertainment into the 21st century, into the new millennium.
 Word!!!
 I know you're familiar with minstrel shows.  They came about at the turn of the 19th century.  It was a variety show in which the talent was in blackface - singing, dancing, telling jokes, doing skits. Dunwitty, I ask you when was the last time there was a good variety show on the air.  Carol Burnett? HeeHaw?
 Go on.  Good so far.
 I've done a lot of soul searching and once again you are right.  In my previous work it's been all surface, superficial.  I have never really dug deep.  Not anymore.  As Mark Twain fully understood satire is the way.  Race has always been a hot button in this country's history and it needs to be pushed harder.  If we are ever to live side by side in peace and harmony. It's about promoting racial healing.
 I'm wid it.
 We're all happy to be here and I'm going to paint a picture for you.
 It's right and tight.  Good morning, let me introduce you to everybody. You know my assistant, Sloan.
 Delacroix, I'm glad you got your mind right.
 Yes!  Yes!  Yes!  I want a show that will make headlines, that will have millions and millions of households tuned in, glued to their televisions every week.  I want advertisers dying to buy on this show.  I'm gonna squeeze this show out of you if it kills you.
 What is it you want from me?  Some plantation follies?  Some sitcom that takes place on a watermelon patch?  Some show that follows four nigger generations of junkies and crackheads?  You want me to go back to the ante bellum days?
 You will or you'll be back at BET so quick you'll never know what hit you.  I need a mid-season replacement and pronto.  It will be on the fast track.
 I'm not sure if I can deliver what you want.
 That's exactly what I think.  I want you to create something that people want to see.  Let's be honest, the majority of the people in the country are deaf, dumb and blind and I'm including 35 million African-Americans.  You know and I know "niggers" set the trend, set the styles.  This is a golden opportunity now.  These idiots have to be led to the water.
 I'm an oreo, a sell out?  Because I don't aspire to do HOMEBOYS FROM OUT OF SPACE, SECRET DIARY OF DESMOND PFEIFFER, A PJ's or some as you might put it, some "nigger" show?  I'm a Tom?  I'm whiter than white and you're blacker than black? Is that what you think?
 You got your head stuck up your ass with your Harvard education and your pretentious ways.  Brother man, I'm blacker than you.  I'm keepin' it real and you're frontin', trying to be white.
 I've never been given a fair shot.
 Delacroix, wake up, brother man. The reason why they didn't get picked up was because nobody - and I mean NOBODY - niggers and crackers alike wants to see that junk.
 ...to white?  I still feel all of my scripts would make good shows.
 The middle class black family moves into a white suburban enclave.  The middle class black family moves into a small Southern town that is run by the KKK.  The middle class single black father raises his teenage daughter.  The middle class single black father raises his teenage daughter.  The middle class single black mother raises her teenage son.  And so on and so forth.  It's too clean, too antiseptic...
 I'm telling you it's not.
 I don't agree.  The Negro middle class does exist, and it's rich material for a dramatic series or sitcom.
 The material you've been creating is too white bread.  White people with black faces.  The Huxtable's, Cosby, revolutionary.  But that's dead.  We can't go down that road again.
 NIGGER.  NIGGER.  NIGGER.  NIGGER.
 I would prefer you not use that word in my presence.
 I understand Black culture.  I grew up around black people all my life. If the truth be told I probably know "niggers" better than you, Monsieur Delacroix.  Please don't get offended by my use of the quote-unquote N word.  I got a black wife and three bi-racial children, so I feel I have a right to use that word.  I don't give a damn what Spike says, Tarantino is right.  Nigger is just a word.  If Dirty Ole Bastard can use it every other word so can I.
 Forget it.  I believe you're my most creative person I've got on staff.  You're hip.  You know what's happening.  I got some corny white boys and girls writing for me.
 I understand.  But again, in all honesty I was not informed.
 I'm sorry about my blowup but I have to have a whipping boy every meeting.
 C.P. Time is Colored People's Time. The stereotypical belief that Negroes are always late.  That Negroes have no sense of time - time except when it comes to music or dance.
 Do you know what C.P. Time is?
 I wasn't told about this until Marie informed me as soon as I got off the elevator.
 So are you telling me everyone knew about this get-together except you?
 Four minutes ago.
 I didn't find out about this very important staff meeting until...
 Do you know how much information can be dispensed in one minute alone?
 I'm sorry I'm late.
 ...exactly thirty-two minutes ago.
 Always keep 'em laughing.
 I love you too, Daddy.
 Baby, you treat me so good. Peerless, you're a good son, I love you.  You never gave me no trouble.
 Let's get him over to the bed.
 In life?  I'ma keep on living, having a good drink, got me a good young woman, make a couple of dollars and make people laugh. Haven't I always tol' you all nigga's are entertainers?  The question is what are you gonna do, Peerless?
 I didn't mean that, in life.
 Three nights Charleston, South Carolina.
 Where do you go from here?
 The truth is never let them seeya sweat.  You do that, that's half the battle.
 Nuthin' I can't handle.
 Dem white boys giving you a hard time?
 The same old, same old.  Trying to get my stuff through.
 Enough about me, what's happening with you?
 All I know is what happened to me. All that other mess I just file into the "life's too short" category.
 Another one of your conspiracies to hold ya career back?
 That's the only reason, period. They only want one certain kind of black comic.
 Daddy, it can't be just because of that.  There had to be other factors.
 Because I had too much pride.  Too much integrity.  I wouldn't lick nobody's butt.  Some material I refused to do.
 That's what I'm askin'.
 How did I end up at the third rate chittlin' circuit greasy hole in the wall in West Hell, Virginny? Is that what you're asking ya Daddy?
 How did you end up here?
 I did.  I'm not an alcoholic.  I just like to drink.
 I thought you had promised Mommy you stopped.
 Purely for medicinal purposes.
 My game is still strong.  No Viagra for me, don't need no chemicals. Just my tonic.
 Daddy, she's younger than me.
 Good woman.  I trained her right.
 Pleased to meet you.
 Pull up a chair.  Oh, excuse me, this is my lady DOT.
 It's been a long time.
 Son.  Good to seeya.  Good to seeya.
 It's me, Peerless.
 Go away, unless you got my money.
 I want to speak with you.
 What do you want?
 He did the best way he knew how, Junebug is stubborn just like you.
 He never showed it.
 Your father is proud of you.
 Don't tell him it's from me or he won't take it.
 I was a hostess at this club, your Daddy was performing and I had never laughed so hard in my life. He asked me to come with him.  I quit my job and we've been together ever since.
 So what's up with you?
 The drinking is for the pain.  It doesn't kill it, just dulls it.
 So he drank himself into a stuper?
 Not that often.  He was excited to see you.
 How long has my father been like this?
 Is that so?
 Glad to meet you, too.  You are all your father talks about.
 Give me the gun.
 I told you but you wouldn't listen. You never listened to me.
 I didn't think this was in your studies at NYU.
 Don't make me have to use this.
 And that's how you got me in the first place.
 DeLa, kiss my big black ass.
 Otherwise.  I trust you know the difference.  You're an intelligent woman, finished at NYU.
 Work related or otherwise?
 The first and only time.  A big mistake.  I'm gonna have to ask you not to see Mantan anymore.
 That was a mistake, but I don't regret it.
 That's why it will be so much fun.
 This is crazy.
 You can talk all that mumbo jumbo if you want to but your hands are much bloody.  I know where I made my big mistake.  I have a general rule, never get involved romantically with somebody crazier than you.
 That which has been hidden in darkness is now in the light.  This bucket of blood.
 Light?
 DeLa, you should try it sometime. Come into the light.
 Do you have to be so damn forthright?
 I can't lie to him.  If he asks me something, I tell him what I think.
 Dunwitty and I feel you've been getting too close to him, getting his mind all messed up.
 Please don't go there.
 Oh, is he?  You getting jiggy with Mantan?
 He's just playing big brother.
 That crazy brother of yours doesn't think so.
 You're the one that put us together. We're friends.
 How long have you and Hambone been hangin' out?
 I don't want to hear it.
 Why'd you do that?
 To me, it shows part of our history in this country, a time when we were considered inferior, sub-human.
 How so?
 It's all good.  You got a hit show, you're gonna need a bank.  Plus, I love these old black collectibles.
 Is that good or bad?
 I thought it was appropiate.
 Thanks.
 This is authentic, not a repro, circa turn of the century.
 The Jolly Nigger Bank.
 No matter what you think, you did come up with something unique. Open it.
 For what?
 A gift.
 What is this?
 A small victory isn't that small when you've been use to losing.
 So you have your small victory, now what?
 Everybody shut up.
 What would their reaction be?  I hadn't the foggiest.
 I'm sorry, I can't help it.  It's too funny.
 Who's side are you on?
 C'mon.  You were only doing what family is supposed to be doing for family.  You gave your brother a shot.  That's all anybody can ask for, an opportunity, a chance, a shot.  He got his.
 I want to apologize about my brother and the Mau-Mau's.  I should not have imposed them on you.
 The pleasure is mine.
 Same here.
 Just don't lie to me.
 What do you want me to say?
 We both lied to him.
 Let's leave the man in peace so he can get ready.
 Your life will never be the same.
 Break a leg.
 Just want to say good luck.
 I'm gonna slit my wrists.  Cut my throat.  For the love of Joseph.
 You've said that already.
 The big one.
 Which one is your brother?
 This is the group I was telling you about.
 I've never worked with any of you and you've never worked with me so we'll be starting from scratch. I'm a fair person, a straight shooter and I don't hold my tongue. Everybody up in here should know I had nothing to do with you being hired.
 Hello.
 Good morning, for those of you who don't know me, I'm Pierre Delacroix. I'm running things and this here is my assistant Sloan Hopkins.
 Like I said, all this for some twisted, distorted sense of principal.  Dunwitty, he just tolerates your Negroidal ass, he doesn't respect it.
 I wouldn't bet against it.  My Negroidal ass is stuck between the proverbial rock and a hard place.
 What's the chances of MANTAN being picked up?
 Even if money wasn't an issue, Dunwitty will still go ahead without me and that could be more dangerous.
 Fuck da money.  Why do through all this effort?  Why?  Are you looking for love from Dunwitty?  For respect?  Dunwitty and his likes don't give a goddamn about you.  So now what are you gonna do?
 It was the principle.  Dunwitty had to be enlightened.  I was making a point.  I take pride in my work. Plus, I already told you I wasn't gonna walk away from my money.
 Why did you even come up with that shit if you didn't want it made?
 My problem is MANTAN THE NEW MILLENIUM MINSTREL SHOW.
 What is your problem?
 I feel like somebody hit me upside da head with a sledgehammer.
 You okay?
 This is Cheeba.
 Hello.
 Manray better not be bleeding to death.  I need him.  After we're done he can do whatever he wants to do, until then, he's ours.
 Maybe something happened to them. Maybe they're lying in an alley bleed to death.
 And lose out on my money?  The only way I get paid is if I get fired. And that's what I intend to do.
 Can't you just quit?  Walk away?
 Good.  I'm going to need your support.
 I'm in till the end.
 You getting cold feet?
 Sounds risky to me.
 The point being that him, the networks don't want Black people on television unless they are buffoons.
 What point is that?
 Dunwitty wants a Coon show.  And that's what I'm going to give him, it's going to be so racist, so negative, he won't have the balls to put it on the air.  Hence I'll prove my point.
 You lost me.
 Not yet, but this thing will never get made.
 Do you know how you will use him?
 Manray was under our nose the whole time.
 The idea was out there in the universe.  Now what?
 How can this be?  You and me at the same time, the exact same thought. It's scary.
 It hit me like a ton of bricks.
 How did you know?
 Manray!
 Manray!
 It wasn't my fault.  If I would have known, I would have known.
 What good are you if you don't tell me stuff like this?
 Nobody told me anything.
 Why didn't you tell me about this staff meeting?
 How was it?
 I've always liked the format of Rowan and Martin's "LAUGH-IN."
 David, I appreciate your comments. Anybody got an ideas?  Everybody just talk out loud.
 This thing was rigged, the deck was stacked, the fix was in.  Could Don King be near?  Good thing Sloan had my back.  She's my rock.  This was going to be a whole lot of work.
 Oh, is that what I'm doing?
 I perfectly understand where you're coming from.  As a minority I can relate to your struggle also.  But I think you should give us all a chance.  We want this pilot to be successful just as much as you. Please don't be so quick to judge us based only on our whiteness.
 Hi, Mona.
 He, I'm Mona.
 Yes, your name?
 Kook and the Gang, it's Manray. Let's do the taping.  You go back to your dressing room, get dressed and blacken up.
 My name is Manray, goddamnit.
 Mantan, we got a show to tape.
 Do I have to spell it out for you? In fact, go ask Sloan yourself.
 I don't believe it.
 Let me ask you a question, if I may. How do you think she got the job in the first place?  I don't mean to burst your bubble, Mantan the Marvelous, but Sloan is an opportunity.
 Sloan is the hardest working person I've ever met.
 Oh, is it?  Buddy boy, in this business if people don't produce, they get fired.
 What you did is dead wrong.
 You shouldn't even be mad at me over Sloan.
 And now is definitely not the time to bitch up.
 Yeah.
 You've made it from the guttermost to the uppermost.  Don't you know you should never let them see you sweat.  Y'knowwhatI'msayin'?
 Yo, DeLa, they tried to lynch my black ass up in dat piece.
 You getting scared because some people don't like what you are doing?
 No.
 What are you?  A man or a mouse? Are you a punk?  Punking out on me?
 In time.
 Hope the same thing doesn't happen to me.  That's some big shoes to fill.
 No joke.  Serious.
 Tomorrow it will be all about cruelty to animals or some sex scandal.  Besides, there is no such thing as bad publicity.
 Same thing Giuliani said.
 This is nothing.  It will blow over by tomorrow.
 You sound like the media.
 So they can be on TV.
 Sloan, will you take your boss out of here so I can get ready.
 Not nervous?  Relaxed?
 I feel fine.
 You feel good, not nervous?
 Naw.  I'll take the zero.
 Can I kiss you too?
 The point I'm trying to make is that this is a blessing.  It's going to be fun doing this show and we should all look at it that way.
 Now I'm privileged?!  Why?  Because I didn't grow up on food stamps and welfare?  Because I didn't call home a cardboard box?  No, I never ever went to bed hungry and I'm proud of it, too.  Whoever told you that living in poverty earns you somekind of badge of honor flat out lied to you.
 That's the way it came out.  Let me ask you one question.  Have you ever been in want, in need your entire privileged life?
 I didn't mean it to sound like that.
 Pressure?  DeLa, you don't know what the hell real pressure is. SHEEETT!!!  This is lightstuff. Now when you scramblin' out on the street in da January winter and the hawk is talkin' to you with NO money and NO prospects of money anytime soon, now that there is some pressure.
 I'm happy for all of us.  It's just we have a great responsibility now. The pressure is on.
 Soon.
 I won't forget.  When are you coming up here to see your mother?
 If and when he calls, please don't forget to ask him if he's seen Mantan.
 You know how your Daddy is.
 Not at all?
 No.
 Yes I have, very hard.  Has Daddy called?
 Of course I'm happy for you. You've worked very hard for your success.
 You going to attack me too.  The show is a hit.  Aren't you happy for me?
 I'm doing okay.  Been reading about your show, it's all over everywhere. I watched it's all over everywhere. I watched it once.  I thought you said there would be no buffoonery.
 Peerless, last time, go see your father.
 C'mon, Mommy.  Daddy hasn't been impressed with anything I've ever done.  From winning my fifth grade Spelling Bee to the present.
 Even more reason to see him.  He'll be overjoyed with your success.
 It's gonna be hard for me to get away with the show taking off.
 Regardless, he still is your father.
 I don't even know why you're still concerned over him.  Daddy's not with you.
 Richmond is not all the way down south.
 I can't go all the way down south.
 He's performing at some place outside of Richmond, Virginia.
 Where is he?
 Yes he did.
 He said that?
 He wants you to come and see him.
 I'll be right over.
 Peerless, your father called.
 I will.  And good luck with your show.  I hope it's a huge success. You've worked very hard.  You deserve it.
 Please let me know when you hear from Daddy, get a number or something.
 Peerless, I didn't raise a buffoon. We have enough of those on television already.
 To answer your question, there are a lot of Negroes in it and what is your definition of buffoons?
 I guess he's still on the road. What kind of show is this?  Are they some Negroes in it without being buffoons?
 I know what's on my birth certificate.  You heard from Daddy?
 Son, Peerless is your name.  Now you might be one of these Hollywood types, change your name and all that but Peerless Dothan is on your birth certificate.
 Mommy, please don't call me that.
 If at first it's not what you want, just work that much harder, Peerless.
 It was.  It is.  But this is a different kind of show.
 That's wonderful.  Isn't that what you always wanted, a show of your own?
 Can't beat it with a hammer.  Well, since you asked, it looks like I may have a new show, a pilot being shot.
 How's the food?
 I said no such thing.  All I said is that something must be wrong.
 C'mon, Mommy, don't start with that I'm an ungrateful son stuff.
 You hear me talkin' to you.  The only time you come up here when something is wrong.
 It looks delicious.
 You must think I'm some kind of fool.
 Thank you very much.  I always try my best.
 Good luck, Jukka.  Do a good show.
 This is a travesty.  A debacle.
 Then will you teach me what I need to know.  Maybe we learn from each other, if that's possible, no?
 This is a TV show, not a music video.
 My visual style is very erotic, sexy, how do you say - hot?
 How did you get this gig?
 Thank you for correcting my ignorance.  I'm looking forward to working side by side with you.  I feel we make a good team.
 Well before there was BLACK or AFRICAN AMERICAN, there were NEGROES.  I'M A NEGRO.
 Ahhh!!!  I never heard of that term before.  I thought you were BLACK of African-American.  No?
 Did you just ask me what's a Negro? I'M A NEGRO!!!
 A fiasco.  A disaster.  A boondoggle. An abomination.
 What's a Negro.
 Yes, I know.  Jukka, have you ever seen a Negro person before?  Even had a real conversation with a real Negro before?
 You know, Finlandia vodka?  Yes?
 Finland.
 Helsinki, which is the capital of Finland.
 Where are you from?
 I just turned twenty.
 Nice to meet you.  If you don't mind me asking you - how old are you?
 This show was created, conceived by you, a non-threatening African- American male.  Voila.  End of argument.  It can't be racist because you're black.
 Yes you!
 Thank you.  And always smile.
 Let Myrna finish.
 We all stick to this, it's smooth sailing.
 The Mantan Manifesto.  Catchy ain't it?  Number One.  We gainfully employ African Americans, in front of and behind the cameras.  Two. Let the audience decide.  Three. Who put these critics in charge? These so-called cultural police? Four.  Who determines what is black? Five.  Mantan is a satire.  Six. If they can't take a joke, "F" 'em.
 The best defense is offense.
 Myrna is here to help us plan our strategy.
 First, I would like to say I love the show.  It's very courageous. My parents marched in Selma, Alabama with Dr. King.
 I know all of you have seen the overnight ratings.  Through the roof.  But in this game you gotta be one, two, three steps ahead.  I introduce you to Myrna Goldfarb. She's the best media consultant in the biz.
 I envy you.  That's the way I want to feel about my work.
 I think that would probably make you the happiest.  When I'm hoofing, I mean really doing my thing, hitting it, nothing compares to that feeling in the world.
 Why do you say that?  You've never seen me.
 You're welcome.  You shouldn't give up on performing.
 If that was suppose to be a compliment, I thank you.
 I'm sure that was the only thing he was impressed with.  You look beautiful like that.
 No, we're not knocking boots.  I got this internship while I still was at NYU, DeLa was impressed with my get up and go and hired me to be his assistant.
 Are you and him kicking it? Knocking boots. Y'knowwhatI'mtalkin'bout.
 What do you mean?
 So what's up with you and DeLa?
 A little.  I just graduated from NYU film school.  Cinema studies.
 You sing and dance?
 I wish I had your natural talent. God only makes that visit once in a while.
 Not a class, not a thing, just picked stuff up by myself.
 You've never had any formal training, either?
 I never had a really real pair before.
 I admit, that's a very hard thing to do.  Quickly let's go to the phones before we pay the bills and hear from our proud sponsors, DA BOMB.  125% PURE PLEASURE MALT LIQUOR.  IT MAKES YOU WANNA GET YA FREAK ON AND TIMMI HILLNIGGER. 125% AUTHENTIC GIT-TOE GEAR WHEN YOU WANT TO BE GIT-TOED FABULOUS.
 I don't know what a retort is, but it's simple.  Mantan - The New Millennium Minstrel Show is UNIVERSAL.  It's not just for Negroes in Compton or 125th in Harlem.  This is America.  Our ancestors helped build this country, we got a right, just like everybody else.  I'm not gonna box myself in. This show makes people think, and they're laughing at the same time.
 Don't you feel that is a simplistic retort?
 No if you go with the flow, Tavis. That's what a lot of Negroes don't understand.  Protesting isn't gonna do a damn thing.  If people don't like our satire in our number one hit show then don't watch it.  Or better yet write your own show.  Do it better.
 Is it inevitable that the game plays you?
 Money makes the world go round.  It ain't no joke being poor.  I know whatI'mtalkin''bout. Y'knowwhatI'msayin'?  I've lived on the street.  I've been homeless. I've learned how to play the game, work the game, be in the game.
 Money and nothing else?
 Yo, Tavis, check it out.  This is the two-one, the 21st century and it's all about the money.  Like my man Mase says, "it's all about the Benjamins."
 Let's jump right into it.  Your show has sparked a world of controversy, provoked a tone of dialogue.  How do you see all of this?
 I'm more comfortable around my people.
 Before we begin, I want to thank you for coming on my show for your first television interview.  You could have chosen Mike Wallace, Barbara Walters, Jane Pauley, whatnot but you're here.
 Tavis, thank you for having me.
 Our guest tonight is the extraordinary, talented performer, Mantan.  Thanks for coming in.
 A song a comin' I feel.
 I feel a song a comin' on.
 Mantan, dat sho' is a whopper.
 Sleep 'N Eat, I was my wife's husband and grandchild at one and the same time.  And lo' and behold, as the husband of a person's grandmother is his grandfather, I Mantan, became my own grandfather.
 Years ago I married a widow who had a grown-up daughter.  My daddy visited us often, fell in love with my stepdaughter and married her. Thusly he became my son-in-law and my stepdaughter became my mother because she was my father's wife. Soon after dis my wife gave birth to a son, which of course was my father's brother in-law and my uncle, for he was the brother of my step-mother.  My father's wife also became the mother of a son.  He was of course my brother and also my grandchild for he was the son of my daughter.  Accordingly, my wife was my grandmother because she was my mother's mother.
 Well, I'll be an Alabama porch monkey's uncle.
 I don't know who I am.
 How be dat?
 Dat's yo Uncle Ben.  That reminds me, I've seen a lot of troubles lately.
 Ain't Jemima on the pancake box?
 Hold on, you allegorical hypothesis. Don't cross words with me.
 Mantan, it is possible that my hyphenated sentences are entirely too complex for all the intellect contained in that diminutive coconut?
 Sleep 'N Eat, what's the matter with you?  Using all dose ten dollar words?
 You expect the unexpected in circumstances of that peculiarity.
 I slept too near where I fell out.
 You slept too near where you got in?
 I fell out of my bed last night.
 ...like fried and chicken...
 ...like grits and butter...
 ...like macaroni and cheese...
 That's what I like about you and me. We git along...
 ...perfect...
 ...too late, maybe around...
 ...then what about...
 ...too early...
 Around...
 So when are you comin' to pick us up?
 ...not that time...
 ...I heard different, thought that was...
 ...yes she did.
 ...no, she didn't...
 Oh, because on our first date, she let me...
 No.  That's her second cousin. Who's married to Li'l Bit.
 I heard ya lady is wild.
 We should go out on a double date.
 I'll buy her a less expensive dress, so I can have some money left over to take her out to dinner.
 ...aconite get it dat cheap.
 ...dat's too much money.  I can't 'ford it.  I needs me a dress that cost no mo' than...
 ...that was Vicki, her best friend. Dat dress will cast ya round...
 I thought you got rid of...
 Not for me, my woolly headed cotton pickin' friend for...
 That'll work.  I just bought one for myself.
 ...to big.  The in-between one, not too tight, not too lose.
 Mantan, way too short, too tight. Get her one of dose...
 Sleep 'N Eat, one of dem slinky, sexy, little foxy...
 Too bad.  How 'bout a dress?
 She hates dem.
 No, not that.  How 'bout...
 Tomorrow is her birthday and I want to get her something really nice, like a...
 Oh her.
 Not her, the one with the little...
 The one with da big...
 Y'know my lady Lucindy?
 Go to your windows and yell out, scream with all the life you can muster up inside your assaulted, bruised and battered bodies.  I'M SICK AND TIRED OF NIGGERS AND I'M NOT GONNA TAKE IT ANYMORE!
 You tellin' the truth.
 Cousins, I want all of you to go to your windows.  Go to your windows and yell.  Yell, I'm tired of the drugs, the crack babies born out of wedlock to crackhead aids infested parents.  I'm tired of the inflated welfare rolls while good wholesome Americans bring less and less of their paycheck home every two weeks. I'm tired, you're tired, we're all tired of these so-called bible- thumping God fearing, whore mongling Professional athletes.  Aren't you tired of these basketball-dunking, football-running, hop-hip rapping ebonic-speaking sex offenders who got ten kids from ten different Ho's?  I know I am and so is Sleep 'N Eat.
 Give or cousins some of dem educated feets.
 Well, thank you Mistuh Sleep 'N Eat.
 Tell 'em what you mean Mistuh Mantan.
 No mo' "city slickers."  Ahh, can't you smell the sweet aroma of the ripe watermelons and high cotton?
 Our Alabamy Home.  Now we're getting countrified.  We is Bama's.
 To come back to our roots.
 ...the big apple, New York, New York.
 We both left the hustle and bustle of Uptown, Harlem...
 And this is my very best friend Mantan.
 This is my best friend Sleep 'N Eat.
 I wuz leaving anyway, for good.
 You can go now.
 I know I won't be your puppet.
 Why don't you answer?
 Don't try to change to the subject.
 Forget about me, are you a puppet for DeLa?
 So you say.  Sloan, you wuz gonna use me up just like you used Dela? Work it to the top.  I never imagined people in this biz could flip on you like "IHOP."  I'm damn happy DeLa fired ya ass.
 That's ancient history.  That has nothing to do with you and I.
 Aw, c'mon.
 We did it one time, only once.  It had nothing to do with the job, it was stupid.  Everything I've got I've earned.
 Did you ever sleep with DeLa?
 Say what, Manray?
 Oh, you gonna make me say it.
 Just ask me what you want to know.
 Stop playing me Sloan.
 And what?
 And?
 After my internship expired, Dela was impressed and offered me a position as his assistant.
 You leave something out?
 Worked my black ass off, first as an intern, then worked my way up to this position.
 How did you get this gig?
 You look beautiful like that.
 What?
 Y'know what?
 I'll be down front.  You better start putting your face on.
 My people love me.
 You're sure this is a good idea.
 For what?  He left.  Not me.
 Why don't you call him?
 We can look out for ourselves.
 I just don't want you and Cheeba to get hurt.
 Why all of a sudden are you flippin' on me?  This blackface thing was part of the deal from the git-go. Don't even try to play it like you ain't a part of all this.  You down with Delacroix.
 Bert Williams and the rest, they had to black up.  They had no choice.  They were considered 3/5ths of a human being.  Did you know that's written in the Constitution of the United States?
 Maybe I need to do a lot of things.
 Maybe you need to start.
 Never read a book in my whole life.
 You don't read, do you?
 No, before my time.
 Y'know, at the beginnin' of the century, African-American had to perform in blackface.  You ever heard of Bert Williams?  He was a great artist.
 Gots no intention of ending up broke.
 I hope you save a little somethin' somethin'.
 Just a little something' somethin'.
 Oh you do, huh?
 Sloan, I got it like 'dat.
 This is a nice place.  It must have cost a pretty penny.
 Are you trying to rap to me?
 What else?
 I'm an asthmatic.  Been one all my life.  Can't go anywhere without an inhaler.
 The good stuff.
 What do you want to know?
 So what's up with you?
 Enough.
 A lot?
 Well, homeboy, looks like he's at a funeral.
 People show their happiness in a lot of different ways.
 Not at all, sir.  I have a pair of good pistols that have already done execution, and are ready to do it again.
 Is your mother not afraid on account of the highwayman to let one so young as you travel?
 That is none of your business.
 Where are you bound for?
 Good morning.
 Good day to you, young sir.
 Don't bully, Mr. Best.  Here are the pistols.  God bless you, my boy; and when I count three, fire.
 Ten, sir, and make them short ones, do you hear, Captain Grogan?
 There's nothing else for it.  Take your ground, Grogan -- twelve paces, I suppose?
 You know the use of arms very well, Best, and no one can doubt your courage; but Michael and I will see you home for all that.
 I'm not afraid of highwaymen.  My man is armed, and so am I.
 Both of us ride home with Best here.
 If you're insulted, and not satisfied, remember there's two of us, Best.
 And, I'll tell you what, Mr. Dugan, I've been insulted grossly in this house.  I ain't at all satisfied with these here ways of going on. I'm an Englishman, I am, and a man of property; and I -- I --
 I never was more in earnest.
 Pooh!  Pooh!  Best, you are joking.
 It's not the English way, for ladies to have two lovers, and, so, Mr. Dugan, I'll thank you to pay me the sum you owe me, and I resign all claims to this young lady.  If she has a fancy for school-boys, let her take 'em, sir.
 Well, well!  What is it?  We'll make you used to our ways, or adopt English ones.
 I'll tell you what it is, Mr. Dugan. I have had enough of Miss Dugan here and your Irish ways.  I ain't used to 'em, sir.
 Hoity-toity!  John Best, what's the matter here?
 Oh!  That will be sent after him.  I have a fancy to look into that red box which contains his papers, you say; and at noon, after parade, shall be at the inn.  You will not say a word to any one there regarding the affair, and will wait for me at the Chevalier's rooms until my arrival.  We must force that box.  You are a clumsy hound, or you would have got the key long ago.
 And his baggage?
 You say he drives after breakfast and before dinner.  When he comes out to his carriage a couple of gendarmes will mount the box, and the coachman will get his orders to move on.
 Not yet, but I believe he intends to.
 Has he sent the challenge yet?
 I am not sure.  The Prince told him quite clearly that if he wished to have the money, he would have to fight for it.
 What are the Chevalier's intentions?
 I had thought you more expert.  You must find out if the Chevalier cheats.  He sees the English and Austrian envoys continually, and the young men of either ministry sup repeatedly at his house.  Find out what they talk of, for how much each plays, especially if any of them play on parole.  If you are able to, read his private letters, though about those which go to the post, you need not trouble yourself -- we look at them there.  But never see him write a note without finding out to whom it goes, and by what channel or messenger.  He sleeps with the keys of his dispatch-box with a string around his neck -- twenty frederics, if you get an impression of the keys.
 Only a very little, as soldiers do.
 You are a Hungarian; you served in the army, and left on account of weakness in the loins.  He gambles a great deal, and wins.  Do you know the cards well?
 There is lately come to Berlin a gentleman in the service of the Empress Queen, who calls himself the Chevalier de Belle Fast, and wears the red riband and star of the pope's order of the Spur.  He is made for good society, polished, obliging, a libertine, without prejudices, fond of women, of good food, of high play, prudent and discreet.
 What is the service, sir?
 Your loyalty to me and your service to the regiment has pleased me very well -- and now there is another occasion on which you may make yourself useful to us; if you succeed, depend on it, your reward will be your discharge from the army, and a bounty of 100 guineas.
 The captain was the nephew and heir of the Minister of Police, Herr Galgenstein, a relationship which, no doubt, aided in the younger gentlemen's promotion.
 How do you do, sir?
 Good morning, Private James.  Please come in.  I should like you to meet my uncle, Herr Minister of Police Galgenstein.
 Neither!
 It's a lie!  You're a deserter! You're an impostor, sir; Your lies and folly have confirmed this to me. You pretend to carry dispatches to a general who has been dead these ten months; you have an uncle who is an ambassador and whose name you don't know.  Will you join and take the bounty, sir, or will you be given up?
 Sir, I'm a British officer.
 I have acted as I think fit.
 Upon my word, sir, I think you have acted very coolly.
 It was my joke.  I was tired, and did not care to go farther.  There's not prettier woman here than that. If she won't suit your fancy, my friend, then you must wait awhile.
 Where's the beauty you promised me?
 The people are great farmers, as well as inn-keepers.
 The place seems more a farm than an inn-yard.
 Ah!  You sly rogue, I see that will influence you.
 Do you want to see the loveliest woman in Europe?
 This may be a very good inn for Germany, but it would not pass in old Ireland.  Corbach is only a league off, let us push on for Corbach.
 This is a very good inn.  Shall we stop for dinner?
 Oh, yes, of course, Ambassador O'Grady...
 O'Grady.
 What is your uncle's name?
 My companion treated me with great civility, and asked me a thousand questions about England, which I answered as best I might.  But this best, I am bound to say, was bad enough.  I knew nothing about England, and I invented a thousand stories which I told him; described the king and the ministers to him, said the British ambassador in Berlin was my uncle, and promised my acquaintance a letter of recommendation to him.
 He has paid off your uncle's mortgage.  He gave Dorothy a coach- and-six.  That coward of a fellow has been making of your uncle's family.  Faith, the business was well done.  Your cousins, Michael and Harry, never let him out of their sight, though he was for deserting to England, until the marriage was completed, and the happy couple off on their road to Dublin.  Are you in want of cash, my boy?  You may draw upon me, for I got a couple of hundred out of Master Best for my share and, while they last, you shall never want.
 The coward!
 No, the very same one, my boy.  He recovered from his wound.  The ball you hit him with was not likely to hurt him.  It was only made of tow. Do you think the Dugans would let you kill fifteen hundred a-year out of the family?  The plan of the duel was all arranged in order to get you out of the way, for the cowardly Englishman could never be brought to marry from fear of you.  But hit him you certainly did, Roderick, and with a fine thick plugget of tow, and the fellow was so frightened that he was an hour in coming to. We told your mother the story afterwards, and a pretty scene she made.
 Mrs. John Best!  Was there another Mr. John Best?!
 She took on so at your going away that she was obliged to console herself with a husband.  She is now Mrs. John Best.
 Good heavens!  Whatever?  Has she died of grief?
 There's only six Miss Dugans now... poor Dorothy.
 Is Miss Dugan well?
 I see you are thinking of a certain young lady at Duganstown.
 We must write to her today, and you can tell her that you are safe and married to "Brown Bess."
 I suppose she addressed them to me in my real name, by which I never thought to ask for them at the post office.
 I had news of you in Dublin.  Faith, you've begun early, like your father's son, but I think you could not do better than as you have done. But why did you not write home to your poor mother?  She has sent half-a-dozen letters to you in Dublin.
 Grogan gave me a wink of recognition, but offered no public token of acquaintance and it was not until two days afterwards that he called me into his quarters, and then, shaking hands with me cordially, gave me news which I wanted, of my family.
 A man of honor dies, but never apologizes.  I'll see the captain hanged before I apologize.
 Look here, Roderick, my boy; this is silly business.  The girl will marry Best, mark my words; and as sure as she does, you'll forget her.  You are but a boy.  Best is willing to consider you as such.  Dublin's a fine place, and if you have a mind to take a ride thither and see the town for a month, here are twenty guineas at your service.  Make Best an apology, and be off.
 It must have been some other gate.
 Not against Castle Dugan gate, that has been off the hinges these ten years.
 But swords are today impossible; Captain Best is -- is lame.  He knocked his knee against the swinging park gate last night, as he was riding home, and can scarce move it now.
 I'll match any man with the sword.
 Oh, it's with pistols we fight.  You are no match for Best with the sword.
 I hope to spoil this sport, and trust to see this sword of mine in that big bully's body.
 I am Harry James' son, and will act as becomes my name and quality.
 And now you risk the same fate.  If you are killed, your mother is all alone in the world.
 It was with this sword that my late father, Harry James, God rest his soul, met Sir Huddelstone Fuddelstone, the Hampshire baronet, and was fatally run through the neck.  He was quite in the wrong, having insulted Lady Fuddelstone, when in liquor, at the Brentford Assembly.  But, like a gentleman, he scorned to apologize.
 That's a very handsome sword you have there.
 Your cousins go out with him.
 My mare is saddled and ready; who's the captain's second?
 The meeting is arranged.  Captain Best is waiting for you now.
 Have you taken my message to him?
 In faith, I believe you are not; for a lad I never saw more game in my life.  Give me a kiss, my dear boy. You're after my own soul.  As long as Jack Grogan lives, you shall never want a friend or a second.
 He'll give the better mark.  I am not afraid of him.
 Well, if it must be, it must.  For a young fellow, you are the most bloodthirsty I ever saw.  No officer, bearing His Majesty's commission, can receive a glass of wine on his nose, without resenting it -- fight you must, and Best is a huge, strong fellow.
 Mark this, come what will of it, I swear I will fight the man who pretends to the hand of Dorothy Dugan.  I'll follow him if it's into the church, and meet him there. I'll have his blood, or he shall have mine.  Will you take my message to him, and arrange the meeting?
 And this is the return you make for his kindness!  Didn't he harbor you in his house when your father died, and hasn't he given you and your mother, rent-free, your fine house of Jamesville yonder?
 And so I am.
 A pretty day's work of it you have made, Master Roderick.  Knowing your uncle to be distressed for money, and try and break off a match which will bring fifteen hundred a-year into the family?  Best has promised to pay off the four thousand pounds which is bothering your uncle so. He takes a girl without a penny -- a girl that has been flinging herself at the head of every man in these parts these ten years past, and missing them all, and a boy who ought to be attached to your uncle as to your father.
 Faith, I think you are a lad that's likely to keep your word.
 Dorothy might love me or not, as she likes, but Best will have to fight me before he marries her!
 The man that marries Dorothy Dugan must first kill me -- do you mind that?
 This is a pretty way to recommend yourself to the family.
 Tut, tut!  I can play at fencing as well as you, Mr. Roderick James. Ah!  You change color, do you?  Your secret is known, is it?  You come like a viper into the bosom of innocent families; you represent yourself as the heir to my friends the O'Higgins of Castle O'Higgins; I introduce you to the nobility and gentry of this methropolis; I take you to my tradesmen, who give you credit.  I accept your note for near two hundred pounds, and what do I find?  A fraud.
 Repeat the words again, and I run you through the body.
 You're an impostor, young man, a schemer, a deceiver!
 Sirrah!  Sirrah, I am as good a gentleman as any in Ireland!
 Whom have I been harboring in my house?  Who are you, sirrah?
 I have heard of them.
 Ah -- I see.  No, I'm afraid mine are the O'Higgins of Watertown.
 Oh, I am thinking of the O'Higgins of Redmondstown.  General O'Higgins was a close friend of my wife's dear father, Colonel Granby Somerset.
 Which O'Higgins do you know?  For I have never heard your name mentioned in my family.
 Mr. O'Higgins, we are in your debt, and rest assured, sir, you have friends in this house whenever you are in Dublin.  Mister O'Higgins, I wonder if I know your good father?
 I am only sorry that I was unable to prevent the villain from carrying off all her ladyship's money and pearls.
 Mr. O'Higgins, I cannot say how grateful I am for your timely assistance to my wife.
 I have said all there is to be said. I am at your disposal for whatever purposes you wish.  Good night.
 Your Grace, if I am so tame as to take this, then I must give up an honorable and lucrative occupation.
 Chevalier, if you will have your money now, you must fight for it. If you will be patient, maybe I will pay you something another time.
 Your Grace owes me seventy thousand frederics, which I have honorably won.
 I don't know.
 I deny your Grace's accusations, and beg you to say how you have been cheated?
 Chevalier, though I cannot say how, I believe you have cheated me.
 The gentleman has nothing contraband.
 I have no luggage.
 As you please.
 All Europe shall hear of this!
 Your honor must lower his voice.
 Ten thousand?  But the scoundrel owes me seventy thousand.
 I have orders to gag your honor if you cry out, and to give you this purse containing ten thousand frederics if you do not.
 It is shameful -- infamous!  I insist upon being put down at the Austrian ambassador's house.
 You are going to drive to the frontier.
 Good gracious!  What is this?
 I will let down the steps for your honor.
 Where is my rascal, Lazlo?
 Perfectly certain, because I shall make him tremble.
 Certain?
 I risk nothing, for I am certain to kill him.
 To risk one's life against such people is an imposition.
 It is distasteful to kill a scoundrel -- that should be work for a hangman.
 Sir, we have but eighty thousand florins in bank, or two hundred thousand at three months; if your highness' bags do not contain more than eight thousand, we will meet you.
 When the Duke of Courland brought fourteen lackeys each with bags of florins, and challenged our bank to play against the sealed bags, what did we ask?
 Then ordering fresh horses, the Chevalier set off on his journey for that capital.  I need not tell you that I was the Chevalier.
 Gentlemen, I wish you a good day. Will you please go to the house from whence we set out this morning, and tell my man there to send my baggage on to Three Kings at Dresden?
 But how, sir?
 Make your mind easy, you shall not be left behind, I warrant you.  Do take a last look at your barracks, make your mind easy, say a farewell to your friends in Berlin.  The dear souls, how they will weep when they hear you are out of the country, and, out of it, you shall go.
 But, if they send you away, then what is to become of me?
 I have faced that problem before.
 I believe they will deport you.
 Have no fear.  It will come out well for me.
 But they will prevent a meeting at whatever the cost.
 We will practice in the mornings, my boy, and I'll put you up to a thing or two worth knowing.
 I can play as soldiers do, but have no great skill.
 The cards are now my only livelihood.  Sometimes I am in luck, and then I lay out my money in these trinkets you see.  It's property, look you, and the only way I have found of keeping a little about me. When the luck goes against me, why, my dear, my diamonds go to the pawnbrokers and I wear paste.  Do you understand the cards?
 I'd give five years of my life to see the old country again, the greenfields, and the river, and the old round tower, and the burying place.
 And I think he was as much affected as I was at thus finding one of his kindred; for he, too, was an exile from home, and a friendly voice, a look, brought the old country back to his memory again, and the old days of his boyhood.
 Only the agency of servants.
 Who else can give me information about you?
 No one, sir.  Before that I served in the army but had to leave due to weakness of the loins.
 For whom else have you worked?
 Herr Seebach was a very kind employer.
 You come highly recommended by Herr Seebach.
 Yes, sir.
 Your name is Lazlo Zilagyi?
 Yes, sir.  Here is my letter.
 You are the young man who M. de Seebach recommended?
 Take to your legs, low Irish dog.
 That is a trifle strong.
 Very well; but a man who yields takes to his legs.
 On the instant.  Everyone must yield to such a nobleman as you.
 Then you yield to me.
 Very well!  Now that I know it, I will no longer love her.
 Perfectly so; and what is more, I will tell you that I love her, and that I am not of a humor to put up with rivals.
 Certainly, monseigneur, does not Your Excellency consider her worthy of love?
 I entered here, monsieur, at a bad moment for you; it seems that you love this lady.
 Old fool!
 Lady Cosgrove, you are an old fool.
 Roderick, you know well enough that I have never loved but you!  Was I ever so wretched that a kind word from you did not make me happy? Ever so angry, but the least offer of good-will on your part did not bring me to your side?  Did I not give a sufficient proof of my affection for you in bestowing one of the finest fortunes of England upon you?  Have I repined or rebuked you for the way you have wasted it? No, I loved you too much and too fondly; I have always loved you. From the first moment I saw you, I saw your bad qualities, and trembled at your violence; but I could not help loving you.  I married you, though I knew I was sealing my own fate in doing so, and in spite of reason and duty.  What sacrifice do you want from me?  I am ready to make any, so you will but love me, or, if not, that at least, you will gently us me.
 My Lady Cosgrove's relationship with me was a singular one.  Her life was passed in a series of crack-brained sort of alternation between love and hatred for me.  We would quarrel for a fortnight, then we should be friends for a month together sometimes.  One day, I was joking her, and asking her whether she would take the water again, whether she had found another lover, and so forth.  She suddenly burst out into tears, and, after a while, said to me:
 We then spent an hour in the most eloquent silence except that, from time to time, her ladyship cried out:  "Oh, my God.  Is it true -- I am not dreaming?"
 As soon as I saw you loved me, I was pleased, and I gave you every opportunity to fall more in love with me, being certain that, for my part, I would never love you.  But after our first kiss, I found that I had no power over myself.  I did not know that one kiss could matter so much.
 Let me give a thousand kisses to that heavenly mouth which has told me that I am happy.
 Without you, my dearest, I might have died without ever knowing love. Inexpressible love!  God of nature! Bitterness than which nothing is sweeter, sweetness than which nothing is more bitter.  Divine monster which can only be defined by paradoxes.
 O, my dearest love.  Enough!  I beg you.  Stop believing in your experience.  You have never known love.  My very soul is leaving me! Catch it on your lips, and give me yours!
 Shall I tell you something -- I believed what was called love came after the union -- and I was surprised when my husband, making me a woman, made me know it only by pain, unaccompanied by any pleasure. I saw that my imaginings had stood me in better stead.  And so we became only friends, seldom sleeping together and arousing no curiosity in each other, yet on good terms for a while, as whenever he wanted me, I was at his service, but since the offering was not seasoned with love, he found it tasteless, and seldom demanded it.
 Sir William Cosgrove is a man who is dying, and yet I envy him more than any man in Christendom.  He enjoys a privilege of which I am deprived. He may take you in his arms whenever he pleases, and no veil keeps his senses, his eyes, his soul from enjoying your beauty.
 My husband has convinced me of the contrary.
 Let us give each other complete happiness, and let us be sure that as many times as we satisfy our desires, they will each time be born anew.
 Our abstinence makes our love immortal.  If I loved you a quarter of an hour ago, now I should love you even more.  But I should love you less if you exhausted my joy by satisfying all my desires.
 I know better than you do.  Love wants a more substantial fare, and if it is stubbornly withheld, it withers away.
 Always, my dear one, never any further.  Love is a child to be pacified with trifles.  A full diet can only kill it.
 Will we always leave it at this?
 I ask only a payment on account today -- after that, you will find me undemanding, obedient and discreet.
 Poor man.  And, for that reason, you want to begin where people end?
 Yes -- but I am afraid of being deceived.
 You will do as you please.  It seems to me that such a matter can hardly be discussed until after people know each other.  Do you not agree?
 Then I will respectfully take leave of her.
 And if she does not choose to show you some kindness?
 With a woman who is completely charming, be she a princess or a woman of the lowest condition, and who, regardless of her rank, will show me some kindness, tonight.
 Be so good as to tell me with whom you think you are?
 But you deceive me nonetheless if I believe you, for it will not be in your power to love me when you love me no longer.
 Deceiving someone without knowing it is something new for me.  If I do not know it, I am innocent.
 The amusing thing is that you deceive me without knowing, if it is true that you love me.
 To love you until death.  To subscribe to all your commands.
 To make me wretched in two weeks.
 It is my only object.
 You want my heart?
 By loving you, with no hope of possessing you.
 How so?
 I believe you, and I see I must hasten to leave, for otherwise I shall become the unhappiest of men.
 A man may need to do that, and find it amusing; but a girl is bound by other laws.
 I agree; but God put us on earth to take that risk.
 It is only too possible.  Love requires a mutual harmony which is difficult, and it is even more difficult to make it last.
 That is true, but it seems to me impossible that you should be unhappy in love.
 But if, when I love, I am unhappy, I will know that my empty heart was my good fortune.
 It is nonetheless a misfortune, and you will know it when you love.
 Your word "empty" makes me laugh. Is it fortunate, or unfortunate?  If it is fortunate, I congratulate myself.  If it is unfortunate, I do not care, for I am not aware of it.
 Then you have never loved?  Your heart is empty.
 Many worthy of attention; but valuing is something more.  I could value only someone whom I loved.
 What!  You have not met a man worthy of your attention?
 That man has, perhaps, not yet been born.
 Have you not a man whom you value?
 Not one.
 How can I believe that there is not a man who has inspired desires in you?
 Not even that.
 But, for a time... a passing fancy?
 Never.
 Have you had one?
 No.
 Indeed, Miss Dorothy, I intend to have his blood as sure as my name's Roderick.
 Monster!  Your father was a tailor, and you are always thinking of the shop.  But I'll have my revenge, I will!  Roddy, will you see me insulted?
 Jump twenty feet!  You wouldn't dare to do any such thing on Daisy. There's the captain's horse, Black George, I've heard say that Captain Bes --
 Well, then, I'll tell you what I'd do.  I'd jump Daisy into the river, and swim you both across, where no enemy could follow us.
 What, with me on the pillion?  Would you kill poor me?
 I'd draw my sword, and cut my way through them.
 Suppose, now, Roderick, you, who are such a hero, was passing over the bridge and the enemy on the other side.
 But Captain Best is already known as a valiant soldier, and is famous as a man of fashion in London.  It is mighty well of you to fight farmers' boys, but to fight an Englishman is a very different matter.
 If ever I meet him again, you shall see which is the best man of the two.  I'll fight him with sword or with pistol, captain as he is.
 Oh!  I can dance with you any day, and to dance with your own cousin at a ball as if you could find no other partner.  Besides, Roderick, Captain Best's a man, and you are only a boy, and you haven't a guinea in the world.
 But you refused me, Dorothy.
 I don't care a fig for Captain Best; he dances prettily to be sure, and is a pleasant rattle of a man.  He looks well in his regimentals, too; and if he chose to ask me to dance, how could I refuse him?
 Were you obliged to dance five times with Captain Best, and then stroll out with him into the garden?
 I had not been in the room five minutes before I was engaged for every single set.
 I hate Miss Clancy, you know I do! And I only danced with her because -- because -- the person with whom I intended to dance chose to be engaged the whole night.
 With pleasure at finding the ribbon.
 Why are you shaking?
 Then you must get it.
 I feel the ribbon.
 Do you see the gate at the end of the field?  The first to touch it will be the winner.
 Agreed.
 I accept, but I insist on a wager. The loser must do whatever the winner pleases.
 All right, five hundred guineas.
 Last month, the Duke of Suffolk spent no more.
 It is entirely up to you.  I want the best.
 All the same, you must name an amount.
 Yes, for I wish to entertain splendidly.
 As much as possible?
 As much as possible.
 I am at your service, Mr. Cosgrove. How much do you wish to spend?
 Well, Mr. Cosgrove, I'll answer you point by point.  The King is exceedingly averse to make peers, as you know.  Your claim, as you call them, have been laid before him, and His Majesty's gracious reply was, that you were the most impudent man in his dominions, and merited a halter, rather than a coronet.  As for withdrawing your support from us, you are perfectly welcome to carry yourself whithersoever you please.  And, now, as I have a great deal of occupation, perhaps you will do me the favor to retire, or tell me if there is anything else in the world in which I can oblige you.
 Yes!
 Have you done, Mr. Cosgrove?
 Well, sir, this nobleman is one of the gentlemen of His Majesty's closet, and one with whom our revered monarch is on terms of considerable intimacy.  I should say you would be wise to fix upon this nobleman your chief reliance for the advancement of your claim to the Viscounty which you propose to get.
 By name only.
 Do you happen to know Gustavus Adolphus, the thirteenth Earl of Crabs?
 And, to be sure, I did know someone who knew precisely how these things were done, and this was the distinguished solicitor and former Government Minister, Lord West, whose acquaintance I made, as I had so many others, at the gaming table.
 What is to be done?
 Then this must be done tomorrow.
 When is he to go?
 The King has determined to send the Chevalier out of the country.
 The Prince left him only that choice.
 A meeting with the Prince of Turbingen is impossible.
 Hmm-mmmm.
 In so far as I can tell these things -- no.  I believe the Chevalier won the money fairly.
 Was he cheated?
 Yes, Minister, I am interested in any work in which I can be of service to Captain Galgenstein.
 Does this assignment interest you?
 You must be very cautious with regard to the company you should meet in Dublin, where rogues and adventurers of all countries abound. I hope you will do me the honor of accepting lodgings in my own house, where Captain O'Reilly will welcome with delight, my gallant young preserver.
 How different was her lively rattle to the vulgar wenches at Kilwangan assemblies.  In every sentence, she mentioned a lord or a person of quality.  To the lady's question about my birth and parentage, I replied that I was a young gentleman of large fortune, that I was going to Dublin for my studies, and that my mother allowed me five hundred per annum.
 That's very kind of you, Mr. O'Higgins.
 As you have been robbed of your purse, may I have permission to lend your ladyship a couple of pieces to pay any expenses which you might incur before reaching your home?
 O'Higgins... Mohawk O'Higgins.
 But I shouldn't like to put you to such trouble, Mister...?
 I am riding to Dublin myself, and if your ladyship will allow me the honor of riding with you, I shall do my best to protect you from further mishap.
 That fool didn't know what was the meaning of a hundred-pound bill, which was in the pocket-book that the fellow took from me.
 Everything -- my purse, containing upwards of a hundred guineas, my jewels, my snuff-boxes, watches. And all because this blundering coward fell to his knees...
 Be off to your work, you pack of rascals, or you will have a good taste of my thong.  Have you lost much?
 Oh, I am grateful to you, sir.  I am the wife of Captain O'Reilly hastening to join him at Dublin.  My chair was stopped by a highwayman; this great oaf of a servant-man fell down on his knees, armed as he was, and though there were thirty people in the next field, working, when the ruffian attacked, not one of them would help but, on the contrary, wished him "good luck."
 What has happened, madam, to annoy your ladyship?
 When I asked them in what form they would accept her ladyship's assurances, they said that they were only prepared to accept them if her ladyship confirms her written consent by word of mouth, in their presence, at their counting-house in Birchin Lane, London.  I requested they come here, and save her ladyship and yourself the inconvenience of the trip to London, but they declined, saying that they did not wish to incur the risk of a visit to Castle Hackton to negotiate, as they were aware of how other respectable parties, such as Messrs. Sharp and Salomon had been treated here.
 I see.
 Mister Bracegirdle said to me that he had heard her ladyship lives in some fear of her life, and meditated a separation, in which case, she might later repudiate any documents signed by herself while in durance, and subject them, at any rate, to a doubtful and expensive litigation. They were quite insistent on this point, and said they must have absolute assurance of her ladyship's perfect freewill in the transaction before they would advance a shilling of their capital.
 Yes, of course.
 May I be quite frank with you?
 Provided that they can be assured of her ladyship's freewill?  Are you serious?
 There are a few other points we should discuss.  The loan agreement can only be executed by her ladyship's signature, and provided that Bracegirdle and Chatwick can be assured of her ladyship's freewill in giving her signature.
 I am prepared to accept the terms, Mr. Newcombe.
 Considering your financial circumstances, Mr. Cosgrove, it has been impossible to find anyone at all prepared to do any business with you.  I think you may count yourself lucky to have this opportunity. But, obviously, if you would reject this offer, I shall keep trying to find a better one.
 Mr. Newcombe, I have made some difficult loans during the past few years, at very onerous terms, but 18% a year interest seems very stiff indeed.
 I have good news for you, Mr. Cosgrove.  The firm of Bracegirdle and Chatwick, in the city of London, are prepared to lend you 20,000 pounds, pledged against your interest in the Edric mines.  They will redeem the encumbrances against the property, which amount to some 10,000 pounds, and take a twenty- year working lease on the mines. They will lend you the 20,000 pounds against the lease income, which they will apply to the loan as it comes in, and they will make a charge of 18% per annum interest on the outstanding loan balance.
 Brooksy was better than you, papa, he used not to swear so, and he taught me many good things while you were away.
 Yes, he's fine.
 Is he all right, papa?
 Your bother is in America fighting the rebels.
 Yes, papa.
 I promise your lordship a good flogging if you even so much as go to Doolan's farm to see him.
 What the devil?  What kind of fools do we have here?  Pottle, who told the lad this story?
 One of the boys in the stable told Nelly that you've already bought my horse, and that it's at Doolan's farm, where Mick the groom is breaking it in.  Is that true, papa?
 Yes?
 Papa?
 Good night, my little darling.
 Good night, papa.
 Well, we'll just have to wait and see, won't we?
 But I will have it on my birthday, won't I?
 Now, just have a little patience, my boy.  Your birthday isn't until next week.
 Did you buy the horse, papa?
 I am sorry for you Mr. James.  I'm grieved to keep you or any gentleman waiting.  Had you not better to arrange with my doctor or get the cook to flavor my omelette with arsenic?  What are the odds, gentlemen, that I don't live to see Mr. James hang yet?
 Sir, let those laugh that win.
 Not so soon, my dear, as you may fancy perhaps.  Why, man, I have been given over many times these four years, and there was always a candidate or two waiting to apply for the situation.  Who knows how long I may keep you waiting.
 I hope that you are not thinking of leaving us soon, knight?
 Is it not a pleasure, gentlemen, for me, as I am drawing near the goal, to find my home such a happy one; my wife so fond of me, that she is even now thinking of appointing a successor?  Isn't it a comfort to see her; like a prudent housewife, getting everything ready for her husband's departure?
 Well, if my intentions are what you think they are -- if I do wish to step into your shoes, what then?  I have no other intentions than you had yourself.  Lady Cosgrove's wealth may be great, but am I not of a generous nature enough to use it worthily?  Her rank is lofty, but not so lofty as my ambition.  I will be sworn to muster just as much regard for my Lady Cosgrove as you ever showed her; and if I win her, and wear her when you are dead and gone, corbleu, knight, do you think that it will be the fear of your ghost will deter me?
 He wants to step into my shoes!  He wants to step into my shoes!
 Faith, sir, if I want to learn good principles, it's surely better I should apply for them to your lady, and your chaplin than to you?
 Gentlemen, see this amiable youth! He has been troubled by religious scruples, and has flown for refuge to my chaplin, Mr. Hunt, who has asked for advise from my wife, Lady Cosgrove, and between them both, they are confirming my ingenious young friend in his faith.  Did you ever hear of such doctors and such a disciple?
 I think, Sir William Cosgrove, you have had too much drink.  Your chaplin, Mr. Hunt, has introduced me into the company of your lady to advise me on a religious matter, of which she is a considerable expert.
 Come, come, sir.  I am a man who would rather be known as a cuckold than a fool.
 I beg your pardon?
 Good evening, Mr. James, have you done with my lady?
 Sir William Cosgrove, with his complication of ills, was dying before us by inches.  He was continually tinkered up by doctors, and, what with my usual luck, he might be restored to health and live I don't know how many years.  If Cosgrove would not die, where was the use of my pursing his lady?  But my fears were to prove groundless, for on that very night, patient nature would claim her account.
 Well, why not a milkmaid's daughter? No man of sense need restrict himself or deny himself a single amusement for his wife's sake; on the contrary, if he selects the animal properly, he will choose such a one as shall be no bar to his pleasure, but a comfort in his hours of annoyance.  For instance, I have got the gout; who tends me?  A hired valet who robs me whenever he has the power.  My wife never comes near me.  What friend have I?  None in the wide world.  Men of the world, as you and I are, don't make friends, and we are fools for our pains.
 The milkmaid's daughter?
 In truth, sir, yes, but, if you must marry, then marry a virtuous drudge.
 Would you have me spend my life all alone?
 Indeed, you are right, sir.  Look at me.  Marriage has added forty years to my life.  I am dying, a worn-out cripple, at the age of fifty.  When I took off Lady Cosgrove, there was no man of my years who looked so young as myself.  Fool that I was! I had enough with my pensions, perfect freedom, the best society in Europe -- and I gave up all these, and married and was miserable.  Take a warning from me, Mr. Roderick, and stick to the trumps.  Do anything, but marry.
 Hang it, Mr. Roderick James, you have no more manners than a barber, and I think my black footman has been better educated than you; but you are a young fellow of originality and pluck, and I like you, sir.  because you seem determined to go to the devil by a way of your own.
 I made Sir William Cosgrove's acquaintance as usual at the play- table.  One could not but admire the spirit and gallantry with which he pursued his favorite pastime; for, though worn out with gout and a myriad of diseases, a cripple wheeled about in a chair, and suffering pangs of agony, yet you would see him every morning, and every evening at his post behind the delightful green cloth.
 Tender Hegenheim.
 He will believe that it will please me if he asks about it, and I shall tell him everything except some circumstances which might humiliate him.
 Will he wish to know the details of this night?
 He loves me, as I love you.
 If his love were like mine, he would not permit you to come here.
 He is only curious to know who you are.
 And he doesn't care about me?
 Yes.  He brought me in his carriage, and he will call for me at midnight.
 Do you expect me to believe that your lover brought you here tonight?
 Dark Valdez.
 Black-eyed Sczortarska.
 Charming Schuvaloff.
 Old friend. Haven't talked to him in -- 911. Can I use your phone?
 Who?
 Bill Styles...
 Yeah, and I could've used the sleep. I'm supposed to meet people here tonight, try and get some work going.
 Hurricane kept you up, too?
 Don't you mean "don't need no liquor license not taken away from me"?
 You know the law -- no liquor before noon. Could lose my license.
 Yeah, if you've slept.
 It's ten thirty in the morning.
 Can I at least have a drink?
 You know that was like a quadruple negative?
 Don't like 'em, don't eat 'em, don't make no damn difference to me.
 None of that matters now. We got two dead bodies and a story that explains them. You're either with us, or against us -- which is it?
 You framed-him...
 Maybe he's dead too. Maybe you killed them both, Mueller --
 He is the only one unaccounted for.
 Maybe he'll be there. Either way, we have to go.
 What about Pike?
 It was the grenade you fucking idiot. Look at him!
 Did -- did you --
 Fine.
 I don't want to go --
 Whoever it is isn't shooting at us...
 What do we do?
 Fuck, what the fuck is going on --
 Just safety your shit and get behind me, okay? I'll take care of this.
 I thought I was gonna have an attack. Go into a fit and bite off my own tongue in the middle of the bayou. Childs could tell I wasn't right.
 A target, Kendall, cap a fucking target. What's wrong with you?
 I'm -- I'm sorry...
 Don't you ever point a gun at me!
 Shut up, Mueller.
 West was one thing, but this --
 HEY!
 Shut the fuck up, you fucking faggot, You just shut the FUCK UP.
 I don't know!
 Before or after the explosion?  Mueller --
 We got -- I don't know, we got separated
 We found him like this! Kendall was with me the whole -- Listen to me!
 You killed him you fucking faggot --
 We found him like this --
 Hey, I --  Holy fuck... holy fuck, what the fuck did you guys do?
 Can anybody hear me!
 This isn't our area. Whose area is this --
 We can still come out of this okay. Pike got free, he got a gun, he came after us. That's the story.
 You too?
 Shut up.  West's dead.
 Yeah, right...
 We found him like this...
 Holy fuck... Holy fuck, what the fuck did you guys do?
 What do you mean, alone?
 What about you, wandering around alone? At least we have an alibi --
 We don't know. West is dead.
 We finished the course and came here, then heard an explosion --  Where's Pike?
 He's telling the truth up to a point...
 Washout rejects, guys he said were "dumbfucks too stupid to know they dead"...
 I promised them I'd ask you where West and the others are...
 You won't find them. Won't find West, either. He's too good.
 And the bodies?
 I guess Nunez wasn't dead after all. He came after us with a vengeance.  You know the rest.
 Hunting -- we had to hunt him --
 Do what?
 He -- He made me do it --
 Jesus!
 Not true, Cadet, I've got a gun --
 We've found all of them.
 Oh, you don't? What else do you have on me? You haven't found any bodies yet, have you?
 We don't need the tapes --
 You wanna bet?
 We're not finished yet --
 Mr. Hardy, I joined the army for college money. I didn't ask for any of this -- I tried to do the right thing out there and people got killed. You say finding those bodies'll help me, then go find them. I don't want to die.
 Raymond, for you to have any chance of coming out of this, we need to locate the other bodies and examine them to corroborate your testimony. Otherwise this is just another story --
 But not Pike's.
 You saved Kendall's life --
 They would have killed us both. You want me to write a confession, I'll write a confession.
 You shot Childs and Nunez.
 Yeah --
 And he'd been shot.
 Of course --
 You saw West's body.
 I apologize --
 Yeah, we know, Pike did.
 I didn't shoot West --
 So Childs made some side money, so what? People are dead, Ray, and the only one we have to blame is you --
 Did Kendall tell you about the PX?
 Fuck "you're serious", Raymond, you got exactly zero truck with us; right now we'd take the word of a crackhead over yours, so if you've got something to say, say it.
 I'm serious --
 Well, why didn't you say so? We'll just drop all your charges, then --
 He's lying.
 That'd be my reaction too --
 That son of a bitch.
 Hey, Ray! Just had a nice talk with your buddy Kendall -- seems you killed three people!
 No, actually, I just left mine in the car and was hoping you had some.
 This is one of those interrogation tricks, isn't it? You don't give me a cigarette till I tell you more.
 You smoke, Ray?
 Yeah. And that's all I'm saying.
 And those were the guys who went on the exercise with you?
 Tell me about them.
 Some.
 Okay... but I would like to know about the other cadets. What they were like -- nice guys?
 I'm not telling you what happened.
 Why'd you ask for a cop, Ray?
 Okay.
 Right. Now, I'm gonna go get you another donut and you think about whether you want to talk more, okay?
 They're dead, aren't they?
 There's no need...
 Fifteen years ago under Sergeant West. Piece of work, that guy. I remember, he used to have these two silver .45's with ivory handles and if you weren't quick enough, he'd knock you on the head with one of them. He still carry those guns?
 You did Basic here?
 C'mon, Ray, everyone hates the Army during Basic. I'll tell you straight, I hated it here.
 I don't know... I like the Army.
 What do you like then?
 I just don't like it.
 Well, it's a game of anticipation, that's the beauty.
 It's... too slow.
 You're under military arrest, it's not gonna happen. What's wrong with baseball?
 I asked for a policeman.
 Why not?
 Just a guess. Maybe they're not where they're supposed to be. Maybe somebody moved them. Habeas Corpus -- no bodies, no crime, and Nunez still plays as self defense. Face it detectives... you have nothing.
 How do you know that?
 Ohhhh, I don't think so...
 Did I ever claim I was Raymond Dunbar? Was I ever told to state my name rank and serial number for the record? No. You assumed who I was, because I was wearing this uniform. Don't believe me?
 We can prove that you're not Ray Dunbar. Impersonating a fellow Cadet is a court-martial in and of itself --
 Is that what I did, now? And of course, you can prove all of it.
 Can't do that now, though, can you?
 You kept Kendall alive to corroborate your story and he did it all they way up to the end. You even gave him his own motive in case we decided to burn him, too.
 Don't know on a map. West told us it was there, we just found it. Maybe the hurricane took it away.
 Where's the cabin?
 Would you have believed me?
 Why didn't you tell us all this in the first place?
 Yeah.
 Mueller was alone in the cabin?
 Back up.
 One went off, yeah, but it didn't touch him -- I thought you knew this --
 What about the phosphorous grenade?
 The creek bed --
 Where?
 Pills, shots, you name it, Basic's a lot easier when you don't feel pain --
 What business?
 No, did he tell you about it? About the business Childs ran?
 He said he worked there --
 Yeah. Spent half his time in the infirmary. Only reason he enlisted was his father. West didn't section him till last week.
 Epilepsy.
 He was sickly. Had that shaking thing, whatd'yacall it, epoxy?
 There were six of us...
 Tell us about the other guys, the ones West weeded out.
 That first night with Pike. I made the mistake of letting him sit down at around 0300.
 No, ma'am, he just wanted us to quit. Making it through was kind of an honor. Some of the other guys on the base told us that if you could hack Section Eight, Command would consider you at the top of the class.
 Are you saying Sergeant West tried to kill you?
 Your weapons, Sergeant.
 What the fuck is going on?
 The rest of you, fallout for physicals!
 Sir, yes, sir!
 Dunbar you are to stand here and guard this nigger for the next twenty- four hours! He is not to be given food, water, or clothes! If he so much as moves, you are to blow his nigger brains out, is that clear?
 Sir, yes, sir!
 You know how to work a pistol, Dunbar?
 Sir, Dunbar, sir!
 Cadet, what's your name!
 I...
 So you killed him?
 So did we. Why didn't you come?
 Pike and I got separated... then I heard gunfire. Close.
 West... he's dead.
 Jesus, what happened?
 We were each given three so whoever killed West will be missing one.
 Why?
 Shut up.  Let me see your grenades.
 I hated West, Childs hated West, everyone with a goddamn brain hated West but that doesn't mean we killed him!
 Oh, bullshit, he's a fucking convict. You know how much he hated West --
 He wouldn't kill anybody...
 Put it down!
 A test will no doubt link you to the killing --
 We wait and I'm a dead man. I got a black face, a criminal record, and over a hundred other cadets who'll testify how much I hated West -- my court martial will take six minutes. It's either me or them, Ray, and you gotta decide right now.
 No... no, we can just wait till we get back and then tell the M.P.'s --
 There's no time to think, Ray, we gotta get out of here! You untie me, we grab the guns, get Kendall and Nunez, and make a run for it --
 This is a lot of information to be getting... I have to think --
 What don't you know?
 I... I don't know...
 Mueller and Childs. One of them must've taken the grenade from my pack on the chopper...
 They?
 Way I figure it, West must have found out about their little business and was gonna bust them, so they decided to get rid of him first...
 That's close range. You go full auto on a guy from close range, you're gonna be swimming in blood. Look at my uniform. Nothing.
 His chest was hamburger --
 From up close or far away?
 Full clip to the body --
 You saw West, right? How was he killed?
 That still doesn't mean you didn't kill him.
 Becoming a morphine addict during Basic ain't exactly something you want to broadcast. Only Mueller and Childs know.
 Why... why didn't you tell me?
 Pull up my sleeve. Right arm.
 You're lying --
 Combat grade morphine. Mueller sold it to me.
 Just look. Little pocket.
 Why?
 Look in my pack.
 Bullshit.
 Enough to go to prison? Childs' PX scam, Mueller was in on it --
 You hated West, Mueller loved him --
 Who you gonna trust, Ray? Him or your friend?
 That's exactly what he says about you.
 We're sweeping our area and suddenly he's gone. Couple minutes later, phosphorous grenade pops off about a third of a click away --
 Oh, come on --
 Mueller.
 If not you, then who?
 Ray, this is my life here. I ain't gonna pretend I'm not happy West is gone, but you know I couldn't have done this. It's not in me.
 Which anyone coulda taken out of my gear on the chopper. Were you watching your pack on the ride in?
 You're the only one missing a grenade.
 Maybe, but that don't make me a killer --
 You hated West more than any of us.
 You gotta untie me.  I didn't do this thing, Ray.
 Yeah...
 Right?
 Do I?
 You know it's not like that --
 Why?
 We just want to check your pack --
 Roberto, what the fuck?
 Wandering through a hurricane trying to find this place. It's gettin' bad out there --  Where's West?
 Where have you been, Jay?
 I mean I killed him.  Isn't that what we all wanted?
 What do you mean, West's?
 West's. Any kindling for afire?
 Whose blood is that, Jay?
 Maybe he...
 MAYBE WHAT --
 Maybe --
 Where are they!
 I don't know --
 You lied to us, Levi, you're going to the gas chamber unless you tell us where to find them!
 But you can't prove it! You can't prove anything until we find the bodies!
 I didn't --
 Or you, Levi? When is it finally going to come out that you were the one who killed him?
 Because I was standing next to him.
 How do you know?
 Because of what I saw.  Who really killed West.
 Why?
 I didn't do anything --
 Jail if he's lucky, the gas chamber if he's not --
 I was just thinking of what's going to happen to your careers when my father gets through with you.
 Something funny, Levi?
 Then we'll leave it up to the courts -- His word against mine. What does his father do again? Steelworker?  Doesn't matter, I'm sure justice will be served. In any case, my father will definitely want to talk to you about all these questions, these accusations on his son. He's quite protective.
 Dunbar will testify that you were.
 Sorry to disappoint. I'm on painkillers for the injury -- they cloud the mind. You're right, it was Nunez. Any more questions?
 Well?
 I believe your next line is "What are you trying to hide?"
 Huh. You know, I really thought you said Nunez. I thought you said "Dunbar was gone," My fault, I gotta check the tape on that.  Oh, yeah we taped the last interview. This one too. Cause it'd be a real break for us to catch you in a lie.
 No. I said Dunbar.
 Dunbar was running out the door? Ohhhhhh... See that's where I was confused, because I thought you said Nunez was running out the door.
 So I should stay silent about his misdeeds? The guns went off, I ran in, Childs shot me, Pike and Mueller were dead, and Dunbar was running out the door with the smoking gun --
 Why did you tell us he shot everybody, Levi? You put him in for three murders, the man saved your life --
 There's that word again.  As I told you, I wasn't in the room when everyone started shooting.
 Is it the truth?
 My heart weeps.
 Epileptic attacks are murder on your system. Rattle your internal organs like a paint mixer.
 Can I go to jail for punching a guy who's been shot?
 How many murders did you cover up? One? Five? Maybe an even ten.
 You tried to pin three stone murders on Dunbar --
 Stop.
 Somebody emptied a full clip into him --
 Mr. Hardy?
 Okay. I think that's it. He rises and walks to the door.
 I honestly don't know. Maybe to have someone to cover for him. And I wish I could, but there's no doubt in my mind he killed those men.
 Why did he come back for you?
 Right in front of us. Mueller went after him but we held him back.
 He admitted it.
 No. Poetic justice, though.
 But you didn't.
 Maybe I shouldn't tell you that. Maybe I should tell you I wasn't scared at all. But I was...  Enough to almost kill him.
 Then who did?
 I didn't kill him --
 What happened to "degrees"?
 You said you wanted to know what happened -- I'm telling you the truth.
 Levi, I don't know if you're familiar with investigative work, but we have this little thing called "motive" and you just gave yourself one.
 The Sergeant discovered this relationship and wanted me expelled. My father interceded, so instead, West Sectioned me and made sure every other cadet knew that I was gay.
 I think you just blew "Don't Ask, Don't Tell" out of the fucking water.
 He is not, shall we say, wild about the idea. He has asked me on numerous occasions to be more discreet about my proclivities, and I have done my best to oblige him. However, in the last four weeks, I began a relationship with another cadet. What do you think of that?
 Senator Daddy must be thrilled.
 My father is a powerful man. Over the years he's used that power to protect me, in one form or another, from certain... unpleasantries.  I am a homosexual.
 My, my, my, how did things turn so hostile so quickly? If I didn't know better, I'd say you two were out to get me.
 But not the only victim, right?
 I've done nothing wrong.  I'm the victim here.
 Levi, you got about four hours before armed men show up here, put you on a plane to Washington, and lock you in a very small dark room. I suggest you talk to us.
 That's it. You're that policeman with friends in low places. Tell me, how's Guissepe Torres doing these days? Those racketeering indictments must have really been a downer --
 Coast Guard, special detective detail. We feel this incident may have put the beaches of Florida at risk.
 You... I've seen you around the Base. But you...  You're not Army, are you?
 Get your hands away from the desk!
 For the last time, I have no idea what you're talking about --
 You can't duck this, Bill. I may have done every goddamn thing in my life wrong but I won't let this happen.
 You're crazy --
 No more witnesses. West's a ghost. But it doesn't matter because we have your signature, the hospital log, and Kendall's toxicology report. And that'll be enough.
 Not for long.
 You want to get into a finger pointing contest about character? The army kicked you out for drugs, the cops fired you for taking bribes from a mobster, and you think you can stand there and lecture me on codes of conduct? There's only one criminal standing in this room and it's you.
 No! You will stand there and you will listen! What happened to you, Bill? You were the one who joined up to do good in the world. You were the one who believed in it --
 I'm not even going to dignify that --
 You poisoned him, Bill. You heard our interrogation, you knew he was ready to crack, so you killed him, just like Pike.
 I wanted to see if he was okay --
 Toxicology report came back. Kendall's attack was caused by a drug known as anephadrine, maybe you've heard of it. It's for asthmatics. If an epileptic takes enough, it kills them. I checked with the nurses at the hospital -- you're the only other person who visited Kendall.
 That's preposterous --
 What I can't understand is why you signed these. If you'd just let West take care of the paperwork, no one would have known, but you got careless. So when Pike finally told the truth you had to get rid of him, too.
 West had a partner. Someone who knew how to get things done.
 Or what? You've gone round the bend --
 Stay where you are.
 I'm not going to cover for you, Bill. Not for this.
 You're drunk --
 If you let him testify then it would have all come out. West was supposed to take care of it out there, shut Nunez up and then disappear. But it got messy and people got killed. So you called your old pal Tom Hardy, figuring if worse came to worse, he'd cover for you.
 What are you talking about?
 It was so good, I actually forgot you're one of the bigger dogs now. The Base Commander. The one in control. You couldn't let him testify, could you?
 I thought you said that wasn't a compliment.
 You're a good soldier, Bill.
 Don't be. I'm not cut out to deal with the West's of the world.
 I'm sorry, Bill.
 The Senator...
 They're taking your command, aren't they?
 I wouldn't know where to start.  I guess it was about one man framing another. He thought if the other guy got blamed, people would over look his own wrong doings.
 You think you could explain all this to me?
 Maybe. But it's my fault and I'll carry it.
 That's horseshit and you know it.
 It's over. Time of death was 4:42. JAG's been notified and I called the Senator myself. My report will reflect that his medical condition made this unavoidable... you two had no culpability in the matter.
 Does Osborne agree?
 Yeah.
 Was dead right. You think Dunbar's on the level?
 What I said before --
 I'm talking about West! We had him, Bill, we were there. You're the fucking Base Commander, you knew what he did to Cadets and you let him go on the way he always he has --
 What the hell are you talking about --
 You want a confession? Why don't you confess, Bill: people are dead and you don't give a shit about it! Only reason you called me is to protect your fucking job, you know this is your fault --
 What about the confession?
 Home, I'm done.
 Tom, where are you going --
 JAG gets here in three hours. Try for the confession.
 You mean not enough to save you.
 Not for me.
 Nevertheless what'? Kendall will testify and that'll be enough.
 Nevertheless --
 From Dunbar? I hate to break this to you, but I don't think he's gonna be all that psyched to put himself in for the death penalty.
 Without the body we have no physical proof. We need a confession.
 Okay, then let's widen the search to include the endzone in Giants Stadium and the trunk of my car --
 Habeas Corpus -- you have to have a body to have a crime.
 There was a hurricane, Bill, the wind probably moved it.
 We've already been over the terrain twice. Nothing.
 Someone must have got a shot off. He wasn't exactly a moving target.
 Who killed Pike?
 Pike killed West, Dunbar killed Mueller, Childs, and Nunez.
 He can wait. Kendall's out of surgery.
 He's not done by a longshot, I can get more out of him --
 I'm not gonna let that happen.
 Tom, bottom line: I let those kids go out there. If JAG shows up and I don't have any answers for them, my career is finished --
 And I'm the closest thing to it, right?
 The guy in interrogation said he'd only talk to a cop.
 Which gives us about five hours. Why'd you call me?
 Cadet Roberto R. Nunez. Killed right in front of me.
 I'm assuming that's what made him the dead one?
 No, the problem is one's dead, one's got a bullet in his arm, and one won't talk. The one who won't talk was trading live fire with the dead one as we reached the pick-up.
 And the problem is you only got three.
 The exercise was one of his Section Eight "private sessions". Left around 2100 yesterday and were scheduled for pick up at 0630 this morning.
 Well, he's a good soldier.
 A few years ago, the Army picked our good buddy as their go to non-com to trot out to the press to talk about the kinder, gentler military. He even did the standard video greeting played to all incoming Basic cadets across the country.
 It's not West, is it? Tell me it's not West.
 The official term for it is "Clusterfuck". By the time Beth hit us, I'd canceled all off base exercises save one -- a six man cadet team and their Drill out in the bush. We're missing three and the Sergeant. The cadets are in their eighth week of the cycle, nobody here knows much about them, up to and including their names. But the Sergeant...
 And here you are going out of house. How's that make you feel, Jules?
 This is Warrant Officer Julia Osborne, the closest thing we have to an in- house investigator.
 Tell me what I can do.
 Would I have called you if it wasn't? If there was any other way --
 That bad?
 What kind of trouble are you in?
 Been better.  I read about what's been happening with you... I should have called --
 How are you?
 Yeah. But he was a lot of other things, too. Thanks.
 He was your friend.
 In case you need me to testify about the shooting. They'll clear you.
 Your phone number?
 Yeah.
 I should probably write that down.
 A word of advice about women -- that first hour or so after they kill their boss? Probably not the best time to hit on them.
 Want company?
 Nah.
 Think it'll work?
 Go home, get drunk, and try and forget this ever happened.
 Leaving without saying goodbye. What are you gonna do?
 What are you doing out here?
 Yeah. I can wait till you're off the base and do it myself.
 Do I have a choice in this?
 Nobody saw. But I don't think so.
 West?
 Far as I'm concerned, whatever you did in the past can stay in the past.
 Really.
 You're a good man, Hardy.
 There are degrees of truth, officer. Always degrees.
 That's not true.
 Tough.
 What if I don't want it?
 This is the perfect time. You know what makes a good detective? The number of confessions they get. You're a good detective, Osborne. So now you get mine.
 This isn't the time --
 Seven guys. What was it you said? You were "just starting to believe I wasn't the guy people said".
 What?
 Seven.
 We need to talk --
 No death certificates. No crime.
 No bodies, no West...
 WHERE'S WEST'S BODY?
 Hardy, for Chrissakes --
 We can tie you to the chair if it'll work better for you --
 Isn't this how your story goes?
 Hardy, what are you doing --
 Right back where we started.
 We got maybe three minutes till they break it down.
 Get in.
 Four --
 Good, just making sure.
 No.
 Maybe... Maybe we were nowhere near. Sometimes mysteries stay mysteries.  I haven't by any chance grown on you, have I?
 We were close to something with Kendall.
 That's gonna stay my secret.
 For what?
 It dawned on me one day that we were supposed to be a nation founded on the principle of questioning authority... and all I did here was follow orders. It didn't add up. Plus, I got kicked out.
 You know, you never told me why you left the army.
 Nah.
 Think it'll work?
 Now I go home, get drunk, and try and forget this ever happened.
 So what now?
 So did I.
 Yeah.
 You wanted to break him.
 You mean the falsely accused?
 No, I didn't. I wanted to humiliate him. For what he did to Dunbar. For fucking over the little guy.
 You wanted to get the truth.
 Yeah, I could've. Should've.
 You couldn't have known --
 I pushed him too hard.
 See, I just take your gun to the morgue and fire it into one of their skulls; then I call every newspaper in the country with the story about how Senator Kendall's gay son went nuts on a training mission --
 That's a fantastic idea --
 Good idea.
 Why don't you talk to Levi off the record for a second?
 Positive. Hardy, they planned this.
 Are you sure?
 What Kendall said -- "the type of guys you don't feel comfortable going to sleep around." That's what Dunbar said about Childs to the letter.
 What?
 They got their stories straight.
 We're fucked, I know --
 Let's go talk to Bill...
 Little bit.
 That bugs you too?
 So why, after Dunbar drags Kendall out from under a house, does the Senator's son try and get us to put his savior in the gas chamber?
 And all hell breaks loose. A lot of Good guys shoot a lot of bad guys and whiz, bang, zoom, happy ending.
 Buttfucks the cabin?
 Kendall maybe would have agreed, but the hurricane buttfucks the cabin --
 So it's a good plan but it goes wrong; Mueller flips out and shoots their fall guy, which means they have to bring Dunbar and Kendall into the cover story --
 And if they're asked, that's what they'll tell the, world.
 They believe the innocent are guilty and the guilty are innocent.
 Exactly, someone who's not involved, who's word can't be questioned. You only let them see what you want them to see, you make them believe, so when the time comes, they've totally bought into your version of events.
 Dunbar.
 And they're smart about it. They know when you commit a crime you know is going to be investigated, you need a fall guy and for that to work, you have to have a witness.
 Talk it through: Childs, Mueller, and Nunez know they're going out on the regular Tuesday Night drill, hurricane or no hurricane, so they plan it: Kill West, pin it on Pike.
 What happened next?
 At least you and Kendall agree on that.
 Dunbar... He said he didn't shoot West. West wasn't shot, Kendall said he was blown apart by a phosphorous grenade and Dunbar never saw the body.
 What?
 I didn't shoot West...
 Because it's my job. Because people are dead. Because of the whole honor and duty thing, make a difference in the world, crap like that.  We can do this, Hardy.
 Why do you care?
 But you will.
 Oh, spare me the reverse psychology bullshit! This isn't my "great second chance", Osborne. Everyone thinks I'm a piece of shit cop who took money and nothing is going to change that. Nobody will ever know what happens here --
 I was starting to believe you, you know? That you weren't who everyone said. I guess I was wrong --
 Phenomenal at taking bribes, right?
 You did more than try. You cracked Dunbar in less than three minutes, as an investigator you're phenomenal --
 West was a monster! Fifteen years ago, I was here, I was Section Eight, I was Pike. Fuck being the knife dummy -- that thing he did, stripping Pike down, making him stand outside all night? He did that every year, he did that to me. Fifteen years ago, I wanted him dead, and now I'm supposed to care that somebody offed him? Sorry, no can do. I tried.
 You said you owed Styles and now you're gonna turn your back on him?
 Watch me.
 Goddammit, Hardy, you can't just leave --
 You knew what he was capable of and you just stood by. It was just a matter of time till somebody fragged his ass, and you know what? He deserved it. There's your confession.
 Styles couldn't reassign him, he's a legend --
 I don't know.
 Why the fuck wasn't he in restraints?
 Well, I'm sure if he'd known this was all going to happen he'd have tried harder to witness it for you --
 Look, all we've got is what Kendall says, and he didn't actually witness any deaths except Nunez. He found West, he saw Mueller and Pike, but just their bodies -- he didn't see any crime committed.
 Everyone's capable of murder, Osborne.
 I just... He came back for Kendall. I don't think he's capable of murder.
 That means under a year. Let me explain what ten years of police work has taught me -- murder is basic. There are no conspiracies, no grand mysteries, and no evil puppet masters behind it all, pulling the strings; murder is shitty people doing a shitty thing to other shitty people -- it doesn't always make sense but it's always neat. Dunbar's our guy.
 I don't think that has anything to do with --
 "Too neat." How long have you been an investigator?
 I lied. Wait for it...
 But we have to question him --  Thought you didn't have cigarettes --
 Have no fear, Osborne, we have not yet begun to fight.
 That was kid gloves?
 Got it.
 Remember, he's the son of a Senator, so go easy. Kid gloves.
 Not the happiest of memories?
 Being back here. Gives me the willies.
 Something wrong?
 What point?
 He's telling the truth, up to a point.
 Imagine what it must have been like for them out there. What do you think of Dunbar?
 You guys really got the shit kicked out of you here.
 So noted.
 You're off to a late start.
 I plan to grow on you.
 You do understand that there's absolutely no way I could ever be attracted to you, right?
 The very same.
 This is the straight hitting on me you were talking about, isn't it?
 Yeah. That's just the story I tell the girls to get them into bed. Truth is... I don't know. The whole honor and duty thing. Make a difference in the world, crap like that. Didn't really work out.
 You're kidding.
 I lost a bet.
 Something like that. You?
 You had a mobile of bayonets above your crib.
 Typical army brat story. Dad was noncom, Mom was a Nurse. There was never any real doubt of joining up.
 Microrecorder for Kendall -- didn't have time to wire his room. Now tell me why you joined the army or I'll jab this pen through your neck.
 What is that?
 Best time for banal chit-chat.
 We're in the middle of a murder case --
 You're right. We should sit in silence.
 You really want to make banal chit- chat like that now?
 Oh, I'm sorry, I didn't know the object of the interrogation is to make you look good -- Everyone knows good cop, bad cop -- by admitting it I appeared trustworthy.
 You made me look like an idiot --
 I believe somebody owes me ten dollars --
 Baseball?
 See, Ray, this is what we call "good cop, bad cop". She shouts, I stand up for you, you're grateful, a bond of trust is established.
 The Colonel saw you shoot Nunez, you're a murderer --
 Ten bucks says I have him talking in under three minutes.
 I questioned him for three hours and he didn't make a sound. You don't have a badge, he won't talk to you.
 Something like that.
 Good cop/bad cop?
 Thank you. At some point in there I'm gonna rub my nose. When I do, go at him with everything you got.
 Is he handsome, self assured, carry himself well, does he look you in the eyes or down at the floor, does he have good bones, suggesting good breeding, does he slouch or sit up straight -- these are important questions, as they reveal a great deal about this man's character so please get over yourself for two and a half seconds and tell me is he cute?
 That is the most unprofessional --
 Is Dunbar cute?
 Excuse me?
 Because interrogation rooms look suspiciously like interrogation rooms, which doesn't exactly put people at ease. Is he cute?
 Why?
 Move him.
 Yes.
 He's in interrogation?
 Kendall Junior is still in surgery, so he won't be available to answer for his name or anything else for another hour -- the cadet we're talking to first is Dunbar.
 Christ... Remind me to thank Bill for mentioning that on the phone --
 Senator Jonathan Kendall, of Ohio.
 Levi? Who names their kid Levi --
 Hurricane knocked out our Mainframe, so all we have are their dogtags. Cadets Raymond Dunbar and Levi Kendall --
 Three things. First -- You don't have a choice. Second -- I've never taken a bribe in my life. And Third -- I'm still a little drunk from last night, so if I skip over the witty banter and move forward to straight hitting on you, try not to take offense. Tell me about the two guys.
 Subtlety really isn't one of you finer points, is it, Osborne?
 Wording and your friendship with the Colonel aside, I'm not comfortable having you involved in this.
 It was for suspicion of bribery, it's really all in the wording --
 You're the Tom Hardy I've been reading about in the papers, right? New Orleans PD fired you for taking bribes from Guissepe Torres.
 He got me through Basic and a lot of other stuff. I owe him.
 You and the Colonel go back.
 Gotta be honest, I love what you've done with the place --
 And you notice I'm not in the Army anymore.
 Sergeant West's served for twenty- three years. He's the public face of the modern Army.
 I didn't mean that as a compliment.
 He was our Drill here. Man's older than sand.
 You knew Sergeant West?
 Ah, Christ
 Fantastic. You want to tell me what's going on?
 Hostile and uncooperative.
 Although that won't matter much when coupled with the murder charge --
 Pike, please --
 Someone else can do the deed, it doesn't have to be you. Maybe Nunez too, he's got a tendency to follow Mueller, but the rest of us can come out ahead -- the guys who took out their Sergeant's killers! We'll move the bodies out to the creek and say we came over the hill right as they fragged West, all we gotta do is tell the story right.
 I don't think I want to hear this --
 Mueller. He's as bad as West and we both know it. Now I can't do it, cause I'm tied up, but we get the others to go along --
 How?
 A gay Senator's son who let his Sarge get fragged on a training exercise? The press'll crucify you and your father. His career will be over and it'll be your fault. But we do this different and you come out a hero.
 What are you talking about?
 The thing is, we've got a real opportunity here. You turn me in tomorrow and we're both fucked --
 To start a fire, goddammit!  What about him, huh? Maybe he offed the Sarge and changed shirts, brought an extra one in his pack. Y'ever think of that? Go ahead, cut him loose! First chance he gets, he'll waste the rest of us, that's how they work --
 So you took off your shirt?
 I was freezing from the hurricane --
 I'm about two seconds away from seeing if fairies really can fly --
 Oh, you remember now --
 I remember now, it was before the explosion --
 Yeah and he doesn't know when --
 Pike and I got separated --
 You better watch it, faggot, I'm not sure you and Childs didn't do him --
 Poor fucker my ass...
 They found him. Poor fucker was practically blown in half --
 Oh, yeah, "Excuse me, Sergeant, sir, we don't feel like going out -- we don't want to get rained on." He'll kick our asses from here to Cleveland.
 We should tell him we're not going.
 You ever been in a hurricane, Mueller?
 You ever been in a hurricane, Mueller?
 The faggot speaks.
 Maybe we shouldn't go.
 He came after us. And I told Dunbar he had to kill him...
 What happened with Nunez?
 So you framed him. The same way Childs was going to frame Pike.
 I scared Dunbar into silence. He's been trying to cover for me the whole time. We got here, you came to see me... I didn't know if I could trust him with that kind of secret --
 I told him what had really happened to West. Told him to keep quiet about it or I'd destroy him. Because if it came out that I was involved with the whole PX scam, my father would be finished.
 Childs.
 Who, Levi --
 We did get our stories straight, but not because we killed anyone.  It was because I threatened him.
 Wrong answer --
 Dunbar's telling the truth.
 What.
 Wait --
 Enjoy your flight to Washington --
 It will and you know why? Because you're not a person anymore, you're a cadet in the United States Army; you have no identity, no Miranda warning, and no rights. So I'm gonna throw you to the wolves, and unlike you, I'm gonna get away with it, because you're pissing me off!
 It won't work --
 What?
 It doesn't matter, Levi. We're going to find those bodies and when we do, I'm going to make sure one of them has a bullet in them that matches your weapon --
 You can't threaten me --
 You and Dunbar got your stories straight. Little details, little inconsistencies, designed to bounce us back from one of you to the other, asking questions, killing time, until the transport arrives and whisks you away to where Senator Daddy can protect you. You think you're just going to slide out of this? You're an accessory to murder, Levi, you're going to jail --
 Then he's mistaken. You know, I really don't think my father would approve of this line of questioning --
 Dunbar says you were.
 No, but it got you interested, didn't it? Got you to dig. Inspired Ray to tell you terribly sordid tales about drugs and creek beds and dead little sergeants who stuck their noses where they didn't belong.
 Pike never confessed.
 Not much time to solve the crime. Tell me, detective, how did it feel taking blood money from Guissepe Torres? Did it weigh on your conscience or did you just not think about it?
 Fifty minutes.
 Running out of time, are we? Tick- tock, tick-tock, how long till your witnesses fly the coop?
 We've been making progress, I see.
 Pike never confessed.
 Like I said, I was in the kitchen. When I came out, Mueller and Pike were dead, Nunez and Childs were hit and Dunbar was gone.
 But you didn't see it, right?
 Because he'd shot Mueller.
 Nunez was chasing Dunbar.
 He whispered it in my ear.
 No one else heard it?
 "You're gonna die tonight, faggot". Clear as day.
 He said what?
 He wanted more than that.
 He couldn't kick you out so he wanted you to quit on your own.
 What, "The Truth"? Please. There are degrees of truth, officer, always degrees. Things are not what they seem.
 We just want --
 -- failure to comply with this arrest is a court martialable offense in and of itself --
 Tell him to shut up --
 Shut up!
 Until we return to base, and ballistics can match your weapon to the slugs in Sergeant West's body --
 Bullshit --
 You are to be stripped of all weapons and placed under guard --
 The fuck are you talking about --
 Cadet Michael Mueller, I hereby place you under military arrest for the murder of Sergeant Nathan West --
 We're not going anywhere.
 Goddammit, Ray, we gotta get out of here --
 Still got mine on, not a speck of blood on it. Not a bad trick for a murderer -- you said you burned yours?
 I used it to start the fire --
 Where's your shirt, Mueller?
 We all know what you did, Pike. I don't know what kind of nigger voodoo you been working in here, but --
 Shut the fuck up.  He was gonna cut him loose.
 This place is going, Mueller. We gotta move --
 What the fuck are you doing?
 Thank God...
 Blame the nigger, then, huh? Someone turns up dead, you just look for the darkest face in the crowd --
 Whoever shot the Sarge blew a grenade first --
 What the fuck happened to you? One minute you're next to me and the next you're gone and the sky lights up like fucking Christmas --
 What the fuck happened to you --
 Toughens us up, Pike. You don't like it, quit.
 Hurricane's due after midnight and we're still going out?
 Ma'am, Ray Dunbar's black.
 So?
 You mean Ray Dunbar? Well, that ain't right.
 No, no that was Cadet Dunbar --
 Funny. I swear I saw them bring him and the smaller guy in this morning.
 Terrible tragedy. One of those Section Eight boys worked in here. Pike. Heard he got out okay.
 Yeah.
 Sign here and here.  Hey, ain't you the folks workin' on that whole hulabaloo from last night?
 The army kicked you out for drugs...
 You never told me why you got kicked out of...
 Gets on his plane in ten minutes, which means you two are done. You'll understand if I don't walk you out.
 What happens to Dunbar now?
 I'm giving you a chance to walk away.
 We know.
 You both know if you do this, if you go after a Senator's son and you're wrong... it's not just me in the hot seat anymore.
 He tried to burn Dunbar to us. You don't do that if you're not involved.
 You want Kendall, don't you?
 It's too neat.
 What do you think?
 No --
 You think he did it?
 I called the JAG Corps, the two cadets we retrieved are to be flown to D.C. on a transport leaving here at 1700 --
 Search parties for the others are fanning out in a ten click radius from the pickup. If they're hurt and we can get to them in time...
 Then it's unofficial.
 He's not Army, it's not official --
 He's former Army and the best I've ever seen in a room. Besides, he knows the territory, we did Basic together here.  You've had three hours with Dunbar and haven't gotten a peep, we need to take a different tack.
 But this guy you called, he's not even Army --
 He asked to see a policeman, we're getting him a policeman.
 This is totally unnecessary --
 LZ is two clicks North of a cabin, you are to split into teams of two and work your way through your designated area blasting as many targets as you can find! Each area has twenty targets, first team to take all twenty and find the cabin wins! Teams are as follows -- Dunbar and Nunez, Pike and Mueller, Kendall and Childs!
 Sir, yes, sir!
 Some of you may have heard there's a hurricane coming! American soldiers do not wait for good weather -- they do not wait for a bright sunshiney day to do their duty! An American Soldier learns to operate in the worst conditions and turn said conditions into an advantage against their enemy! Anyone who thinks these conditions are too harsh, feel free to lay down and die, you get me?
 So forget what you've seen on Sixty fucking Minutes about the kinder, gentler military -- you will either succeed, quit, or die by my hand!
 Sir, yes, sir!
 In my time I have killed sixteen men for the good of my country, sixteen men whose entrance into this Army I could not condone, as it would weaken the fabric of this nation's defense! This base suffers an average of three training accidents a year, unfortunate incidents that I will not hesitate to repeat if you cross me, understand -- give me a sir, yes, sir!
 Sir, yes, sir!
 Those who I deem unworthy to pass through this camp will quit, and those who refuse to quit I will kill. You ever hear of a training accident -- give me a sir, yes, sir!
 Sir, yes, sir!
 You motherfuckers have just made the worst mistake of your lives! You have chosen to join my Army! This Army is my mother, my father, and my little virgin sister and I will not allow anyone or anything that is not up to my standards near her pretty little virgin cooze, do you understand me -- give me a sir, yes, sir!
 Good luck, kid.
 Thank you.
 Her name is Sandra Templeton. She's going to Auburn. The semester's almost over, so you better hurry.
 There's only one I want.
 I was wrong about you kid. You may not have much, but what you got, you got a lot of. You could get any girl.
 That would explain the indigestion.
 A few rabbits, but I think one of them was already dead.
 Didn't kill anything, did I?
 I'll work night and day, and you won't have to pay me. You just have to tell me who she is.
 Sorry, kid. I don't do charity.
 I don't have a job, but I would have a job if you gave me one. And I may not have much, but I have more determination than any man you're ever going to meet.
 Kid, you were a big fish in a small pond. This here is the ocean, and you're drowning. Take my advice and go back to Puddleville. You'll be happy there.
 Someone stole my backpack.
 I've got a whole backpack full of clothes!
 Sure I do. You were hot shit back in Hickville, but here in the real world, you got squat. You don't have a plan. You don't have a job. You don't have anything but the clothes on your back.
 What do you mean? You don't even know me.
 Kid. Don't waste your time. She's out of your league.
 Who is she? Where does she live?
 I know her uncle. Friends of the family.
 Yes!
 Jesus, kid.  Let me guess. Real pretty, blonde hair, blue hat?
 I'm going to spend the rest of my life looking for her. That or die alone.
 Tough break. Most men have to get married before they lose their wives.
 I just saw the woman I'm going to marry, I know it. But then I lost her.
 See! The big guy likes it.
 That's great.
 Hey kid! Your friend just made himself a star.
 It was on that night Karl met his destiny. And I met mine. Almost.
 Great, great. That's fantastic.
 I don't expect to.
 You won't find a better place!
 No one's ever left.
 This town is everything a man could ask for. And if I were to end up here, I'd consider myself lucky. But the fact is, I'm not ready to end up anywhere.
 Why?
 I have to leave. Tonight.
 It truly is.
 Now tell me if that isn't the best pie you ever ate.
 No. I've gotta meet somebody. I'm already running late.
 He's still here. Let me buy you a drink. I'll tell you all about it. Hell, I'll have him tell you.
 The poet? What ever happened to him?
 The town of Spectre. Best kept secret in Alabama. Says here you're from Ashton, right? Last person we had from Ashton was Norther Winslow.
 What is this place?
 Not yet.
 You were expecting me?
 Oh. Here! Right here. Edward Bloom. We weren't expecting you yet.
 Yes.
 Bloom like a flower?
 Edward Bloom.
 Welcome to ya. What's your name?
 I didn't know she belonged to anybody.
 What the hell are you doing? This is my girl. Mine!
 Don.
 Bloom!
 Let's see it.
 I brought it.
 You get the eye?
 Fine, I'm doing it.
 Fine, you do it.
 Fine, I will.
 Then do it.
 I'll go in right now and get that eye.
 Or are you too scared?
 Your mother came in about three in the afternoon. Her neighbor drove her, on account of your father was on business in Wichita. You were born a week early, but there were no complications. It was a perfect delivery. Now, your father was sorry to miss it, but it wasn't the custom for the men to be in the room for deliveries then, so I can't see as it would have been much different had he been there. And that's the real story of how you were born.
 No.
 Not that one. The real story. Did he ever tell you that?
 A thousand times. He caught an uncatchable fish.
 Did your father ever tell you about the day you were born?
 Five-eleven. One-eighty. Regulated hypertension.  How would his son describe him?
 How would you describe him?
 Thirty years. Maybe more.
 How long have you known my father?
 My father and I have an advantage. We never talk.
 Glad to see you're not trying to have a heartfelt talk. It's one of my greatest annoyances, when people talk to those who can't hear them.
 Absolutely. Be good for you to talk to him.
 Can I see him?
 A pleasure.
 Dr. Bennett. It's good to see you.  My wife, Josephine.
 Will.
 I'm sorry, Jenny. I am.
 Lucky girl.
 And from the moment I saw her until the moment I die, she's the only one.
 I know.
 Don't. Don't be embarrassed. I should never have let you think that...  I am in love with my wife.
 Go.
 I'll...
 Please. Go. Just go.
 Lord, I'm sorry I...
 I can get it. I can just...
 It's okay, just leave it.
 I see. I thank you for your time.
 I won't be selling you this house, Mr. Bloom.
 I was 18. He was 28. Turns out that was a big difference.
 You're Beamen's daughter. Your last name is different.  You married.
 I'm sorry. Have I offended you?
 I'm not convinced you should be happy.
 Helping people makes me happy.
 It's not like you're going to lose anything. You can ask anyone in town. I've been nothing if not generous. I want the best for everyone.
 Then I don't think so Mr. Bloom. If nothing is going to change, I'd just as soon it not change in the way it hasn't been changing all this time.
 In so many words, yes.
 I'll offer you more than it's worth. And you know you won't have to move. Nothing will change except the name on the deed, you have my word.
 So I've heard.
 Apparently I've overlooked this one piece of it, and I'd like to remedy that. You see, in order for the town to be preserved, the trust must own it in its entirety.
 No one would come out here unless they had business. And no one would have business with me except for you. You're buying the town.
 How did you know?
 You must be Edward Bloom.
 I promise. Someday. When I'm really supposed to.
 Promise me you'll come back.
 I suspect it will hurt a lot.
 How are you gonna make it without your shoes?
 And when I'm 38, you'll be 48. And that's not much difference at all.
 You're pretty good at arithmetic.
 I'm eight. That means when I'm eighteen, you'll be 28. And when I'm 28, you'll only be 38.
 Eighteen.
 How old are you?
 It's not a woman, it's a fish. No one ever catches her.
 Yeah.
 Was she nekkid?
 Well, she... uh...
 What did she look like?
 Did you see that woman?
 And I like you.
 I like your stories.
 I didn't forget. I was just working on a tangent. See, most men, they'll tell a story straight through, and it won't be complicated, but it won't be interesting either.
 You were talking about your wedding.
 There was one time when I was eleven...
 Truth is, I've been thirsty my whole life. Never really known why.
 Is it the medicine that's making you thirsty?
 Well, we were all set to, but there was a complication.
 I thought you said you didn't have a church wedding.
 Well, it's not a short one.
 Oh, so this is a tall tale?
 Will never told you that?  Probably just as well. He would have told it all wrong anyway. All the facts and none of the flavor.
 I never knew.
 That's because we didn't have a wedding. Your mother-in-law was never supposed to marry me. She was engaged to somebody else.
 Please?
 You don't need a picture. Just look up handsome in the dictionary.
 Can I take your picture?
 Spooning the sherbet.
 They were squeezing the cheese. Clanking the bottles. Licking the popsicle.
 Stop.
 He was buttering her rolls. Pumping her churn. Splashing milk in her box.
 He was slipping her a little extra cream.
 No, I understand.
 Because see, my mother was banging the milkman.
 Terrible for her, but think about me, young boy with that kind of power. Wasn't three weeks later that the crow came back to me in a dream and said, "Your Grampa is going to die." Well, I ran right back to my parents. My father said, no, Gramps is fine, but I could see there was trepidation. And true enough, that next morning my Grampa was dead.
 That's terrible.
 Means when you dream about something that's going to happen.  Like one night, I had a dream where this crow came and told me, "Your Aunt is going to die." I was so scared I woke up my parents. They told me it was just a dream, to go back to bed. But the next morning, my Aunt Stacy was dead.
 What were you dreaming about?
 I was dreaming.
 Hi. How are you feeling?
 You're lucky to get four words out of them in English. But if you were to walk through the jungle, you'd hear them speaking the most elaborate French. Those parrots talk about everything: politics, movies, fashion -- everything but religion.
 Really.
 Just to be sure, you can take my pack.
 You're not trying to run away?
 That poet, Norther Winslow did. He was going to Paris, France. He must have liked it, because no one ever heard from him again.  Tell you what. You take the other way and I'll cut through here. Meet you on the far side.
 You know anyone's who's taken it?
 Beats me.
 What did she say?
 Okay.
 Okay.
 I love every square inch of it. But I can feel the edges closing in on me. A man's life can only grow to a certain size in a place like this.  So what do you say? Join me?
 You don't like it?
 Mine's Edward. And truthfully, I do want you to leave, Karl. But I want to leave with you.  You think this town is too small for you, well, it's too small for a man of my ambition. I can't see staying here a day longer.
 Karl.
 What's your name, Giant?
 You're just trying to get me to leave, aren't you? That's why they sent you here.
 So why are you wasting your time in a small town? You're a big man. You should be in the big city.
 I can.
 Wouldn't lie to you. And they've got all-you-can-eat buffets. You can eat a lot, can't you?
 Really?
 Hardly two stories in the whole place. Now I've heard in real cities, they've got buildings so tall you can't even see the tops of 'em.
 Yes. Exactly.
 You become what you always were. A very big fish.  And that's the way it happens.
 Story of my life.
 It's unbelievable.
 The River!
 You say...
 Where are we headed?
 Somehow, you're better. Different. You're getting ready to go. And I say...
 Let's get out of here.
 Okay. Okay.
 Like this.
 I can try, Dad. If you help. Just tell me how it starts.
 How I go.
 How what happens?
 Tell me how it happens.
 The river?
 The river.
 I have been nothing but myself since the day I was born. And if you can't see that, it's your failing, not mine.
 Yourself. Good, bad, everything. Just show me who you are for once.
 What do you want, Will? Who do you want me to be?
 It would kill you, huh?
 Dad, I'm about to have a kid of my own here. It would kill me if he went through his whole life never understanding me.
 Only on the surface. But that's all I've ever seen.
 You think I'm fake.
 You tell lies, Dad. You tell amusing lies. Stories are what you tell a five-year old at bedtime. They're not elaborate mythologies you maintain when your son is ten and fifteen and twenty and thirty. And the thing is, I believed you. I believed your stories so much longer than I should have. And then when I realized that everything you said was impossible -- everything! -- I felt like such a fool to have trusted you. You were like Santa Claus and the Easter Bunny combined. Just as charming and just as fake.
 I've told you a thousand facts. That's all I do, Will. I tell stories.
 I have no idea who you are because you have never told me a single fact.
 What, you're seeing down to my nose? My chin?
 The thing about icebergs is you only see 10 percent of them. The other 90 percent is below the water where you can't see it. And that's what it is with you Dad. I'm only seeing this little bit that sticks above the water.
 Then you shouldn't have started with a question. Because people want to answer questions. You should have started with, "The thing about icebergs is..."
 I'm trying to make a metaphor here.
 What?
 Dad!
 Do I? I saw an iceberg once. They were hauling it down to Texas for drinking water, only they didn't count on an elephant being frozen inside. The woolly kind. A mammoth.
 Do you know much about icebergs, Dad?
 Can we talk?
 Son?
 Dad?
 But the real story is how I got the car. You see...
 I think someone hasn't.
 The maple tree and the Buick. We heard it.
 Yes.
 Did I ever tell you about how...
 Oh, so you know.
 Josephine actually went to the Congo last year.
 It's rude to talk about religion. You never know who you're going to offend.
 Why not religion, Dad?
 I said this isn't how I go. The last part is much more unusual. Trust me on that.
 I thought you weren't dying.
 I used to do it when you were gone, remember? I used to do it a lot.
 You know where the chemicals are?
 I will.
 Your mother hasn't been keeping up the pool. If you wanted to you could...
 I'd just like to know the true versions of things. Events. Stories. You.
 You mean, while I'm here.
 Dad, I'm hoping we can talk about some things while I'm here.
 You're right.
 There's a lot you don't know about me.
 When did you ever work in an office?
 True story.
 Really.
 You owe me three-fifty.
 What did he say?
 And every day I gave him a quarter. Every day. Then I got sick and was out for a couple of weeks. And when I went back there, you know what he said?
 Okay.
 There was this panhandler who used to stop me every morning when I came out of this coffee shop near the office.
 Surprise ending. Wouldn't want to ruin it for you.
 So how does it happen?
 I saw my death in that eye. And this is not how it happens.
 No, she was old and probably senile. Maybe schizophrenic.
 She was a witch.
 The Old Lady by the swamp.
 Truly. I saw it in The Eye.
 Really.
 People needn't worry so much. It's not my time yet. This isn't how I go.
 You learned from the best.
 You think I'm up for it?
 No, but I hear it's terrible. Then you spend years trying to corrupt and mislead this child, fill its head with nonsense and still it turns out perfectly fine.
 Did you do any of that?
 Having a kid changes everything. I mean, there's the diapers and the burping and the midnight feedings...
 Am I?
 You --  -- are in for a surprise.
 I'm not scared.
 Your mom says I can't tell you that one anymore. You get nightmares.
 The one about the witch.
 No Dad, they don't. I do not like the story. Not anymore, not after a thousand times. I know all the punchlines, Dad. I can tell them as well as you can.  For one night, one night in your entire life, the universe does not revolve around Edward Bloom. It revolves around me and my wife. How can you not understand that?
 Come on, Will. Everyone likes that story.
 Friend of yours? Did you help him out of a bind?
 Jesus Christ.
 I am a footnote in that story. I am the context for your great adventure. Which never happened! Incidentally! You were selling novelty products in Wichita the day I was born.
 What, a father's not allowed to talk about his son?
 Make him stop.
 You can see my predicament. My wedding ring, the symbol of fidelity to my wife, soon to be the mother of my child, was now lost in the gut of an uncatchable fish.
 I see. We need to get you one of those plant misters. We can spray you like a fern.
 I was drying out.
 Go out with me.
 How can I convince you to stop?
 I have the rest of my life to find out.
 You don't even know me.
 I called everywhere in five states and explained this was the only way I could get my wife to marry me.
 How did you get so many?
 They're your favorite flower.
 Daffodils?
 But you're wrong. I do know you, at least by reputation. Edward Bloom from Ashton. See, I'm actually engaged to a boy from Ashton. Don Price. He was a few years older than you.
 Oh.
 Don't need to apologize to me. I mean, I'm the luckiest person you're going to find today...
 I'm sorry.
 Edward, it's got your deposit slip on it.
 'Fraid so.
 This is it? The whole vault.
 I'm robbing this place.
 So what are you up to now?
 That's great, Norther. I'm happy for you. I can't believe I helped.
 I want you to know, when you left Spectre it opened my eyes. There was a whole life out there that I was not living. So I travelled. I saw France, and Africa, half of South America. Every day a new adventure, that's my motto.
 I don't believe it!
 I was astonished to see the greatest poet of both Ashton and Spectre all the way out in Texas.
 It's me. Norther Winslow.
 You're a poet. You oughta be able to. And maybe if you'd seen more, you could.
 I can't imagine any place better than here.
 Norther, do you ever regret not making it to Paris?
 This is why you don't show work in progress.
 There's a lot of expectation. I don't want to disappoint my fans.
 Really.
 I've been working on this poem for 12 years.
 There is no softer ground than town.
 Wait! I need those!
 Well, therapy. And one day I realized I was in love with a man who could never love me back. I was living in a fairy tale.
 You didn't become crazy.
 No, it's logical if you think like your father. See, to him, there's only two women: your mother and everyone else.
 Logically, you couldn't be the Witch, because she was old back when he was young.
 My father talked about a lot of things he never did, and I'm sure he did a lot of things he never talked about. I'm just trying to reconcile the two.
 Look, I don't know how much you want to know about any of this. You have one image of your father and it would be wrong for me to go and change it. Especially this late in the game.
 Because he's dying.
 Can I ask you a question? Why did you come here today? If you found this deed, why didn't you just ask Eddie?
 I've seen him with women. He flirts. He always has. On some level, I presumed he was cheating on my mother. I just never had proof.
 Wow. Wow, you just said it. I was expecting to dance around this for another half hour.
 Were you and my father having an affair?
 This was on his sales route, so he was through here all the time. Everyone in town knew him.
 How did you know my father?
 I am. And you're Will. I've seen your picture, that's how I recognize you. I almost said something at the store, but it would have been awkward.  Like this.
 Are you Jenny Hill?
 I wasn't expecting you.
 Hello.
 Oh. Oh.
 I loved it. It sounds peculiar, but I loved every minute of it. I did. Eddie was travelling a lot, so he was gone, but I felt like I always had a piece of him with me. A little part of his soul inside me. I could feel it. It was alive and kicking.
 I do.
 Do you like it, being pregnant?
 I know. It was the same when I was carrying Will. Like clockwork.
 I'm sorry. It seems every hour I have to...
 I need to lie down for a bit.
 I'm going to check on him.
 I'll help you.
 I'm going to get started on dishes.
 We'll have to pick up a copy.
 I spent a week in Morocco for the story. It was incredible.
 Down the hall on the right. The door sticks. You have to really pull it.
 Yes.
 Thank you. I'll bet you need to --
 Is he going to be okay?
 Your father had a stroke. He's upstairs with your mom and Dr. Bennett.
 What happened?
 I am always on your side. And I think you should talk to him.
 I need you on my side.
 You're not.
 Look, I know why you like him. I know why everyone likes him. But I need you to tell me I'm not crazy.
 What is "true?" I've never heard my father say a single true thing.
 But it's not true.
 You have to understand. When I was growing up, he was gone more than he was here. And I started thinking -- maybe he has a second life somewhere else. With another house, another family. He leaves us, he goes to them. Or maybe there is no family. Maybe he never wanted a family. But whatever it is, maybe he likes that second life better. And the reason he tells all those stories is because he can't stand this boring place.
 Do you love him?
 Everyone loves my father. He's a very likeable guy.
 Do you love your father?
 Mmm, what. I know better than to argue romance with a French woman.
 Mmm, what?
 Mmm.
 But it's romantic.
 That's because most of it never happened.
 What about the details? How they fell in love. The Circus. The War. You never told me any of that.
 They met at Auburn.
 You never told me how your parents met.
 Did you?
 I talked with your father last night.
 I'm going with you.
 You don't have to.
 I'm going with you.
 Probably tonight.
 You need to go.
 It's more than they thought. They're going to stop chemo.
 It's bad.
 Yes. Thank you.
 Mom, do you want some time with Dad?
 That's okay?
 I'll stay. Why don't you go home with Josephine and I'll stay tonight.
 I don't suppose one of us could stay with him. In case he...  In case he wakes up, one of us should be there.
 Heavens no. We had a hard enough time keeping the mortgage on this place.
 So you never bought any land.
 I suppose your grandmother's house when she passed on. But we sold that right away. Your cousin Shirley bought it.
 Did you and Dad have any other property?
 Yes?
 Mom?
 He just fell asleep. Josephine's with him.
 Is he awake?
 Not everything your father says is a complete fabrication.
 That really happened?
 Do you know who that is?
 No. But it's weird. She seemed to recognize me.
 Was she one of your teachers?
 Mom, do you know who that is? Blonde hair.
 Before I forget, your father has papers in the basement I'd like you to go through. I wouldn't know what's important.
 Well, clearly you don't. But I'm not the mystery you're trying to solve right now.
 But I understand you, Mom. I always have.
 I know it's not easy. Just remember, he didn't choose to be your father and you didn't choose to be his son. You just ended up together. You could pick numbers out of a dark bag and it'd be just the same. If you ask me, it's a wonder parents and children can stand each other at all.
 True. But I've known him my whole life, and I don't feel like I know him at all. Or ever will.
 Yes, you both think William Bloom is a very smart man.  The problem is, you only see me as your mother, and not as someone's wife. And I've been his wife longer than I've been your mother. You can't discount that.
 Josephine and I have a lot in common.
 No it's not. It's exactly the same. Your father and I met, we dated, and we married -- we chose each other -- because we understood each other on some fundamental level. Just the same as you two.
 Yes. But that's a different...
 Would you say you understand Josephine?
 Yes, Will, I do. And don't presume things you don't know.
 How is that possible? I mean, you try to ask him a question and suddenly it's another one of his stories.  You can't honestly say you know him.
 Yes.
 What I mean is, do you really know what's going on in his head?
 Of course.
 Mom, would you say you understand Dad?
 Really! That's wonderful.
 I don't know if you've seen it, but Josephine has some photos in the most recent Newsweek.
 You don't talk about those things. Not yet.
 How much time does he have left?
 He's impossible. He won't eat. And because he won't eat, he gets weaker. And because he's weaker, he doesn't want to eat.
 How is he?
 He's up with your father.
 Is that Dr. Bennett's car?
 You didn't need to do that. You just didn't.
 We rented a car.
 Ruth McHibbon offered to pick you up at the airport.
 We swam. The Atlantic, it's not that big really.
 How did you get here?
 The sets were excellent. Everything was big, you know, all the rubbish, coke cans, sweet wrappers, dustbins, so when you were watching it you felt cat size. It was really clever.
 The sets were good.
 Yeah. It was quite good actually. Some bits I really liked.
 Yeah it was okay.
 I paid for those guitar cases.
 Those aren't presents. That's normal friendship stuff
 When we went to the Hard Rock Cafe. Who paid? When we went to see 'Cats'. Who paid?
 Such as?
 I've been buying you stuff all week. I've been buying him stuff all week.
 I got you those trousers from Paul Smith.
 No I don't.
 You know what for.
 What for?
 Put it in the cases. Split it up. And don't forget you owe me 150.
 Fifty thousand. Almost exactly.
 You first.
 No I haven't.
 You have. You've actually fallen for this prick.
 Leave him!
 What. You're what? You're with this creep now.
 What are you doing here?
 What? What are you doing?
 Name it.
 A baby? What are we supposed to do with a baby?
 You heard what I said. I'm pregnant. I've been throwing up for weeks.
 What?
 Thank you.
 Say thank you.
 Yeah.
 Do you like it?
 It is. I did it cooking.
 That's not a burn.
 It's nothing. I burnt myself.
 What's this?
 We'll stop then.
 Yes.
 Do you want to stop?
 You know what I mean babe, It's enough. We can stop.
 What do you mean?
 It's enough isn't it?
 There's over eighty thousand here.
 Sixty four thousand, eight hundred.
 Right.
 I thought you could give us the tour this morning. Sort of be our Indian Guide.
 Hello.
 Uh... Yes.
 You can see why it's sensitive?
 Right.
 To customers approaching the bank from the rear
 Ch...
 This is sensitive. Your car. Lovely car. Doesn't necessarily give the right impression.
 Leave her alone.
 I'm so sorry.
 Just leave her alone.
 Oh Jesus. Of course I can't.
 He is sure you can do this. Of course you can not.
 Oh Jesus.
 I've got eight hundred pounds. Oh Jesus.
 You don't understand. He wants all the money that is in your bank.
 I'll fuckin' give it to him! We'll go down there.
 He wants the money from your bank.
 I'll give him money. Tell him to put the...
 He wants a lot of money.
 Tell him to put the kettle down and I'll give him money.
 He wants money.
 What does he want. The Russian shithead. What do you want ?
 He says you are very sad ridiculous man. I don't agree of course. And that you must pay someone to have sex like a prostitute. Nadia is a prostitute. I'm sorry.
 What did he say? Tell me!
 What? What does he want?
 He says you scare him so much he must go to the toilet in his trousers. John, he is a soldier. A trained killer. We must do what he says.
 Put the fucking kettle down. Tell, Yuri, tell him put it down or I'm going to make him.
 John.
 Put the fucking kettle down.
 Good night.
 I have brought you trouble. Maybe I should have come alone.
 You can stay tonight.
 I understand. I'm so sorry
 To be indoors on such a day. It's crime.
 Fine. I thought you were leaving today.
 How is bank?
 It's very strange. How many people are truly themselves with their love? It is the greatest human disaster and it is never in the newspapers. There are no Marches Against Heartache, no Ministries Against Loneliness, no Concerts Against Disappointment. We look away. And still we know in secret that nothing is more important to us. The one thing we all share but don't say. Look John I will show you something.
 I suppose it's... I mean define your terms.
 Do you believe in love?
 No. It's not that.
 You are not ashamed of it? It's no surprise to want to love.
 He says why did you send to Russia for a wife.
 Tell me what he said.
 No. It is too judgmental.
 Tell me.
 Oh nothing.
 What was that?
 Binoculars. He had these Binoculars he has kept from the war.
 Binoculars.
 "I have these uh..." She explains to you... "When I was a little girl my father had these beautiful old glasses." Like... I don't know the word. Like for watching uh... for watching the birds.
 I...
 "I saw you waiting there, by the gate."
 When?
 What?
 She says she has a secret to tell.
 Classic!  Thank God. She says 'Yes!'
 Uh. Do you like England?
 She says 'Hello' to you. Go for it John!
 No, no...
 You're asking for my documents?
 You must have a visa or something...
 Plans are for the architects, politicians and so forth.
 So how long will you be in England?
 Yes it's okay. Thank you for the food.
 I asked her if you were happy to see us. I find it hard to tell with you.
 What was that?
 So I come to England with other actors to make shows, I meet this freak from Novgorod I tell him of you and Chicken and the birthday here we are.
 So?
 Right. So I can say he smokes me. So.
 No.
 I am actor, he is actor, although he is an actor stroke musician. I just noodle along, I'm not so good. He makes me look like a retard -- He smokes me. I don't mean he smokes me.
 Right.
 We better watch him. He's crazy.
 Right.
 Of course not. Alexei, he's is my problem.
 So hang on. You're both Nadia's cousins?
 Toast first then we talk seriously, I can see you are serious about us.
 Hold on.
 And what? You mean from the beginning? Jesus. Can I uh okay, as we say in Russia can I cut a long story short. Okay. Nadia is my little cousin. Except she's not. But we say cousin. This is for you.
 And...
 Good.
 Yes. I know.
 Oh.  We are Russian.
 I need to know who you are first please.
 He says he feels safe here.
 What did he say?
 What?
 I'm asking what you're here for.
 Sorry. You've lost me...
 What are you doing here?
 You must find some glasses, small, for the toast, and some plates.
 Hang on hang on, sorry, but like, who are you?
 How's that? We can't drink our piss can we?
 Sophia. Hello Sophia. Mine's still John.
 My name's Sophia.
 Right.
 Hurry. I'll wait for you here.
 Maybe you will find out.
 What does it mean?
 Tell me about it.
 It's a long way to go for a date.
 It's more like a date.
 No. What? No. I know.
 I'm not asking you to marry me.
 Why?
 It's what you came back for.
 It's not mine either.
 It's not mine.
 Please.
 I'm sorry.
 Whatever.
 You didn't deserve me John Buckingham.
 Goodbye.
 I'm quitting. This will be my last one. So. Goodbye.
 You can probably buy them on the flight.
 Okay. Promise?
 Something else.
 Goodbye.
 Okay. Goodbye.
 Because it was a lie.
 Please. Why not?
 Yeah. No thanks.
 Whatever.
 Okay. Thank you.
 No. I think I better just go.
 I've got an hour. Can I buy you a coffee?
 It's alright.
 You know you can come under the blanket.
 What's your name?
 What was her name?
 I don't know.
 Except for Small Eyes.
 Except for Small Eyes.
 I don't want anyone to die.
 Maybe I want to die. Don't you want me to die?
 Nobody's that unhappy.
 I smoke more these days. I smoke more when I'm unhappy.
 I've got news for you. It's not working.
 I'm trying to quit.
 You should stop smoking. You're pregnant. You smoke like a fucking lab dog.
 Laugh it up.
 She's alive!! She is not dead?
 She's alive?
 I don't know why I said it. I'm sorry.
 What?
 I don't know why I said that. She's not dead at all.
 I'm sorry.
 She's dead.
 Did she leave you? Come on. It's nothing to be ashamed of. Who did she leave you for? Your best friend? Her boss? A woman? Did she leave you for a woman, John?
 It's none of your business. She didn't have small eyes.
 The thin... the girl with small eyes. The one in your cupboard.
 What?
 What happened between you and the blonde?
 Not really. Maybe a little.
 Are you scared?
 No.
 Have you had any before?
 No.
 Do you know if it's a boy or a girl?
 Well what have you got?
 I don't have nothing.
 I'm pretty naive? Look at you. You have to do all this, and what have you got to show for it? Nothing.
 You are pretty naive if you think it is.
 Thank Christ for that.
 The rest of the world, John, it's not all like St. Albans.
 Yeah. He's a smashing bloke.
 Fifteen. You don't know him. He was very kind and strong.
 Then okay.  So how old were you when you met him?
 I wasn't saying anything.
 Please, there's no... Oh.
 What? I... I wasn't saying...
 You don't have to say anything
 You know, in Russia, there's no work for women. It's a different world.
 Get out.
 You are throwing me out.
 Get out
 Excuse me?
 You don't understand you either.
 You don't understand me.
 So what did you want? I think we understand each other, no?
 It wasn't what I wanted.
 You didn't mind too much.
 I got what I paid for.
 You...
 What?
 Oh. I think you will recover okay. I think you got what you paid for.
 I think it's my safest bet, don't you?
 So now you hate all women?
 Well, it's just that the thought trying to charm up an erection in front of a woman, or alone for that matter, makes me want to die.
 Why?
 I don't like sex. I don't think I'll be having sex ever again.
 There's nothing wrong in liking sex, John.
 Some... What does that mean?
 Sometimes neither.
 Sometimes which?
 Sometimes.
 So what? Do you just switch off in your head or do you imagine you're with him, or what?
 Listen. I didn't go rooting around in your private stuff.
 Whereas "Wet 'n' Wild" is an emotional journey. "Tied and Tethered". It's pretty moving huh? Like Anna Karenina.
 So. What then? You just detach sex from everything..
 What's a moral orgasm John? Tell me how it feels exactly.
 And that would be Morals. That would be one's own moral sense of decency.
 And who says what is wrong.
 And. It's wrong.
 And? What are you saying?
 Okay. Let's... Okay. Okay. You have had sex with people you don't like haven't you? For money. To make money.
 I don't hate you.
 So. What's it like having to fuck men you hate?
 We'll pretend it never happened.
 Okay we won't talk about it.
 No.
 You don't want to talk about it.
 Shut up. I'm not listening.
 Why not?
 I don't want to talk about it.
 No. But you tend to tie them up.
 Yeah. I tend to tie up and abandon women I really want to see again too.
 He left me my passport and ticket. It's pretty clear he wants to see me again.
 Excuse me?
 He will come back.
 Not the kids type then is he? Not that broody. You must be pretty miffed.
 But, you know, so what?
 Of course. Of course. Of course he does. Of course. Thank you. Thanks.
 If what you want to know is does he have a bigger cock than you, then yes he does.
 Oh Jesus.
 Look, if you want to know is he better in bed than you then yes he is.
 So uh...
 Fine. Absolutely. Must be disappointing though. Must come as a hell of a shock.
 It's none of your business.
 Fine.
 I don't want to talk about him.
 So, uh, Alexei, which I know isn't his name...
 I said I don't have any.
 What?
 I don't have any money.
 Give me some money.
 Yes.
 Shut up. Have you got your passport?
 What?
 Have you got your passport?
 You don't have to do this. I can look after myself.
 No you're not. How... Nice one. How dumb do you think I am ?
 I'm going... I am... I'm going to be sick.
 What? No you're not..
 I'm going to be sick. Where's the...
 What?
 Where's the restroom?
 Well, Nadia, It it's all the same to you, I'd like to give it a bash.
 You can't hurt me more than I'm hurt already.
 In every sense. If at all possible.
 So you're just going to be vindictive
 I do. I want to very badly.
 I know you just want to punish me --
 In the world.
 No I don't.
 You must think... I'm the biggest pillock... In the world.
 Well as it turns out I did.
 Why else would you send off for me? If you just wanted sex just go to a prostitute.
 Even so I always felt the decision to burst in and rob it very much remained with me.
 They don't blame you. When a bank employee does this they understand. You get your life back. Anyway I bet you hated that bank.
 I'm going to drink my coffee. Then, we're going to the police station. Where there will be lawyers, loss of job, house, humiliation, gutter press, and probably prison.
 So what are you going to do?
 That's a relief. It's nice to know I'm a regular guy.
 It makes it faster. If I don't speak to the men, they fall faster. It's pretty obvious why.
 I don't want to know.
 It's makes it easier. Okay.
 Unless. Unless this is part of the routine. You get tied up, stick around, distract me, they both bust in and Steal My Cup Of Coffee.
 I think that about covers it. I think I have grasped the part about you being dumped though. That's got to hurt, I imagine. That's got to smart a bit. I mean strictly in my observer's capacity it seemed you two were getting on Pretty Fucking Famously.
 You don't understand anything.
 Oh, I don't know. In my job as Deputy Assistant of New Business at the bank would have to listen to the problems of a great many individuals. This took a lot of understanding and sympathy, to try to work out solutions to their problems. But, you see, I'm not in that line of work anymore. Nowadays I'm a bank robber.
 They go.
 Of course. They go. Yes. Yes.
 They go.
 What's wrong?
 They go. John. They go.
 Yes I know.
 "Frenzy".
 Happy Birthday. Happy Birthday.
 Syevodnya
 Syevodnya?
 Happy bath day.
 I don't understand.
 Sorry?
 Today is bath day.
 Yes.
 Uh... Are you a giraffe?
 Yes.
 Do you follow or should I speak slower?
 Yes.
 Good. Or should I speak slower?
 Yes.
 Do uh... Sorry. Can you follow me? Do you understand what I'm saying?
 Yes.
 And how was the flight. Sorry, am I speaking too fast for you?
 Yes.
 I bet.  What about me? Am I how you imagined?
 Yes.
 So. Is it different to how you imagined it?
 I mean... "Ants." "I've got a problem with ants."
 Yes.
 I'm pretty nervous. Are you?
 Yes.
 I just can't find a nest. The root of the problem. I've looked everywhere. What's the Russian for ant? Sorry that's a stupid... Sorry. This is strange isn't it.
 Yes.
 It's about forty miles from here. I don't know if you've looked at a map, it's close to London but it's a city in itself. A Roman city. It's a nice house. I'm having a problem with ants. I uh... It's the warmer weather. I can't seem to find the nest. Sorry, do you understand "ants"?
 Right. Okay. Good.
 Yes.
 Is that everything?
 Cash.
 How do you want to pay?
 Thanks.
 You have excellent English.
 Please check. Is it full? Please could you check.
 I'm sorry Sir. I believe the flight is closed.
 Is the flight full?
 Yes, ma'am.
 Then start taking them seriously.
 Yeah, I know.
 You know the rules.  You do know the rules, don't you?
 Just wanted to see.
 What are you doing?
 I do. God's truth. I do.
 Laz. I'm gonna put my trust in you. I'm gonna do it knowin' all too well I can get hurt like this. And I have been hurt. Just like you.  Woman like me, I got a lot of livin' to do. But my days are precious to me. They all I got left. Don't want no more fuss. I want love in my life. You understanding me, Laz?
 Yes, I do. Cuz I feel for you. Mean to say...  I got feelings for you. And I didn't want you to think... I didn't...  I don't want you to go away. There's better ways to say what I'm trying to say, but... they it is. Don't go away.
 Laz... you don't need to explain yourself to me...
 I lied to you. It was wrong. But at the time... I didn't know what to do. Imagine you got an earful from folks about that gal I's carryin'...
 Can I come in?
 More cough syrup?
 I need ya help again.
 What do you need?
 Hey. You wasn't at'cha work but that nosey gal up at the counter give me your home address. Hope you don't mind me comin' over.
 Hey.
 Come on, just a little somethin'. Right here. Go'on now, don't be shy.
 When? Now? Oh. No.
 You gonna sing me somethin'?
 Mm-hm. I don't know if I got a good voice or not but... practice is only on Mondays and Wednesdays, so...
 At church?
 I's thinkin' about singing in the choir.
 I put on the lotion you got me. Can you smell it?
 That'd be nice.
 Been eatin' like a princess all week. Even got enough for us to take a picnic under the gazebo.
 You liked what I brung ya?
 I bet you have loyal customers.
 Well. Hope you enjoy it.
 This was very sweet of you.
 Well that's good. I'm happy to hear it.
 Just wanted to say how much I appreciate you helping me the other day. My niece, she's cured up, and I got you to thank.
 You didn't have to do this.
 I brung you a little basket of goodies. Fresh squash, tomatoes, some okra, butter beans.
 Don't make it less true.
 I already tossed that out.  Somethin' you should'a done to that woman long ago... how she treated you. Of course, that's none of my business.
 Thank you.  Oh. My wife. She had a card here for her migraine pills. She ain't gonna be around no more... So if you...
 Not if no one finds out.
 This gonna get you in trouble?
 My sister got a bad cough with her pneumonia. I just copied her prescription. You don't need to pay anything... just take it. But if she gets worse, you give me a call. I wrote my number on the box.
 Oh, she older than that.
 Is your niece older than 12?
 No. No, she can't go. Mean to say... they's just no money fo'a doctor. Her daddy left for a job, and uh... give her to me to look on. I just...  I don't know what to do.
 You take her to a doctor?
 My little niece... she got this deep cough.
 Go on, Laz. You can talk to me.
 I need to uh...
 Yes?
 Angela?
 Well. It's good to see you.
 Been on the crop. May need to get some extra hands if I don't want to work on Sundays.
 I'm standing most of my day. They're for support.  Didn't see you in church this mornin'.
 You hurt it?
 I'm sorry. It's these soft shoes I wear for my back.
 Oh! Gave me a start.
 Lazarus?
 Don't gotta tell me. Me and my girlfriends use-ta talk 'bout them hard fingertips he got pickin' that guitar.
 Wanna get on somebody 'bout live music, get on ol' Laz, there. He the one got this place shakin' back in the day.
 Naw. They got some blue dye, though. You think them boots you got on come from a black cow?
 You seen my snake-skin shoes?
 Folks can dance when they want. Didn't buy that mirror ball for nothin'.
 Why you stop havin' dancin' on Saturday? Used to have bands... all kind's live shit. Like a wake up in here, now.
 He black alright, he just ain't blue.
 Okay.
 Can I put it in your mouth?
 Cuz let me tell you, you boys gotta run the ball more. You get into a kicking game, ya'll gonna lose.
 No, ma'am.
 You ain't the kicker, are you?
 Hey.
 Hi.
 I'll take a jar of that, too.
 Some women prefer not to scent their bodies with perfume. So now they have scented creams. They help moisturize a woman's skin.  This one's my favorite. It's called Ginger Souffle. I recommend... applying the cream while the skin is still damp. So... perhaps just after a shower.
 For your hands?
 These are whipped body creams. It's like a lotion.
 Mind I ask, what's all this business here?
 Well, that makes it easier.
 That young lady's size, right'cher.
 And, sir... do you have a size in mind for what you're lookin' for?
 Make yourself at home. You done it already.
 You gonna steal my truck?
 The only thing that cunt's had behind her is me and half the town fuckin' her.  Your first night away, I come over and drop off the spare keys like you wanted me to. You weren't gone two hours and she was aching to get me inside her. Like she was havin' some kind'a fit.
 It's not her fault, Gill. She's had to take care of me all this time, cuz I'd just start throwin' up... choking. Just losin' my grip. And she listened. She listened to me.  And... I got better. I don't get nervous like I used to. And since we been together... she been faithful to me. Put all that junk behind her...
 YOU HAD A PLAN! YOU HAD A GODDAMN LIFE! AND SHE JUST FUCKED THE GUTS OUT OF YOU!
 I know about how she was like. But we was different. I's the only person she talked to about it. How she's abused. Terrible things, Gill, just terrible...
 With all she was doin'. With all the shit she kept doing! You stayed stuck to that bitch's ass and you wouldn't let go.
 Now wait...
 And then you had to fall in love with the school slut.
 You joined up in that monkey troop cuz you had a plan for yourself. Army'd pay for school. You were gonna get a degree, maybe somethin' in business or agriculture and you were gonna make somethin' of yourself.
 That's not right, really, cuz I...
 Ronnie. You can't see cuz you're too close to it.  These nervous spells you get. You never had that shit back in school...
 I just been so mixed up lately, Gill. And, you know, with her history, I can see how she could get scared...  ...and run.
 She ever tell you she was thinkin' of taking off?
 This don't feel right. Kitchen looks just like I left it. I know, cuz I cleaned it.
 You need a ride?
 Uh-uh. I's hitchin' up the interstate when I seen your truck outside.
 You been home yet?
 I don't know. She's gettin' crazy, like she gets. Begged me not to go. Got real down. I just think somethin's happened. Like she run off with someone. You'd tell me if you knew somethin', right?
 She's around. Always is.
 I can't get Rae on the phone. She's not at home... none of her friends seen her anywhere.
 I guess it could be worse. You could be comin' back in a body bag.
 They been keepin' a folder on me cuz of my stomach. Like how it was just before we'd play ball back in school. Thought it was just some tic I got, or ulcers like my daddy had.  I can't... shoot. Target practice I'm a pro. I tag between the numbers each time but...  But when there's really loud noises around me... somethin' happens. I get shaky and... I lose my breath. They called it anxiety. Severe anxiety. It can be fixed and all... just not in time for....  It's a long process but... they sent me home.
 What happened?
 Marv, let's get Ronnie set up here.
 Sure.
 Sit down, man. Need a beer?
 Yeah.
 Holy shit.
 You gonna miss your bus.
 Look it. I got somethin' for us. This is gonna help, okay.
 Yeah. Transmission's shot.
 Still need a lift?
 You don't got half what Tehronne got.
 The fuck you laughin' at?
 I bet you did. Just had to get that black cock up in you. I swear to God. What Ronnie sees... you disgust me.
 I begged him. Don't see why he had to go...
 This thing you got... I've heard people say, you'd fuck a tree if it was handy. I can see that.  But that nigger Tehronne. Thinks he's some player cuz he hustles dope and stolen hubcaps. I mean, I can see a tree. But that piece of shit?
 I got others.
 Thought you had a skirt earlier.
 Stop what?
 Jes? Jesse?  Oh shit... Wait... Wait... STOP!
 You go to hell.
 You think I'm Ronnie's spy or somethin'? Come tomorrow that dumb- ass gonna be halfway round the world tryin' to keep his head on his shoulders. You think he's gonna be thinkin' about you?
 It's not like I can't go out and have fun with my friends.
 Yeah.
 Better?
 Here. Pound this and I'll join you.
 It gets worse there. Leavin' me to my own mind. That's just not good.
 You wanna go home?
 I begged him not to go. And he did.
 Why should you waste your life waitin' and wonderin'. Not like you're married.
 Can't be thinkin' bout him every second of my day. I'll go outta my gourd.
 Nothing's gonna happen. Not like everybody over there is in the line of fire with them Arabs blowin' themselves up.
 It's so stupid. Says to me that he don't want nothin' to do with no military career. Says he wants to move. Open up an auto shop with his uncle up in Knoxville. I said, okay. How about now? Let's go.
 Ronnie ship out this mornin'?
 Don't you lay a CURSE ON ME!
 You better pray, gal. You better pray...
 LAZ, I said let...!
 Would'a chopped my arm off if you asked. And this how you do me!
 Let go of my arm...
 My Daddy told me that a younger woman would bleed me dry. And that's what you did. Ya bled me.
 Let go...
 God forgive you, for how you done me...
 I don't love ya no more.
 If we get with a counselor. At the church, maybe they's...
 Laz... You can't say nothin'...
 Rose... please...
 Better than what you give.
 Better'n me?
 I deserve better than this.
 Kept us warm for twelve years.
 That damned, rusty, radiator, bout burned the skin off my legs each time I passed.
 I keep the heat on.
 Talk to me about sick. Ain't been right since I moved into that drafty house.
 Rose. Folks get sick. But you do what you can to get on the mend. Our marriage... it just got sick. That's all.
 And you gonna live it with him?
 I'm not ready to grow old, Laz. Livin' with you. I feel it. Like I'm one foot in the dirt. Saw it happen to my momma. And that's not gonna happen to me. I got living to do.
 Carryin' on behind my back. Make me out to look like a fool to all our people. Tell me, what's friendly about that?
 Thought we was gonna be friendly about this.
 How many times we been over this, Laz? How many times?
 Say what you gotta say, but I ain't gonna hear you speak his name to me. Not never. You hear?
 Think this about money still, ya old fool?
 If you come to talk about that muthafucka, I'm gonna get up and leave you sittin' pretty in that new suit he bought'cha.
 We leavin' this weekend. Deke got a friend in Mobile gonna get him a job at the water company...
 Your mother's funeral. I's a pallbearer, remember?
 Can't remember the last time I saw you in that suit.
 Yes. I mean that's it. I wanna feel like a man with her. I wanna feel like the only man with her.
 Like a man.
 Son, I'm grown. Don't got patience to suffer you children and this monkey junk. I'm too old to play house...  ...and cowboys. So let's have it. End me or get out of my face!
 Don't... don't say that to me...
 Put all your love and dreams into one woman... she turn around and give it all to another man. That's a good reason to paint the wall with me, kid. She'd fear ya then. Cuz there won't be no more question in her mind. She with a real man now. A real KILLER!
 SHUT UP! SHUT UP!
 BOY! YOU KEEP THAT GUN POINTED AT ME!  You need to kill a man, all you gotta have is a good reason.  You know she been here with me, don't cha? Been all over town, givin' up that switch you thought was your own.
 GODDAMMIT, RAE!
 Test. Shit. What kind'a test you thinkin'? You mean like, if you a man or not? If you a killer? Only one way to prove that. You just look me in the eye, boy, and you squeeze that trigger back.
 You testing me? Huh? You testin' me, old man?
 BOY! You so green you couldn't stomp a baby duck.
 You heard me, mother-fucker. I'll fuckin' kill..
 You sayin' you'll do what?
 Ain't gonna be callin' me boy when I blow your face off.
 Boy? You here to make a point, or you here to kill somebody?
 Or what? OR WHAT?
 Careful how you point that gun, boy.
 YOU SHUT UP!
 Maybe I won't.
 I don't want you to let go.
 Well, this one's yours now. You ready to take care of it?
 I've had nice things before but I always ruined 'em somehow.
 Now that's sharp. That's real sharp. Miss Ella Mae set you up, didn't she? You like it?
 Get a good picture in your mind.
 What I love.
 Stop that foolishness. Just do as I say and close your eyes.  Close your eyes. And think about... well, for a song like this, I'd say you think about what you love.
 No, you do it. I can't sing.
 Go'on and sing it, I'll play.
 Woke up real early. Sun was shining. Just thought I'd mess around, try to learn a song.
 I know that.
 You know how you feel when you come out of a bad hangover? Like your eyes can open a little bit more.
 How you feelin' today?
 Don't know where I learn't it, but... it's there in my head.
 Looks like you know a song.
 Sorry.
 I know you didn't. But you a grown girl. You can handle it. I got to.
 I didn't mean it nothin' dirty.
 Don't think that'd be wise.
 Laz? Can I sleep with you tonight?
 I guess you have.
 Yeah, gal I been here before.
 Are you drunk?  Keep drinkin' water and you won't get a headache in the mornin'.
 You can handle it.
 By myself?
 Get'chu at that table up yonder.
 Nothin'.
 What is it?
 I tried.
 You took care of your wife, like you do me?
 I'm gonna just get some girl stuff, like make-up and... stuff.
 Right here. Be here all afternoon.  You ready for this?
 Where you gonna be?
 You think God forgives people like that?  You think God forgives people like me?
 No one's gonna hurt you no more.
 Oh, Laz... he hurt me. He... hurt me so many times.
 He told me... get help. I just stood there and watched him... I watched him die, Laz. Oh God! GODDAMMIT!
 You just havin' a fit. You ain't goin' nowhere.
 I seen a man die. He couldn't breathe... his heart was... was givin' out.
 The... chain helps.
 Tell me what to do.
 I had love in my heart. And I gave it to one woman. And she gone now.  Where am I gonna put all this love?
 I'm here with you.
 My life is gone. Only life I was livin'. And I lost it.
 Anything.
 Could you do somethin' for me?
 I ain't in a hurry.
 If you want... I can take you back to town now.
 No joke.
 Still makin' jokes?
 To freedom.
 We drinkin' buddies now?
 Want another?
 Sure.
 You take it straight?
 You drink whiskey?
 They sure liked them devilled eggs.
 Well, get to it.
 I can handle that.
 If all you got is filth comin' out'cha mouth... people just gonna tune ya out.  Rae. RAE! I'm not fightin' with ya. I just know you got more in you than junk.  Now, you sayin' you don't know how to cook anything at all?  You know how to boil water?
 Look it... I put the Goddamn dress on, didn't I? I think I'm handlin' myself with some... fuckin' restraint here... how you got me locked up like a dog on a...
 Gal, I been around hard-cursin' folk all my life. And let me tell you...
 I don't fuckin' cook.
 Good. Now I got the steaks on, potatoes at a boil, and biscuits ready to pop in the oven. R.L. and Lincoln out yonder grillin' up the corn. What do you know how to make?
 Uh-uh.
 Now that's sharp. That is sharp. Chain give you any trouble?
 GIVIN' UP THAT SWITCH LIKE A TRAMP! BEHIND MY BACK AND KILL MY BABY...!
 Let go of me...
 My God, gal, don't you got no SENSE? I ain't sayin' I ain't weak? Shit. Playin' guitar in the blood-bucket jukes all ya life... a nigga learn how to sin, let me tell you!  I GOT SIN IN ME! I AIN'T GO'N LIE! BUT I GOT RESPECT! AND ALL YOU GOT IS BILE, GAL!
 Gal... Matthew ain't doin' shit... this just a story...  Look it. I've seen it in nature, I've seen it in men. Ya got to change up your crop. Cuz that seed ain't gettin' in.  Ya gotta cut this shit out. Got no cause to be up under these fools, ruttin' on ya like you a bitch. Like you somebody's dog. No woman... who joins in union with Almighty God... or man... in the sanctity of marriage... should degrade herself... and bend to ANOTHER MAN'S WILL!
 I know. I get it. What's Matthew doin'?
 The seed that land on good soil is for them who hear the word of God... and understand the word of God. Not enough for you to hear what I'm sayin', you gotta understand.
 Uh-uh.
 Means ya healin'.  So all this farmin' make me think on Matthew. Matthew 13. The parable of the sower? Man toss seed on rock, on the wayside, some fell in thorns... you know the story?
 Itches.
 Cuz once in a while soil need a change. Corn take up a lot of nitrate in the fertilizer. So next crop what ya do is plant ya some soy beans. That give off a lot of nitrate. Change keeps it all growin' and growin' strong.  Sting a bit?
 Uh-uh.
 My Daddy was one of the first mens to organize soil conservation in these parts. That's a group of farmers, you know, each season they'd rotate the crop. Know why it's best to rotate em like that?
 If I break one you gonna shoot me?
 Can't sit all day on that sofa. Need to get your legs strong.
 You like this? Walkin' me through this field like I's your mule?
 I CAN'T!
 I said... STOP!
 Hm-mm... Hm-mm...
 No, ma'am. You stop that foolishness.
 You gonna get a lot more a'that, you keep me locked up like this!
 Wicked little bitch... gonna cut me...
 Whose doin' is that?
 Stop it! Stop it! IT HURTS!
 Or what?
 Now you get up! And you get in my house!
 You can holla y'self hoarse. Ain't gonna bend my will.  Right or wrong, you gonna mind me.  Gonna suffer you like Jesus say, to the FAITHLESS and the PERVERSE GENERATION.
 LET ME GO!
 You sick. You got a sickness... we broke that fever... we gonna break that hold the devil got on ya.
 Look it, mister... you wanna have your way, you take it. I'll do whatever you want. But you gotta let me go. You can't do this! You can't KEEP ME HERE!
 In my house, you watch that lip...
 Some crazy Jesus freak, gonna fuck the spirit into me...
 No ma'am.
 You some kind'a pervert?
 God saw to it to put you in my path. And I aim to cure ya of your wickedness.
 WHAT DO YOU WANT FROM ME?!  WHATEVER YOU GONNA DO TO ME, JUST DO IT! AND LET ME GO!
 We got everything we need. Plenty of food. Ya medicine still got a few good swallows in it...
 What do you want?
 I give ya enough chain so's you can get about the house. Get you to the kitchen. You need the bathroom, it'll reach.
 I've saved ya life, gal. I can do and say whatever the fuck I want.
 The hell you know about me?! You got no right to talk to me about that shit! The hell you think you are?
 You know what I'm talkin' about.  All that mess with ya teachers and... boys in the backs of trucks.
 Do me? Do me like this, you mean? Like chainin' me up?
 These men you up under. How you let them do ya like that?
 What?
 How you let men treat ya like they do?
 I'm right enough to stand on my own two feet. Now take this Goddamn chain off...
 Gal, you ain't right yet.
 Well I'm woke now... you can take this off.
 Now, no harm's come to you... and I aim to keep it that way. Ain't gonna... gonna run a train over ya... or however you call it... see... you was runnin' wild on me... these fever dreams you was havin'... these fits. I'd be chasin' you all night.
 Get this Goddamn thing off me!
 I ain't laid a hand on ya but to ease yo fever... Remember like I say, I found you in the road...
 The fuck you been doin' to me?
 Way I see it, it's gonna take a while for you to get right.
 Why you got me chained?
 Let me say somethin' first...
 Best try gettin' ya wits about you 'fore you try to...
 Naw'sir... I gotta be on my way.
 Think it'd be best if you stayed put while we talk.
 Then I better be on my way. Don't wanna put you out no more.
 Don't need none.
 I don't got any money... for fixin' me up and all.
 Wait. He left.
 Well I don't...
 Where's Ronnie?
 After your fever broke, you'd wake up in spells... long enough to get that medicine in ya.
 Two days?
 You been in and out goin' on two... maybe two days.
 How long... how long I been out?
 Take it easy now. Don't rush it.
 Come on, gal...
 Mm-mm... Mm-mm...
 GAL! YOU HEARIN' MY VOICE?
 Nn-nn... Nn-nn... no... N'RONNIE!
 Tehronne? Tehronne done this?
 Teh... Tehronne?
 Nobody ever asks me to do shit like this for people. And you know what? I'm good at it. Naw what I mean?
 Don't see generosity much these days. Everything always got a catch. Guess I'm tryin' to say... thank you.
 It got some miles on it, but my boys say she run good. Got fresh 22's on her. Ain't my doin'. That's just how it came to me. Don't worry. Nobody gonna come lookin' for it. I got the pinks... got no problem.  Ain't gonna have my girl ridin' no bus.
 Like I told you.
 How a girl get like that?
 Meanin' like a team of fellas go to work on her and she don't even break a sweat.  She into football, you know. You got a letter on your jacket you get that pussy in ya lap. I ain't playin'.
 Nuh-uh.
 You ever seen a train run on a woman?
 Go ask him.
 Naw!
 He tapped that.
 Uh-huh.
 First hooked up with that bitch when she was 16. Girl was fuckin' the principal and two of her teachers. You know coach Reynolds?
 What I'm tellin' you. Girl gotta get dick or she go crazy.
 What'chu sayin'?
 She a freak. Got what you call a sexual addiction.
 What I'm tellin' you. Girl gotta get dick or she go crazy.
 What'chu sayin'?
 She a freak. Got what you call a sexual addiction.
 What'chu sayin'?
 Like I say, you wanna hook that up... I ain't in ya way. That switch of hers been all over this town. Got that sickness, you know.
 You collar that dog, boy. I ain't gonna hurt nobody. Just wanted to know who she was.
 See, that girl is in my favor. You heard me, nigga? You fuck with her rough, and you got me to fuck wit.
 Now, hold up.
 That ain't my scene. If that's somethin' you into...
 She like it rough? You like beatin' on her?
 She got a spare minute she'll snatch up anyone... but me, I'm different. Sometimes she need the real deal, so she call me up. Girl got an itch. You know... what's a nigga to do?
 Why you say that?
 Shit. Who hasn't?
 This Rae... you get with her?
 I don't pimp that.  You talkin' about who I think you talkin' about, you mean Rae. Rae Doole. Sexy little split tail, like you say. I can't hook you up with that. I got two girls. One ain't in town, the other one pregnant. So... you on your own.
 Huh?
 That ain't up to me to hook you up. Naw what I mean? She her own, you know?
 Been years since I fooled with that.  You know a white girl? Dirty blond hair, split down the middle like?
 You need some weed?
 Word wit'cha. In private.
 Do you call it a game when only one man win each time? I think you call it a damn shame.
 I do.
 And now these three remain: faith, hope and love. But the greatest of these is love.  Who gives this girl in marriage?
 I don't know, but I been told, them Georgia women sweet jelly roll.
 Yeah, you know you home, old man. You just walked through the door.
 We ain't here to talk about that shit.
 Heard about this morning.
 I just know how you get. Good to know, them butterflies still in ya gut.
 There you go, preacher man. Get me drunk so I don't stick my foot up yo ass.
 The fuck are all these people doin' here? Been drinkin' in this shit hole for years ain't seen this many people since I don't know...
 What? I called Bojo, like you say. Called up the fellas in the band...
 The hell is this shit?
 She's tied to me, R.L.. We tied to each other.
 Then what?
 Not like that.
 You believe He wants this? A woman chained to ya radiator?
 I'm dealin' with what God put before me.
 Gotta get that chain off her, Laz. Somethin' like this gets out, you could land in a heap of trouble.
 Ask the chef.
 Mm. MM. Now these eggs got some kick to it. What'chu got in this?
 This all looks wonderful.
 Y'all let me know if these steaks are too dry.
 Pass them potatoes, Lincoln.
 One thing at a time, Laz.
 You treat folks special when they company. It's just supper, R.L., shit.
 You mean with you and that woman chained to ya radiator?
 Good. Makin' steaks for supper. I expect you to come.
 THIS IS HOW YOU HANDLING IT? THIS IS HOW YOU HANDLING IT?
 Why don't you go'on and ask her. She need to talk wit somebody with sense. Folks been ruttin' and beatin' on this gal all her days. And this is how I'm handling it.
 What's that chain around her for?
 Put yo'self in my shoes. Say you out here, alone, with a beaten, half naked, white woman loves to fuck. I been toe to toe with the law in this town for no more than being black and nearby.
 You say she was beat on. You call the sheriff on that?
 I haven't laid a hand. On my life, R.L., my wick is dry on this.
 Laz, I know about that girl.  Good number of this town's sinners got my ear, you know.  Oh, Laz. She's had a mess of crabs and them STD's. What'chu thinking?
 I'm tellin' you the truth, dammit. I found her beat. Left for dead. So I brung her home.
 A naked woman, chained in ya house?
 Man like you ought not take the Lord's name like you just done.
 Are you outta ya GODDAMN MIND?
 I told you to TURN BACK!
 Or what?
 Got no place for preachin' here. Not now. So you do as I say...
 Ain't gonna be moved?
 You ain't gonna talk me outta shit no more. I got my mind made up and I ain't gonna be moved on this.
 You sayin' that gun's for me if I don't?
 You gotta go, R.L.. I ain't foolin' this time.
 Goin' dove huntin'?
 Somethin' wrong with ya phone? Been callin' the last few days.
 This ain't got nothin' to do with that woman. Just don't want nobody around me now.
 You get a call from Rose?
 R.L., you gonna have to get on. I can't have nobody round my place.
 Why's his britches round his knees?
 He's fine. Just had a bad fall.
 Was that Lincoln James I seen run off?
 He knows where ya at. Just answer the door if he come knockin'.
 Don't know if God wanna see me.
 I think you did alright by God under the circumstances.  Your people are here for you, Laz. This is your home. No shame in showing your face.
 You gonna preach 'bout turnin' the other cheek?
 Bojo called. Said you got to see your brother at the long end of a broken bottle.
 I didn't start this, R.L.
 That kind of talk is between us. Don't you go in there with that shit on your tongue.
 I never laid a hand on her in anger. Not a day. Not even when I's drinkin'. But this business got me wonderin' what a good shake and slap would do for her.
 You ain't gonna make a fuss, are you?  Nothing a man can do when a woman make up her mind.
 Well, dig in, son. Got plenty to eat.
 I skipped lunch.
 You struck some gold, didn't ya?
 Yes'sir.
 So...  That your first time?
 My mouth is shut, boy. And that's how we gonna keep it. Don't go braggin' to ya buddies, ya heard me?
 Please don't tell my daddy.
 That's between her and me. It's private. And I don't want you goin' off and tellin' ya daddy.
 Why she got a chain on her?
 What happened in there... that won't your fault. Ain't a young man alive could keep they britches on with that girl being in heat like she is.
 Naw... I got it, Mr. Lazarus.  You wanna tip me, best do it in butter beans. Momma say she need a bag 'a yours, none of that store-bought junk. That's what she said.
 Keep the change on that.
 Yes'sir.
 Get me ten bags of mulch.
 You won't at the square this mornin'.
 Rae, look at Ronnie. And tell him how you feel.
 It starts like this... fire... that spreads. Starts in my head. Then moves to my stomach. Then it goes lower. I can stop it sometimes but mostly I just jump on and ride it out... then everything'll go back to normal, you know. Only thing ever took that feeling away was... was... when I met Ronnie.  Cuz I love him so much. He's all I got in my life that's special. And I like taking care of him and helping him when he gets nervous. When I can do that for him... it's like I'm givin' somethin' of myself that I haven't givin' nobody else.
 I'm gonna tell you somethin', and it's just gonna be between you and me.  I think folks carry on about heaven too much. Like it's some all-you-can- eat buffet up in the clouds. And folks just gonna do as they're told so they can eat what they want behind some pearly gates. I can go to Shoney's for that.
 You can't hurt people... and then just say, I'm sorry, and then everything just gets washed away. Why would heaven want people like that. People who... do what they want and then... switch.
 What's on your mind?
 But that's so fuckin' stupid.  I'm sorry. Didn't mean to curse.
 You could put it that way.
 Can I ask you a question?  People always say, you gotta get good with Jesus, if you want not to go to hell. That you say sorry for all you done and... and Jesus would let you go on to heaven.
 That's right.
 You a preacher?
 So he got it into his head that the only thing gonna keep you from endin' up bleedin' on the side of the road again, without a stitch of clothing on is...  You think he's crazy for thinkin' that?
 You know how, like they say, you save someone's life, you responsible for them. Guess he just don't think it's safe for me.
 I gotta ask you. Why do you think Laz is keepin' you chained like this?
 Thank you.
 Ronnie...
 Goddamn it, I ask you a question, you better answer it, or I'm gonna blast a hole in ya!
 Did 'ya have fun with her? Sweet as a peach, I bet. Huh? Huh?
 Ronnie. Please, baby...
 Ain't been a week and you already some nigger's whore? Gill told me. Told me how you and he... you and everybody...
 Yeah, I do.
 I feel better. Do you?
 All them people shoutin' your name like they were doing tonight! Shit! That arm you got'll get'chu on a box of cereal...
 I'm a what?
 Holy shit, Ronnie!  You're a fuckin' rock star.
 What?
 Holy shit!
 No. I just got a messed up stomach.
 Are you wasted?
 Well. That's my vomit. I came in here to get sick. I thought I'd make the toilet but... anyway, I got sick.
 Just about anything, you know. It can be funny or... not. Just tell me somethin'.
 Yeah?
 I think it'd be better if you talk to me.
 Yeah, I know.
 I'm just in one of my moods. You know how I get.
 You feelin' sick?
 I think if I just piss... I'll be okay.
 You don't gotta get up but... I gotta go...
 Hey.
 Hey.
 Rae!
 It's stupid... It's so fucking stupid!
 Rae don't do this now...
 I don't see why we gotta lie 'bout it when you and I know this ain't gonna work.
 Rae...
 This ain't gonna work.
 Only thing I'm sorry for is listenin' to my parents and having you instead of doin' what I should'a done.
 But... Momma... just tell me... not gonna be mad... we can just talk about it... Be eye to eye on this... You don't even got to say you're sorry... Just say how you knew...
 All my life I been puttin' out your fires, with you givin' out your snatch to every waggin' dick in this town. And you gonna lay the blame at my feet? Well, I ain't gonna take that.
 I'm sorry... I didn't mean to shout...
 Now see? Don't do that. I'll go along with all you say about me. But that... you can't pretend no more on that. Cuz I was just a kid, Momma.  I didn't know about any of that stuff he was doin' to me.  And you let him do it. Some big nobody in your life... and you let him do as he wanted... with the only SOMEBODY you had.
 The hell are you talkin' about?
 I just think you should'a kept him off me, that's all.
 All that shit's on aisle 5.
 I just wanted some make-up.
 I'm workin' here, Rae. Can you see that?
 Yeah. I know I did. But...  I'm tryin' to be dif'rent. I'm tryin' to... get some peace, you know?
 You never needed nobody. Always made that clear to me.
 No. That's not why...  Why we always gotta do this? I mean, you and me been at each other as far back as I can remember. Wasn't no love between us. And I'm your daughter. I'm the only family you got.
 You need money again?
 Since you workin' on the square now, maybe we could get some coffee in the morning, if you want.
 Yeah.
 Got in a little accident.
 What happened to your face?
 I just like dressin' up in these goddamn blue vests.  Your money ticket get shipped today?
 Didn't know you was workin' here now?
 Eh, if the bootie fits...
 The hell you call me?
 Alright. How much you need, ho?
 Just a cough. Sugar and a spoonful of Jack'll do it.
 Mobile technology is the new fix for these niggaz, I'm tellin' you. I'm just lookin' ahead.  Anyways, ain't no money in drugs no more with these rednecks popping cough pills like they's Skittles. Hey, that's what you need, girl. Get you some cough medicine. What, you sick?
 Stolen phone cards and two-ways is what you sayin'.
 What'd I tell you?  I don't do none of that shit no more. I'm in communications now.
 Save that hustle talk to them field ballers you sell crack to.
 What we just did, you askin' for money, make a man stop. I ain't callin' you no ho. But I ain't gonna be played like no trick, neither. Remember... you called me.
 I said we wasn't gonna talk about him.
 Thought you had a man for that.
 You got any money?
 Nick, how we gonna bag this guy without any help?  Maybe I should work on that girl Joyce, she speaks the language.
 Sure, a rice burning crotch rocket...
 Now that's the kind of motorcycle I want to see you on.
 He couldn't find his ass with both hands.
 ... He's a sorry old guy, but I like him.
 I don't think he'd feel it.
 It's incredible.  Hit him or something.
 Maybe we should bail?
 I'd feel better if we had some heat.
 Getting very weird.
 I hope not.
 This the right place?
 You said that in the last two places.
 This should be it...
 First decent idea you've had.
 Let's grab some food.
 ... Detective Ich-iro Matsu-moto. Hey, we're getting Mr. Moto on our side.
 I said let's go, Charlie.
 Nick, we can't just --
 Let's go.
 In Rome, I'll bow.
 Hey, when in Rome --
 Givin' you a book is like givin' a baby a gun.
 The lieutenant was on the pad along with the rest of the squad.  I was new, didn't know shit.  When the feathers flew, I got called in front of the special prosecutor.  It's on the top of my personnel file.  They think I'm dirty or I cut a deal. Doesn't leave you with a lot of friends either way.
 I didn't know.
 I worked the three nine in Queens, Charlie.
 You didn't take, did you...?  You hear things.
 Go to sleep, Charlie.
 I just want you to know... I mean anybody who says you ever took has got to deal with me.
 Number five with a bullet.
 Nick, have I been a good partner?
 No.
 Nick... You up?
 Where is the subway station, please.
 What'd you say?
 Hey, come on, big guy like you, cop from New York.  You're gonna be the biggest thing to hit town since Godzilla.
 Not a prayer.
 I call, right?  I say I got the dreaded thirty six-hour Asian shits from some raw clam and we stretch it into three days.  You and I become a driving force on the local Geisha scene.
 They say we got to turn around and come right back.  That's what they say.  I got a plan.
 Beats forty hours on a plane.
 What are you missing?  Riding your motorcycle to the nurse's house. That shit is sadder than Ethiopia.
 I was thinking the Poconos, Charlie. Maybe Vegas.
 ... Nick, you're the one that's always saying you never go anywhere.
 Saving your life.
 What are you doing?
 Charlie, take your gum, stick it under your ass and keep it warm.
 Maybe we should do something?
 Some party.
 The Wolf?
 Frank Abolofia.
 What?
 Charlie, don't do anything.  Promise me?
 I don't blame you for being sore. It'll pass when we bag him.
 Maybe Cavello's buying a Subaru. How would I know?
 Who do you think the Jap is?
 Eating Scungilli, just like the last time you asked.
 What are they doing now?
 -- Hey, I got a better chance of being hit by a bus then moving up.
 Whoa, I knew you were going to say that.  I absolutely anticipated that, Nick.  But I said to myself, Charlie, Charlie, we can move up on this, so go find Nicklaus... He'll be pissed for a moment, but then it'll dawn on him --
 -- I should tear your head off.
 ... I found the goombah... Cavello. He's --
 Charlie...
 Nick, let's go hunting.  Bag Cavello.
 I'll get rid of it when you get rid of the egg-beater.
 It's not regulation.  And the only way you're gonna stop anybody with it is to show it to him, and while he's laughing, you can shove it down his throat.
 Why?
 Get rid of it.
 Back-up.
 Let go...
 What's this?
 So why dive through the glass for a nickel and dime bust?
 He works for Frank Abolofia. Atlantic City.  Casinos.
 -- Cavello.  Ronnie Cavello.
 Wait up.  You know the guy who did the Weismuller through the window --
 Home.
 Hey, hey, where you goin'?
 Thanks.
 ... It's not like you were slow or anything... I think you did just fine.  I think you did great.
 Still, you gotta wonder how she'd look in handcuffs.
 You want a popsicle, go to Good Humor.  And don't call me 'pappy.'
 I think she got to you, pappy.
 Hey, all right.
 What does Charlie mean?
 What does Ichiro mean, anyway?
 You all right?  You okay?
 Cool?
 You cool, Ich?
 That I should let you pay for the drinks.  Kampai.
 What'd she say?
 Joyce can be nice.
 Pussy, ass, soft personnel.
 Squid?
 I wasn't expecting you.
 Are you expecting anyone?
 If you give me one.
 Give me a break, would you?
 You'll take care of that.
 High spirits, desire, commitment.
 All right, how's the new partner?
 Connie...
 It's getting too cold even for me, Nick.
 Yeah... I came to save you.  If you're hopeless, I'll pull the plug.
 Short shift?
 How can you be so sure?
 We can't lose.
 Think we'll get him, Nick?
 Joyce, give the assistant Chief Inspector a drink, would you?
 Louder, pal, louder.
 Call for help.
 Yes...
 You all right?
 Because we're the biggest things to hit this town since Godzilla.
 Why's that?
 You know, Nick, we can't lose.
 Luck.
 What's that for?
 Me too.
 I'm sorry.
 A wife.  She left.
 Thank you.  You have one?
 Now we've got nothing to negotiate with.
 Someone attacked him.
 We need the plate to negotiate with.
 I don't know.
 Joyce?
 I couldn't tell.
 How many men?
 I followed them.  An hour from the train station.
 I was ready to have your ass for taking off on me.
 I called Ohashi, he'll be waiting.  I like him waiting.
 You did great, Ichiro.
 Kampai.
 Just one, compadre... Kampai.
 I can't...
 Start it.
 Not now, man, okay, not now.  Work with me.
 No.
 Grab the keys, Ich, and get inside.
 It's done.  You don't have to come.
 Nick, you can't do this.
 Let's go.  Him first.
 No...
 So I bring some cheese?
 For Sugai.  Caviar, French cheese, ham... If you come to apologize for interrupting his meeting, Sugai may feel obligated to see you.
 What's in the box?
 Sugai's not going to be impressed with your gun, Nick.  No.  I won't put myself in danger for you anymore.
 It's a new deal.  ... coming with me tomorrow?
 It's illegal, Nick.
 Big enough.
 It's very small.
 I'll be a nice Gaiijin.
 He'll never speak to a Gaiijin.
 Because he knows how to get to our man.
 What...?  Why?
 I want to go talk to him.
 A resort city, Beppu.
 Where does this Sugai live?
 A few minutes faster, we might've nailed him.
 Nick!
 San is an honorable title.
 Ich, my name is Nick.  Not Nicklaus, not Nicklaus-san, not Nick-san. Nick.
 Not without a small army, Nicklaus- san.
 I want to yank Kobo.
 ... A Godfather.  His man was killed at the printing plant.
 Shut-up.
 Nick --
 We're through.  I mean it.  This is the end of the line, Matsumoto.
 I'm not drunk...
 You can trust me.
 If I smell one drop of Scotch on your breath, my friend --
 I'll check it out.
 Gaiijin.
 You can't come in.  They don't want --
 You were too far behind.
 She disappeared... shit!
 Good.  Very good...
 Yakuza.
 Smells like Bayonne at low tide.
 Broiled fish paste cake, Kelp roll, soybean curd, devils tongue --
 Ichiro --
 Chikuwa, Hampen, Kobu, Konnayaku, Ganmodoki --
 Four goddamn days.  This is going nowhere...
 Work, lunch, groceries, laundry... Fabulous...
 If you're gonna give me a hard time, wait outside.
 Nick...
 Sure.
 You're doing fine, Ich.  Now drop it, okay?
 Are we getting married?
 You toler -- yes, tolerate me.
 Did I say that?
 There she is!
 What'd I tell you?
 Nick...
 No.  Don't say anything.  Don't do anything, and for Christ's sake, don't apologize!
 You said you could keep up with her! 'No problem, Nick-san.'
 Only one way to find out... Get her up in the morning and put her to bed at night.
 Nick, no one's seen Kobo in three days.  He might not even be in Tokyo.
 He says they're very nice.  He wants to know if you have anymore.
 What's he saying?
 A snitch?
 We can ask someone I used to work with.  A criminal.  Someone I pay money to...
 Know her?
 I stole them.
 How'd you get this?
 I can see that.
 I've continued working on the case!
 I'll get him for you, Nick.
 Yeah...
 You must leave?
 I couldn't keep up.  My shame is complete.
 Why weren't you at the platform?
 It may be too soon to talk about it. When someone we care for dies we...  ... keep something of their's.  A tie, a pen.
 They made you leave your hotel...  ... you caused a disturbance.
 What happened?
 I don't, that's all.
 Why the hell not?
 I don't deserve Ohashi's respect.
 You know, Inspector, you take shit once, you take shit forever.
 Leave the rice cake outside and go home!
 It's Ichiro.  Ich.
 Give us a break...
 Nick!
 What's the problem here?
 ... We got to keep looking.  Track him down!  Great balls of fire!
 That's what you said in the last three piss pots.
 No, this is the place for the young Yakuza.
 Jerry Lee Lewis, Elvis, Dinky Doo And The Don't's.  Let's book, Charlie.  If he starts on Motown, we'll be here all night.
 "Goodness, gracious, great balls of fire."  To the killer.  Jerry Lee Lewis.
 The mayor's office, under the bed, the back room at Lombardi's.  And call me Ich.
 Where're you going, Ichiro?
 Where would you look for the mafia?
 Where do we start looking for this guy?
 I'd like that.
 Maybe.  If I come visit, we can find out.
 Might be different in New York.
 Last time you asked me to come along I nearly got a hole in my head.
 Can't make you change your mind?
 Wouldn't help.  Watch out for Ich.
 What if I chant?
 I still think you're a bastard.
 Why would you care?
 Bullshit, Nick.  And don't tell me this is all just about Charlie. It's not.
 No one's keeping him here.
 You'll get Ich killed.
 The cheese...
 We're in?
 Tell them I'm not.
 This little guy thinks you're Robert Redford... the other one thinks you're Charles Bronson...
 Who am I supposed to be?
 They want your autograph.
 I don't remember you saying no.
 I don't remember saying yes.
 Not if it works.  I'll meet you at the train?
 'Nam oyo ranged kyo.'  You think it's dumb of course.
 What do you chant?
 I'd invite you up but I know you'd hate the incense.  I chant.
 You met her.
 Where's the wife?
 He's got a reason.
 He drinks.
 You're wrong to sell Ich short.
 You could fake it.
 And I'm supposed to care?
 It's my last shot.  I have to be on a plane home tomorrow night.
 My Japanese isn't that hot... Besides, you'll never get in.
 I need someone to translate for me.
 I've heard of Sugai.  I've also heard of the emperor.  They're both national treasures.  One's a hood.
 Unavailable.
 Where's Ich?
 I need your help, Joyce.
 Somebody must be suffering somewhere, you're being so nice.
 You know where I can get a decent cup of coffee this time of night? I'm buying.
 I paid for that.
 He's on duty.
 Don't be an ass.
 Sure, but then I just pull out the photos.
 She ever pull down her shades?
 I don't think so.
 Maybe I'm a quicker learner.
 Look, you need Ich.  I've been here five years and I still can't read all the street signs.
 You have a helluva way of answering.
 You have a helluva way of asking for help.
 You can count on the truth from people who don't like you.
 I don't give tours.
 I could use some help.  Show me around.  I'll pay you for your time.
 An outside person.  A foreigner.  A barbarian.  You, me.  More you.
 Gaiijin?
 Dead gaiijin's are big news.
 There was a change in plans.
 Ich said you left.
 He gets as much as he wants.
 Don't give him any more.
 Then take it from him.
 Sugai won't give it to me, you know that.
 Don't be.
 I'm amused.
 This is my stop.
 Time, I've got plenty of.
 She's such a long way home for you.
 Guess I'm on a roll.
 I like your friend, Joyce.  You're lucky.
 You are a lucky man.  Where you come from a man can stand out.  It's expected.  Here a man is made to look a fool for standing out.
 Save it, I already took the tour.
 Ugly... A couple of thousand years they've been bound by these little rules.  Looking in.  Always afraid. Ugly little lives...
 I'm taking you back.
 Keep the change.
 Right.
 ... Remember, counterfeiting is the Feds.  They'll be all over Abolofia's place.  Stick tight. You I.D. the other plate, he does real time.
 Your plane's at nine a.m.  Be on it. That's orders.  Period.
 He killed a police officer.
 How?  You don't know the place.  You don't know the language.  Get on the plane.
 I planned on catching him, Captain.
 They're blaming it on you.  Christ, Conklin, you didn't even tell me you lost the prisoner!
 He was my partner.
 It's not your job.
 They said send a detective if I could spare one.  I can always spare you.
 Why me?
 Check your gun before you leave. They're not allowed in Japan.  It's a nice, safe country.
 What...?  What if I say no?
 You and Charlie are taking the Jap home, tonight.
 What?
 He's wanted in Japan.  They want him first.  Then we can have him.
 Why?
 Doesn't speak a word of English. And he won't speak Japanese either. No papers.  The Japanese embassy is very interested.
 Thought you knew your way around dark alleys, detective.
 Yeah.
 One guy do all the damage?
 The old man was a Japanese paper manufacturer.  Hotel room and rental car were full of it.
 Not in that company.
 Dope?
 This by this...
 How big a package we talking about?
 Goodbye, officer.
 I have to get to Sugai.
 -- Do you know where she is, detective?  Do you know how to find her?  Even where to start?  We will find them.
 If anything happens to her while I'm here --
 You had my help, detective.
 For God's sake, Ohashi, I need your help.  Let me out of here!
 Your plane leaves at six.  Two officers will escort you.
 Twenty-four hours, detective.
 Hey...!  HEY, I'M TALKING TO YOU, INSPECTOR!
 Look.
 While you were hanging out at the visa office, we found the son-of-a- bitch.
 Your visa has expired.  Be on a plane in twenty-four hours or you will be deported.
 What's this?
 Can we skip the poetry, inspector?
 The young are eating the old, something that usually doesn't happen here.
 Because I want you to tell me.
 Why don't you ask your chief detective?
 Could you fill me in?
 Do you know what this is?
 Hey, inspector, I don't intend to take the rap for this.
 Work with me.  I want your best detective.
 You're foreigners.
 We're police officers.
 It is not allowed.
 I want a gun.
 Incompetent is letting people waltz through a secure area wearing your uniforms, carrying official documents.
 You lost a man we wanted for some time.  It was very incompetent on your part, officer.
 After a court convicts him.  He belongs to me.
 You want him dead too.
 That wasn't our deal.
 He'll find out you took me.  I'm unprotected.  He'll kill us.  All of us.  You don't stand a chance.
 Good.
 I don't have to.
 You're smarter than Kobo.  You know the price of deceit.  Think about it.
 If I say no?
 Swiss bank deposit.  Gold bullion. Whatever you want.  You know the city and the police.
 With these?
 I'll pay you.
 You trust me?
 The other plate is currently in New York, in the hands of Kobo's man. Find it for me.
 Why tell me this?
 Not with these bills.  And even if it only took them six months, do you know what our profit margin would be?
 The Feds would be onto you in a month.
 Imagine if your families could pay their gambling and drug debts with perfect counterfeit bought for cents on the dollar.
 Yes.  Unlike our syndicates, your criminals don't understand the words 'honor' and 'duty'... We can't afford not to deal with them.
 The families who control the casinos?
 Our associates in New York were close to closing a deal with us.
 He'll be dealt with.
 I want him.
 I took Kobo from the street.  I gave him a home, a future... But my ways were too slow for him... I served seven years in prison for my boss when I was a young man.  Kobo wouldn't serve seven minutes for his Oyabun.  He was supposed to take over this syndicate when I retired.
 -- Kobo... I know.  He killed two of my partners.  One in New York, one at the printing plant.
 I'm impressed.  But let's use the short form.  I'm looking for --
 Seven years work by the finest engraver.  Mass produced, sequentially numbered.  The best there has ever been, Mr. Conklin.
 That wouldn't be very sporting.
 Then go get him.
 One man.  He must be good.
 You underestimate the trap, Mary.
 Not to be trapped.
 What's the point?
 Anywhere.
 Where?
 Let's go while there is still time.
 Pris?
 I don't think there is another human being in this whole world who would have helped us.
 I'm sure glad you found us, Sebastian.  What do you think, Mary?
 Mr. Sebastian is a host who wants to be appreciated.  We'll appreciate him and he'll cooperate.
 If he won't cooperate?
 He knows what he's doing.
 Well stocked.
 You certainly have a nice place here.
 We're not used to the big city. Where we come from it's not so easy to get lost.
 We were worried to death.  It's awfully kind of you.
 Can't thank you enough, Mr. Sebastian. If you hadn't come along...
 Nothing the God of biomechanics wouldn't let you in heaven for.
 Also extraordinary things.
 I've done some questionable things.
 I am?
 Also you're too valuable to experiment with.
 Put it this way.  Rolls Royces are made to last -- as least they were. But I'm afraid you're a Ferrari. A high strung racing car -- built to win, not to last.
 But not to last.
 Wouldn't obstruct replication, but it does give rise to an error in replication, so that the newly formed DNA strand carries a mutation and you're got a virus again... but all this is academic -- you are made as good as we could make you.
 Then a repressor protein that blocks the operating cells.
 We've already tried it -- ethyl methane sulfonate is an alkylating agent and a potent mutagen -- it creates a virus so lethal the subject was destroyed before we left the table.
 What about E.M.S. recombination?
 Because by the second day of incubation any cells that have undergone reversion mutation give rise to revertant colonies -- like rats leaving a sinking ship.  The ship sinks.
 Why?
 The facts of life.  I'll be blunt. To make an alteration in the evolvement of an organic life system, at least by men, makers or not, it fatal.  A coding sequence can't be revised once it's established.
 Come here.
 I want more life, fucker.
 I'm afraid that's a little out of my...
 Death.
 What's the problem?
 Had in mind something a little more radical.
 Would you like to be modified?
 Can the maker repair what he makes?
 And what can he do for you?
 It's not an easy thing to meet your maker.
 I'm surprised you didn't come to me sooner.
 Here's your check, my boy.  Thank you.
 Yeah.  It might be better if we talk in private, Sebastian.  Why don't you go home.
 Oh?
 The name is Batty.  Roy Batty.
 No, you stay here with us.  Out last night together.
 Just thought I'd...
 Where are you going, Sebastian?
 Thank you.
 You're our best and only friend.
 This afternoon.
 When do you deliver your project?
 No.
 Be better if I could talk to him in person.  But he's not an easy man to get to.
 I'd be happy to mention it to him.
 His company made us.
 He could?
 Tyrell could help us, Sebastian.
 He's not really my friend.  I just do a job for him now and then.
 Dr. Tyrell?
 What about your friend, the man who owns this building?
 If we don't find help soon, Pris hasn't got long to live.
 I don't know much about biomechanics, Roy.  I wish I did, but you're out of my league.
 You could help us.
 Of course not.
 Not only that, but we have smiliar problems.  Accelerated decrepitude. But we don't want to die quite yet.
 You mean that you can't come here and I can't go there?
 We have a lot in common.
 Like...
 Like what?
 Show me something?
 Nexus - 6.
 What generation are you?
 You're androids.
 What, Sebastian?
 You're just all so... so different.
 Why are you staring at us?
 Well, actually
 Oh, no bother, I'd be glad to.
 If it wouldn't be too much of a bother... a little bite to eat would be...
 How about breakfast, I was just going to make some.
 Well, no, not really.  There's Mr. Deetchum, he's the watchman, he lives on the first floor.
 I like a man who stays put.  An admirable thing to be able to sustain yourself in these times. You live here all by yourself, do you?
 Okay, but don't kill him.  Save a little for everybody.  A masterpiece.
 I want to do it.
 Very good, Pris.  Now show him why.
 I think, therefore I am.
 Not if everybody is doing their job here at home.  How are things at home?
 Then we're stupid and we'll die.
 Hello, glad to meet you.
 This is my Uncle Roy, Sebastian.
 Tomorrow, he says.
 When?
 He's not ready yet.
 What's going on down there?
 Go.
 Yeah.  I got it.
 If you don't, we will.  It has to be total, Deckard.  That's an order from as high as it comes.  Got it?
 Okay, here it is.  Eldon Tyrell, his family and half his staff were just massacred.  The cat is about to get out of the bag.  Pressure is definitely on.  The Nexus program is terminated.  When you finish there, locate Nexus designated Rachael and retire.
 Got it.
 Take a number.  Canapt 1700, tenth floor, Villa Vita District, Olympia South.
 Who.
 She's not with you?
 Yeah.
 This is Bryant.  Are you alone?
 Yeah.
 Yeah.
 Look, go home.  Get some rest. Take an aspirin.
 You didn't like her!?
 I didn't like her.
 Then let her get away.  I thought you were a pro -- you're supposed to be a fuckin' tracker!
 She was gonna get away.
 If you hurry you'll get back before it gets cold.  I got a spinner on your roof in five minutes.  Good luck.
 I was just about to have my dinner.
 Bryant here.  Regarding the rundown you requested on job applicants, Esper's concluded that the only irregular category that Tyrell's got is the entertainment section.  You better get on it.
 Yeah.
 Garbage man?
 Industrial refuse.
 What was the cover on the one that got Holden?
 The Tyrell Corporation has a demo model.  Check it out on the Voight-Kampff.  There's a chance the Nexus-6 is beyond out ability to detect.  If that's the case, everybody's up shit creek.
 Where do we start?
 We're using Esper -- a 231 -- that picked up Holden's alarm.  Its guess is that all five are in the city.
 You got a machine on it yet?
 There wasn't much left of him, so we can't be sure.  But bio- chemical data and morphology records of the Nexus-6 were reported missing.  Going on the possibility they might try to infiltrate we send Holden in to run Voight-Kampff tests on the new employees.  Guess he found himself one.
 What was he after?
 Five.  Three nights ago one of them managed to break into the Tyrell Corporation.  Killed two guards and got as far as the Genetic Sector before he got fried going through an electro- field.
 Six, huh?
 Oh!  Day after tomorrow.
 Day after tomorrow.
 When might that be?
 Soon as I finish the job.
 Well, when do you get paid?
 Your customer, eh?
 It's gotta be right for my customer.
 Nexus designated Zhora:  incept June 13th 2017, athletic conditioning, highly competitive, special abilities in the entertainment field.
 Number three.
 Nexus designated Pris:  incept data December 13 2017, competitive, programmed to provide pleasure for long term spacers.
 Next.
 Nexus designated Mary:  incept November 1 2017, domestic conditioning non competitive, trained for day care position.
 Okay, gimme a run-down on the three females.
 Longevity is classified.  No.
 Never mind.  Do they have that knowledge?
 Four years.  Which would make her termination date...
 The umbrella.
 And what in your estimation works?
 Not if it works.
 Do you have something against science?
 Yes?
 I think we're through for the night.
 What about a summary then.
 I know all that.
 Here's something you might find interesting.  They have been built to emulate the human in every way except in its emotional spectrum. However, after a period of time it is only logical that such a 'mechanism' would create its own emotional responses, hate, love, fear, anger, envy.
 I'm coming to that.  Vulnerable zone is the base of the skull, the occipital bone.  A direct hit is a positive retirement.
 Okay, but...
 Unlike a five, they can sustain massive traumas to several parts of the body without debilitating another.  Sever a leg and it will perform quicker on the remaining leg than the fastest man can run,
 How do I stop one?
 The five in question are third generation Nexus Sixes, constructed of skin-flesh culture, selected enogenic transfer conversion capable of self-perpetuating thought, para-physical abilities and developed for emigration program.  Are you with me?
 You start.
 Why, yes, of course.
 You equipped for random questions?
 This is Esper and I'm ready.  Go ahead please.
 Machines can be helpful sometimes, but they can also be a pain in the ass.  Ask for a trace on a forger and you might wind up at a steel- mill.  I don't mind a bum-steer once in a while -- it's their personalities that usually get me.  Somebody once said that man makes machines in his own image.  If that's true, whoever made Esper should have been shot.
 Four years.
 My birthday is April 10, 2015. How long do I live?
 I don't know.
 How old am I?
 I gotta piss.
 One more, eh?
 I like you too.
 I like you.
 No thanks.
 You like to kiss her goodbye.
 Prosit.
 Prosit.
 Two months.  But this one is not guy.  It is girl.  His girl.
 How long you had these guys?
 Ya.
 Those cockroaches?
 No problem.
 Sorry, don't have the time.
 You want to see my friends?
 Prosit.
 Prosit.
 My pleasure.
 Thank you very much.
 Shot of vodka, please.
 Vodka!
 I'll but you one.  What'll you have?
 But I would like to buy you drink.
 It's okay.  Forget it.
 I think I have no money.
 I know what they are, Deck -- Look, maybe they can pretend to feel, but far as the raw, hot emotions of the old heart -- no way.
 These aren't just...
 Love is just another name for sex. Love is sexy and sex is lovely -- I don't care what you call it, an android can't have it.
 I'm taking a piss.
 What's that?
 I think I'm starting to empathize with these Nexus-sixes.
 Let's hear it.
 No.  I got a problem.
 Money?
 Yeah.  But that's what I wanted to talk to you about.
 From what I hear you're doing great.  Bryant tells me you're going like a god damn one-man army.  Making a lot of money, huh?
 I'm doing okay.
 Hey, it's okay.  I like to pee. So how are you doing?
 Sorry.
 Don't make me laugh.  It makes me pee.
 Well, you don't have to worry about getting it wrinkled.
 I'm great.  I mean, I know I'm not really great, but I feel just great.  How you like my new suit?
 Me too.
 My job is here.
 But if you could?
 Too old.
 Why didn't you go?
 Never been more sure of anything in my life.
 You sure?
 They'll change the limit before I change my mind.
 What if you change your mind?
 Listen, I could make you a long list of complaints about this fucken city but I still rather be here than up there.
 You're going to be over the limit.
 Nope.
 But you haven't put in for emigration.
 True.
 Considering the nature of your work, that could be unhealthy.
 Huh huh.
 Your mind kept wandering.  That bothered me.
 Yeah?
 During the road test...
 Meaning you don't run as fast as you used to.
 Meaning?
 I didn't say that.  Your motivity rate checked out a little slower than last time.
 No rust?
 Nerves of steel.
 Silicone Valley.  Lots of these science guys never leave that place.  We book two shows a month in there. Those big time techs and bio- guys might be real high zoners up here, but when it comes to the arts, they like it loud and lewd.
 What shows?
 Lots of places.  The tours, the clubs, the Silicone shows, private parties.
 Book the good ones for where?
 You talking about the Opera House on the Main?
 That's what we call in the trade, audition free-for- alls and most of it sucks. Bit I don't think that's her.
 What's suck night?
 I didn't know if I wanted to handle her -- I already got a snake act.  But my partner goes down there to the Opera House on suck night to book the good ones.
 What night?
 Nothing.  She wanted to know about suck night.
 The girl that doesn't look like that girl.
 Who?
 What did she want?
 This one looks familiar, but I don't know.  Naw.  There's one came in today looks a little like this one but...
 Do you recognize any of them?
 You see I lost my contacts a couple of days ago around here somewhere and my sight is a little... What am I supposed to be looking for?
 Of course.
 I'd like  you to take a look at these pictures.
 Can I come in?
 Yes?
 Taffey Lewis?
 And who do I go to about you?
 Me.
 Little dirty holes the bastards drill in the wall so they can watch a lady undress.
 I bet I would.
 You'd be surprised what a guy'll go through to get a glimpse of a beautiful body.
 Hey!  Do your job but don't wreck mine, huh?
 Sorry.
 Jeezus!
 Come on.
 Does it eat?
 The best.
 You mean the snake.
 It's a good job.
 Of course he's not real.  You think I'd be working here if I could afford a real snake?
 It that mother real?
 For holes.
 What the fuck for?
 Oh, yeah. You'd be surprised what goes on around here.  I'd like to check the dressing room if I could.
 Are you for real?
 Like to get this position.  Did you or were you asked to do anything lewd or unsavory or otherwise repulsive to your person?
 How do you mean 'exploited'?
 You haven't felt yourself to be exploited by the management in any way?
 I don't know nothing about it.
 There's been reports of management sexually abusing the artists in this place.
 I'm with the American Federation of Variety Artists...
 Yeah?
 That some of the folks around here are more programmed then me.
 What?
 You know what I think?
 Just wait here.
 What difference will it make?
 Don't leave here.  Don't open the door, don't answer the phone.
 No, I don't.
 Do you think I simulated what happened between us?
 Andies only simulate suffering -- if they're programmed for it.
 Don't you think anything that can suffer deserves to be considered?
 Because it's not.
 Why do you call it retire, why don't you call it murder?
 Nope.  Nobody could stand me that long.
 Ten years.
 What's a long time?
 Uh-huh.
 You mean a woman?
 Have you ever known anybody a long time?
 I never felt better.
 You're sick, Deckard.
 Good for a smart girl to feel stupid.  Part of your education.
 This feels stupid.
 I don't like the noise.  Just practice.  Practice makes perfect.
 But then how can you...
 Never mind the plug, just go through the motions.
 But if I don't plug it in how can I...
 I don't like people snooping around my stuff.
 They could clean around the arrangement.
 It appears to be dirty -- why don't you get somebody?
 Don't be fooled by appearances.
 Have you ever cleaned your apartment?
 Hmmm?
 When was the last time you cleaned this place?
 I'm not sure.  Is there a secret?
 Like?
 I don't know... I think I missed something.
 What?
 I don't know, I have nothing to compare it to.  I guess I thought there was something more to it.
 It wasn't very good last night, was it?
 Nobody is freer than when he dreams.  I read that.
 That's another thing I can't do.
 Yeah.
 Did you cry when your father died?
 I wish I could.
 Yeah.  Sometimes.
 Do you dream?
 If they are smart, they take naps.
 What do people do in the afternoon?
 Not too good.
 How are you doing?
 I am.  Part of my job is to sit on a couch and try and figure things out.
 How come you're not on the job?
 Oh.
 Dead.
 Where is he?
 Me and my dad.
 Who is this?
 You didn't hear me.  You were sleeping.
 You did?
 I told you I'd come back.
 There's a lot I haven't done with a man before.
 You ever take a bath with a man before?
 Sit.
 What do you want me to do?
 Don't just stand there looking at me.  It's not polite.
 Right.
 They probably want to find out when they were made.
 Can you?  I couldn't.
 I can imagine.
 I'm sorry.
 Yeah.
 Do I make you nervous?
 So, I'm a piece of equipment. Use me.
 So?
 You use your equipment, don't you?
 I work alone.
 Two of us might be more effective than one.
 Sounds like I'm an ass-hole either way, but the answer is still no.
 There's two reasons a man rejects help.  Either because he's so good at what he does he doesn't think he needs it, or he's so insecure he can't admit it.
 I think you need more help than you've got.
 I've already got more help than I need.
 I know you think it complicates your work, but I'm here to help.
 Is there anything else?
 Ugh.
 Last question.  You're watching an old movie.  It shows a banquet in progress, the guests are enjoying raw oysters.
 Sounds like you speaks from experience.
 It would be my child.
 In your opinion.
 That would be murder, Mr. Deckard.
 Why not?
 I'd never get an abortion.
 You become pregnant by a man who runs off with your best friend, and you decide to get an abortion.
 You show the picture to your husband. He likes it and hangs it on the wall. The girl is lying on a bearskin rug.
 Is this testing whether I'm an android or a lesbian?
 In a magazine you come across a full-page photo of a nude girl.
 I'd kill it.
 You're watching T.V. and suddenly you notice a wasp crawling on your wrist.
 I'd take him to the doctor.
 You have a little boy.  He shows you his butterfly collection, plus the killing jar.
 I wouldn't accept it.  Also, I'd report the person who gave it to me to the police.
 For the responsibility of your power.  Being a police bureaucrat, you've got more than your share.
 Why should I be?
 Are you apprehensive?
 Of course not.
 It's artificial?
 But because your department can't do an adequate job in detecting the miniscule number at large, it's a problem.  Correct, Mr. Deckard?
 A humanoid robot is like any other machine, it can be a benefit or a hazard.  If it's a benefit, it's not our problem.
 It seems your department doesn't believe out new unit is to the public benefit.
 I'll see you in a minute.
 Severed spine.  You'd better get in here.  Bryant's waiting for you.
 Bad?
 Holden got hit.
 What's up?
 Next time you go on vacation, do me a favor, let us know where it is.
 You know where I been.  I been on vacation.
 Where the hell you been?
 All pertinent information is being fed into your departmental computer, an Esper 231 -- I believe -- and a photo over-lay packet is being produced.
 Discreetly.
 And how is it one man will be able to cover so much ground?
 Five, maybe six.
 How many questions does it usually take, Mr. Deckard?
 Memory implant.  She was programmed. But I think she has transcended her conditioning.  I think she was beginning to suspect.
 She didn't know?
 Thirteen.
 How many questions did it take?
 The machine works.  She is.
 If she is, the machine works.
 Well?
 Sitting next to you.
 One that relies on human interpretation.  Where's the subject?
 Like you said, Mr. Deckard, a machine can be a hazard.  The Voight-Kampff scale is a machine, isn't it?
 Nothing is infallible, but so far the Voight-Kampff scale bas been foolproof.
 But in your profession that is a risk.
 No.
 Have you ever retired a human by mistake?
 Go ahead.
 May I ask a personal question?
 Capillary dilation of the so-called blush response?  Plus fluctuation of the pupil, plus involuntary dilation of the iris?
 Yes.
 Is this to be an empathy test?
 Please.
 Black?
 Thanks.
 Almost through.
 I'm tired of this.
 You're not responding to the stimulus.  I can see right here, I'm not getting a reading.
 How do you know I'm not?
 We're going to have to start the sequence again if you don't stay with me, Deckard.  Concentrate.
 Sorry.
 Let's keep our eyes on the road, Deckard.
 I mean you're not helping! Why is that, Leon?
 Whatcha mean, I'm not helping?
 You reach down and flip the tortoise over on its back, Leon.
 But I understand what you mean.
 I never seen a turtle.
 Same thing.
 Of course.
 Know what a turtle is?
 A tortoise.  What's that?
 Maybe you're fed up, maybe you want to be by yourself -- who knows.  So you look down and see a tortoise.  It's crawling towards you...
 But how come I'd be there?
 Doesn't make any difference what desert -- it's completely hypothetical.
 What desert?
 What?
 What one?
 You're in a desert, walking along in the sand when all of a sudden you look down and see a...
 Reaction time is a factor in this, so please pay attention.  Answer quickly as you can.
 Already had I.Q. test this year -- but I don't think I never had a...
 Sorry.
 Don't move.
 I kinda get nervous when I take tests.
 You're all so perfect.
 What makes you think so?
 I keep a lot of provisions right here.
 Sebastian doesn't like to go out too much.
 Good.
 As a matter of fact I did.  They've got some work to do tonight, but they're gonna come tomorrow.
 Ah, you get hold of your friends?
 Yes.  I couldn't pass the test.
 Is that why you're still here?
 My glands.  They grow old too fast.
 What's that?
 Methuselah Syndrome.
 What's your problem?
 Twenty.
 Yeah, I live here pretty much alone right now...
 And you live in this building all by yourself?
 Thanks.
 Beautiful.
 Just better.
 You look... better.
 You scared me.
 Whatcha doin'?
 I was hoping you'd say that.
 I've got stuff.  If you wanna go to my place?
 I'm hungry, J.F.
 We sure did.
 We scared each other pretty good didn't we?
 I have some, but I have to find out where they are staying.
 What about friends?
 They left.
 Where are your folks?
 Oh.
 I don't have one.
 You want to go home?
 Hi.
 Mine's J.F. Sebastian.
 Pris.
 What's your name?
 I was tired and didn't have any place to go.
 How come you were in my truck?
 Sure.
 She is a dancer! And a lovely one! You would like her very much! Shall we dance?
 Your mom was a dancer?
 No, I'm not! My mom taught me.
 You're kidding!
 Really?
 We work on Rodeo Drive.  But we're both professional dancers.
 He's really funny!
 I'm Adam Webber.
 This is my new friend...
 Thank-Q!
 Bravo!
 You like it?
 Oh, now, that's a great one!
 I was wondering if you might help me. I...I seem to have lost my Congressional Medal of Honor somewhere around here.
 Yes?
 Hi!
 Young man, stop right there!
 The key to my hotel room!  I want you to have my baseball cards!  And please be sure to pay my bill!
 Yes, ma'am.
 Let's go talk first, Adam.
 I thank you very much for the invitation, but I'm quite busy today. Perhaps I could see you tomorrow.
 Well, that depends...
 For how long?
 My office.
 Come where?
 We want you to come with us so we can talk some more about your experiences.
 Adam, I'd like to introduce you to my associate -- Mr. Brown.
 Fallout shelter. There's a difference.
 Very well, thank you. I'm with the County Family Services Department. Eve tells me you've been living in a bomb shelter most of your life.
 How do you do?
 I'm Nina Aron, Adam.
 Eve? I'm leaving.
 It certainly is.  I agree with you completely.
 Maybe we shouldn't fight at all. Fighting is pretty immature.
 Do ya?
 Cliff, I must warn you. I know how to defend myself.
 Shallow? I'm shallow?!
 I'm sorry, and legs. Legs, butt and hair.  Well, isn't he?  And shallow, as well?
 What?!
 Eve, I don't mean to be rude, and please excuse me Cliff, but Eve, isn't Cliff just a butt with hair?
 Oh, brother...
 Please excuse this interruption.
 How 'bout a drink at the bar?
 Thank you very much. But, Cliff, that's my seat. And I was just--
 But I do miss that green sport coat of yours.
 I do fine, Adam.  How 'bout yourself?  You doin' any good?
 How do you do?
 My mother's like that.
 We can make this work, Adam! Believe me! I'm very good at making things work!
 See! I can't tell them that!  I can't ever let them know. It makes their life..well, frankly... a joke.  I can't let that happen.  You understand?
 No.
 Could I please just go home?  I was lost, but this morning I found home and I promise not to bother any of you ever again.
 ...I do.
 ...All right, Eve.  If you say so.
 Adam....you should go with Dr. Aron. It's the best thing.  The best thing for you. I promise.
 Hi, Adam.  This is, uh....
 Hi, Eve!
 Neat. Goodnight!
 And I think better than the ocean. I'm serious!
 Really?  Okay!
 It was at least as good as the sky.
 My pleasure.
 Not at all.  And Eve thank you for tonight...and for the kiss. My first.
 That's right.  And I'll see you in the morning in the lobby.  Do you mind waiting outside for the taxi?
 Of course.  I shouldn't be over here at this hour.
 I want you to go back to the hotel now.  I'll call you a cab.
 Yes, Eve?
 Uh-huh. Adam?
 No.
 Adam...dumb question, but humor me. Have you ever had sex before?
 "All at once am I--several stories high-- knowing I'm--on the street-- where you live."  It's about a young man who is overjoyed just to be standing in front of the house of the person he loves.
 Sing it to me.
 But it just wasn't where I wanted to be so I left as politely as I could and found a taxi.  But I asked the driver to drop me here instead of at the hotel.  There's a song Mister Como sings called "On the Street Where You Live."  You know it?
 Is that what you call it?
 I went to Sophie's and she was very hospitable.
 Thanks.
 There.
 Well, you had better!!
 I know first aid!
 Look! I'm limping!  How attractive is that?!  What if this is for life?!
 Eve, if you'll let me, I can --
 Goodnight!
 What?
 Well, you should be!  Thanks to you, my heart is in my neck!
 I know...and I'm really sorry.
 What in the hell are you doing here!! You're supposed to be over on San Vicente Boulevard having unsafe sex with that slut Sophie!!
 I'm really sorry!
 Scare me, why don't you?!!?  You stupid son of a bitch!!!
 Eve?!
 And tomorrow maybe Troy will help you out--because I quit!  This is ridiculous! You're ridiculous! I'm ridiculous!
 But, Eve, I would--
 I'm leaving, too.
 Eve, I'm sorry.
 I don't blame you!
 I'm sorry.
 Adam?!
 All right. Let me tell you the whole thing. In 1962--
 I want to know exactly who you are and what you're really up to!
 No.  I admire you.  I...I fell in love with you the first time I saw you.  I did. I think that you are the most--
 You think I'm some sort of sap?! Don't you?!
 I've never lied to you.  I've maybe let you believe things that you wanted to believe, but I've never lied.
 Don't change the subject! I want you to tell me the truth about yourself.
 Why are you suddenly so mad at me?
 You're not from Alaska!  Where'd you learn to dance like that?!  And there are no starving people, are there?!
 You wanted to see me!
 Did you?
 Romeo and Juliet. I cried at the end.
 What?
 Say something surprising. And funny. Lie, if need be.
 Okay. All right.  And what do I say?
 Yeah.  Could be.  Go say hello, Romeo. Looks like a healthy non-mutant to me.
 Maybe. But that's how it works.
 That's ridiculous.
 Yes, really! Basically, they want what they think they can't have.  Same with guys.  That's why everybody is walking around here sending off "you can't have me" signals!
 Really?
 What do I say to Miss Sweet when I meet her?
 Yeah, sweet.  That's a nice way of putting it.
 Okay. I like that.
 How 'bout this one?
 Because we're bitches!  Look at her! Look at the expression on her face! The walk, the jewelry, the fingernails.  Please!
 Yes, I have a dictionary. But I can't understand for the life of me why you would call her that!  Or why Cliff would say that about you.
 Adam!  She's got bitch written all over her!  You do know what "bitch" means, don't you?
 Why?!  I think she's very attractive.
 No way.
 What about her?
 It's a Rob Roy. A very popular drink, I'm told.
 What have you ordered?
 And don't be so obvious!
 I like her.
 Not that one!
 I thought I was here to meet women.
 Good-bye!
 Quit showing off!  We're here on business!
 Yes!
 Do I look crazy?
 No!  Not crazy!
 Look unimpressed.
 My goodness gracious!  This place is something!
 Well...yeah. Okay.
 Would you do it just because you're my friend? My very best friend.
 Hey, screw you! Okay? You think I'm just somebody you can buy off! Listen, let me tell you something--
 Then just help me find a girlfriend! That's all I ask. I'll give you every single card I've got left!
 Yes it is. A girlfriend maybe. But a wife? I mean...
 No it's not!
 Okay. But you know, this business of finding you a wife -- it's kind of ridiculous, don't you think?
 I certainly do!
 Yeah? No kidding. Listen, you still want to go girl hunting tonight?
 Yep.  You know, my father -- who is a scientist -- says that everything is a miracle. Everything. Until recently I wasn 't sure what he meant by that.
 Have you ever heard the saying, "He hasn't got enough sense to come in out of the rain?"
 Hey, Eve!
 Okay!
 He's going to kill himself.  Go skate out on the bike path! It's that way!
 It's fine. Just give it a try. And for gosh sake, Eve, take your foot off the chair!
 What about holding your right arm up like that all the time?
 Whatever you two want. If you've got the time, I've got the wazoo.
 Yeah.
 About clothing?
 That's boring!
 The guy with the underpants!
 Wazoo!  Try to listen.  Whataya think? Surfer, grunge, hip- hop, Euro trash?
 The what?
 So, what are you seeing?
 All right.
 Uh...yeah.
 May I please be excused?
 No.  We keep it in the backyard.  Of course, in the house.  It's in there.
 In the house?
 Sure.
 He has a computer?
 He's gone to check your answers on his computer.
 Where's he gone?
 Good for you.
 Yeah, right!  That's where you'd go to find girls!  Nome.  He's gay, by the way.
 Wow.
 You live in...Alaska.  The only way in or out of your place is by plane and... you've definitely come down here for food and supplies and... to find a wife!
 Yes!
 I'm seeing...snow... lots of snow. Way up North.  Are we getting hot?
 Um-hum.
 Okay, let's see...I'm not promising anything. You okay?
 Well, I know Mom sure likes 'em!
 I thought only hookers drank those things.
 Thank-Q!
 Here you go.  One champagne cocktail.
 What?!
 Actually,no. I was wondering why Cliff likes to wear another man's underpants.
 He's a former boyfriend. We lived together for about six months.  And yes, I'll admit it.  I've still kind of got a thing for him.  That's what you wanted to know, isn't it?
 Why, thank you!  Very nice to have met you, Cliff!  May I ask you a question?
 I like it.
 Yes!
 Is this your house?
 I was wrong!!
 You said it would be easy!
 Never drive again!
 I told you I've never driven before!
 You almost got us killed!
 Sorry!
 Stop that ma'am crap!
 Yes, ma'am!
 Now, get out!!
 The engine is still running.
 Get out!
 Thank you.
 Of course.
 Could we talk about that a little later?
 That's what I was afraid of.
 Well, I could probably get you laid in two weeks, but to locate a non-mutant wife from Pasadena...that could take some time.
 Two weeks.
 When do you need her by?
 And if possible, I'd like to marry someone from Pasadena.
 No dogs, huh? Okay.
 One who's not a mutant.
 I wouldn't know.  What kind of wife are you looking for?
 It didn't used to be that way.
 Everybody's divorced.
 They're all divorced?
 Everybody knows that. Ask my divorced sisters. Or ask my divorced mom and dad.
 I didn't know that.
 Sure.
 It does?
 The big one!
 Bites what?
 You can be single and not alone. Marriage bites!
 I don't want to be alone.
 Why?!
 Because I want to get married.
 What for?
 Yes.
 A wife?
 Well... Okay. I would like you to help me find a...wife.
 Think of me as your genie.  Just ask.
 This is for me.
 No, no!  I'm sorry!  What is it?
 Then forget it.
 Oh, I'm sure it will!
 Well, this is going to sound a little crazy.
 Name it.
 There's something else I would like you to help me with.
 Now, let's take the truck back and get something to eat.
 Okay.
 Adam?  Don't even think about it. Okay? I'm sorry.  I know that sounds mean, but believe me, it would be meaner if I didn't say it. Okay?
 And, um ...I guess... I guess you and I, uh...
 Thank you.
 You know, Eve -- don't get mad, okay? - -  but, I'd just be lost without you.
 No problem.  We'll just sell another baseball card.
 I guess we'll need another locker.
 It's your life.  And, by the way, it's a dandy.
 We'll have to rent a refrigerated truck for the beef and poultry.
 Night!
 Hey, you know. I was thinking...
 Pick you up at eight tomorrow morning.
 Sorry.
 Well, another day, another dollar.  Stop staring at me!!
 What?
 Wait! Wait!
 Hey!  Pipe tobacco!  I'm going to need all of this! This is swell!
 Very funny, smart ass.
 My Mom and Dad.
 Who are these people?
 They like Dr. Pepper.
 Why not buy them milk or something-- instead of Dr. Pepper?
 Sure.
 You got it! Wait here while I change.
 I've got to make at least a thousand a week.
 What's fair?
 What's the pay?
 Two weeks.
 How long would you need me?
 Well, they're not starving yet, but they need help.
 Food and supplies?  Who for?  Like starving people?
 Selling all my baseball cards. And helping me buy enough food and supplies to fill several large trucks.
 Doing what?
 Why not go to work for me?
 It never works out because I'm into legs and butts and hair myself! That's why! So I wind up with guys who are very good looking, but even more shallow than I am, if you can picture that. Now, if you'll excuse me, I have to go find another low-paying, demeaning job where some guy named Jerry keeps telling me how lousy his marriage is.
 ...Okay.
 Why?!  Who the hell knows?!
 Why does it never work out?  You and...men?
 What?
 Why doesn't it never work out?
 See, ya.
 Cross my heart and hope to die.
 Hey, no kidding?  In color?
 Watching television in color.
 The eyes.  Okay. An eye-man.  Anyhow, it never works out.  Okay?  Not that you even need to know that!  You look like crap, by the way.  What have you been doing?
 I think it's the eyes.
 Oh, stop that!  God! Listen, I know you like me.  I can tell. But you know what? A lot of guys like me.  Not me, exactly. It's more like the legs or the butt or the hair.  Or some combination of the above.
 Thank-Q!
 No.
 Troy? Is he your husband? Or a boyfriend?
 Okay!  Damn!
 Can't you please just talk to me for one second?
 I knew this would happen!  You're like a lost puppy!
 Please don't follow me.  Don't do it!
 Wait, Eve, please!  Wait.
 Oh. Okay. Well, so long. Enjoy your visit.
 I haven't brushed yet.
 Why are you doing that?
 Okay.
 Take it. damn it!
 I can't, it's yours.
 Okay, down boy.  I can't take this for driving you home. I wish I could, but I can't. So here, take it back. I could have just left it for you at the desk, but it's very valuable. Now take it.
 I am so glad to see you!!  I thought I'd never see you again!
 Right.
 Yeah, same here. Don't forget your suitcase.
 That was...wonderful!  I've never felt anything like that in my life.
 I can't help it. Perry Como always does this to me! I just get so cranked!
 Gee-zooie!!  You better slow down!!!
 I know a short-cut.
 Hey, what are you doing?!
 You are one scary son-of-a-gun.
 Yeah! Listen to this part. This is where it really takes off!
 Over this?
 Oh, I could die...
 How's that?
 Okay, okay!  Take it easy!
 Perry Como!  You had him!  Go back! Go back!
 Perry?
 It's Perry!
 What is it?!
 Wait!  Wait!
 Mind if I change the station? Better traffic reports on AM.
 It's Webber.  Adam Webber.
 So...Mister Andretti, your first time on the freeway?
 Okay.  What the hell?  You got a deal. Get in.
 Heck, no!  What?!
 I don't have to take a physical in your space ship?
 Yes.
 And that's it?
 Yes.
 So for four thousand dollars, all I have to do is drive you to your hotel?
 So what?!  I've got two of him!  And this many DiMaggios and Robinsons. I was holding these out, too.
 Rogers Hornsby's worth like four thousand dollars!
 He's all yours. I was holding him back.
 Rogers Hornsby?!?
 Wait! Please wait!  I'll make a deal with you!  I'll give you a Rogers Hornsby, if you'll take me to the hotel!
 Get away from me!!
 I'm sorry!  I said something wrong, didn't I!  Please forgive me!
 Well, that changes everything. Get the fuck away from me!!  I mean it!!
 Nope.
 You don't?
 If it will make you feel any better, I don't have a gun.
 I'm not taking you there, Sweetie. Rule Number One in North America: No strangers in the car.
 Do you own a car?
 Yeah. Thanks. Anyhow, let me predict a bus for you to get on.
 It was amazing.
 See? I'm psychic. Not completely, but pretty much. That was pretty good, wasn't it?!
 Yes! Yes! The Holiday Inn! That's exactly right!
 Where are you staying? The Holiday Inn?
 Again.
 I knew it! So anyhow, you get on a bus and before you know it, you're out here in the San Fernando Valley without a clue.  Which brings us to here.  Correct again?
 Right.
 Yes, I'm right?
 So far?
 Let me guess something. This is your first visit to La La Land. You're staying somewhere over in Hollywood because, like an idiot, you thought that would be an exciting place to stay.  Right so far?
 Oh, that's nice.
 Well, I guess because I'm a little psychic...I have this thing.
 I don't know. Why doesn't it?
 Why doesn't that surprise me?
 I came on a bus.
 Here, pick these up!
 I just had a mental picture of...
 What's wrong with you?
 A walking penis capable of intelligent speech.  A dickhead.
 Dickhead?
 Forget it.  I'm sick of working for that dickhead.
 Say,...did you just lose your job because of me?
 You're lost?
 No, I'm lost.
 We? I'm going home. And, judging by that coat, I'd say you have to get back to the barber college.
 Where are we going?
 Yes, ma'am.  But my name is Adam.
 Come on, Heathcliff, I'll walk you to the corner.
 No, you get out of here.
 Get out of here!
 Well, your business must not be sports memorabilia, because this one Mantle card right here--  --is worth six thousand dollars all by its little self.
 No.  I'm from out of town.  I'm here on business.
 Are you French?
 Bon soir, mademoiselle!
 Of course!
 Yes, sir.
 A card?
 Fill this out please. And I'll need a card.
 Good evening. I want to stay at this hotel.
 Nothing.
 What?
 Is this because of the radiation?
 Gee-ma-nee!
 Yes, it is.
 Is that a birthday cake?!
 Archbishop Melker. We met earlier.
 I've got almost everything we need! And this nice man...
 I promise.
 The front door is open.  Will you be back?
 How do I leave here?
 No. I don't need money anymore -- I see that now.
 That's always a good idea! Would you like some money? I have a great deal of it.
 Of course you do.  I'll stay here and pray.
 I've got to go, now.
 Yes.
 I know it has been terrible.  But it wasn't your fault. And now all the decay is over with and things are going to get better. You understand?
 Ooooohhhh!!  Of course! The father! Forgive me!!  Can you forgive me for my wasted life?!  Everything has been so awful!!
 All in yellow?  Oh!  That was my father!
 Yes!  Yes!  Oh, Lord!  Yes, oh, yes! But  where is the one who came last night -- all in yellow?!
 Are you all right?
 Hah!!! Those cagey rascals! Those sly dissemblers! Those, uh...  They've finally pulled the wool over everybody's eyes!
 Uh, I think they have.
 My gosh, those Commies are brilliant! You've got to hand it to 'em!  "No, we didn't drop any bombs!  Oh yes, our evil empire has collapsed!  Poor, poor us!"  I bet they've even asked the West for aid!  Right?!
 Uh-huh.
 Yes. That's kind of how it was.
 What? Did the politburo just one day say - "We give up?"
 Yes, sir. It's true.
 That's what everybody believes?
 Positive. The Soviet Union collapsed without a shot being fired. The Cold War is over.
 You're sure?
 Dad, I don't know how to tell you this. And I was going to wait a while, but I think...Dad,there was no bomb. A plane crashed into our backyard. I looked it up in old newspapers.
 Uh-huh.
 It's Ukrainian. Her grandparents immigrated here.
 This is great son, just great. By the way, Eve's last name. Rus-to-kov, that's not Russian, is it?
 Well, in that case...of course, son.
 And, I'm asking you to trust me without understanding why.
 But, I don't understand.
 I'll try.
 One more thing. If you find a healthy young woman, bring her back with you.
 I promise. Is that all?
 Poison gas. Invisible. Don't forget.
 Adult Bookstore.  Why?
 Also...stay out of the "Adult Bookstore."
 Yes, sir.  Is that all?
 ...the pipe tobacco.
 Yes, father?! Yes?
 Adam...don't forget...don't forget ...
 Merci!
 C'est bon, Monsieur.
 Shit is a French word?
 Helen-Thomas-Webber!  Maybe we have been down here a little too long!  Please excuse her French.
 No, son! We wait for night.  Now...is precisely when... we must be at our... most cautious.
 Well, do we just go on up?!
 These are really swell! I mean swell!
 Your roller-skates! I redesigned them! I think this new design will work even better!
 Holy Cow! What the heck are these?!
 No kidding!
 Your mom made that all by herself.
 Oh, boy! A jacket!
 Blow out the candles!
 Thank you, Mom! Thanks, Dad!
 Because he must!
 Then why go there?
 Because he's forced out at third! It's a force!
 Why?
 No, no! The runner on second goes to third! He's out there!
 No. Sit down.
 The nocturnal flying mammal?
 Uh, no. There's a man who throws the ball -- to a man who has a bat.
 Like one of Mom's?
 No, son. A pitcher.
 Like a painting?
 It's a game, son. I can explain it pretty easily. There's a pitcher.
 What's baseball?
 It's my entire baseball collection. It's yours now.
 These are wonderful.
 You know, you have a wonderful sense of humor, son!  I must say, the acorn doesn't fall very far from the tree. By the way, it's time I gave you something. Come with me.
 Haben sie etuas nettes in leder?!
 Sorgen sie bitte dafur das die gepack sorgfaltic behandeldt warren!
 Gerade aus dann links!
 En arte voluptus. Que les bons temps roul!
 Tempus fugit!
 You're right!  It's Tuesday already! By gosh, time flies, doesn't it?!
 Latin exam, Dad.  It's Tuesday.
 Sure. Now, let's move on to our French exam.
 They're pretty.  Can I have them?
 This is what money looks like.  It comes like this, in coin, or like this in paper.  Or you can have an "investment."  These are stock "certificates" that we bought in your name.  Of course, they're worthless now, but at one time they were quite valuable.
 What?
 And thanks for always being happy!
 Bye, Adam!
 Bye, Troy!
 Goodbye.
 Good-bye, Adam.
 Yeah...Seems to.
 Does that work?
 I know what you mean!  I usually wear a big hat and dark glasses.
 No, I wouldn't go in one of those places with a gas mask on.
 A magazine?  A toy perhaps?  In the bookstore.
 What?
 So, did you buy a movie?
 You bet!
 How 'bout we check with Eve first?
 Okay, Troy!  Let's get those all-beef frozen patties!
 No!  There's an Adult Bookstore back there!  I'll be right back!
 I'm sorry. I took the Lord's name in vain again, didn't I?  I'm so sorry.
 Okay. Thank you, my friends.
 Yes! Lying is always a very effective dating tool.
 Ladies first, Troy! That was close.
 What?!
 Oh. I see.
 Miss Rustokov refuses to let total strangers drive her car.
 Why did you park way back there?
 I LOVE THIS!!
 That's why little things mean so much to him.
 Amazing. I'm very impressed.
 The recovery? Oh , yeah! Hey, they rebuilt the freeway in six months.
 The recovery is very impressive.
 Almost all of them.
 I guess a lot of those tall buildings we saw this morning are new.
 No.
 Isn't it a little tiring to sit up straight like that?
 Okay.
 I just don't want to.
 Why not? He has great pants.
 I'm not wearing his pants.
 Not on him.
 True.
 ...I guess it's...just a matter of personal taste.
 Well, I think Windows stink. What do you think of that?
 Yes. He likes windows.
 He's a Windows guy then, huh?
 Oh, yes.  It would probably kill him.
 Yeah?
 That would knock my father out.
 Okay, maybe she is psychic.  Let's go eat!
 Mt. McKinley.  It's also the highest point in North America.
 How do you get through those winters?  Well, you're right.  Juneau.  What's the highest peak?
 No.
 You don't have a computer in your cabin?
 I don't think so.
 What are you talking about? This is the new Mac. You a hacker?
 It's so small.
 Yeah.
 This must be very new.
 Sorry, that's the largest city.
 Hello! It's Anchorage!  Gotcha!
 Juneau.
 What's the capitol?
 1867.  Seward's Folly. We paid 7.2 million dollars for it. A tidy sum then, as well as now. I'm quoting my father, of course.
 When did we get it from them?
 Russia.
 Who use to own it?
 1959.
 Well, we try. Listen, let me just ask you a few questions.  When did Alaska become a state?
 Why not just go to... Nome for supplies and a wife?  Isn't that closer?
 I've got goose-bumps all over me.
 She's right?!
 I've never met anyone like you in my life.
 That's right?
 Well, Dionne Warwick, guess his home town.
 Right on the button.
 Really?  Since when?
 Maybe Eve can guess.  She's psychic.
 And it's called...?
 It's a very small place. People don't even know it's there.
 You nut!
 I love Lucy!
 Well, I hope you like these! Fresh sea urchin wrapped in seaweed. Or "nori" if you prefer. I love sushi.
 Not particularly.
 I do? Well, thank you! You like ceilings?
 You have very nice ceilings.
 Goodnight.
 Yes. Up here on the fifteenth floor. Goodnight.
 Up here on the fifteenth floor?
 I guess living up here makes people look older.
 Twenty-five? Around there.
 How old do I look?
 You don't look thirty-five.
 Thirty-five.
 How old are you?
 Good night!  Sleep tight.  Don't let the bedbugs bite!  That's what my Mom always says...  ...who I'm really beginning to miss. I'm sorry.  It's my first night away from home.
 No kiddin'. Well...good night.
 My father is a genius.
 Thank you. Your father is a smart guy.
 I see.  Well, thank you very much. You've been very, very nice.
 The hotel.
 Of what?
 You dial nine to get out.
 Just look!!
 I don't see anything!
 Up there!!
 The sky?  Where?
 The sky!!!
 What?  What is it?!
 Gladly.
 Well, that's great then! Terrific...except...it just occurred to me. I don't know where I live! I'm lost! I don't know where home is!  Would you excuse me?
 Sure.
 You could have a meat order that big delivered to your home.
 Then I'll need, twelve into nine hundred, seventy-five boxes. And that's almost...five hundred dollars just for the hamburger! And my Mom only gave me three thousand dollars for everything! The yacht batteries! The diesel oil! The birthday candles!
 Frozen, they're six-thirty a dozen in the three pound box.
 Come on. Frozen. How much are they?
 Yes, please.  I'm looking for all beef patties.
 Help you?
 Good!
 I do alright.
 How do you do, ma'am.
 Say what?!
 Oh, my holy stars! A Negro!
 Whatcha looking at?
 Hey, smart ass, how 'bout I kick your butt?
 I didn't want to leave without saying how much I admire your jewelry.
 Oh, you got a problem with that?
 Sir? I would really appreciate it if you wouldn't take the Lord's name in vain again.
 Well, we're here to help!
 Oh, that would be wonderful!
 I see what ya mean. Tell you what...I'll give you five hundred dollars in small bills for the whole box.
 See, my problem is, all I have are hundred dollar bills and I need something smaller.  Ones, fives, tens. Like that.
 Really? No kidding?
 I was thinking of selling all the cards.
 How--how much do you want for the Mickey Mantle, rookie season?
 Hi.
 Hello.
 Yes.
 No.
 Eve and I...eloped.  We're married.
 Well, where are you --
 No, Mom, I've turned it into Dad's office.
 This is your bedroom?
 No, wait! At least stay for dinner!
 We have to go.
 I can't explain it now.  But I want you to set the locks for two months. You have more than enough of everything.  Then we'll be back to get you.
 What?
 Mom?  Eve and I have to go.
 A psychiatrist?!
 I think I'm being chased by a psychiatrist.
 Are you in trouble, son?!
 ...and his church group have volunteered to help us bring the supplies down.  But we've got to hurry.
 Heck, I know that mom! You're my parents.
 Your father has a few final words for you. You know, he'd fight a buzz saw for you - he loves you so much. We both do.
 Yes, ma'am.
 Here's the shopping list and $3,000 which should take care of everything.
 Yes, ma'am.
 Oh, Adam,that would be wonderful if you could find a girl. One who's not a mutant...and hopefully comes from Pasadena. Nothing against Valley girls, but in my day anyhow, the girls from Pasadena, I don't know...always just seemed a little nicer.
 I was thinking that, uh...you know, while I was up there and all...that maybe I could, you know...try to meet a girl.  I've, been thinking about that a little...just these last...fifteen years or so.
 Yes?
 Mom?
 I just hope this is still good up there.
 Right.
 Yes, ma'am.
 I don't know how far you'll have to travel to find supplies, but if you can't get home by nightfall, I want you to look for something called a Holiday Inn. Write that down. It's a hotel. There might still be one standing.
 You're my brave boy.
 I'll be all right.
 I'm afraid you've got to.
 I'll go up.
 He seems to be doing all right now.  I don't know if he's had a heart attack or just... a horrifying experience. But we  need supplies and I've got to stay with him.
 Oh, no! Oh, my goodness!   Let's get him into the bedroom.
 Dad!
 You never know. You may someday dine at the White House with the president.
 Sorry, Mom!
 Elbows, Son.
 Yes, ma'am.
 Oh. A nice one, I hope.
 Let's all remain calm. That's the key thing.
 I was frightened and I didn't know what to think! But you know-I believe him. I think he just wants to go home. Wherever the hell that is...
 And now you must let me be the judge of that!
 You know, I don't think so. I'm confused but you know, I don't think he'd ever hurt me. I don't think he'd hurt anyone.
 Calm down, please. This man needs help and you need protection from him. That's obvious.
 No, I can't have that! They'll come with their cars and their guns and their handcuffs--
 I have to. If a complaint is made and the person resists obser--
 No!  Not the police!  Don't call them!
 He'll catch him.  Hi. This is Nina Aron.  I've got a run away and I'm going to need police assistance.
 Oh, my God!
 Yeah.
 Good god.
 Yeah.
 He drank it hot?
 The neighbors over there said the guy spent day and night out here. She'd bring him sandwiches and hot Dr. Pepper.
 All back East.
 What about relatives?
 Unless we get a postcard or somethin', that's my guess.
 Well, he and Mrs. Nutcase must have been out here when the plane hit.
 According to Caltech, this Webber guy was a bonafide genius and a borderline nutcase.
 No, I can't.  I'm sorry!  I have to go!  I have to...
 Uh-huh. And it's all yours for the remarkably low price of only $200! And if you act now, I might even throw in some free lawn furniture.
 Really?
 Cute Little Old Man, if you want a boy, I can be a boy.  And if you want a girl, I can be a girl.  I can be anything you want me to be!
 Yes, I can tell that just looking around.  "Boy?"  Did you say you were a "country boy?"
 "Hell up here?"  Honey, it's been hell up here, down there and over yonder! Hell everywhere.
 Yes, yes, the song.  So tell me...has it been...hell up here?
 The blast?  Honey, I have survived a host of things. Like the song says: "A country boy can survive!"
 So...you...survived the blast, did you?
 Good.
 What?!  A light!  Yes, I've got a light!
 You got a light, honey?
 What can I offer you, Eve?
 Some time.
 Well, please excuse us!  We...we haven't entertained a guest in...um...
 To keep what's up there from getting down here! It's not the radiation I'm worried about.
 Well, that's...considerably shorter than before.  I was wondering, Calvin, why set the locks at all.  I mean the radiation is gone and...
 I thought ten years.
 How long will you set it for this time?
 Amen.
 And Lord we ask finally that you send an angel to look after and protect our beloved son, Adam.  Amen.
 Yes, dear, I know.
 He's smart.
 --do as I say!
 And the ocean!  A mountain range!
 --and we will--
 I want him to at least see the sky!
 Well, I am the head of this household--
 No, Calvin.  We're not going to make do.  Not me!  Not Adam.  We're going up no matter what!  We deserve it. Even if it's terrible!
 We'll make do.  I'm of the opinion that these mutants will eventually kill each other off and then--
 For how long?  We've just about run out of everything!
 Excuse me.
 Yes.
 We do?
 We stay down here.
 Oh my. Oh,my, oh my, oh, my. So, what do we do now?
 They've done a lot of re-building but society, at least as we knew it, has utterly collapsed. People throw up in the streets. Others point guns. There's something terribly wrong with the automobiles and...and I...I can't tell you the rest.  I just can't.
 I don't believe it!
 Yes.
 No.
 Others are...multi-sexual.  It seems...they can be both masculine and feminine...simultaneously.
 It's not a pretty sight. Some eat out of garbage cans.  Others are...cover your ears, Son, and hum.  I mean that literally and I mean right now!
 Mutants?!
 I'm going to give it to you straight. There's no point in beating around the bush. There were survivors. Apparently, the fallout has created....a subspecies of mutants.
 Yes! That's right!
 It's an archaic colloquialism, roughly meaning..."good".
 Yes, yes it is!
 Just open the door.
 Should we say a little prayer first?
 I know exactly what you mean!  Hey, honey?
 Oh, yes.  It just fascinates me how all    these things work.
 In the generator room again?
 Sure.
 Would you excuse me?
 You know, when we do go up...I'm going to miss this old place. How 'bout you, hon?
 Yes...
 If we still have one.
 Yeah. Let's dig in!
 Let's eat our cake.
 Well, we'll be going up in two years. We'll know then. I'm very hopeful.
 Calvin Webber! What a thing to say!
 One who doesn't glow in the dark.
 Well, we did in my family!
 Oh, that's just a bunch of baloney! We never believed that in my family!
 If he tells, it won't come true!
 What did you wish for, Adam?
 And I made these!
 No kidding.  Who else would have done it?
 You bet.
 Get the presents and do the lights.
 Coming!
 Calvin!
 Hi.
 Hi, honey!
 I believe there will be other survivors. In fact, I'm guessing there's life on the surface, even now. It's not life worth living perhaps, but believe me, something's moving around up there. And I don't just mean the cockroaches.
 Oh, Calvin, I'm not sure we should be making promises that perhaps can't be kept.
 Yes, you certainly will. And you'll find a nice girl and rebuild America. Just the way it used to be.
 Nonsense. People have no idea what the human mind is capable of. Look at us!
 Yes, he's very bright, dear. Much like his father. But you know, Calvin, maybe he's a little...young for school.
 Not bad for a three and a half year old! I'd like to see the public school system match that! I don't care how terrific it is!
 What?
 Watch this!
 Yes.  Well... yes.
 Very nice. Unless it caved in, too.
 No reason.  Well, it's pretty clear that the front entrance caved in when the bomb went off. So, you know, when the time is up, we'll have to return to the surface using, you know, this back entrance.  Which is very nice because it has the service elevator!
 Why?
 Oh, I was just examining this rear hatchway.
 We looked all over for you. What are you doing back here?
 Right here!
 Calvin?!
 What? Whatever you want, Helen!
 If I...you know...
 Yes!
 And I was wondering...if...if I could have a...
 No.  I think it's just right.
 What shall we call him?
 I've noticed.
 No, Calvin.  Babies cry.
 Is there a problem?
 Honey?
 Uh, oh. Now it's time.
 What?
 Oh, no.
 I told you! I've got everything!
 You have tranquilizers?
 Would you like a tranquilizer?
 No. No! Calvin, this is different! Believe me!
 How could you?! This is just like home!
 Maybe I've just got the creeps.
 Really?
 No, Calvin, you're favorite.
 Hot Dr. Pepper! Your favorite!
 I'm not hungry.
 Burnt to a crisp.  I've given you the most well-done cut.
 All our friends...
 We have to be strong, sweetheart. If not for ourselves, for the child.
 No.
 Hi, honey! Feeling better?
 To go up.
 To go up.
 It's safe.
 Then after that it's safe.
 Thirty -five years!
 To keep us from trying to leave. After an atomic blast there's a radiation half-life that lasts thirty five years.
 The locks?
 The locks.
 What's that noise?
 To you maybe.
 Home sweet home!
 As long as we've got that straight.
 Yes, dear!
 Now you listen to me Calvin Webber, when this baby comes, you're going to be out in the waiting room smoking yourself to death with all the other fathers.
 I've read up on it. I'll deliver the baby myself if I have to.
 But, what if I go into labor? That could happen any time.
 Rather safe than sorry. That's my motto!
 Days??
 I don't know. For this thing to blow over, it could take days.
 How long will we have to stay down here?
 Yeah, yeah. Okay.  Give me the roast and watch your step.  I'll come back for the radio.
 Oh, much worse. But not as bad as that Mexican Jumping Bean dip. You remember that?
 Worse than your Kraft Holiday dip?
 Cheese is particularly troublesome.
 I just hope those plates aren't radioactive by tomorrow morning.
 Calvin, I wish you would have at least let me do the dishes. It's not going to be that easy getting all that dried- on food off my nice plates.
 Yes.
 You hear that?!
 I never know anymore.
 No.  They all do.
 Did you rig it to do that? You're so clever.
 It shuts off automatically.
 Time? Oh, no Calvin. It's not time yet. I still have--
 It's time.
 We'll do this again! Maybe next week. Here's your hat. Could I wrap something up for you? Did you have a coat?
 I'm sorry everyone, but given this extraordinary turn of events, I think it's prudent that we cut the evening short. I'm sure this Cuban thing will resolve itself, but in the meantime...I'd suggest taking a prayerful watch-and-wait stance!
 You bet, hon!
 Well, put it down and come in!
 Sorry, honey!  I just got to fooling with this darn rheostat.
 For Pete's sake, Calvin!  We've got guests!
 I guess we shouldn't fight in here.
 Stop it, you two!
 Yeah. Before I kick your ass.
 Go home, Adam.  Go to your hotel.
 You know, I don't know.  And looking at you, I don't care.  It's been too long, Eve.
 So where is your roommate, the model?
 Shana Gillroy's apartment.  Remember her?  The model who went to Harvard? Well, I better get going!  Bye, Adam. Nice coat!
 Go home, Cliff, wherever that might be.
 This is Adam.  Adam, meet Cliff.
 Hey, they're Ralph Laurens.  And who's this interesting looking fellow?
 You came back for these?
 Your stuff?  Let me see that.
 I forgot some of my stuff.
 What are you doing here?
 What are you bitching about now?
 Stop!
 Where?!
 Adam!!
 Yeah.  Maybe he'll call.
 Well, we've come a long way, haven't we?  I want to go home.
 None of this stuff was here in 1962. The Valley was mostly small homes and fruit orchards.
 Why would you put a fallout shelter under a porno shop?
 Come on.
 An adult bookstore. He was very excited about seeing it. You think home is under a dirty bookstore in the Valley?
 What?!
 No. No, wait a minute. We stopped at a porno store.
 You didn't stop anywhere else?!
 We came back to the house!
 Then what?
 To get some frozen poultry.
 Well, at least I fell for him before I found out he was rich! That's new.  Wait a minute! He said today he knew where home was. What happened this morning?! Where did you go?!
 I don't know. I like to think so.
 He was always so "nice"! How was I supposed to know that's a good thing?! "Nice" is weird! Nice is...what is "nice"? It's not cool! I'll tell you that.  Was it ever?
 Yeah! That's thinking.
 Have him committed.
 Millions upon millions upon millions! The cards. The stock!  The clothes! The toothpaste!  The guy was on the level!  And you blew it!  A man walks into your life who is the kindest, most polite, honest, trustworthy, incredibly rich guy you have ever met in your life!! And what do you do?!
 See these?  Found them in the box with the cards.  These are stock certificates.  IBM.  AT&T.  Polaroid.
 I don't know.  Everything's so neat. It's all just so...goddamn dear.  Damn!
 What's wrong?
 We'll find him.
 And if we can't find him?
 Give it back to him.
 What do you want to do with it?
 Fallout shelter.
 Good God...you don't think there really is a bomb shelter, do you?
 Oh.  Well, you're...certainly welcome!
 Gay.
 What?!
 Oh, no!
 I know...I know. You did the right thing.
 Well what was I supposed to do?! He wants me to live underground with him! That's like Silence of the Lambs, don't you think?!
 Coward!
 I don't think so.
 You're goddamn right I am!
 What are you going to do? Go over to her place and kick in the door?
 Oh, no! Not Sophie! No way! Please don't tell me that!!
 It's true.  She swept him out the door whispering little French things into his ear.
 What?!!
 He left with Sophie.
 Well...I admit it. I'm glad to hear that.
 He didn't leave with them.
 So now I suppose he's trying to make those two dancers feel as comfortable as possible.
 From the oddest place. His parent's told him. I don't think I got that memo.
 Where did he get all that information?
 Exactly! I thought a gentleman was somebody who owned horses. Turns out, the short and very simple definition of a gentleman or a lady is: someone who always attempts to make the people around him or her feel as comfortable as possible. That's it! If you don't do that, nothing else matters. The cars, the clothes, the houses...
 Well, consider the source. I don't even know what a lady is.
 He thinks that I am a gentleman and that you are a lady!
 What?
 You know, I asked him about that. And he said that good manners are a way we have of showing other people that we respect them. See, you'd eat like a slob if you were alone, but since another human being is present, you show that person respect by going to the trouble of having proper manners. I didn't know that. I thought it was a way of appearing superior.  Know what else he told me?
 Or have perfect table manners.
 Yes, you do!
 Or pee in their pants when they see the ocean!
 Uh, yes, you do.
 And I don't fall in love with grown men who collect baseball cards!!
 Yes, you do.
 In the first place, I don't fall in love with weirdos I've only known for four or five days.
 What?!  Now hold on!  Wait one damn minute!
 Yeah.  I'm not the one who's in love with the guy.
 To bed?
 To bed.
 Where are you going?
 Yeah. But who's not a slut these days?
 Those sluts!
 Hey, you're the psychic. Eve, the psychic pimp.  You tell me.
 I'm his pimp. He left with the dancers, didn't he?
 What's it to you?!
 Who did he leave with?
 We did not leave together.
 What's that mean?
 Uh..he might of.
 He go back to the hotel?
 Right here?  Well, you're being so bossy I wasn't sure!
 Go to the bathroom.
 It's not so much what you say but how you say it.  Women like men who are unpredictable.
 Um... Eve?
 Adam,  I think for you, we should go for "sweet."
 Well, I'm trying to educate him!  It's nothing personal.
 Eve?!
 Are you kidding?!  You wouldn't even be a crumb on her table!  You don't see that?!
 For him. It doesn't work for the rest of us.
 Always good advice.
 Just be yourself.
 He's from Alaska.
 That water's freezing!
 No.
 How 'bout it, Eve? Can he skate around your block?
 Let me show you the entire trousseau!
 I think...it...works.
 Well, what do you think?
 What do you think, Adam?
 I'm busy tomorrow anyway. I have to buy six thousand paper napkins.
 Alright, I will.
 That's what I'm sensing.
 Yeah? Like Ralph Lauren?
 I see "elegant."
 And I suppose you see him in some sort of strapless  thing, don't you?
 I'm sorry. But if the shoe fits.
 Well, that's blunt!
 It means that your taste in men's apparel is as bad as your taste in men.
 What's that supposed to mean?
 You're serious, aren't you?
 Money is no object.  He's got cards up the wazoo.
 I don't know.
 Exactly.  You understand that, don't you?  You have no chance of meeting a woman dressed like that.
 But first, you have to start with the clothes!
 Oh, my God...
 Give me your hand.
 I even guessed his hotel, didn't I?
 Oh, yes.
 Since that guy rear-ended me in Palm Springs.
 Out-of-town.  That's all he'll say.
 So, Adam...where on earth are you from?
 Darlin', this is X-File stuff!  Think about it!  The guy's got all this easily negotiable property. He's obviously setting something up very big.  Like a self-sustaining island off the coast of South America, for instance. Or perhaps he's the head of a cult that's doing weird things with poultry and pipe tobacco. I've heard worse.
 I knew you'd like him.
 Eve!  This guy is un-be-liev-able!
 I'll give it to ya, no money down. The neighborhood has gone to hell anyway.
 Yeah!  Yeah, that's it!
 Buy it from me?
 Could I, like...oh, wow...like,uh...
 I'm selling this place.  I want out of this hell hole!
 Um...uh...
 I miss those nice flower-power kids. How 'bout you?
 Uh...yeah. It's like hard.
 I can't tell the boys from the girls anymore!
 You bet, Mom! Coming up!
 I'm going to need two more banana- splits and a cherry coke!
 Roger, Wolf One.
 I'm marking the 180 radial for five and ejecting.
 The SAR HELO is airborne with you in sight.
 Tower, say again!!
 Roger, Wolf One. Can you make it to the ocean?
 I've got secondaries of an engine fire and I'll need to find a clear area to eject.
 Wolf One -- say intentions.
 Stand by. One.
 Say your problem, Wolf One. Are you declaring an emergency?
 Tower. Wolf One. I've got a problem here.
 Aunt Barbara. I love you, but you're not gonna get it.
 Sometimes it helps to talk things over. For instance, many marriages are saved by.
 I don't want to talk about it. Everything's okay now. I don't want to talk about it.
 Okay honey.
 Well, I haven't seen any. I wouldn't worry about it. Look, I better go.
 I've seen a few.
 Oh yeah? Have you seen any?
 Okay honey. That sounds nice. Jeffrey. I think you've got termites in the house.
 Will you tell Mom when she gets home from the hospital that I've gone to dinner at Sandy Williams' house?
 I'm not sick.
 Doctor Gynde, my whole family's sick. What's going on?
 No, I'm just going to walk around the neighborhood. Don't worry.
 Jeffrey, you're not going down by Lincoln, are you?
 Aunt Barbara. I'll try not to get depressed.
 I think it's important not to get depressed. Depression is a terrible thing. They say it can bring on illness.
 Yeah. How's Dad?
 You look good, Jeffrey. Did you have a nice flight?
 I sent a trunk home yesterday. This is all I have.
 Right Ben. LET'S GO FUCK. I'll fuck anything that moves.
 See you Tuesday, Frank.
 EXCUSE US por favor! Hey. Let Tits see her kid.
 Frank, I have something for you. Excuse us everyone.
 If you like Frank. Here's to your fuck. Cheers.
 Shit. Let's drink to something else. Let's drink to fuckin'. Say here's to your fuck Frank.
 To your health, Frank.
 Darling, where are the glasses? Oh, here they are.
 Fuckin' good, real fuckin' good. You know this little tid bit, Dorothy, and this thing, here,  is a neighbor. What the shit we're doin' with a neighbor, I don't know. Goddam!!!  This is the suavest guy I know. Look at you. You're one beautiful fucker, Ben. I love this jacket and that cigarette holder of yours. Shit, that is too fuckin' much. Where's those glasses. This beer's gonna get too warm. I can't stand fuckin' warm beer. It makes me puke.
 Fine Frank. Fine. How are you?
 Shit Ben! How the shit are ya?
 Certainly Frank.  Darling, get some glasses. We'll have some beer with Frank. Won't you sit down?
 Suave. Goddam are you suave, you fucker. You want some beer?
 Fine. Welcome. Come sit down.
 Hey, I brought some friends. And some beer.
 Frank. Come in.
 Oh my God. Is her son OK?
 Not yet.
 Does Dorothy know her husband is dead?
 Because of your information I alerted internal affairs to check out Detective Gordon. I had to keep on with him as if nothing was different. He slipped off on his own when he found out we were going to raid Frank's place.
 We're ten minutes away and moving as fast as we can.
 Yes it's me!!! Frank is on his way up to Dorothy's apartment.  Oh no. Frank has a radio and is hearing everything we say!!  Detective Williams. Hurry. I'm in the apartment. Hurry. I'm hiding in the back bedroom.
 Detective Williams here. Is that you, Jeffrey?
 Detective Williams!! Detective Williams!!
 Yes sir.
 For now. Alright, you better be. And Sandy better not be involved with this, I can tell you. Be prepared to come in for further interrogation on this later.
 Yes sir. I sure am.
 You're all through with this now?
 Only you and the photo lab.
 Who knows you have these?
 No, not at all.
 Is Sandy part of this?
 I can't tell you the whole story. I. I took it upon myself. I can't say more.
 Well now Jeffrey, how did you come to get so involved?
 I have no hard proof of any of this. Her address is also on the photos. I think these people are involved with drugs, and murder. I think Frank is killing drug dealers and...  ...and somehow Frank is getting all their drugs. I had to tell you I got slightly more involved in this than you wanted me to, but it's over now for sure. I had to tell you about these things in case it could help.
 And that man came out with a third man - this well-dressed guy. Here's the photo. I think a girl named Dorothy Vallens is in trouble with these people. I think Frank has taken her husband and her son.
 Okay, I gotta tell you. I've discovered some things. Anyway I have to show you some pictures and tell you some things about them. The first picture is this.
 Okay?
 Yeah.
 Okay, come on in. Looks like you had a bad face lift.
 Hi. Hi Sandy. I'm sorry to bother you, but I've got to talk to you.
 Jeffrey! Come on in.
 It's blue. Blue velvet.
 What color is it?
 Blue. It's Blue Velvet.
 What is this? What color is it?
 Yeah. I get it.
 I won't let the bastards get me up against the wall. It's an act of defiance.
 Why do you do it?
 Yes I have - so bad I wouldn't poison your mind by telling you.
 I guess you've seen some bad things.
 Yes.
 Is that why you say it's horrible?
 The criminals are winning.
 Anything you can tell me?
 Okay.
 These are beautiful. How's the case coming?
 If you want to come up a minute, I'll show you some pictures.
 Yes?
 Jeffrey?
 And it's horrible too.  I'm sorry Jeffrey. That's the way it has to be. Anyway. I'm sure you do understand.
 It must be great.
 I was the same way when I was your age. I guess that's what got me into this business.
 I understand. I'm just real curious like you said.
 Detective Williams here. Yeah. Tell him to go to Sergeant Milton. Yeah, copy.  Well, Jeffrey, you found something which is very interesting to us. Very interesting. I know you must be curious to know more.  But. I'm afraid I'm going to have to ask you not only not to tell anyone about your find, but also not to ask more about the case. One day, when it's all sewed up, I'll let you know all the details. Right now, though, I can't.
 Excuse me, Mrs. Williams.
 Come into the study a minute.
 Come on. I'll drive you home. It's on my way.
 Got it. Thanks for letting me in on as much as you did.
 By the way, Jeffrey, this story isn't going to the press and I'm going to ask you to consider all you've heard strictly confidential. Do not discuss this business with anyone, but me, or other police personnel. Got it?
 Yep, that's right. Let's take a look at it.
 Yeah. I've got it here in this bag. I thought I should bring it to you.
 You did? A human ear?
 He's alright, I guess. I hope. They're doing tests, that's why I'm home from school. I was over at the hospital this morning and I was going home and in the field behind our neighborhood. There behind Vista, I found an ear.
 Sure I do. I understand he's in the hospital. How is he?
 My name is Jeffrey Beaumont - I live near you. I believe you know my father, Tom Beaumont - Beaumont's Hardware Store?
 Yes.
 Are you Detective Williams?
 Hold me. I'M FALLING!
 I promise, Dorothy. I promise.
 HELP HIM!! Promise me you'll help him!
 Don? Where is he?
 Hold me, Don.
 Don. Help him. HELP HIM!! DONNY!!!!
 Who, Dorothy?
 They hurt his head.
 My secret lover.
 It's okay. It's okay.
 Where have you been?  Oh God, they hurt him, Jeffrey. Jeffrey, Jeffrey, Jeffrey, hold me. HOLD ME. Oh God.
 Oh God, Jeffrey, is that you? Oh God.
 Yeah, it's me.
 No.  Hi baby.
 Oh no.
 You look beautiful to me.
 I'm getting a little bit fat. I hate that.
 What?
 Okay. Soon? Do you think I'm too fat?
 I'll call you.
 I think I better go.
 I want you to stay with me.
 I guess I should go.
 No. Not really.  But also because I really want you to be alright.
 Why are you here?  HMMMMMMMM!!!! OK.
 Yes.
 I did. Are you?
 You called me Jeffrey.
 If I die, then they'll be free. It's getting late, isn't it? I can tell, it's a cold feeling when it's late. It's warm then it gets cold. Jeffrey. I feel it getting cold.
 Dorothy. No!
 There's so much I want to tell you. I'm in so much darkness though with things moving. There is darkness sucking me. It's kissing me and darkness is entering me. In every hole. It's opening me to a death.
 I'm glad you do.
 Men are crazy. Then they put their craziness into me. Then it makes me crazy. Then they aren't so crazy for awhile. Then they put their craziness in me again.  It's burning me, but I love you. I do, I do. Did you know that? Did you know that I love you?
 There's no disease, I can tell you.
 You put your disease in me. Your semen. It's hot and full of disease.
 You what?
 Shhhhhh. Now I have your disease.
 I didn't mean to hurt you.
 No, it's not Don.
 I love you Don with all my heart.
 Just get outta my bed.
 Wait a minute. Wait. Whatiya want? For cryin' out loud!
 And sometimes you think you don't?! Well, get away then!
 Sometimes I think I do.
 I asked first.
 Do you love me?
 Do you love me?
 Kiss me.
 Look, snap out of it, will ya?
 What if Frank came over here and found us?
 Come on Dorothy.
 Beeeee careful.
 Shut up.
 Does that scare you?
 Okay. I know you've been scared. Now you want to scare someone.
 Frank would open you.
 That wouldn't be too good, would it?
 What if I told Frank that you opened me?
 Yes.
 You like to open me, don't you?
 No police!!!  No police!!
 No. I told you. I don't want to hurt you. I want to help you. I think I know some of what is happening to you.  Dorothy? Frank has your husband and son. Dorothy? Doesn't he? You have to do something Dorothy. Go to the police.
 I want you to hurt me.
 What do you want?
 Do you want to do bad things?  Anything, anything.
 Whatiya mean?
 Are you a bad boy?
 I'm doing it.
 What do you want to do?
 Sure I do.
 Do you like my body?
 That's good.
 I'm not crazy.  I know the difference between right and wrong.
 I sure don't hate you.
 No. How could he? Don't go. You think I'm crazy, don't you? I want you to stay.  Don't hate me.
 Frank is coming?
 Yes. Frank--
 I'm sorry, maybe I better go Dorothy.
 It used to make me laugh, but.
 Hello.
 Come in.
 Please, please stay.
 No. I should go.
 Or do you just want me? I'm going to let you enter me now.
 Yes.
 Who are you? Maybe I'll need to. You like me, huh?
 I came back to help you. You said do I let girls sneak into my house. You know where I live. If you need to, come to where I live, OK?
 Why are you so interested? Why do you keep asking me?
 No. But you're in very big trouble.
 Don? Are you in with them?
 Who is Don?
 No. Please, Dorothy. Why are you in so much trouble?
 Falling.
 No.
 Look.
 Take it easy. What's goin' on anyway? Why are you in so much trouble?
 I can't. I can't. You think you know so much.
 There you go again. Stop saying that. You can make it.
 Oh God. Don!!! Why can't I just die.
 Who's it, you mean.
 Nice guy. Who's he?
 I'm alright. Go hide. This won't take long. Be quiet.
 Frank? Can you stand up?
 Oh shit.
 Same here.
 I liked being with you last night.
 That's not crazy. I like you too.
 I looked for you in my closet tonight.  It's crazy, I don't know where you came from, but I like you.
 I, uh.
 Why are you here. Whatiya want?
 Yeah, hurry up though.
 Hi, can I come in?
 OK.
 It's a secret so don't tell anyone. Some day I'll show you where. I've gotta go to sleep now.
 Don't say that.
 Did I say that? I didn't mean it, or did I?  Sometimes I think it would be fun.  Go ahead, you better leave now. I can't open myself to you now. I'll tell you a little secret.  I want to die.
 Then don't talk about killing.
 Go then. I can't let you put it in me now but I want you. I like you.
 Please don't talk like that. You're upset. I'm not helping you. I'm sorry for what I did. I better go.
 Maybe you don't know. I know you though. You're Jeffrey Beaumont and I know where you live and I know ways to get you and I know ways to kill you.
 No. What is happening?
 You don't?
 No.
 Do you know?
 Next Christmas. Is he Santa Claus who has left a present for Dorothy? What was it? An ear? Another ear?!!  What was it?
 What?
 I made it go down the toilet.
 You can be my special friend and come and put that in me.
 Yes, I like you.
 Do you like me?
 No, please. I won't.
 You can hit me, if you want to.
 You can kiss them if you want. Feel them. They're getting hard.
 Yes.
 See my nipples?
 Yes.
 See my breasts? See?
 Yes.
 Do you like the way I feel?
 It's okay. It's okay.
 Thank you. honey.
 Don. Hold me. I'm scared. Hold me. Please.
 No.
 Don?
 I'll go then.
 Sure I'm alright.
 Nothing. Are you alright?
 Don't.  I don't like that. What do you want?
 Lie down on the bed.
 No.
 Do you like talk like that?
 Yes.
 Do you like that?
 What do you want?
 I, I don't know.
 What do you want from me?
 No way.
 Look. I'm sorry. Just let me leave.
 NO, you come on. Take off your pants. I want to see you.
 No. Come on.
 How'd you like it if someone sneaked into your house and watched you.  Get undressed. I want to see you.
 Never before this.
 How many times have you sneaked into girls' apartments and watched them undress?
 Then you got undressed.
 THEN WHAT?
 Well.
 That's right. That's what I said. You have a good memory. Then what?
 You said hello, to Frank. You wanted to talk to someone? Don? And little Donny. You said something about Momma loves you. And something about a Meadow Lane. Something in an hour. I don't remember any more.
 The phone. What did you hear on the phone. Tell me. Word for word.
 I saw you come in, talk on the phone. Get undressed.
 Tell me what you saw tonight. TELL ME.
 I sprayed your apartment. I took your key. I really didn't mean to do anything but see you.
 An experiment? Hey, I've seen you before.
 I was an experiment. Just to see if I could do it.
 Shit. You better tell me something.
 Nobody.
 What? Are you kidding me? Who sent you here?
 I wanted to see you.
 You tell me!! Let me see that wallet.  Jeffrey Beaumont. What're you doing in my apartment, Jeffrey Beaumont?
 Jeffrey nothing.
 Jeffrey. Jeffrey what?
 Jeffrey.
 GET OUT OF THERE!!! GET OUT!!! Put your hands up, on your head. GO ON!!! Get down on your knees - DO IT!! What are you doing? Who are you? What's your name? WHAT'S YOUR NAME?
 Yeah.
 That oughta do it.
 Oh yeah, that's good.
 Nope, it's new stuff. No smell.
 Oh God, that stuff stinks.
 Pest control, gotta do your apartment.
 Yes? What is it?
 Okay, I'm goin'. You'll see, I'll get you.
 No way, get out. I'm gonna tell Frank. I'm gonna tell him what you said.
 He's the reformed dealer though who wanted to turn himself in. He's the one that caused Frank to come and Frank's fucking us real good. I just feel so horny. I'm supposed to be here watching you why can't I be here fucking you. Listen. I know his cock's the size of a pin - let me give you the real thing. Let me wet my whistle, baby.
 Oh he forced you, huh?
 Yeah, maybe so. Frank's got me, and you and really it's all thanks to Don, isn't it. Remember that. Your husband was the one who started fucking my mind with drugs.
 'Cause he's comin' back, that's what for. Frank's got you really loaded tonight.
 He's comin' back? What for?
 Alright, suit yourself.
 Bull.
 Yeah, but get outta here. He's comin' back.
 Frank gone?
 Shut up. Gimme your lipstick.  Hey, pretty, pretty.
 Frank, he didn't mean it. Leave him alone. Come on. He didn't mean it.
 If you want to.
 Can I feel 'em?
 Those are my breasts.
 Don't say PLEASE, Fuckhead. WHAT ARE THESE?
 Come on, Frank. Let's go. Please.
 Look at these. What are these?
 Then, shut up!
 Yes, but.
 You want to see him too, right?
 Frank?
 Hey Tits, I'm taking your neighbor to the country. Maybe something for you too.
 Where are we going, Frank?
 From the neighborhood?  Shut the fuck up.  You like telephones? Huh? You wanta go for a ride?
 He's a friend. From the neighborhood. We were just talking.
 Who's this fuck?
 Baby wants to fuck.
 Mommy's here.
 MOMMY!
 My bourbon.
 Hello, daddy.
 Shut up. It's daddy, shit-head.
 Hello, baby.
 Yeah. I sure know that. Yeah, but how many more are out there?
 We're going to leave that up to Detective Williams. I'll tell you though, you're okay. You shot a real son of a bitch.
 Yeah. I guess I did.  What's going to happen to me?
 You seemed to see some very interesting things on your little escapade with Dorothy Vallens.
 He became obsessed with her. She hated him. He had to have her. He kidnapped them to control her. To make her do things. Then she wanted to commit suicide so he started cutting off ears as a warning to her to stay alive. I'm not kidding. Frank loved blue, blue velvet. He had to have Dorothy cause her whole life was blue.
 We're looking for him. In your opinion, why did Frank kidnap Dorothy's son and husband?
 I'll send you straight to hell, Fuck!
 Yes.
 Don't be a good neighbor to her or I'm gonna send you a love letter. Straight from my heart, fucker. You know what a love letter is? It's a bullet, straight from my gun, fucker. Once you get a love letter from me, you're fucked forever. Understand, Fuck?
 Don't look at me, Fuck. I shoot when I see the whites of the eyes.  You like me?
 Nothing.
 What are you lookin' at?
 Let's take our neighbor out. Let him fuckin' walk back.
 What?
 Hey? You like to walk.
 Do you see, Ben? I can make him do anything I fuckin' please.
 Here's to Ben.
 Hey neighbor. Here's to Ben.
 FUCK THAT SHIT. PABST BLUE RIBBON!!!
 Heineken.
 A ride? Hell, that's a good idea. Okay, let's go. Hey, let's go.
 On a ride.
 Go where?
 I don't want to go.
 No thanks. What does that mean?
 No thanks.
 Speak to me Fucker.
 Hello?
 Good, let's drink up.
 There ya go.
 No, I want ya to fuck it. Shit, yes, pour the fuckin' beer.
 Right here Frank. You want me to pour it?
 Raymond! Where's the fuckin' beer?
 What kinda beer do you like?
 Okay Frank.
 Come on. I wancha to meet a frienda mine. Raymond, get enough beer for Ben too.
 You can't just stay out half the night and carry on, Jeffrey. There's got to be some order, Jeffrey. I thought it would have been nice to call your father when you got home but now it is much too late.
 Nothing. I'm fine.
 Is something wrong? What's happened to your face?
 God, you scared me.
 Of course, Jeffrey.
 Can I use the car tonight?
 Alright.
 No, I'm just gonna walk around.
 Do you want the car?
 I'm going out for awhile.
 Jeffrey! Nobody wanted you to leave school and go to work in the store, maybe going back to school will be an option one day. I hope so.
 Thanks a lot, Mom.
 It would be too much for him. So please let him think as he does, that you're home just to see him.
 What?
 He doesn't know you're out of school. He thinks it's a vacation for you.
 Yeah?
 Jeffrey, when you see your father.
 Well. Okay.
 I've made arrangements with Dr. Gynde for 10:30. But Jeffrey, you'll have to walk over; I need the car this morning.
 What time are visiting hours?
 Be right down.
 Jeffrey, breakfast is ready.
 This is it.
 Where's all your things, Jeffrey?
 Mom.
 Jeffrey, honey. Your father's condition is serious. It's going to cost so much. We just won't have the money to keep you in school. I'm telling you this now, so that you can get your things together and check out of school, honey, or whatever you have to do, it'll save you another trip back. You're going to have to work at the store.
 For good? I can't Mom. Not right in the middle of the term.
 I mean, for good, Jeffrey.
 I'll get a coat for her.
 Sandy?... Sandy, please.
 Nice of you to offer, Jeffrey, but certainly not. Just relax and enjoy your coffee. I'm sure Sandy will be back soon.
 Sure thing, please don't worry about me. Can I help you with the dishes?
 Please excuse me a moment, Jeffrey, and I'll get to the dishes.
 Anyone else? Alright Jeffrey, just a minute.
 That sounds great!
 Here you are. Would anyone like coffee?
 Say "goodnight" to Sandy.
 Oh, you're welcome. Nice to finally meet you, Jeffrey.
 Mrs. Williams? Thanks for the cake.
 Yeah.
 He comes over to study.
 Yeah. okay.
 It's a real good chocolate cake. Duncan Hines' devil's food. Real good.
 No. No thank you.
 Would you like a piece of cake?
 Yeah, I know.
 I was sorry to hear about your father. I know your mother from church. It's such a shame.
 Alright.
 Really, he'll be home soon, would you like a cup of coffee?
 I just wanted to ask him a few questions, that's all. Maybe I better go.
 Oh, yes, Jeffrey. Come in. He'll be back any minute now. You're welcome to wait. Is it urgent?
 Hello, uh, my name is Jeffrey Beaumont. Is Detective Williams in?
 Later Mike. I gotta take care of someone who's hurt here, in case you haven't noticed.
 Hey, you ivy league shit. COME HERE!
 Well, most guys don't. I mean that's the point. You all mind if I take my vitamins?
 Yeah, well I never wanted to get slaughtered much.
 I mean, some guys play anyway but they usually get slaughtered.
 No, you're right.
 I mean, you don't exactly have the build for a football. I mean, no offense.
 Well.
 Looks like you'd make a good runner.
 No.
 Good deal Dad.
 Hey Jeff. I'm feelin' so much better.
 How ya doin' Dad?
 It's good to see you, Dad.
 Good to see you, son.
 Uh-uh.
 Are you feeling okay?
 Uh-uh.
 Looks like they've got you strapped in pretty good.
 Hey Jeff.
 Hi Dad.
 Yeah. I just saw him outside. Maybe the robins are here.
 Look Jeffrey.
 Yes I'm going. I have to. I love you. I will, believe me.
 No Jeffrey!!
 Please get to your father and send him and the police to Dorothy's apartment right away. Be sure your father comes. Something is happening over there. They're hurting someone, the guy she loves. Tell them to hurry. I'm going over right now.
 Go ahead!
 Sandy?
 Go ahead.
 I should go with her, Sandy.
 Shhh. I'll tell you.
 Jeffrey? What's going on?
 Right. Watch out for Mike, there.
 Okay. Let's get her over to your father's.
 Probably not. No. Why?
 No. Is Detective Gordon going to be at your house?
 Take her to my house. My dad can get an ambulance faster than anyone. Do you have anything to put around her?
 Yes.
 Dorothy Vallens?
 Dorothy!... Dorothy!
 Sandy, this guy is a killer!! I promise you.
 No.
 My father has a gun at home.
 Frank!!!
 Oh my God. What's wrong?
 Okay.
 You want to dance?
 Just a minute.
 Let's wait for some slow one.
 NO.
 Really. You want to dance with someone else?
 Really?
 I can't dance fast.
 You want to dance?
 I like that idea, that's a real good idea.
 Thank you. Whatiya say we just enjoy the evening?
 You look beautiful.
 It's okay.
 I'd rather not talk about it. I'll tell you about it sometime.
 Just go over to Gelford and up to Vista. It's not far. Can you tell me any more about what you learned?
 Where to?
 It's good to see you.
 Nothing, really! It's good to see you.
 What was that all about?
 Just some fatherly advice.
 What is it?
 Okay.
 Okay. Great!
 I should never had gotten you going on this.  Yes Jeffrey. Friday's on!
 No.
 You didn't tell him about me?
 Yeah. I think so. I just had to tell him some of what I knew. Is Friday still on?
 Everything okay?
 Okay, but I promise I won't mention you. Okay? I'll see him at the police station, okay? See you Friday night, if not before.
 Jeffrey, are they important things? Well forget me - you have to tell him. Jeffrey, I mean it.
 Great. Hey, I've got a bit of a problem. I know some things that could help your father but you might get into trouble.
 Yes. Is that so surprising? Yeah I worry, a lot. I got you into this.
 You worry about me really?
 Yeah, you're a mystery. I like you. Very much.
 You like mysteries that much?
 I'm seeing something that was always hidden. I'm involved in a mystery. I'm learning. And it's all secret.
 Jeffrey? Why?
 Yeah.
 I can't believe what you are finding out. Are you going to continue with this. Are you going back to her apartment?
 Then these guys told me the police will find a huge amount of drugs inside the dead man's place.
 Jeffrey!!
 Number two. I saw the Yellow Man come out. This time with a well- dressed man with an alligator briefcase. They drove down this factory building and stood on a staircase looking at something in the distance. Number three. Now get this. In the distance was a murder. A drug dealer shot to death and a woman with her legs broken.
 Oh yeah?
 Maybe. But I think the Yellow Man is on drugs. I think Frank supplies him.
 Nothing really, but it's interesting. They know each other. They seem to like each other.
 Number one. I saw the Yellow Man go into Frank's building, laughing with Frank. Now, the only trouble is, what does this prove?
 Shoot.
 That's what makes it so good. You wanta hear what I saw today?
 You know, that cheese is practically all chemicals.
 Yeah, but I don't think it's going to do much good. Let's go. I'll try to talk to him later.
 You want to go talk to him?
 What am I going to do?
 I'm really sorry.
 You were late.
 See ya tomorrow.
 Goodnight.
 Okay, okay.
 You better not, Jeffrey.
 Can I give you a kiss good night?
 Okay, Sandy.
 Okay, be careful.
 I will. I'll pick you up on the same corner at three thirty-five, okay?
 No, silly - I'm still in school you know. But I'll meet you after school and you can tell me what you've learned. You better be careful, Jeffrey.
 I guess so. You want to help me watch Frank? I'm going to stake out Frank's place tomorrow with a camera.
 So are you.  I mean you're a neat guy. We better get back.
 Yeah I guess so.  You're a neat girl.
 I don't know. I had a dream. In fact, the night I met you.  In the dream the world was dark because there weren't any robins. You know, birds. Robins stood for love, and all of a sudden thousands of robins flew down and brought this blinding light of love. And it felt like that love would be the only thing that would make any difference. I guess, until the robins come there is trouble.
 Why are there people like Frank. Why is there so much trouble in this world?
 You're sure right. It is a strange world.
 That's what I thought.
 Who, me? Why should it?
 That doesn't bother you, does it?
 Yeah?
 Yeah. I mean a little, you know.
 Did you see her undressed?
 Yes.
 Twice. Without her sensing anything?
 Actually. I've been in twice.
 You saw a lot in one night.
 I don't see how I can, and I can't prove any of this. I got all this information illegally. Also it could get you in trouble.
 Wow. Should you tell my father?
 OK. It's a strange world, Sandy. This is what I have found out. What I think I have found out. Dorothy Vallens is married to a man named Don. They have a son. I think the son and the husband have been kidnapped by a man named Frank who has now cut off both of Don's ears. I think he is holding them to make her do things for him. I think she wants to die. The ears were for her a warning to stay alive. There is another man involved. I call him the "yellow man". You saw his back the other day in the hall at her door. I don't know what he does but I think he's on drugs supplied by Frank. Frank is a very dangerous man.
 You want to tell me about it?
 No way. I'm about to blow up.
 You want a Dairy Queen?
 It's okay. Don't worry about it.
 I'm sorry, I didn't...
 He got a little jealous.
 What's with Mike?
 Well.  Maybe we should discuss this somewhere else, you know what I mean?
 What did you see?
 Well, I've found out some things, nothing really for certain. There are some strange people involved.
 Well, how did it go? What happened?
 Okay, okay. Bye.
 That's for me to know and for you to find out. I'll see you. I mean call you, okay?
 I don't know if you're a detective or a pervert.
 Okay, thanks.
 I'll honk four times so you'll hear it and know she's on her way up. Okay?
 Are you sure?
 I'm going to wait here until she comes.
 Yeah.
 Call tomorrow. It's okay. Good luck. I hope you can sneak out okay. You're going to wait until she's asleep?
 Look, it can wait till Sunday.
 Okay, yeah, call.
 Oh, okay, can I call?
 I, I don't want to see you tomorrow. Mike's coming over.
 I'm going in, Sandy. I'll see you tomorrow and tell you how it went.
 I wish you wouldn't do this. It doesn't make any sense. Let's go somewhere and have some coffee.
 Could you wait a little while, this key may not fit.
 OK.
 Leave it in the front of your house for me, okay?
 Yeah, but.
 It'll be okay. I don't think you should wait out here though. I think you should go home. Can you drive this car?
 It's crazy and dangerous. My God, I shouldn't have told you.
 Why not?
 Jeffrey, I don't think you ought to do it.
 I'll drink to that.
 Here's to. An interesting experience.
 Two.
 That sounds good.
 This is not my usual Friday night!
 Then we'll drive back to her apartment and I will plant myself there.
 Brilliant.
 First of all, we're going to the Slow Club to see Dorothy Vallens. We'll watch her for awhile. I'd like to hear her sing anyway, and then also we'll know she is there and not in her apartment.
 What's the plan.
 Okay. You better get out before someone sees us.
 Yeah, but don't pick me up. My father may think it's strange. I'll walk over to your house. I'll be there at eight o'clock.
 Great. I'll pick you up around eight o'clock. Is that good?
 I already know. The "Slow Club". It's on Route 7.
 First of all, we'll have a nice dinner. Try to find out where Dorothy sings.
 I'll tell Mike I'm sick. There's a game tonight anyway and he'll never miss me. Afterwards he can go out with the guys. Just so the record is kept straight though, I love Mike. What do want me to do?
 I don't want you to get involved, really, I mean, I do, but if something went wrong I mean, like you said, they may be involved in murder.
 You really want to do this, don't you?
 Well, it's Friday night and you're a beautiful girl. I guess you would have a date, that does that.
 Yes. I do.
 You didn't goof it up, but you still owe me one. I want to sneak in tonight. It's Friday, do you have a date tonight?
 I owe you, since I goofed up this one.
 Pretty clever. Are you game for more?
 So, what's next?
 Yeah.
 Yeah, if it opens the door.
 I didn't get a good look at him either, but he sure looked at me. I didn't have time to get a window, but I found this key.  Pretty nifty, huh?
 No. I only saw his back. He went down another stairwell at the end of the hall.
 Yes and no. Did you recognize him?
 I was just about to go to the door, when that man did my job for me. Was it alright?
 Yeah, let's get outta here. What happened?
 Are you alright?
 Alright. Good luck, yourself.
 Thanks. Dorothy Vallens. Okay, goodluck. Three minutes, no sooner.
 Oh brother. Dorothy Vallens, Seventh Floor. Look on the mailbox for her number, bright boy.
 Okay, I'm going ahead. Wait a minute, what's her name?
 Let's go.
 Alright.
 Now, we'll walk over so there's no license plates and you give me at least three minutes. I can stall if it's more, but I need time to find a good window, alright?
 You've got a point there.
 Let's just try the first part. If that goes well, we'll see about the rest. No one will suspect us, because no one would believe two people like us would be crazy enough to do something like this.
 I don't know, it sounds like a good daydream, but actually doing it is too weird. Too dangerous.
 You will be a Jehovah's Witness. I have a few "Awake" magazines for you. You don't have to keep her very long. A few seconds is all I'll need. Whatiya think?
 What will I say when she comes to the door?
 Right out in the car I happen to have some old overalls and a bug spraying rig. I will go to her apartment and be the pest control man. I will spray her apartment. After a few minutes you will knock on her door, drawing her attention away from me and I will then jimmy a window.
 Now, how are you going to do that?
 Alright. the first thing is to get into her apartment and open a window that I could crawl into later.
 It wouldn't hurt to hear the plan, I guess.
 Settle down. I have a plan which I think will work. There is very little for you to do, but I do need your help. Aren't you curious about my plan?
 You said it was a strange world. And you're the strangest part of it. Are you crazy? She is possibly involved in murder. This gives me the creeps.
 There are opportunities in life for gaining knowledge and experience. Sometimes, in some cases, it's necessary to take a risk. I got to thinking. I'll bet a person could learn a lot by getting into that woman's apartment, you know, sneak in and hide and observe.
 Alright, now tell me. What is it?
 Ooooo, you are smart. Just don't get too smart.
 I guess Mike's got some sort of sports practice in the afternoon.
 I'm here, aren't I?
 I don't want to cause any trouble.
 Just a minute, pull over and wait a minute.
 I'd like to talk to you about something.
 I don't know.
 You hungry or thirsty, or both?
 Yeah. Good bye.
 I guess so. Like you said. It's a strange world.
 I guess I'll see you sometime.
 Thanks for the tour. It was nice talking to you.
 I've gotta go in.
 I don't know. He moved away.
 What happened to him?
 It's not bad, but it's bad enough. It's a lot worse for my father.  I used to know a kid who lived there and who had the biggest tongue in the world.
 Still, it must be kinda rough.
 I have to help out in my father's hardware store. They're giving me sort of my own hours for a while, which is nice.
 Yeah, I guess so.  What are you going to do now that you're home?
 You really do hear a lot, don't you?
 My father is watching the businessman. The businessman had a partner who disappeared. Left his whole business and family, his wife and two kids. They think he's been murdered.
 Oh yeah. What about those other people? Anything?
 I don't know, like I said, she's not my father's case.
 Did they find out anything when they questioned her?
 I don't know, you're not supposed to see them. They're supposed to see you.
 Where are they?
 That's the building. She lives on the Seventh Floor. Don't stop to look long, the police are watching.
 Not really, why?  You want to see the building? Come on, I'll show you.
 I guess you have to get back home soon?
 Yeah. It's close by, that's what's creepy. They've had her under surveillance for a couple of months, except I don't know what they've found out because my father isn't in charge of her.
 It's a strange world isn't it? Do you know what building the woman lives in?
 Maybe so.
 The ear is from a missing person maybe?
 No, this has been going on for some time. Several months. About six months ago some parts of bodies were found down by the river. They were from people who were reported missing. They never found one complete body, only parts.
 Were all these people questioned this afternoon?
 There were at least three, maybe four. But a name that keeps coming up is this woman who lives in an apartment building very close to your house and also close to the field where you found the ear. There's also a business man over by the Franklin factory district that was questioned. And a musician. And some others.
 Do you know who was brought in for questioning?
 I don't really know much but bits and pieces. I hear things. My room is right above my father's office. The ear, there's no corpse in the morgue missing an ear, and it did come off a living person. That's direct from the Coroner's Office. The person is unknown. There are a couple of cases I get mixed up on, but I think there are some people who were brought in for questioning on a murder case that could have something to do with the ear. I heard some of the same names.
 Come on, you brought it up. Do you know anything?
 Didn't my father tell you not to talk about it?
 What do you know about the ear? Anything?
 That's too bad.
 I'm home from school. My father's in the hospital.
 Yeah. What are you doing now?
 What else is new? Right?
 Terrible boring.
 How is Central these days?
 Yes.
 No. You're not bothering me. You a senior?
 Am I bothering you?
 Yeah I did, treasurer. Shouldn't you be studying or something.
 You were pretty popular. Didn't you run for some office?
 Oh yeah?
 I just know, that's all. I remember you from Central.
 Yeah, how did you know?
 You shut up. Nobody's talkin' to you. Hey who's that Jeffrey? Your mother?
 Stop it Mike.
 Hey come here, you stole my girl, you bastard. I'm gonna kick your ass, right in front of your stupid house.
 Okay.
 Come on out a minute, okay?
 Sure, just a sec.  Excuse me.
 Sandy? Could I talk to you a minute?
 Mike. We don't have to watch it. Come on.
 I don't know why we have to watch TV.
 You can change it if you want to.
 What are watchin' this junk for?
 Yeah, nice meetin' you.
 Mike's gotta go.  Nice to meet you.
 Oh fuck!
 Up his house. I don't know what's going on but I know it's gotta have something to do with this kid.
 Up where?
 Well he's the one shooting up all his guys, right? He's scared of the kid. Says he's real good, got every available gun in the city up there.
 Just for him?
 Needed an outsider. The package boy knows everyone. He'd spot our hitters a mile away.
 What did he bring him in for?
 Go find one.
 There's ways around that.
 Your dad and I used him three times over twenty years, only when everything went totally fucked. Believe me kid, you don't want this guy unless you are 100% sure you need him. He is... a fuckin' monster.
 Yeah. I was only twelve or thirteen when you guys used to talk about him, like he was a ghost or something.
 Listen kid, I think you better understand who you're dealing with here.
 This kid, this package boy could bring down the whole east coast. If he decides to turn states he could dismantle us... totally. But it looks like for now, he's content with just killing us one by one. And even worse the kid is good at it. I mean I had a prodigy on my hands the whole time and didn't even know it.
 The Duke?  What did you do?
 I need Il Duce.
 Don't start with your shit. Don't you talk to me. Oh, hey Uncle Gussy, thanks for years of service. Here's a gold watch and a job sniffing other guys' shit eight hours a day. What am I, a retired bus driver?
 Hey, I just...
 I bounced you on my knee at family reunions, for Christ sakes. Your dad and me ran the whole east coast syndicate you snot-nosed little prick. And when you took the wheel, who was beside you?
 Hey, Augustus, I need your help, I got a serious problem here. I'm not screwing around.
 Fuck you.
 Aye.
 Are ya ready?
 I mean it now. I carried the two of you little bastards around in my belly at the same time you ungrateful pissants. Ya ruined my girlish figure in one fell swoop, and then ya sucked me dry.  My tits are saggin' down ta my ankles. I trip over em for Christ sakes, now ya listen ta me, NO FIGHTEN!
 Yes mother.
 Well listen, I know how my boys take ta scrappin' when they take ta drinkin'.
 What did you do, Connor?
 Mother Mary, full of grace.
 Lord's name.
 You're not being charged. It's up to you. Do you want to talk to them?
 The press is everywhere outside. They're going nuts for these guys. What do you want to do?
 What?
 Ah, Agent Smecker, we have a problem.
 Any word back from the E.R.s?
 Any tips on where these guys may be?
 Look, look! I'm not saying one way or the other. Just be careful and go by the protocol on this one.
 Well, not armed. If they had guns, they'd have used them. But dangerous? Oh yeah.
 Are these me considered armed and dangerous?
 Got it.
 Look under the body.
 I can't find the second one, sir.
 Paraffin came up positive. And bullet holes are usually a big clue.
 Look in the trash around their hands. See if you can find me two bullet casings. 45's, if my eye serves me right. Don't disturb them. Mark them as they lay. Newman, root through this shit.  If this was a sink find me some metal parts. Gimme a faucet or a drain cover or something.
 Yes sir.
 You gotta keep going.
 We're here brother.
 You guys?
 You won't do it Connor, you won't. You love me man.
 Let him go or I will deliver you, right now.
 Okay, just calm down. He could hurt us, brother. He could ruin the whole thing.
 You little fuck. Let him go. I'll drop you right here.
 This guy is very sharp. If he hasn't figured us out yet, he will.
 They got nothing.
 What?  What, that guy?
 Shit.
 I know what the fuck he looks like!
 Look again for fuck sake!
 Fuck you! I told you I never saw him before!
 Who the fuck was he, Rocco? I know you fuckin' know!
 C'mon!
 Forget it. It's a family prayer. My father, his father before him that sort of shit.
 You guys gotta teach me that prayer, man. That's some good shit.
 Aw, c'mon. I gotta clear my family name here. I've brought shame to the house of Della Rocco.
 No way. I've been waitin' for this asshole.
 Oh man. You gotta let me do these guys. I'm such a moron. I gotta make up for the tit thing.
 This place is like a scumbag yard sale.
 What? What is it?
 I-I'll tip her.
 What the fuck are you doing?
 MEEE! ME! I'm the guy! I know everyone, their habits, where they hang out, who they talk to. I know where they fuckin' live. We could kill everyone!
 I guess we really don't have a system of deciding who.
 Oh, what the fuck? How do you guys decide who you're... I mean, who makes the cut? Is there a raffle or something?
 Yeah, well...
 Fuck, man! I may as well have posted flyers. Right out in public, man.
 Anybody see ya?
 Lakeview the deli? Oh, shit!
 What did I fuckin' do?... in the middle of the Lakeview.
 I killed em! Oh, Jesus! I killed em all!!
 What happened?
 Pack your shit! We gotta get outta here! We gotta get out!
 No, look. No rolling. Nothing needs to be rolled.
 Do me a favor and roll it around for a bit on your way in.
 No. No man. That's... that's... you don't know what you're talking about. That's bullshit. I know these guys. I mean, thanks for your concern, but that just ain't the thing of it.
 He knows you, man. He knows all you want is to move up. That's all. A smooth hitter woulda gone in there, seen it was a wash and slipped out. But a guy like you? Knowin' this is your only chance? Waitin' eighteen years?
 No, no. That's just not the way things are done. Besides, how's he know I don't just get in there see there's too many and just serve em their fuckin' food and beat it?
 He probably knew you'd end up nailing the fat guy, maybe one or two more, but he had to know you weren't walking out of there. Figure it out. Shooter's dead on the scene. No in-depth investigation. It'd slide right off his back. 'Cause as much as I love ya, you're not exactly Don Corleone. What would he be losing? A thirty- five year old delivery boy?
 You think they sold me out? No way.
 Think about it man. Nine men, six bullets.
 What are you saying?
 Well... what if your boss knew how many guys were supposed to be there... in that room?
 What?
 Listen. Something's been bothering me about last night.
 She ain't been around in weeks anyhow.
 You sound real remorseful.
 Shit. She's on every drug know to man. She'd have sold that thing for a dime bag. Screw her.  But I do kinda feel like an ass-hole.
 Donna's gonna be angry about her cat.
 Fuck it! I'm doing it. I deserve it. I've been working for those fat bastards since I was in high school and look at this place.
 Climb the corporate ladder, boy. Don Rocco.
 Weird, huh?... Know what I think is weird? Decent men with loving families go home every day after work. They turn on the news and see rapists, murderers, and child molesters all getting out of prison.
 Don't you think that's a little psycho? A little weird?
 Yes.
 Anybody you think is evil?
 Get a hold of yourself, man.
 What the fuck are you doing here? What, huh!? WHAT? WHAT? WHAT? ANSWERS! I WANT FUCKIN' ANSWERS!
 Certainly illustrates the diversity of the word.
 What did you do?! Fuckin'... what the fuckin' fuck! Who the fuck, fucked this fuckin'? fuck. How did you two fuckin', fucks?......... FUCK!!!
 Let's do him right here.
 Poppa Joe said there was only two. In and out.  Boy, you guys sure did a good job. You're good, huh? Cool masks. Where'd you get them?
 This is a six-shooter.
 Chest pocket.  Shit!
 Where's your gun?
 Oh, God! Don't kill me! We're on the same side! The boss musta sent you in as back up, huh? Oh, shit, please! I'm Rocco. I'm the funny man.  They call me the funny fuckin' man!
 All right, I suppose you have the right ta know.
 Come on, ma. Out with it. Who came out first?
 Still bickerin' over that, huh?
 Well, there's my boys.  Shit. I gotta go. Looks like I caused a ruckus with that shot. Half the damn neighborhood is comin'.
 Yeah, we promise.
 Well, I didn't but...
 What... the dirty bitch! I hope ya trounced her a good one!
 Well, we tried ta make friends and she gave me a shot ta the nuts.
 Well, you know how it is with him. Always complainin' he's never turnin' a profit on St. Patty's. Whole damn family goes down there with no money, cause we know he can't bear ta charge us.
 How's Uncle Sibeal?
 BLAME...
 No ma! No!
 Pull the trigger?! Have ya lost it woman?! Now just calm down here.
 I want ta tell ya one last thing before I pull the trigger.
 What?! What are you doin'?
 What the hell are you doin' with Da's gun!?
 I finally found your Da's army revolver, Connor.
 Mother, what are you sayin'? You're talkin' crazy here.
 It's all your fault. Both you little bastards. I was a fool to believe you would bring me any peace. The day your Da left us when you were almost too young to remember, he said the two of you would do me right and make me proud, but he was wrong and I got nothin' ta live for.
 Ma, what's wrong?
 Is that worthless brother of your there? I want you both ta hear this.
 Mother, is that you?
 Connor, is that you?
 Hello.
 I'll call you tonight, afterwards.
 Be careful.
 We're going to hit Poppa Joe tonight, right in the comfort of his own home. Then we move on to New York. It's getting a bit hot for us here.
 I'll see what I can do. How do I get in touch with you?
 I think it's better if we find this man before he finds us again.
 So you're telling me it was one guy with six guns? A-and he was a senior fucking citizen?
 Well, the light caught the side of his face for a second. And it looked like he had a gray beard, maybe... late fifties, early sixties.
 Our mother can see through bags.
 Well, we could try the bag over the head thing. Walk you right out the front.
 Know any other languages?
 We paid attention in school.
 So, how is it that you guys are fluent in Russian?
 They had some pretty interesting bandages. Know anything about that?
 We... met them last night.
 You guys are not under oath, here. I am assuming you knew these two guys from before, huh?
 Ass!
 me up the...
 Fuck!
 Would someone please come over here and...
 Right.
 Hold this shit for us, Doc. We'll be comin back for it when we get out.
 y-y-yeah that's what he said.
 We're going to turn ourselves in. It was self defense.
 What are you going to do?
 An F.B.I. agent came by the bar. He left me his c-c, he left me his c-c, he left me this.
 We're alive.
 And we will send you to whatever God you wish.
 For if you do, there will come the day when you look behind you and see we three. And on that day you will reap it.
 There are varying degrees of evil. We urge you lesser forms of filth  Not to push the bounds and cross over into true corruption... into our domain.
 These are not polite suggestions. They are codes of behavior and those that ignore them will pay the dearest cost.
 Do not kill, do not rape, do not steal. These are principles which every man of every faith can embrace.
 Each day we will spill their blood till it rains down from the skies.
 With every breath we shall hunt them down.
 It is your evil, who will be sought by us.
 It is your corrupt we claim.
 We do not want your tired and sick.
 We do not ask for your poor or your hungry.
 Now, you will receive us.
 He's a good man.
 He isn't to be touched.
 And he is one smart man.
 That's the guy that got us off the hook with the "Checkov" thing.
 A-fuckin'-men!
 There he goes.  Okay, gentlemen. Are we ready to bring this man into the light? Are we ready to truly do the work of the Lord?
 Rocco, this is the real deal. We must kill without hesitation, without guilt or remorse. Evil man, dead man.
 Give the guy a shot.
 So, when are you getting a plastic fuck doll?
 We've teamed up with a sex offender.
 I'm strangely comfortable with it.
 So what do you think?
 Holy shit. Who? How many?
 Who did you kill?
 Then what the fuck?
 Yes.
 Where are you goin'?  Did you tell him?
 Kill em all. Admit it, even you've thought about it.
 Little girls catchin' stray bullets in their heads, playin' hopscotch in their front yards. And everyone thinks the same thing... Someone should just go kill those motherfuckers.
 Mafiosos getting caught with 20 kilos and walkin' on bail the same day.
 Oh, you're good. What were you gonna do? Laugh the last three to death, funny man?
 Nine bodies.
 Yes, we are.
 Oh, we're good man.
 Yeah, and ya gotta shoot at him for ten minutes.
 On TV ya always get that asshole that jumps behind the couch.
 Aye.
 That was way easier than I thought.
 Sh, sh! Fuck you!
 Asshole!? I'm not the rope-totin' Charlie Bronson wanna-be that's getting' us lost!
 We're doing some serious shit here. Now, get a hold of yourself, asshole.
 No, fuck you. This rope is bullshit. I'm sweatin' my ass off draggin' this stupid thing around. Must weigh 30 pounds.
 We'll find it. Just calm down.
 Where the fuck are you going?
 Just like on TV.
 See. I told you there'd be a shaft.
 Me, too.
 A bit.
 Nervous?
 All right, get the stupid fuckin' rope.
 Is that right, Rambo?
 What is all this "they" shit? This ain't a movie.
 I don't know they just always need it.
 Me too. That's stupid. Name one thing we're gonna need it for.
 I'm serious.
 Oh, you've lost it, haven't ya?
 Yeah, these guys always got a lot of rope strapped around em in the movies and they always end up using it.
 What?
 Charlie Bronson's always got rope.
 For what?
 Know what we need, man?... some rope.
 ...so that which is good may flourish
 Destroy all that which is evil...
 No pictures, either.
 Absolutely not.
 Spanish.  Then I guess he's just real... real good.
 German.  Not in our neighborhood, man. A hundred percent Irish. No one talks to cops. Period.
 I have no idea. Maybe someone saw and talked.
 Italian.
 How do you think he figured all this out without talking to us?
 "I'm afraid we can't let that one go, Ivan."
 "Now, that wasn't too polite, was it?"
 Yeah, it's St. Patty's day. Everyone's Irish tonight. Now, why don't ya pull up a stool and have a drink with us?
 Listen fellas, Y'know he's got 'til this week's end. Ya don't have ta be hard asses, do ya?
 Don't c-cross the road if ya can't get out of the kitchen.
 A p-penny saved is worth two in the bush.
 Okay. We're ready.
 "We just got up and left. Bum musta rolled them before the police got there."
 "What do we tell him about the guns and money?"
 Yeah. It's been twenty-seven years.
 All right, love ya ma. Listen, before ya go just give us the goods, eh?
 If that was a girl I want ta see some papers. She had ta be just preoperative for Christ sakes.
 He got beat up by a girl.
 Don't even do it, ya bastard.
 I gave him his first lesson in sensitivity toward the fairer sex just today.
 Oh, Jesus.
 Lord have mercy. That was a good one ma.
 Aaaww, shit!... evil woman!
 Shut it. It's Ma.
 No fuckin' hot water man. That...
 Two. One ta screw it in and one ta suck my cock.
 How many?
 How many feminists does it take to screw in a light bulb?
 Aye.
 Hey Murphy?
 Aye.
 I do believe the Monsignor finally got a point.
 Now look Rozengurtle, we're sorry. Just relax.
 Baumgartner sound Irish to you, fuck face?
 Oh, come on now Rozengurtle. I was just tryin' ta get a rise outta ya.
 I knew you two pricks would give me problems. Give me shit cause I'm a woman. I'm not gonna take your male dominance bullshit!
 Do you know where that term comes from? In the early 1900's it was legal for men to beat their wives as long as they used a stick no wider than their thumb.
 Yeah?
 Rule of thumb?
 Okay, just cut off as much fat as you can as it goes by and the rule of thumb here is...
 Okay then... let's get ya started.
 I prefer to be called Rozengurtle by men.
 Friends, Gentlemen. They were friends.
 How do you figure?
 The shooter knew these guys, huh?
 That's just fucking weird. I have no idea.
 And it's the same story over here. Why the crossover?  Theories.
 No. This guy is big time.  These two are street-walking scum.
 Maybe the three of them had something in common.
 Nah, too quick half their infrastructure got taken out at the Copley plaza. Besides, if you're a hitter, you're either working for the Russians or the Italians. There's no riding the fence. Our little theory from last night just got blown to shit. Something... new is going on here.
 Only two did the shooting.  So what are you thinking, Russian retaliation?
 Three.
 Of course they were. How many?
 They were wearing masks.
 Can she I.D. them?
 She was in here when it went down.
 That depends. You either do your job or get ethical.
 So, what do we do now?
 Fan-fuckin-tastic!
 Uh... two shooters!
 And number three, Dolly.
 Yeah, well... I'm an expert in name- ology.
 Holy shit. You're the first one that's ever got that.
 Male or female, bitch?!!
 It was... It was...
 Peeperman? WRONG? What color was it?!!!
 Pee...Per...Man.
 Your what, bitch? I'll shoot myself in the head, you can tell me that cats name! Go ahead... Your what? Your precious little...
 My, my...
 Your what?! Your fuckin' what?!
 You killed my... my...
 I felt it would bring closure to our relationship!
 You... oh god, why?
 I killed your fuckin' cat, you druggie bitch!
 Where's my cat?
 What?
 Rocco!
 No! Fuck you! You start getting excited! We gotta fucking go!
 Fucking figures. Look, are you guys seeing the pattern here? We got big questions at both of these crime scenes, with no answers. WHY did they kill the guys in the other two booths? WHY did he do the bartender? It would seem unnecessary, even stupid.  God, I hate cold crime scenes! I'm fucking leaving now. And do me a favor, tell me when the next guy dies, cause these guys are not done yet.
 Well, we didn't get any help on that. A lot of people saw it. Nobody's talking.
 Duffy. This look like a fucking post office to you? This guy came in here with intent. Maybe he didn't know exactly what he was gonna do but he had a pretty good idea. The bartender wasn't a fucking accident.
 Crime of passion. He just went nuts. He would have shot everyone in here. He just ran out of bullets.
 These two fucking scenes are related. Too many coincidences. Same day? Five hours apart? Dead mobsters on both scenes. Now, why did he kill the bartender?
 Why was I not informed of this?
 A guy went nuts over off of Commonwealth today. Shot three guys to death in a coffee shop in broad daylight. Fled the scene. Don't have much on him.
 What?
 Jesus. I just can't think anymore. That scene over at the coffee shop today tapped me out.
 Those doors were down... which means this. They looked down in through the peep hole, saw these guys and opened the doors from the inside. Pop, pop, pop, right through the glass. Why?
 No way they could have seen it?
 Allow me to enlighten you gentlemen to the protocol of the porno industry, as I'm sure you've never been in one of these places before. A man goes into the booth, puts the money in the slot. The dancer gets it on the other side. She hits the button, door goes up, now there is only glass between you and it's  little fireman time.
 And is there an American, shit is there a man seated among us that hasn't thought about it many times, let's just put them all on an island, give them guns and let them kill each other. This is our wet dream come true. You can expect federal and local law enforcement to go only deep enough to satisfy the law, then bury it from here on out.
 It's gonna look like the bad guys are killing each other.
 Now, what is this going to look like to those who do not know what I just told you?
 Possible, but unlikely. The angles are too extreme. A guy holding two guns to the back of your head is gonna shoot straight ahead. He wouldn't cock out his elbows, makes no sense. Besides, you telling me one guy came in here and killed eight men with eight extremely well aimed shots in just a few seconds? No way. Had to be at least two.
 What about one guy with two guns?
 Now stay with me, boys. What did they do to make two such identical wounds? Did one guy put him on his knees, pop a cap in, sit him back up and shoot him again the same way? No. Two men of similar height dropped this guy down, each put some iron to his head and boom! That's all she fuckin' wrote!
 Excellent! Number two. Greenly.
 They shot him at a downward angle.  They put him on his knees.
 The two bullets went in here, through the top of the skull, criss-crossed and exited through the eyeballs. This one clue tells us three distinct facts. Number one... Duffy.
 The Sicilians.
 The Greeks. The Italians.
 Yeah. Some cultures still put pennies in the eyes of the dead, or silver.
 That's a possibility. Y'know you Boston cops are perking up. That's two sound theories in one day, neither of which deal with abnormally sized men.  Another possibility is that they were placed there with religious intent.
 New hitman wants to leave his mark
 And the pennies?
 He was the only one done right. Two in the back of the head.
 Well, Freud was right. So you think they came for the fag man, huh? And what do you base this upon?
 The fat man.
 The what man?
 These guys were pros. I think they were coming for one target, the fag man, he was the...
 So Duffy, got any theories to go with that... tie.
 Really want to know?
 So what are you thinkin' here?
 Why don't you let me do the thinking, huh, genius?
 What if it was just one guy with six guns?
 Oh that's just BEAUTIFUL! All the scumbags in the quiet city of Boston start dropping dead and you think it's unrelated?! Greenly, the day I want the Boston Police doing my thinking for me, I will have a fucking tag on my toe! Now, get me a squad car and get me over there. I want the crime scene photos and any witness statements. NOW!
 A couple of peons for the mob and...
 Who were the victims?
 They weren't related. The guy used a 38. No pennies. Totally amateur.
 No way they could have seen it.
 Witness?
 After talking to the dancer we know that their mark was the guy in the middle booth. After she watches them whack him, she passes out.  Why the two extra victims?
 It tells us that he was the last to die. All these men  Were carrying. They came in, dropped all in seconds and then took their time with fag man. Didn't they, Duffy?!  They sure as fuck did!
 Uh.  Shit, I, uh...
 Shit! Shit!
 While Greenly's getting coffee, anybody else want anything?
 Eight.
 How many bodies, Greenly?
 Respect is earned, Greenly, never given. Guys like you should have to follow me around squabbling for the scraps from my table.
 Why do you always disrespect me like that?
 He's struck again, hasn't he, Greenly?
 Sweet-n-low!
 Chief, what the fuck is this?
 Twist of lemon!
 Who the...
 Detective Greenly. Who the fuck are you?
 Brilliant. So now we got a Huge guy theory and Serial crusher theory. Top fucking notch.  What's your name?
 That's one big fuckin' shoe!... and think about it. Of all the ways to kill a guy, crushin' him to death. That's very particular. You don't get many of those. I dunno. I feel something big here. I wouldn't be surprised if we see more of these turning up.
 We promise.
 Promise me boys.
 Well you tell him ta take it easy with that. He's gotta learn ta respect women the way Connor does.
 But he's been havin' himself a nip or two as well... Been up the waitress' skirt all night, poor girl.
 Just called ta torture us did ya?
 It's only 11:00 here boys so I got lot's more drinkin' ta do with your worthless relatives down at the Anvil.
 Okay, seriously, both you listen ta me now.
 Oh, she's quite proud of herself.
 I...
 Oh my god!
 I got it ta my head now. I got it ta my head now.
 What the...?
 You'll make it outta here. You can't ever stop, not ever.
 We'll keep going, Roc.
 We have to go now.  We're on the lamb.
 Hey! We gotta talk about this early morning church shit.
 Well, I'd say that makes him a lia- fuckin-bility.
 You bet your ass he will.
 I mean he ain't here.
 What the fuck do you mean?
 Shit!... Shit! He ain't here.
 Fuck you both! Ya ask me, he was aiming at you!
 Well he sure as fuck knew you!
 Well, I'm sold.
 Worst day of my life, man.
 Fine! Fuck it! When we're done she can I.D. me. I don't care. Just tryin' to be professional, but no...
 You look like Mush Mouth from Fat Albert.
 Well, what'ya do?
 Well, truth be known, those first ones just kinda fell into our laps.
 So let's kill the motherfucker. I mean, what are you guys... like that's your new thing right?
 So?
 Vincenzo, that fat motherfucker, Yakavetta's right hand. He's the one who set me up. Then he went around shooting his mouth off, telling everyone I was as good as dead. He goes in there every Wednesday night around 10:00, he jerks off in the same booth to the same titty dancer. Never misses.
 Y'know it is, a bit.
 Liberating isn't it?
 You sure you killed them?
 Those rat fucks! All of them were all laughing at me man!
 Those cocksuckers sold me out!
 This is some crazy shit, man!
 Hurry the fuck up!
 I'm fuckin' fine.  Catch you on the flip side.
 No. You sure you're okay?
 Yeah. Anybody call for me?
 Roc. You okay?
 Hey, Murph.
 Hello?
 I'm fuckin' fine.  Catch you on the flip side.
 No. You sure you're okay?
 Yeah. Anybody call for me?
 Roc. You okay?
 Hey Murph.
 Hello?
 I'll be back at 9:00.
 Fuck it! What kind of flowers ya want at your funeral? Ya dumb Wop. This is the last time I'll see you. Bye-bye ya stupid son of a bitch.
 Oh yeah. You two fuckin' Micks know what's going on, huh?  Fuck you!
 Use your brain for once. Is it so unbelievable they don't care about you? You are fuckin' dead, you go in there today. Dead!
 Fuck you!
 Oh, Jesus. You're such a fuckin' retard!
 Hey. You don't know that shit for sure.
 Yeah, fuck it. If you think about it, it's all you can do really. You can't tell him it was us. Go in braggin' and shit.
 What are you serious?
 Who says that? You could take credit on it.
 You fuckin' guys. You ruined me. I'm fuckin' done. Permanent package boy.
 We're like 7-Eleven. We ain't always doing business, but we're always open.
 Well fuck, you guys could do this every day.
 So you're not just talkin' mob guys. You're talkin' anyone, right? Even like pimps and drug dealers and all that shit?
 Hallelujah, Jaffar.
 This is some heavy shit. This is like Lone Ranger-heavy man. Fuck it! There's so much shit that pisses me off. You guys should recruit 'cause I am sick and fuckin' tired of walkin' down the street waitin' for one of these assholes to get me, y'know?
 Don't kill me. Oh shit, please no. I'm Rocco. I'm the funny man!... the funny man... the funny.
 Right now.
 Thank you, Father, thank you.  Whatever. Goodbye, amen.
 Forgive me father.
 Yes! Yes! I was thinking that, too. No. I was feeling it. All I needed was to hear you say it! Amen! I'll help them.
 The laws of God are higher than the laws of man.
 No. They would never do that.
 Do you think they would harm an innocent man, for any reason?
 Yes.
 You know them personally?
 I believe these young men are right.
 Then you must find out what your beliefs are.
 I want to stand for what I believe in, father.
 Those who do not act are in a constant state of ethical indecision.
 You're right.
 It is easy to be sarcastic about religion. It is harder to take small hints from God, your feelings and listen to them... to take a stand.
 I guess not.
 You have entered the house of the Lord of your own free will speaking of beliefs and feelings. Is it so much to believe that God has brought you here?
 Has he now?
 You feel? A soul is what gives you feelings. Happiness, guilt, right or wrong. It is a conduit through which the Lord speaks to us. You felt that your answers would be here in the house of God today. You feel these men are necessary. The Lord has spoken to you twice this day.
 Yes.
 You feel?
 Yes.
 You believe?
 But in this day and age I believe what they do is... necessary. I feel it is... correct.
 God's permission? God doesn't...
 It's ethics. I put evil men behind bars, but the law has miles of red tape and loopholes for these... cocksuckers to slip through. I've found out there are these two young men who fix the situation with an iron fist. As if they have God's permission. But what they do is wrong and I should arrest them... technically.
 What is it my son?
 Why have I come to a church? I never have before. I guess I just... felt I should.
 Why have you come to a church for council if you're not religious?
 Y-Yes my son.
 Hello? You there?
 Just go!
 I wouldn't have, uh, killed you, Father.  Dominus Ominus. Remember, you're bound. You can't talk about this... to anyone.
 How long since your last confession, my son?
 Just be natural, goddamit.
 What do you want me to say?
 Do your thing Father. Don't fuck this up.
 God have mercy on my soul.
 Father, I'll do you right here.
 That's who I'm doing this for, now open the fuckin' thing.
 Have you no fear of God?
 Open it!
 Don't do this my son.
 Shut up! Shut the fuck up!
 I'm sorry, I'm sorry. I didn't see.
 I'm sorry you're gonna hafta see this. Don't look at me!
 Yes.
 You gonna do what I say, got it?
 He says, "What's your third wish?" And the guys says, "I-I want you to beat me half to death."
 Continue the joke.
 Yeah. And uh, he's pissed off. He says, "Why you crackers always gotta find my mother fuckin' pot? And he tells him he's gonna grant all his three wishes but he's gonna give all the black guys...
 He's a nigger.
 Uh. Okay... um... you hear the one about the, no fuck that one... uh... oh! oh! Well... shit. Okay, there's a white guy. He's walkin' along the beach and he finds a, a pot, y'know and ah, he rubs it and this genie pops out. But this genie, he's a ni... he's a black guy.
 The funny man. Well, I got a new job for you, just for now. Roc, I'm having a real shitty day. I'm depressed. Tell me a funny story or a joke.
 The... The funny man.
 I always see you talking to the boys and making them laugh. They always come around telling me what a crack up you are. What is it they call you?
 Yeah boss?
 Hey, Rocco, wait. Come back here.
 Yeah. Thanks, Rocco. See ya.
 Poppa Joe, you want me to go now?
 I caught your show down at the velvet room at the Holiday Inn, loved it when you busted into Viva Las Vegas.
 Tell me a joke funny man. Hee Hee.
 Fuck you Vincenzo.
 I'm Rocco. I'm the funny man. Heee Hee. I'm so fuckin' funny. Hee Hee.
 Gimme the fuckin' thing. Now sit the fuck down!
 Joey Bevo said it was important. Said I had to give it to him myself.
 Well, it's the funny man. Give it here, package boy.
 Shield me from the bullets. They won't shoot civilians. Ready?
 Scale the --
 Scale the barricade and tunnel through no man's land. And Bob. Remember:
 Dignan, I --
 Have the car running at the north- west checkpoint. Bob and I'll --
 What?
 When we go through the next gate you'll have 30 seconds to take out the tower guard.
 Dignan, I --
 Shhh. Wait for my instructions.
 How?
 No. I'm not.
 You're kidding.
 I think I may have found a way out of here.
 He stole a tractor.
 What's he in for?
 What can I say? It's jail. You don't sleep when you want to. You don't eat when you want to.
 So how is it in there?
 We're not sure yet. It's going to need some repairs.
 Does it float?
 Behind Bob's house.
 Where?
 Oh, I'd say about --
 How big is it?
 It belongs to Bob's uncle.
 You're living on a sailboat?
 Nothing.
 What do you mean?
 Mr. Henry never gave you a test, did he?
 We're not sure.
 Why?
 We haven't heard from Applejack since he got out of the hospital. His case got dismissed.
 You think Applejack knew?
 The grandfather clock?
 Pretty much everything.
 What'd he get?
 I'm not kidding.
 You got to be kidding me.
 Yeah.
 He did?
 I don't think so. I mean. Actually, he robbed Bob's house.
 So is Mr. Henry going to come by and see me or anything?
 Can't remember shit. CRS.
 Like amnesia.
 I don't think so.
 Dignan, it's too late.
 Yes, there is. Let's get organized.
 There's not enough time.
 I'll get him.
 What are you talking about?
 I'll see you there.
 What?
 I'll see you there.
 Come on.
 Applejack's stuck in the elevator?
 You're kidding.
 Come on, Kumar.
 Wait for Kumar.
 Let's go. Come on.
 What are you doing?
 Jesus Christ, Anthony. Did you lose him?
 I don't know.
 Where's Kumar?
 It's the fire alarm. Somebody pulled the fire alarm.
 Who tripped the alarm?
 Careful. Check his pulse.
 Help me move him.
 Get against the wall!
 Nobody move!
 Freeze!
 Applejack! What's happening?
 It's going back down.
 Who did that? What the fuck is that?
 It was Bob. His walkie talkie's busted.
 What's happening? What's going on?
 Check the fucking elevator. It's moving.
 I don't know.
 Stand by, Bird Dog.
 I've got a great view up here. I can see all the --
 Good. It's supposed to be.
 Not at all. The place is totally deserted.
 Any activity?
 I'm in position, Scarecrow.
 OK. Roger.
 Take your second position.
 Uh-huh?
 Hang on a second.
 We all set?
 Roger.
 You're all clear.
 Go ahead, Bird Dog.
 Bird Dog to Scarecrow. Bird Dog to Scarecrow.
 So do I.
 Yes. I do.
 Yeah. As a girl.
 As a person?
 Do you like Inez?
 He was all right.
 He was a nice guy.
 I don't think I ever said this to you. But it meant a lot to me the way you were after that Swifty stuff happened.
 Look, you're going to do fine. It's OK to be scared.
 I don't want to be too much of a liability.
 I don't think you will.
 I'll try not to hold you back tomorrow.
 Did that hurt?
 Or I might end up with a broken nose.
 Hopefully this trip'll go a little smoother than the last one.
 Next week we'll be drinking pia coladas.
 It's like we've finally arrived.
 Yeah. It's pretty good.
 God. Isn't this great? Working on the job. Got a wheel man. Got a safecracker. Good friends with Mr. Henry.
 I did.
 OK. Mark that down.
 Eleven fifteen.
 OK. Man in blue jeans just left by southwest door. He is entering a white van. What time is it?
 I'm sorry, Bob.
 I don't know, Dignan. You went crazy.
 What the fuck are we doing out here?
 Shit, Dignan.
 Easy, Dignan. It's OK.
 No fighting. It wasn't Bob's fault.
 No, Dignan. This isn't --
 Get out of the way.
 He doesn't want to fight.
 Bob!
 Dignan. Take it easy.
 He seems pretty good.
 What do you think?
 Let me feel that.
 You could give somebody a concussion.
 Right now.
 What time did he say to be here?
 Right. Freezers. Imported foods.
 What exactly is this place? Freezers?
 You'll meet him this afternoon. He's helping us set it up.
 Who's Mr. Henry?
 Mr. Henry has an inside source. We call him Steve. That's where we get our information.
 What's Hinckley Cold Storage?
 It's big, Anthony. Real big. It's called Hinckley Cold Storage.
 What is it?
 I want you to look at this.
 You really hit a guy with a bottle?
 Applejack would of got him anyway. This was just the quicker way.
 Sure.
 That's Applejack. You want to meet him?
 Who's in the car?
 Ah. Couple days ago.
 When'd you get back?
 What are you going to do, get married? Have a bunch of little idiot janitor brats! And go around scrubbing the --
 Shut up!
 You're in love with the fucking housekeeper!
 I know that. But --
 That's what she is!
 Her name's Inez. Stop calling her the housekeeper.
 A $500 tip! For the housekeeper!
 She needed it.
 You gave $383 to the goddamn housekeeper! What the fuck is your problem?
 $383.
 How much?
 I had to give some to Inez.
 Where's the rest?
 I know.
 Sixteen dollars.
 That's not correct.
 We've got sixteen dollars.
 You're so spoiled. What is "not good" to you? Only a few hundred --
 Our money situation is not good.
 You can't just run home every time things get tough. First of all, we've got enough dough to --
 I'm not. But there's --
 Don't panic, Anthony.
 I think we better go home.
 No, I'm serious. He made me a diagram.
 Bob taught you how to get electrocuted.
 Yes, I do. Bob taught me.
 You don't know how to hotwire.
 I don't think we need any keys, Dignan. I think I can hotwire a car for us.
 Dignan. I can't do that. All right? I just can't.
 No one to back me up. Now I have a good idea. So unless you come up with something better --
 Shh.
 Look. I'm ready to get the fuck out of here. It's real torture for me to be here. Getting the shit kicked out of me by Mexicans.
 I don't know, Dignan. I just --
 She doesn't need to know.
 What I'm saying is she wouldn't go for that.
 I know we can. It's real simple. We go into a room, grab some car keys and --
 I don't think we can do that.
 Inez has a master key to all these rooms, doesn't she?  Doesn't she?
 What?
 I have an idea for that.
 We need a car.
 I don't really feel like talking about it. The only thing I feel like is getting the fuck out of this place.
 Man. I'm sorry. We just went for a walk --
 Would of been nice.
 I wish I'd been there.
 Can you hand me those french fries.
 I can't believe he just jumped you.
 OK.
 Why don't you come with us.
 No. I'm going to swim. I'll see you later.
 We're going over to this bar if you feel like going.
 Well, the world is a little bit colder today.
 I didn't realize you had such an incredible ability to feel sorry for yourself, Dignan.
 If you'd gone with Bob you'd probably be in Weatherford by now. Of course I'd be here frantically worrying thinking you must of got kidnapped.
 If you say so.
 I understand that if I had a few more friends like you and Bob I'd be dead.
 Bob went to help his brother. I understand that and I can't help it if you don't.
 So when you were saying Bob's at the store and acting real surprised, that was just an act. You were just --
 Well, I didn't do it, did I?
 If you wanted to go? What were you going to do? Just leave me here by myself?
 He told me because he wanted to know if I wanted to go.
 He told you and you let him do it.
 You were asleep.
 Where was I?
 This morning.
 When'd he tell you?
 That's a long time to be in jail.
 We said 48 hours.
 He went back for his brother.
 He took his stuff. He's gone.  I should of seen this. I should of expected it. Bob doesn't have any character.
 Maybe he just went to the store.
 That coward. Son of a bitch.
 Right here.
 Where was it parked?
 He's gone. He stole the car.
 Yes... It's true.
 But if it wasn't for Dignan I probably would of died.
 They blamed my family for everything. They always said Mr. Langston saved Anthony's life.
 After that my parents never let me go to Dignan's again.
 Mr. Langston performed cardiopulmonary recitation. CPR. I've never said this before, but frankly I thought Anthony was dead. The veins in his face were all sticking out. His skin was blue. He truly did look dead.
 This was in fourth grade.
 See, one day we were playing hot box over at my next door neighbor Mr. Langston's house and Anthony fell in the pool and got knocked unconscious. I had to dive in and save him.
 Don't worry about it, Bob.
 See, now we've got a plan.
 Bob?
 Obviously. That's a given.
 As long as he gets out OK.
 Now that makes sense. We'll hang out for a couple of days. Get a little R&R. Make sure Future Man's OK and then get back on the road.
 No, no. Look. OK. Let's stay here until we find out what's going on.
 He needs to hire an attorney.
 No kidding.
 She's from Cuba.
 On the left.
 Which one was that?
 No. Not really. Inez speaks a little.
 They don't?
 No. I didn't. Dignan, they don't speak English.
 Anthony, we're on the run from the law here. Did you tell these people your real name?
 What. What's the matter?
 What the fuck is going on here?
 Sure.
 May I have a word with you, please?
 Jerry.  And this is my associate Cornelius.
 Inez, this is --
 Hi.
 This is Inez. Carmen. Anita.
 No. We didn't.
 I thought you guys went to get your hair cut.
 Even if it's the difference between some trooper recognizing us and throwing us in prison or not?
 No, Dignan. I'm sorry. I can't do that.
 Then you're going to have to dye it, Anthony. We've got to hide our identities. Especially after Bob crashed the car.
 Dignan, I can't get my hair cut. That's just not possible, all right?
 True.
 Yeah, but you wouldn't have the truck if you blew it up.
 Actually. If you knew the exact route, you could plant explosives under a manhole cover and blow it up as it went over.
 It's not a plan. It's just --
 Right. Get back to me on that one. Once your plan is worth a shit.
 I know. But once you get inside you're home free.
 Armored trucks are very difficult to steal, Anthony.
 It's a great shirt. Don't worry about it.
 No, I'm not saying her. I'm just saying, I don't know.
 Look, man. She didn't know anything about shirts.
 Bob?
 You owe me fifty bucks.
 On your marks...  Get set go.
 OK. Go ahead.
 I'll say it.
 I'll just say it.
 You were spoiled rotten.
 Don't call me spoiled, Dignan.
 That's real cool, Anthony. Yeah, I wore boots. My parents wouldn't buy me any $200 running shoes like yours. I wasn't spoiled.
 You've never had a pair of fast shoes in your life, Dignan.  In fifth grade Dignan used to wear cowboy boots for P.E.
 Really. OK, Dad. But seriously, Anthony. These are fast shoes.
 Well, those treads stink. You'd blow a knee out racing on those.
 They obviously weren't designed for racing.
 What about them?
 Look at the treads on those.
 Yes, they are.
 Dignan, those aren't running shoes.
 See if mine are in there.
 Anthony, we're on the run. This is an emergency. It's only fair that...
 I keep it for emergencies.
 Well, then cut it in half.
 I don't want to use it.
 She's not going to notice, Anthony.
 Because my mom gets the bill.
 Why not?
 I don't like to use that credit card, Dignan.
 Can I get that credit card from you?
 Don't even say it, man.
 I didn't realize you were so sensitive to Bob's feelings. Considering I did the plans, you're actually lucky you got --
 He was the driver, Dignan. He did what he's supposed to do.
 Anthony, he sat in the car and watched a 4-11 in progress. He got what he deserved.
 What do you think?
 What's wrong with him?
 Like I'm going to hunt you down and kill you.
 Like he would find Dignan. One day.
 Yeah.
 Like he meant it.
 I swear to God. In a very quiet voice.
 Oh, shit. That was scary. In the middle of the robbery. The manager looks at me. Right in the eye. And goes, I'm going to remember you.
 What about what that guy said?
 We got it. We got it.
 Holy shit.
 Unlock that door.  Check the aisles.
 Is that the manager?
 We know there's another stocker.
 There's another stocker, right?
 Where's the other stocker?
 Where's the manager?
 You're right. You're right.
 Calm down. Take a deep breath.
 Dignan! Stop!
 You're out! I'm not working with either one of you!
 Dignan, calm down.
 No, Dignan. It's not your gun. It's all of ours.
 Anthony, give me the fucking gun!
 Nothing. Go ahead.
 Now. One thing we need to discuss is timing. Timing is absolutely crucial. What are you doing? Anthony!
 That's a good question. No. I don't. I'm just being hypocritical here. However, I will say --
 You think we're going to be chased?
 OK. Escape route. The most important thing you can have is an escape route. Just in case somebody's tailing us. Or even chasing us, as the case may be --
 Just turn right here.
 Loop around real fast.
 Yeah.
 Is it back in?
 Hang on a second.
 But he didn't say anything.
 That's not bad.
 Eight dollars.
 Holy shit. What'd I tell you?
 Five, seven, eight dollars.
 Yeah, I heard that.
 It had an alarm.
 No, just do it real quick.  I'll meet you down there.
 That sets it off.
 I don't think so. Just reach on in.
 Dignan, it's got an alarm.
 I'm lookout.
 Yeah, I saw it.
 Did you see that?
 That's not what I meant, Dignan.
 You're making fun of my family. You know there's nothing to steal from my mom and Craig. You know exactly what you're saying.
 How was I ridiculing you?
 I don't appreciate you ridiculing me.
 Where are you going?
 Then you shouldn't of gone in there, Dignan. Maybe we should of robbed your house. Did you ever think of that?
 Yeah, but I can't be sorting through that shit in the middle of a burglary. There's just not time for it.
 That doesn't make any difference. I bought those earrings for my mother on her birthday. They have a very special value for her.
 Every valuable item in the house was on that list.
 The list, Dignan. I know you remember the list because you signed it. "Things Dignan was not supposed to touch."
 I know about money, Anthony. I know the value of money. Plus the earrings are worth three times that.
 But Dignan, do you really know that much about rare coins?
 Anthony, we'll get two hundred for the coin collection alone. That's less than what it's appraised at.
 What do you think the cops have?
 It's got a V-8, Dignan.
 She's an attractive older woman.
 She's really kind of hot.
 See, your mind is very good with the more mechanical details. Whereas my strength would be --
 Now that window can never be locked. It's impossible.
 Who knows? That's why I filed it down.
 Would they do that?
 That's true. But what if they change the locks?
 Kind of. Except we've already got the keys.
 Did you see what I meant about the window?
 No. This is he.
 This is he?
 He says. This is he.
 What does Starsky say?
 The point is the killer always goes, May I speak to Starsky? He says his name.
 See, that's what I'm saying. It has the logic of a dream.
 As part of his plan. I don't know why.
 Why?
 No. It's a real episode. The killer is leading him across the city by calling different pay phones.
 I think you might of dreamed this one, Anthony.
 He's not there. Huggie Bear isn't in every single episode.
 Plus where's Huggie Bear?
 Dignan, it's --
 OK. That's wrong.
 Right. The blond guy.
 Making Hutch David Soul?
 Black hair. Paul Michael Glaser.
 What color hair does he have?
 Because I was like you once. And there was no one there to help me.
 Why'd you want to help us?
 Absolutely.
 Can I ask you something, Mr. Henry?
 We're renegades from despair.
 It's an esoteric journey.
 Yeah.
 But you're thieves. It's what you are.
 I want to ask a favor, boys. One day, when I'm long gone and all but forgotten, make one last toast to Abe Henry. And remember me as a friend.
 This is good.
 Anthony, I'm petrified.
 Are you afraid to die, Mr. Henry?
 Bob. Bob. That's a palindrome.  I love palindromes.
 No. Bob did.
 The fear of death, The pain of consciousness.  Did you mix this martini?
 Death.
 Exactly. Woah.
 Yeah. I mean, I don't think about it all the time. But once in awhile I kind of go, Woah. Man.
 Are you afraid?
 I don't want to die.
 No, that door over there.
 Me?
 I'll tell you, Anthony. Times like this I get philosophical. What does it mean? What's it all about? Are you afraid to die?
 That sounds like Dignan.
 Well, he agreed 100% that Bob should be dropped. And he also agreed you were a liability. But he felt his talent would make up for your weaknesses.
 How'd he do?
 Yes, he did.
 Did Dignan take the test?
 It feels good.
 How does that feel?
 Take a deep breath.
 That was a test?
 The Abe Henry double-cross test. You just made a perfect score.
 What do you mean?
 Congratulations. You passed the test.
 Hold it.
 And you're wrong if you think, I'd turn my back on a friend.
 As far as I can tell he hasn't thought his life through. He'd be fine cutting my grass or parking my car. But business?  You I can work with. You I could groom. Dignan's not going to make it.
 I don't think you're giving him enough credit. I know sometimes he doesn't think an idea through. He gets too excited. But --
 Sure, sure. He's a great person, and I'd call bullshit on anybody who said differently. But I wonder if the kid has the goods  up here.
 What do you mean what kind of person? He's a good person.
 I guess what I'm trying to say is what the hell kind of person is this Dignan?
 I'm not really sure. I think it's Irish. Or maybe --
 Tell me something. What the hell kind of name is Dignan?
 So do I.
 Look at that woman. She's what? Fifty? Fifty-five? But she hasn't let herself go. I appreciate an older woman who has a commitment to her body.
 Yeah. And I'll tell you who we're going to want: Kumar Banijamali.
 You mean a safecracker?
 Yeah. Convert it into lofts. OK. Pop quiz. What's the single most important aspect of your job?
 I'd like to live in that place. Hinckley Cold Storage.
 Technique. That's right. Seventy- five percent of your job is crowd control. Seventy-five percent. Do you believe that?
 You mean like techniques?
 Grammar.
 Every once in a while some cat comes to me. He wants to know how I made it. How did I become a success?  The first thing I tell them is: follow your instincts. Let your instincts guide you. The second thing I tell them is, for Christ's sake: you got to know your grammar.
 Thanks.
 You know, your form is for shit, but you've got a hell of a talent.
 It's called a racquet, Anthony, and you're holding it wrong. That's ghetto play. Hold it like this.
 It's hard to get much spin with this kind of paddle.
 Thanks.
 That's a sharp jacket.
 Nice to meet you.
 This is my business manager, Rowboat.
 Temporarily.
 It's in the driveway.
 His health isn't very good, you know. They take that into account.
 We think Mr. Henry maybe --
 Who's got the car keys?
 Yeah.
 I didn't do anything.
 Jesus, Bob.
 No.
 Let me see it.  Did you drop it?
 My walkie talkie's busted. I can't tell what's going on.
 What are you doing?
 Sure.
 No, I know. I'm just saying. I feel fine. You want a piece of cake?
 Nothing. I was just asking.
 No, I'm having a heart attack. Of course, I'm OK. What's that supposed to mean?
 You OK, Bob?
 Hopscotch. The code name is hopscotch.
 Give him a second.
 Cause you would of let my brother rot in jail.
 Yeah. Let's keep it --
 It was stupid.
 Let's not even talk about it.
 Jesus Christ! No.
 Was Future Man adopted?
 No. I wasn't adopted.
 Well, because you guys don't look alike.
 Why do you say that?
 Were you adopted, Bob?
 Yeah, but he still has the aggravation. Three days sitting in a cell.
 I thought he didn't have to pay anything because of the technicality.
 Prison tatoos. I got to be pretty good. It's not like drawing on paper.
 Why were you drawing the Holy Mary?
 Yeah. One minute you're studying Great Expectations and the next minute you're drawing the Holy Mary for some kid who tried to stab his girlfriend.
 Sixty days?
 At first they were going to charge me with manslaughter. That's partly why I was in custody so long. Sixty days.
 I don't like that word prank, Bob. I was trying to do something more than a prank.
 That's pretty complicated for a senior prank.
 It took six months of research. I did all the wiring myself. Switched AC to DC. Doubled the voltage. Shorted out the generator. The whole school was shut down.
 Well, I didn't mean to electrocute him. But the whole operation was my idea.
 I know it must of been a bad experience. But it doesn't sound like it was your fault.
 No, I don't mind.
 You don't have to talk about it if you don't want to.
 Yes. You just got to stick with it.
 You think I'm improving?
 You've only been playing for two weeks, Bob. It takes a long time to learn this game.
 Cause I'm not getting any better. It's a waste of time.
 Why not?
 I'm not playing any more golf.
 Bob, where you going?
 Is that OK?
 What?
 And if Future Man doesn't get let out of jail in 48 hours, then we go back. All right?
 Anthony, I --
 I don't know. I don't know anything. Except Phil says they got him. And he's in jail.
 How long are they going to hold him?
 He looked too shaken-up.
 You think he got my license plates?
 OK, Dad.
 Will you guys shut up? God. It's like having two little kids in the car.
 Nobody does.
 I don't know. I personally don't need that shit in my life right now.
 Why don't you just tell them the truth. Those belong to my neighbor Phil.
 Move.
 Where you going?
 Phil probably provoked him.  Where's he going?
 I hope not.
 Oh, yeah. They'll never catch the guy.
 There's a million places to hide around here.
 What the fuck is Dignan doing with that cop? He loves them.
 What was that?
 You'll probably have them the rest of your life.
 See you, Bob.
 See you.
 Yeah. He said that.
 Are you serious?
 Let them fight.
 Let them fight.
 You could make your own cinnamon toast.
 I don't know. Sure, I guess.
 Could you grow cinnamon?
 But he's got a loud bark. That's the most important thing is a loud bark.
 Hector woudn't do anything.
 It's private property. Plus I have Hector.
 In your backyard? How do you protect them?
 Pot is an herb. It's just like any type of gardening.
 What do herbs have to do with it? I don't understand the --
 Yeah. I've stolen two cars before. One Jaguar. And one Trans-Am. With T- Tops. That Trans-Am was fun to drive.
 Did you ever steal a car before?
 Future Man. You know. Cause he looks like he's from the future.
 Who?
 Future Man.
 God. That does sound corny. Oh, your skin feels so soft and silky. But it really kind of does.
 Like silk?
 What?  What?
 God, yes. Like silk.
 Does my skin feel soft, Anthony?
 Oh, really? That's interesting. Do you prefer Cuba or the United States?
 Cuba.
 Were you born in Mexico?
 It could happen. This is the exact kind of place where it happens. But I don't want to scare you.
 No.
 Are you ever scared of finding a dead body in one of these rooms?
 Right. Yeah. Yo soy dies y nueve. How old are you?
 Dies y nueve.
 How do you say nineteen?
 Where were you?
 The front stairs.
 Where'd they come from?
 Feel this.
 What do you mean?
 I can knock a man out with a six inch punch.
 Abdul-Shabazz?
 Let's go, Abdul-Shabazz.
 Uh-uh.
 S. Cooper Trust, in San Francisco?
 Uh-uh.
 Did you ever hear of the S. Cooper Trust robbery?
 I hear you're a good thief.
 Yeah.
 You're Anthony?
 Nice to meet you, Applejack.
 Bob! Get back in position!
 What?
 True.
 You don't celebrate til it's over.
 Well, this isn't really a party per se.
 I don't know why the fuck we're having a party. The damn job's not over yet.
 Hell, no. This is a '72. I was driving a '63 Pontiac.
 Mr. Henry pulled that job in 1965. It's famous. Applejack was the wheel man. Did you use this same car, Applejack?
 We're going too slow. It looks like we're following him.
 Wait. Did he see us?
 Looks like he's staying with Buckethead. That's what I figured. He's probably got his own room. Let's see where he's going.
 What's he doing here?
 Yeah.
 That's your friend Anthony?
 That's Anthony.
 Wait a second.
 Is that him?
 Is that Buckethead?
 We might have to take that chance. Cause I feel pretty strongly about this.
 That sounds like a lot of bullshit that'll land us in jail.
 Just settling an old score. You might say revenge.
 Why the fuck do we need to blow up the car? It doesn't make any goddamn sense.
 There's a lot of valuable shit in there, Applejack. The silver and the china. The crystal. And the grandfather clock. Goddammit, I bet that clock's worth ten grand.
 The one and only Little Richard.
 It seemed like a good idea at the time.
 Little Richard. Trust me. You're insane. Jesus, this guy used to carry a percussion bomb around in his trunk. You do not want a guy like that loose on the streets.
 I don't know about that.
 Dignan and Anthony, this is Little Richard. He's crazy. Totally nuts.
 You're the faggot.
 Are you a fag?
 Now!
 Wait a second --
 Here we go.
 Hold on --
 I don't really want to talk about it, Bob.
 Do they let you --
 No. I have a cellmate. His name's Carl.
 Do you have your own cell?
 We don't have rooms, Bob. We have cells.
 Do you have your own room?
 That's just what the DA asked. CRS is a disease where you can't remember shit.
 What's that?
 I said to the DA, That cop who hit me must of given me CRS disease.
 Run. Run. Let's go.
 Applejack drove.
 He's stuck between two floors.
 Where's Applejack?
 The elevator broke.
 Take him to the car, Bob.
 I didn't think there was an alarm.
 Jesus Christ. What the fuck is that?
 I think so.
 Is he breathing?
 Let's go!
 He's having a heart attack or something.
 What's wrong with Applejack?
 Who's watching the door? What the fuck are you doing? Get back in position.
 I couldn't hear anything.
 Stand by. Bird Dog?
 It looks pretty good. There's nobody back here.
 Yeah. We're in the elevator. How's it look back there?
 Everything OK?
 Yeah?
 Scarecrow?
 Jesus Christ.
 I know it, man. Hang on.
 Come on, Bob.
 Look. We want you on the job.
 That's OK.
 That's OK.
 I'm sorry, Bob.
 I didn't have any choice.
 It wasn't your fault, Bob. You had your brother.
 I don't want to fight you, Dignan.
 Come on!
 All right! Backyard! Right now!
 Bullshit.
 Bob, you're lying!
 I never agreed to that.
 You said 48 hours!
 Man, I don't want to go into this.
 I can't fucking believe this guy. An apology, Bob?
 I don't expect an apology and I don't even want one. I just want us to --
 Right. It was extremely stupid.
 Yeah. It is.
 It's too bad about what happened on the road.
 Not a whole lot, Bob.
 Come on in. What you been up to?
 Not bad.
 Hey, Dignan. How's it going?
 Anthony. Bad news.
 Dignan.
 Let's go.
 You've got a beautiful walk, Bob.
 That's right. I only have one vote. We'll go talk with Anthony and figure it out.
 It's not your decision and he's not your brother, Dignan.
 OK, Bob. I don't know his name. You know why? Because I don't care. He's Future Man. But I care about you. And to me it doesn't make sense to go back to the scene of a crime. Will you get in the car, Bob? This is stupid.
 What's his name?
 Just get in the car, Bob.
 What is it?
 Yes, I do.
 You don't even know his name.
 I know it's not.
 His name's not Future Man, Dignan.
 Future Man would never go to jail for you, I'll tell you that.
 Goddammit, Dignan! It's my car! If you don't give me my keys, I swear to God --
 Don't threaten me, Bob.
 Dignan. You're going to give me those keys or you're going to get hurt.
 I can't do that, Bob.
 Give me the keys, Dignan.
 Good luck, since I got the keys.
 Watch me.
 Not in that car you're not.
 I'm going back.
 Don't "Come on, Dignan" me.
 Come on, Dignan.
 This could be a trap.
 Dignan, he's my brother. I can't just leave him there.
 Bob, that makes no sense.
 Well, obviously, we got to go back.
 What do you mean get back?
 We'll have to see when we get back.
 Then how come they haven't set the bail yet? That's unconstitutional.
 I don't know.
 How long has he been in there?
 I was just going to use it to see how much I had.
 So tell them the truth. What do you use it for?
 The cops say it's a special kind of scale drug dealers use in selling marijuana.
 Since when is it a crime to have a scale in your house? Everybody has a scale.
 They also found my two beam scale in the garage.
 That could be anybody's.
 Well, the marijuana crop is a good start.
 I don't think they can make it stick, Bob. I mean, what do they actually have on Future Man?
 They said he's a drug dealer.
 But it's not his. How can they arrest Future Man?
 The weed.
 What are you talking about?
 My brother's in jail.
 You can go first, Bob.
 See you in a little while.
 Bob. Are you coming?
 You're the one who kept saying ram him.
 What the fuck possessed you?
 It's registered in my mother's name.
 I'm sure he did. We'll have to get new plates.
 I don't know.
 Is he chasing us?
 He wouldn't move.
 Shit, Bob. What the fuck did you do that for?
 There were more than that.
 In all probability nothing would of happened. But why take the chance? That's why I ran. I mean how many plants were even back there? Five? Ten?
 So it's my fault?
 I told you they were there.
 Way to go, Bob!
 Bob, I've got nightmares.
 That's true. That would give me nightmares.
 I mean, Jesus Christ, Bob. You didn't have some vicious lunatic screaming, "I'm going to remember you!"
 I don't want to talk about it.
 Bob, will you please listen?
 No. All he'll remember is a guy with a piece of tape on his nose.
 You really think he'll remember you?
 No. I was calm.
 Was Dignan screaming like, Get me a bag!
 Don't count it.
 How much is there?
 Be cool, Bob. Be cool.  Make that light.
 Did we get it?
 That's good. Keep it at forty.
 This is natural.
 Shhh. Slow down, Bob. Drive natural.
 What happened?
 I'm putting a piece of tape on my nose.
 What are you doing?
 You know, when somebody gets electrocuted, their skin starts smoking. At least Swifty's did.
 That's too bad.
 Yeah. One of the nicest old guys you'd ever know.
 His name was Swifty?
 It was an accidental. I don't want to go into the details. It was just one of those senior pranks that didn't really go right. I mean, obviously, since Swifty's dead. That's why Anthony never graduated.
 He electrocuted someone?
 You know, Bob, Anthony did kill someone. He electrocuted our janitor senior year.
 Yeah, but what if some nut pulled gun on you?
 Well, in reality it's not that dangerous, Bob. It's only dangerous if you don't know what you're doing.
 He doesn't get it. Held never understand what we're trying to accomplish here. It's too dangerous for him.
 God DAMMIT.
 I paid for it.
 I just want to see how much bullets it takes.
 What's your fucking problem? You're a shithead!
 I'm paying attention. I just want to look at it for a minute.
 Bob.
 OK.
 That's your domain.
 That's my responsibility.
 Hang on. This is important, Bob. Anthony and I are responsible for the internal situation. The money and the people. You're responsible for the external situation. The streets and the getaway.
 I'm going to take a look at this.
 Let's just go.
 I think we might of scared her.
 Maybe she turned.
 Where'd she go?
 I do blame you, Bob. And woah. Look at her.
 Well, don't blame me. I told you.
 I know that now. He's a fucking psycho.
 No, I was saying crazy like a lunatic.
 You said it like it was a big joke, Bob. Like he's wild.
 I warned you, Dignan.
 The guy is fucking insane.
 I told you he's crazy.
 What did I say?
 I can't believe you said that.
 What was that all about?
 Yeah, but don't tell anybody.
 You're paranoid, Bob.
 Don't you guys tell anybody about my plants.
 Good question.
 If it's that easy why doesn't everybody grow them?
 You should take a look. I have an entire crop in my backyard.
 Six thousand dollars? Come on, Bob.
 As much as I want. When these plants bud I'll probably have about six thousand dollars worth of weed.
 How much could you grow? Realistically.
 I'll just drive my car.
 Well. What do you want to do? You want to steal one or just drive your car?
 It's true, Dignan.
 OK, Bob.
 Yes. I did.
 You stole a Trans-Am.
 Can you use a coaster.
 What are you talking about, Bob?
 If you're that worried, maybe we should just steal one.
 Let's cut the bullshit.
 That never would of --
 He looks like he was designed by scientists. For desert warfare.
 My brother.
 So who's going to know?
 They are.
 I thought your parents were in Italy.
 No.
 Not even for emergencies?
 I'm not allowed to drive those.
 I don't know, Bob. What about one of those?
 Well, what do you think?
 Right. I'm sorry.  You've got a reputation to think about.
 I'd appreciate it if you didn't go around telling people lies about me.
 I know, Bob. You were on a secret mission.
 John, I'm twenty-six years old I didn't run away from home.
 I might have mentioned it.
 Yeah. Hey, Clay.
 Fancy seeing you here, Bob.
 Hard to find it sitting by the pool drinking beer and bullshitting.
 I'm working on it.
 How's that 700 bucks coming?
 No. I didn't run away. I went out of town.
 He said you ran away from home.
 He said what?
 Your brother was up here the other day. He said you ran away from home.
 This boy's a troublemaker. He used to tear this place apart.
 I'm trying.
 You keeping out of trouble?
 Hey, Jackson. How's it going?
 How you doing, Bob?
 Did you hear that?
 Ground defense.
 Hand to hand combat?
 Social issues. Crime prevention.
 And what does that cover?
 26 weeks.
 How long do you have to go?
 No, if I go out on this job, then it's just another score by Mr. Henry. And I don't see it like that. This is your job. Your creation. I want you to try this.
 Well, I think --
 Why?
 Yes.
 You got to have fun with it. There's no point if you're not having any fun. Would you like me to be there tomorrow?
 We're just going over a few things.
 Join the party, fellas.
 He's damn good.
 Is he good?
 You're going to need a boxman for this one. But that can be arranged.
 Oh, yeah.
 Crowd control. Crowd control. Wake up, guys.
 The grammar?
 The basic grammatical rules of robbing.
 What do you mean grammar?
 I don't know. Are you in, Anthony?
 Is he in?
 This is no good.
 This is Anthony Adams, Mr. Henry.
 Dignan. Good to see you. Good to see you Applejack.  Who are you?
 What can we do?
 Can't get it. It won't...
 What's the story?
 He's going to watch the back stairwell, remember?  Don't worry about it.
 Why did he go that way?
 Who? Applejack?
 Where did he go?
 You got that?
 I don't know. Maybe in literature. That's his section.
 Where is he? Where is Rob?
 In the cash register. Step away from the door.
 Where?
 Well, I left some money in there.
 He left his sweater.
 Where's that guy going?
 We're closed, sir.
 No, it's not.
 It's locked.
 Come on in!
 Mr. Henry?
 How's the weather down there?
 Right.
 No. Me no Hoto. Tecate?
 Fuck you. You a Hoto.
 You Hoto?
 No. Just pool.
 Fight. You know.
 What?
 Si. Tecate. You like to fight?
 Guess I'll get another Tecate.
 She is a good looking woman.
 I don't know.
 Where's your friend? He go with the chiquita?
 Got a little lucky.
 You a good pool player.
 Sure.
 You like Chicanos?
 She Chicano, yes?
 No, my friend knows her.
 Is that your chiquita?
 No. I just have short hair.
 Hello, my friend. You in the Army, yes?
 Nice to meet you.
 Pleasure to meet you, John.
 Well, we'll see you later, Bob.
 The world needs dreamers. To relieve the pain of consciousness.
 What?
 The world needs dreamers, son.
 Good to know you, John.
 John Mapplethorpe.  How are you. Hi.
 Bourne comes here? Why?
 He left yesterday on the night train. He's probably just getting in now.  You'll have to hurry.
 What?
 Save it for Bourne.
 Go to the airport. Get a plane. I'll have a brass band waiting for you.
 What do you mean?
 Leaving was a business decision. We're both rich, come enjoy it.
 One last push. One.
 Neski was a roadblock. Without me, there's no company, no fortune. You owe me, Uri. One last push.
 Anything else?
 She's done everything I wanted. She bit on Conklin so fast it was laughable. She even found his bogus Swiss account...
 And the Landy woman?
 No. The files are spotless. Whatever they find, it's just going to make Conklin look worse.
 Will it track back to us?
 I'll say. You killed his goddam girlfriend instead. Now they're onto Neski. They're at the Brecker Hotel even as we speak.
 There was a mistake.
 You told me Bourne was dead.
 Well, you're probably right. I guess that's all that hubris is.
 No. You lost your way.
 In the end, honestly, it's hubris. Simple hubris. You reach a point in this game when the only satisfaction left is to see how clever you are.
 No good options left?
 Had to be done.
 And Danny Zorn, what was that?
 Why not? It was just money.
 And pocketed a fair amount of change while doing it.
 I'm not a traitor. I've served my ountry.
 'Why' would be enough for me.
 I don't exactly know what to say -- I'm sorry.
 I'd rather stand if it's all the same to you.
 Sit down.
 I'm sorry, Ward.
 Jesus... I, Zorn... I have to call his family. Tell them...
 Don't know.
 Moscow? What the Hell's he going to Moscow for?
 No... It must have been Bourne.
 Did he say anything to you?
 Oh, God... It must have been Bourne.
 They found Danny Zorn's body. Dead in the basement at the building where my people got hit the first time.
 What?
 I wasn't sleeping.  You OK?
 Sorry to wake you.
 Well, whatever he's doing, I've had enough -- this is now a search and destroy mission.  I want the Berlin police fully briefed and --  -- get this out to all the agencies.
 It's hard to swallow.  The confusion -- the amnesia -- but he keeps on killing? It's more calculated than sick.  What about Nicky? She's the last one to see Bourne in Paris. She's the one he asks for. They disappear...
 So what's he doing? You believe him?
 There are no answers. There's either Jason Bourne alive or Jason Bourne dead. And I for one would prefer the latter. And what about her?  You just send her out to this lunatic with no protection?
 Don't you want answers?
 My ass he does. You're playing with fire, Pamela. Marshall said nail him to the wall. I don't know how you interpreted that, but I don't think he meant repatriate him.
 Hold on -- he said he wants to come in.
 Call a Mayday into Berlin station. We need snipers, DOD, whatever they got. Snipers?
 And you do? From the moment he left Treadstone, he has killed and eluded every person that you sent to find him...
 You don't know what you're getting into here.
 I've already got a team there. I doubt Bourne's in Naples to settle down and raise a family.
 Berlin!
 So what's your theory?  Conklin's reaching out from the grave to protect his good name?  The man is dead.
 What's definitive, is that I just lost two people in Berlin!
 Conklin might've been a nut, but he wasn't a mole. You have me his calendar for a couple of days, I'll prove he killed Lincoln.  This is supposed to be definitive?
 May I finish?
 We were throwing money at him. Throwing it at him and asking him to keep it dark.
 Excuse me.
 Do you know what his budget was?
 ...At the time of his death, Conklin was sitting on a personal account in the amount of seven-hundred and sixty thousand dollars.
 ...this is Conklin's computer.
 ...Ivan Mevedev -- senior financial manager -- worked for one of the new Russian petroleum companies, Pecos Oil. He claimed to know where the money landed. We believe this could have only happened with help from someone inside the Agency... This...
 I think I do. We had a deal going down in Berlin last week. During the buy, both our Field Agent and the seller were killed. We pulled a fingerprint from a timing charge that didn't go off.  They were killed by Jason Bourne.
 Dead in a ditch? Drunk in a bar in Mogadishu? Who knows?
 And Bourne? Where's he now?
 I've given thirty years and two marriages to this agency. I've shoveled shit on four continents. I'm due to retire next year and believe me, I need my pension, but if you think I'm gonna sit here and let you dangle me with this, you can go to hell. Marshall too.  It had to be done.
 So you had Conklin killed.  I mean, if we're cutting the crap...
 What happened? Jason Bourne happened.  You've got the files? Then let's cut the crap. It went wrong. Conklin had these guys wound so tight they were bound to snap. Bourne was his number one -- guy went out to work, screwed the op and never came back. Conklin couldn't fix it, couldn't find Bourne, couldn't adjust. It all went sideways. Finally there were no options left.
 I want to know what happened.
 What are you after, Pam? You want to fry me? You want my desk? Is that it?
 Let's talk about Conklin.
 He does. I've been down to the archives. I have the files, Ward.
 To know about it?  It was a kill squad. Black on black. Closed down two years ago. Nobody wants to know about Treadstone. Not around here.  You better take this back to Marty and make sure he knows what you're doing.
 I want to know about Treadstone.
 And what are we looking for?
 With all due respect, Pam, I think you might've wandered a little past your pay-grade.
 That's not gonna fly.
 Never heard of it.
 Treadstone.
 Okay...
 Show me again...
 Nobody. You.  I had to tell you, right?
 Who else knows about this?
 Including Landy...  She had access to the archives.
 Lots of people...
 Something's been going on here in Europe. And it's still going on. Post Conklin. Who's been in Berlin?
 Keep going...
 Okay. What if someone decided to cover their tracks by blaming Conklin and Bourne. What if Bourne didn't have anything to do with this?
 Jesus...
 Is it a slam dunk? No, but...
 It was staged?
 There were two charges, they were supposed to go off simultaneously. The second one, the one that didn't go off, was down here...  First of all, this is nothing, it's a sub-line for the breaker above. Second, why put the charge all the way down here? If you're good enough to get in here and handle the gear, you're good enough to know you don't need this.  Bourne would know.
 And?
 You put a four-gam Kel on here and it's gonna take out power to the building. You know that. What you can't know, is if it's gonna blow the room with it.
 What do you have, Danny?
 I did my box work, but I wanted to show you before I showed Landy. I came out here last night because none of this was making any sense. I mean, I'm with you on this, Conklin was a nut, but a traitor? I just can't get there.
 The sooner the better.
 She say what time I should call?
 Thanks.
 Sir...
 I'm sorry.
 Is this really happening?
 I have to go now.
 No.  Because you don't want to know how it feels.
 Because you're afraid!
 I can't let you do that either.
 I should kill you... if it's true you should die... I should kill you now!
 Look at me.
 YOU'RE A LIAR!
 You know I'm not.
 You're a liar.
 It doesn't matter. Your life is hard enough.
 I don't want you to forgive me.
 How... how can... how can you be here and say this?
 They loved you.  And I killed them.
 You killed them.
 It was my job. My first time. Your father was supposed to be alone. But then your mother, she came out of nowhere...  I had to change my plan.  You understand me?  You don't have to live like that anymore. Thinking that.
 I killed them.
 Then what?
 That's not what happened to your parents.
 Yes...
 It changes things. That knowledge. Doesn't it?
 What?
 I would want to know.  I would want to know that my mother didn't kill my father. I would want to know that she didn't kill herself.
 No, I do.
 No. It's because you don't know how they died.
 It's nothing. It's just a picture.
 It's nice.  Does this picture mean anything to you?  Hmm?
 Okay.
 Of all the people in the world, you're the only one I have anything to offer.  That's why I came here.
 I speak English.
 Sit. Can you...  [The chair. Have the chair.]
 -- take the back -- get another car --
 -- what? --
 -- my coat -- but we should --
 -- car keys?
 How long? How long do I have --
 I'm sorry.
 You called it in?
 I did.
 She really did that? Told you not to kill me?  I had a woman once. But after a while, what do you talk about? I mean, for us. The work. You can't tell them who you are...
 I don't know! Why would I lie?
 What's going on in Berlin?
 I don't know who that is.
 Pamela Landy?
 A voice. A voice from the States. Someone new.
 Who sent you to Greece?
 I don't know.
 You're lying. If it's over, why are they after me?
 Shot dead in Paris. Dead the night you walked out.
 Try again.
 He's dead.
 Conklin.
 What do you want?
 She wouldn't let me.  She's the only reason you're alive.
 So why didn't you kill me then?
 I like it here.  Last time I saw you was Greece. You had a good spot.
 You still should've moved.
 Sorry. Old habits.
 Front. Use your teeth.
 Drop it.
 Felt a little light.
 I emptied it.
 Jason. You know exactly what to do. That is your mission now.
 God, I miss you. I don't know what to do without you.
 I only dream about people who are dead.
 You do?
 I know it's a dream.
 It might have.
 It wouldn't have changed the way you feel.
 I did.
 But you found another choice.
 I wanted to kill him.
 Tell me later.
 I love you, too.
 There's no choice.
 Jason, please don't do this...it won't ever be over like this.
 I warned them, Marie. I told them to leave us alone.
 There must be another way!
 If he crosses the bridge, it is.
 What if it's not who you think it is?
 I'm going to bail on the other side and wait. This bridge is the only way he can follow.
 Where are you going?
 You keep going to the shack. I'll meet you there in an hour.
 -- hang on --
 -- yeah -- one guy -- I don't think he was ready --
 -- it's just him? --
 -- not yet --
 Jesus! --  -- is he back there? --
 -- make the left -- toward the bridge --
 -- where? -
 Switch! You drive!
 What?
 You drive.
 -- there's places -- we can't afford to be wrong!
 -- where's left to go? --
 Look, we clear out, we get to the shack, we get safe. We hang there awhile. I'll come back. I'll check it out. But right now we can't --
 I don't want to move again... I like it here.
 We can't wait to be sure.
 ...but you're not -- you're not sure...
 Back there -- at the corner -- Hyundai -- silver --
 Where --
 No. Not this. This is real.  And he's right there...
 That's crazy.
 It's wrong. Guy with a rental car and hundred dollar sneakers sleeps in a tent?
 So...
 He was at the campground yesterday.
 But you're sure?
 We pushed it. We got lazy.
 But we were so careful.
 The Telegraph office.
 No... How?
 One day it will be different. It just takes time.  We'll make new memories. You and me.
 But it ends up the same.
 You are better. And I think it's not memories at all. It's just a dream you keep having over and over.
 I should be better by now.
 Sleep. Sleep now.
 I don't mean that. I worry when you try to ignore it.
 It's just a nightmare.
 I worry when you get like this.
 I'm trying, Marie, Okay?
 I do remember something good. All the time. I remember you.
 We write them down because sooner or later you're going to remember something good.
 -- it's always bad and it's never anything but bits and pieces anyway!  You ever think that maybe it's just making it worse? You don't wonder that?
 -- it hasn't been two years --
 Two years we're scribbling in a notebook --
 You're sure?  We should still -- we should write it down.
 No. There's nothing new.
 I'll get the book.
 Conklin up front.
 Where were you, Jason? In the car.
 ...it's not in the file... I swear... I know your file... your first job was Geneva!... I swear to God you never worked here!...
 I was here!
 No... Jason... please...
 You never worked Berlin...
 That's a lie!
 Your first assignment was Geneva.
 My first job.
 No. You never worked Berlin.
 For Treadstone. In Berlin. You know my file. I did a job here. When?
 What do you mean?
 So when was I here?
 He closed down Treadstone -- he took care of me after Paris...
 Abbott?
 Please -- I'm only here because of Paris -- because they can't figure out what you're doing -- I'm here because of Abbott --
 Why are you here, then?
 Conklin! Stuff on Conklin!
 What was Landy buying? What kind of files?  WHAT WAS SHE BUYING?
 I left a fingerprint! You fucking people.
 You left a print! There was Kel that didn't go off! There was a partial print, they tracked it back to Treadstone! They know it's you!
 I killed him???
 And you got to him before we could.
 Last week? When?
 It was Pamela Landy's op. The guy was going to sell-out a mole or something. I haven't been debriefed on exactly what it was.
 A Russian?
 Last week an Agency field officer went to make a buy from a Russian national.
 Say it.
 I want to hear it from you.
 What is this, a game?
 How do they know that? How can they know any of that?
 They know!  They know you were here. They know you killed these two guys. They know you and Conklin had something on the side. They don't know what it is, but they know!
 Why is she trying to kill me?
 IS SHE RUNNING TREADSTONE?
 You hear me? I believed you.
 Who is Pamela Landy?
 I did... Jason, I swear, I did... I told them... I told them I believed you...
 Get on it.
 Yes.
 See that tram coming around the corner?
 Why you're alive?  You're alive because you're special. Because she kept you alive.  Because we want you back on our side.
 You didn't answer my question.
 Sounds like a threat.
 Don't need it. I remember everything.
 Do you think you can read? Are you well enough?
 What's that?
 Thank you for your gift. I'm sorry about Marie.
 Are you disappointed?
 Why am I alive?
 Careful...
 Oh, shit...
 Ramstein Air Base, Germany.  Before the wall fell you would have woken up in a Russian prison hospital.
 Where am I?
 Alexanderplatz. 30 minutes. Under the World Clock. Alone. Give her your phone.
 Okay, Jason, your move.
 There was a girl in Paris. Part of the program. She used to handle the medication.
 Who?
 I want someone I know to take me in.
 Okay, how do you want to do it?
 I want to come in.
 What do you want?
 Bourne?
 It's me.
 Hold on...  Yep. And Abbott just direct dialed Moscow from his room...
 What? The tapes?
 You're sure?
 But we can relax. We tracked him. He's on a train to Moscow.
 We'll know for sure when we get the security tapes.
 This stays between you and I.  We finally have an edge. I don't want to lose it.
 What?
 Alright... take it down.
 I want to look at the room.  Check it out.
 Maybe he just needed a place to spend the night?
 -- the hotel -- how far? --
 -- go -- take the van! --
 -- uplink all relevant files to Kim --  -- and I want them to contact anyone who had anything to do with Treadstone --
 -- Kurt's reopening all the wyfi and sat links --
 Then get a number, they need to know who they're dealing with.
 There's only a Consulate, they sent a field officer out half an hour ago --
 Who's going? Us?
 Looks like he's been detained.
 And the Germans can't match it?
 -- so there were two of these explosive charges placed on the power lines. One of them failed. The fingerprint...  That's from the one that didn't go off.
 I'm working on it.
 We need to get in there.
 -- shut up! -- just shut the --
 -- no! -- not me! -- no other people! --
 -- who? -- who else is here? --
 Is there. Is all there.
 This is everything? Is there.
 Now. Show now.
 Here?
 Show me.
 I think that Bourne and Conklin were in business. That Bourne is still involved. And that whatever information I was going to buy in Berlin, it was big enough to make Bourne come out from wherever he's been hiding to kill again.  How's that scan?
 Okay, cut to the chase, Pam. What are you selling?
 For a thief. A mole. I vetted the source, Marty. He's real. If it does nothing more than narrow the list of suspects, it's a bargain at ten times the price.
 Still...
 We're talking raw, unprocessed KGB files. It's not something we can go out and comparison shop.
 It's a lot of money, Pam.
 That's where we came out.
 I'm here. So is Donnie and Jack Weller. We understand you're using the full allocation for this buy?
 I'm getting on a plane to Berlin in 45 minutes, which means you are going to call me back in 30, and when I ask you where we stand, I had better be impressed. My mobile number is...
 Yes, sir -- ma'am...
 I want that area secured, I want any evidence secured and I want it done now. Is that clear??
 If you ever want to make it to five, you're gonna listen to me real close. Jason Bourne is armed and extremely dangerous. A week ago, he assassinated two men in Berlin, one of whom was a highly-experienced field officer...
 Me? Four years.
 How long have you worked for the agency?
 Pamela Landy, again. Where do we stand?
 Who's this?
 Mr. Nevins?
 Felt promising. It's a start.
 So?
 Let's give him half an hour.
 Alright...
 I don't know. He was sick. He wanted out. I believed him.
 What do you think? Is he coming in?
 It's got caffeine in it. That's all I know.
 Is it fresh?
 Because he's doing just what he said he'd do. He's coming for us.
 And why is that?
 I don't think we need to keep looking for him anyway.
 See, that's a problem for me, Nicky. Whatever he's doing, we need to end it. This isn't the kind of mess you walk away from.
 What do you want from me? I was reassigned. I'm out.
 Some women like Dobermans --
 These were killers. Conklin had them all jacked up. They were Dobermans.
 Did you?
 You mean, did I want a date?
 You felt nothing? No spark? Two young people in Paris? Dangerous missions? Life and death?
 You're making it out like we're friends here or something. I met him alone twice.
 Not good enough. You're the person who floated this amnesia story.  Ever feel sorry for him? For what he'd been through?
 If you say so.
 So he fooled you.
 I believed Jason Bourne had suffered a severe traumatic breakdown.
 Believed what?
 Look, what do you want me to say? I was there. I believed him.
 Are you an expert in amnesia?
 Am I a doctor, no, but...
 I'm curious about Bourne. Your interpretation of his condition. You have specific training in the identification and diagnosis of psychological conditions?
 You were his local contact. You were with him the night Conklin died. You're coming with us.
 Good luck.
 Before this? Before Bourne? No.
 Amnesia?
 Depression. Anger. Compulsive behaviors. They had physical symptoms -- headaches -- sensitivity to light --
 What kind of problems?
 And what about you, anything?
 Yes. In that order.
 Are we hacking or asking?
 We're looking at all Berlin outbound. Good news is, every train station in Berlin has thirty to forty fixed, digital security cameras. Common feed.
 Alright... I want you, Kurt and Kim to stay on Bourne, track everything that's out there...
 His wife. In room 645. Then she shot herself.
 By who?
 Here's what I've got.  Remember Vladimir Neski? Russian politician? Seven years ago, he was due to speak to a group of European Oil ministers here at the hotel. He never did. He was murdered.
 Yeah, that'll work...What the hell was he doing here?
 Black coat, possibly leather. Dark slacks. Dark t-shirt.  He says they're gonna try and corral the guests on the street over there, and then check them out, but...
 Are we locked up?
 No. Munich's a bust. He's loose.
 Anything?
 What the hell is a "Treadstone?"
 Yup...  The main word there, the file heading, translates as: Treadstone.
 Do we know what this says?
 They've been sanctified and buried in the holy rites of God's church, and any hand that disturbs them now takes on eternal damnation. So please -- do it.
 Then we'll just have a peek at the wounds.  Dig 'em up!
 My brother and nephew perished two days ago, when their hay cart turned over.
 What it means in England -- and in Scotland too -- is that rebels have forfeited their lands. We were ambushed last night. But the Scots dragged their dead away.
 We just had a funeral, isn't that what it means in England as well?
 Someone dead from this household?
 Saying goodbye in their own way -- in outlawed tartans, with outlawed pipes, playing outlawed tunes.
 What are they doing?
 Non loquis Latinum? You don't speak Latin? We have to fix that, won't we?  Did he give the poetic benediction? The Lord bless thee and keep thee? Patris Benefactum et --  ...It was Malcolm's favorite.
 It was in Latin, sir.
 Did the priest say anything about the Resurrection? Or was it all about Judgment?
 Didn't want your father to die either, did ya? But it happened.
 I don't want to leave.
 We'll sleep here tonight. You'll come home with me. We'll let the house, and the lands too; plenty of willing neighbors.
 He has already agreed to come.
 I will meet you, but only one way -- if Robert the Bruce is there, and puts his hand on my Bible, and swears his loyalty to Scotland.
 We cannot. Some scarcely believe you are alive. Other think you'll pay them Mornay's wages. We bid you to Edinburgh. Meet us at the city gates, two days from now, at sunset. Pledge us your pardon and we will unite behind you. Scotland will be one.
 So let the council swear publicly.
 An oath to a liar is no oath at all. An oath to a patriot is a vow indeed. Every man of us is ready to swear loyalty to you.
 You've all sworn to Longshanks.
 Sir William. We come to seek a meeting.
 It is suicide.
 With cavalry -- not heavy, like the English, but light, fast horsemen, like you nobles employ -- we could outmaneuver their bowmen!
 We cannot defeat this --
 Peace?!
 We must sue for peace.
 A thousand.  You have made me Guardian of Scotland. So I tell you this is what we face.
 Invade?! That's impossible, it --
 I will invade England. And defeat the English on their own ground.
 But... what will you do?
 You are surprised he would lie? Balliol was murdered in a church yesterday. You are Longshanks' new designate. You will be king.
 Longshanks promised!
 He will. I know he will.
 He won't come.
 That is another matter. There is a price to all this, required both by Longshanks and our nobles. Pay it, and you will be our king. And we will have peace.
 The crown is that of Scotland. And Scotland is William Wallace.
 Homage is nothing. It is the crown that matters!
 If I pay homage to another's throne, then how am I a king?
 It will not be long before Longshanks too is encased in stone, and his crowns divided for others to wear.
 He was a modest man.
 May he rest in peace... You have already sealed the coffin?
 No. But his weight with the commoners could unbalance everything. The Balliols will kiss his ass, so we must.
 Does anyone know his politics?
 He strained his leg so that it pains him to ride. But he sends his greetings -- and says that I speak for all the Bruces. And for Scotland.
 A wise plan. And how is your father? We have missed him at the council.
 Clearly meant to draw more of his supporters here.
 My father hears that Longshanks has granted prima noctes.
 Young Robert, we are honored --
 You let Wallace escape your whole army. You cannot blame me for this.
 His legend grows! It will be worse than before!
 He is gone! Finished! Dead! If he has not yet bled to death or had his throat cut for him, he will not survive the winter. It is very cold -- is it not, our flower?
 But if we have not caught Wallace --
 What choice do they have? Now they must serve us or starve.
 The Scots will fight for us?
 Now we kill two birds at one stroke. We recruit from Scotland for our armies in France.
 So the Scots will have none of them, will they? My armorers have already made a thousand.
 The weapon has been outlawed by the Pope himself!
 Impossible.  How dare you bring a panicky lie.
 Wallace has sacked York!
 I have ordered conscriptions...
 While I am in France fighting to expand your future kingdom I learn that Stirling castle is lost, our entire northern army wiped out! And you have done nothing?!
 Nothing new, Majesty. We have sent riders to speed any word.
 What news of the north?
 I hear. This Wallace is a bandit, nothing more.
 Scottish rebels have routed Lord Bottoms!
 Before he lost his powers of speech, he told me his one comfort was that he would live to know Wallace was dead.
 Nor you. To you that word is as unfamiliar as love.
 I respect him. At worst he was a worthy enemy. Show mercy... Oh thou great king... and win the respect of your own people.
 You fancy him.
 I have come to beg for the life of William Wallace.
 Wallace's? For treason there is no trial. Tomorrow he will be charged, then executed.
 When will his trial be?
 Simply because he eluded your trap, do you think he is more than a man? My father is dying. Perhaps you should think of our coronation.
 Is it true? Wallace is captured?
 Grant, as you do everything else, with treachery. Offer him a truce to discuss terms, and send me to my castle at Locharmbie as your emissary. He trusts me. Pick thirty of your finest assassins for me to take along. And I will set the meeting, and the ambush.
 The little cow is insane --
 Wallace himself. If you wish to pretend a ghost rallies new volunteers in every Scottish town, I leave you to your hauntings. If you wish to take him, I know a way.
 Wallace's followers.
 I am cheerful with a plan to soothe your miseries. All of England shudders with the news of renewed rebellion.
 You mock us with a smile?
 Good day to you, M'Lords.
 You may.
 Yes. I had thought that... I was loathsome to you. Perhaps I am. If I may be excused, M'lord.
 Now, my flower, do you understand?
 Look at me. I said LOOK AT ME!
 No, M'lord.
 All so very boring! He wants me to learn to fight too, so let me do it!
 ...His majesty was quite keen that you should understand --
 Shut up, would you! How can I concentrate?!
 Scotland. He intends --
 So I did! And what was so important about it?
 You directed me to report to you the moment the king's conference was ended.
 What is it?!
 No. One of us is enough.
 Keep these. We're going too.
 My dreams of Marion are gone. I killed them myself. If I knew I could live with her on the other side of death, I'd welcome it.
 Your dreams aren't about freedom! They're about Marion! You have to be a hero, because you think she sees you! Is that it?
 We've lived a dream together. A dream of freedom!
 That's just a dream, William!
 Nor I! I want to live! I want a home and children and peace. I've asked god for those things. But He's brought me this sword. And if He wills that I must lay it down to have what He wants for my country, then I'll do that too.
 I don't want to be a martyr.
 Probably. But we can't win alone. We know that. This is the only way.
 You know it's a trap.
 Your rest is making me exhausted.
 I rest.
 Rest, William.
 We're here to stay. We don't care to live, if we can't fight beside ya.
 Thanks for the food and drink. And for bringing 'em yourselves.
 Aye.
 Stephen ready?
 Mornay has come. So will the Bruce.
 The Bruce is not coming, William.
 Fourteen? --
 We make spears. A hundred spears. Fourteen feet long.
 Hamish, I... thank...
 I'll wait... back there.
 I should'a remembered the eggs.
 Good to see you again.
 I will not.
 You'll move
 I could crush you like a roach.
 Can you do it when it matters? As it matters in battle? Could you crush a man with that throw?
 That depends on the man.
 I still say this is no test. A catapult can throw a stone farther than a man can.
 The test of a soldier is not in his arm. It's here.
 Call it a test of soldiery, then. The English won't let us train with weapons, so we train with stones.
 You win.
 Test of manhood.
 Aye, we'll get 'em.
 We'll get those English pigs tomorrow.
 I wanna have supper waitin'.
 Wanna stay with me tonight?
 It's up to us, Hamish!
 With your father and brother gone, they'll kill us and burn the farm!
 They're English soldiers, ain't they?
 Armed?
 Three, maybe more!
 How many?
 They're coming!
 They used hounds on us in Ireland, it's the only way!
 We don't split up!
 We must run in different directions!
 A patriot!
 A common thief.
 Excellent! Stephen is my name. I'm the most wanted man on the Emerald Isle. Except I'm not on the Emerald Isle of course, more's the pity.
 In order to find his equal, and Irishman is forced to talk to God.  Yes, Father!...  The Almighty says don't change the subject, just answer the fookin' question.
 Is your Poppa a ghost -- or do you converse with God Almighty?
 All right, Father, I'll ask him!  If I risk my neck for you, will I get a chance to kill Englishmen?
 All men lose heart. All betray. It is exactly why we must make the choices we make.
 In my heart I had begun to hope that he would never break.
 We must have alliance with England to prevail here. You achieved that! You saved your family, increased your lands! In time you will have all the power in Scotland!... Yet you grieve.
 He broke because of me. I saw it. He lost all will to fight.
 So more men were slaughtered uselessly!
 He was so brave. With courage alone he nearly won.
 I am the one who is rotting. But I think your face looks graver than mine.
 He will fight you forever. But what does he fight for? Freedom first, and peace. So grant them.
 Let her speak.
 I have faced him. Have you?
 My greatness is better demonstrated with this.
 Forgive me, Sire. I thought that generosity might demonstrate your greatness to those you mean to rule.
 This is what happens when you must send a woman. And a fool.
 No. I have it to ease the suffering of the children of this war.
 Humbly, M'lord.
 The Scottish nobles have sent him no support. His army starves. Our stall has worked, he must withdraw. You may return to your embroidery.
 ...A mindless barbarian. Not a king like you, M'lord.
 You spoke with this Wallace in private. What kind of man is he?
 He waits. For you. He says he will attack no more towns -- if you are man enough to come fight him.
 Then why does he stay? My scouts say he has not advanced.
 No. He did not.
 My son's loyal wife returns, unkilled by the heathen. So he accepted our bribe.
 If he wants his queen to rule, then you stay and learn how! I will deal with him.
 Shall I leave, M'lord?
 I sent for him -- and the little coward send you?!
 Your pardon, M'lord, he asked me to come in his stead.
 Where is my son?
 Then on the morrow, thou shalt receive they purification... And in the end, I promise you'll beg for the axe.
 I do not confess.
 Confess, and you may receive a quick death. Deny, and you must be purified by pain. Do you confess? ...DO YOU CONFESS?!
 -- while many who serve him have taken and broken his oath many times. I cannot commit treason, if I have never been his subject!
 It matters not, he is thy king!
 Never, in my whole life, did I swear allegiance to your king --
 Against thy king, thou vile fool! Hast thou anything to say?
 Treason. Against whom?
 ...Tonight!
 Then when?
 My parents are growing suspicious! I can't keep meeting you every night!
 Tonight then.
 Shush. It's only been a day.  And it's seemed like forever.
 I've missed you.
 I will be with you, like this. Forever.
 This night is too beautiful to have again.
 I don't want to scare you. I want to be yours, and you mine. Every night like this one.
 You scare me.
 But I won't give you up to any nobleman.
 Nor I!
 I'm not just saying it!
 I... accept your proposal!
 I want... to marry you!
 No. You don't choose your dreams. Your dreams choose you.
 Did it work?
 Some nights. I have dreams. Mostly dreams I don't want. I started riding at night to fill up my mind so that when I did sleep I'd dream only of the ride and the adventure.
 You've been here before?
 You are. And I'll come again.
 I'll invite you again, but your mother thinks I'm crazy.
 Thank you for inviting.
 Thank you for accepting.
 It's not you. He dislikes that you're a Wallace. He just says... the Wallaces don't seem to live for very long.
 Your father doesn't like me, does he?
 Wake up, William. Wake up!
 I need you so much! I love you!
 And I with you. But you must wake.
 I don't want to wake. I want to stay with you.
 Yes, you are. And you must wake.
 I'm dreaming.
 ...I wouldn't know.
 Knowing his passion for his lost love, they next plotted to take him by desecrating the graves of his father and brother and setting an ambush at the grave of his wife. He fought his way through the trap and carried her body to a secret place! Now that is romance, Oui?
 A magistrate wished to capture him, and found he had a secret lover, so he cut the girl's throat to tempt Wallace to fight -- and fight he did.
 This Scottish rebel... Wallace? He fights to avenge a woman?
 Ah, Oui! Englishmen don't know what a tongue is for.
 He shouldn't be telling secrets in bed.
 Last night I slept with a member of the War Council.
 How do you know this?
 When the king returns he will bury them in those new clothes. Scotland is in chaos. Your husband is secretly sending an army north.
 I can't bear the thought of your torture. Take it!
 It will numb my wits, and I must have them all. If I'm senseless, or if I wail, then Longshanks will have broken me.
 Drink this! It will dull your pain.
 Every man dies. Not every man really lives.
 You will die! It will be awful!
 If I swear to him, then everything I am is dead already.
 Mercy... is to die quickly. Perhaps even live in the Tower. In time, who knows what can happen, if you can only live.
 Will he show mercy to my country? Will he take back his soldiers, and let us rule ourselves?
 Sir, I... come to beg you to confess all, and swear allegiance to the king, that he might show you mercy.
 M'lady... what kindness of you to visit a stranger.
 No. But can you love me for the sake of all you loved and lost? Or simply love me... because I love you?
 I cannot love you for the sake of revenge.
 You understand. Consider, before you laugh and say no. You will never own a throne, though you deserve one. But just as the sun will rise tomorrow, some man will rule England. And what if his veins ran not with the blood of Longshanks, but with that of a true king?
 I have taken vows. More than one. I've vowed faithfulness to my husband, and sworn to give him a son. And I cannot keep both promises.
 You have... you have a husband.
 Because of the way you're looking at me now. The same way... as when we met.
 Why did you?
 It does me good to see you.
 A meeting in a barn. It had to be a trap. And only you would know I would be aware of it.
 She was my wife. We married in secret because I would not share her with an English lord. They killed her to get to me. And she was pregnant.
 I understand you have suffered. I know... about your woman.
 SLAVES ARE MADE IN SUCH WAYS!
 Peace is made is such ways.
 A Lordship. And gold. That I should become Judas.
 Let us talk plainly. You invade England. But you cannot complete the conquest, so far from your shelter and supply. The King proposes that you withdraw your attack. In return he grants you title, estates, and this chest with a thousand pounds of gold, which I am to pay to you personally.
 That is not possible.
 York was the staging point for every invasion of my country. And that royal cousin hanged a hundred Scots, even women and children, from the city walls.
 Did God make you the sacker of peaceful cities? The executioner of the king's nephew, my husband's own cousin?
 I have been given nothing. God makes men what they are.
 I understand that you have recently been given the rank of knight.
 But now that I am here, will you speak with a woman?
 It's battle I want, not talk.
 I come as the king's servant, and with his authority.
 Wife of Edward, the king's son?
 I am the Princess of Wales.
 And I will consult with mine.
 I must... consult with my father.
 Then tell me what a king is! Is he a man who believes only what others believe? Is he one who calculates the numbers for and against him but never weighs the strength in your own heart? There is strength in you. I see it. I know it.
 I am trying.
 War finds me willing. I know it won't bring back all I have lost. But it can bring what none of us have ever had -- a country of our own. For that we need a king. We need you.
 Nobles? What does that mean -- to be noble? Your title gives you claim to the throne of our country. But men don't follow titles, they follow courage! Your arm speaks louder than your tongue. Our people know you. Noble and common, they respect you. If you would lead them toward freedom, they would follow you. And so would I.
 I'm no coward! I want what you want! But we need the nobles.
 We all end up dead. It's only a question of how. And why.
 No. But from top to bottom this country has no sense of itself. Its nobles share allegiance with England and its clans war with each other. If you make enemies on both sides of the border, you'll end up dead.
 And the common man who bleeds on the battlefield, does he risk less?
 Wait! ...I respect what you said. But remember, these men have lands, castles. Much to risk.
 Aye. But it won't let me dream.
 Come, it'll help you sleep.
 Bring out our spearmen and set them in the field.
 Fine speech. Now what do we do?
 No English lord would trust an Irishman!
 I thought I was dead when ya pulled that dagger!
 Exactly.
 Who would do such a thing?
 The dogs have a scent. My scent. Someone must have given it to them.
 What's the crazy man saying, Lord?
 They've tricked us.
 We can't stop!
 When I asked Evan about his drawing, well, he didn't remember doing it.
 What?
 Of course. There is one more thing, Mrs. Treborn. And I feel bad for mentioning it...
 Thank you for showing it to me first. I'll... I'll take care of it. Can I have the picture?
 Yesterday I had all the children draw pictures of what they wanted to be when they grew up. Most of them made drawings of what their parents did, but this...
 What is it?
 I was going to show this to the principal, but I wanted to talk to you first.
 I'm sorry, but can it wait til tonight? I'm already late for work --
 Mrs. Treborn! I need to speak with you!
 The hemorrhaging... the neural damage is irreparable. I'm frankly surprised he still has use of his motor functions.
 No dances, just tell me.
 So what did you find.
 Actually, these tests weren't available twenty years ago.
 Nine, ten. And you're awake! Open your eyes, dammit!
 Evan wake up, oh please wake up!
 How soon?...
 It's worth a shot. I can arrange a controlled meeting. A careful dose of sedatives for Jason, some security, you and I monitoring. Evan comes in for a quick visit and with any luck, no more missing father complex.
 Well, he has been pushing me to meet his father, but I've been putting it off.
 You'd be surprised how often they are.
 Come on, I doubt the answer's that simple.
 Plenty. Who knows? Maybe he's got severe coping problems about not having a father. Did you say the last blackout occurred when he was with his friend's dad.
 But he's seven. What kind of stress can he have?
 If I had to guess, I'd say the blackouts are stress related.
 But you must have something to go on?
 Unfortunately, we've got nothing to work with. It's harder playing detective now.
 And the bad news?
 Well, the good news is that the results are negative. I've found no evidence in the way of lesions, hemorrhaging, tumors...
 It could be extremely useful to jog his memory. See if he remembers anything new the next day. And I'll have the test results back in a few days.
 Why? What for?
 A journal. Just have him write down everything he does.
 Anything.
 Look, Andrea, I'm sure he'll test negative for brain disorders. But there's something else you can try to monitor his memory.
 Just tell me that Evan doesn't have Jason's illness...
 Hold it, hold it, Andrea. Let's not jump to conclusions. I'll run some preliminary tests, see what we can rule out.
 Not according to his teacher. It just got me thinking about Jason and what if Evan's inherited his father's condition?
 And you say he doesn't remember any of it?
 Don't worry. I'm gonna get you out of here.
 Just. Like. Jason.
 You told me that on Parents' Weekend. Remember? Wait, that wasn't me. Or you.
 How. Did you. Know that?
 Come on, Mom. Just 'cause Dad was my age when he started going crazy doesn't mean that I'm nuts.
 You're. Acting. Like your father.
 I just need the entry about the blockbuster. Wait, shit, no arms. I never even got the chance to write it.
 Fix?
 There must be a way to fix this.
 He's saying it's like forty years worth of new memories have been jammed in my brain since last year. Overload city. 'Sat about the gist of it, doc?
 What does that mean for Evan?
 Cute, Evan.
 Okay, doc. What's the damage? How much time have I got?
 Fine. You'll get them, Evan. But I think it's far more important to focus on your case right now.
 Damn it, Mom. I told you I need them all!
 I found these. The others are still in storage.
 How's Kayleigh doing? She all right?
 I don't know. These things take time.
 How long will I be in here?
 ...I spoke to your new lawyer about the appeal. He's sure he can get you off on self-defense, so if you're patient.
 What? What could he do?
 And then, just before it got so bad that he had to be committed, he said that he could...
 Sure...
 I couldn't tell if they were real memories or just phantoms. You know, he might only have thought he actually remembered them...
 When he was around your age... almost exactly your age. He said he figured out a trick to remember the past.
 No, it's just weird with him being such a brain and all, I just wondered if he was ever able to remember stuff he'd forgotten.
 Why do you ask?
 Ma? Did he ever say that he figured out a way to recall a lost memory years after he blacked it out for the first time?
 Please. He got straight A's without ever touching a book. That was the one area where his memory never failed him.
 Did Da -- Jason --- get good grades?
 I can't help it. I'm just so proud of you. You've got the highest grades in all of your classes.
 Please, mom. People will talk.
 Don't try to use your blackouts to get out of this one!
 I... I blacked out.
 Something must've happened! What set him off?
 I don't know... I don't remember.
 Okay.
 Now your father may seem sleepy to you, but that's just because of his medicine, okay?
 I... I don't remember.
 Honey. What were you doing with that?
 What happened?
 Great. I'll see you soon.
 These'll bring you luck, Crockett.
 My father has a bad memory, too?
 That's why I wanted you to come here, Evan. Dr. Redfield already has a background in memory loss.
 You'll be fine. Dr. Redfield just wants to give you some tests. You'll like him.
 I don't like this place, Mom. It's creepy. Please can we go? I promise I won't make any more bad pictures!
 Good. Because I've been waiting to see your art projects all week and I'd feel terrible if all you thought about was your father not being there.
 No.
 I get the point, kiddo. But I'm not so bad, am I?
 All the dads are gonna be there.
 But Lenny said that his dad's coming... and Tommy and Kayleigh's dad...
 We've been over this a hundred times. It's too dangerous for him.
 Can't he come out for one day?
 You know the answer to that.
 Um... can dad come this time?
 Darn it!
 Thanks. Don't worry Evan, you'll have plenty of time.
 Righty-tighty, lefty-lucy.
 We're putting up pictures for Parent's Night.
 When did you ever care about getting to school on time?
 We're gonna be late again.
 So you believe me?
 Signs of the Lord. They just appeared out of nowhere. I thought you were loco!
 What did you see? What did it look like?
 Marks, scars, I dunno. Anything could happen I guess.
 Weirder than this?
 Just tell me if anything weird happens.
 You need to see the prison shrink, man.
 So when I'm out, I need you to watch my face and hands closely.
 I ain't bullshitting. Jesus speaks to me in my dreams.
 Shit. I knew you were crazy.
 Because I think he sent me to your cell on purpose. For you to help me.
 Straight up.
 You're religious Carlos, you believe that bit about "the Lord works in mysterious ways?"
 Jesus himself couldn't make me take on the Brotherhood. When they come, just put your mind in another place, man. Be somewhere else.
 Can you protect me?
 Best not bitch up. Wind up someone's luggage that way.
 Photos?
 You remind me of your father. He always screamed for a photo album even though he never had one.
 But I... I need those books.
 Think Evan. You've invented a disease that doesn't exist. Alternate universes with colleges, prisons, paraplegia...
 My journals! Where are they?
 Books?
 Where are my goddamn books?
 Hey, Evan. What's the big rush? We don't meet for another hour.
 Lemme guess. Would that be where the memories are stored?
 This is where we're finding most of the hemorrhaging. The outer lining of the cerebral cortex.
 Are you sure? Not even with my father?
 It's a little complicated. I haven't seen results exactly like these before.
 It's coming... argh! I can't!
 The car doesn't vanish Evan. The movie in your head has broken, that's all. But now I've re-spliced it and I want you to tell me about the car.
 I can't... the car vanishes and all of a sudden I'm on the ground in the woods.
 Go on. Nothing can hurt you. Remember, this is only a movie. You're completely safe.
 I see a car.
 Okay. Then go a little forward in time. What do you see now?
 No, protecting her.
 Are you hurting her?
 I'm standing next to Kayleigh, my hands are over her ears.
 Where are you now?
 Yes.
 Now I want you to go back to the time you were in the woods with Lenny. Think of it like a movie. You can pause, rewind, or slow down any details you wish. Understand?
 Not in this wing, actually. No.
 Dad lives here?
 You know my father?
 Hello, Evan. It's very nice to meet you.  He's as handsome as his father.
 Sorry, dude. Just figured it'd be okay with you bein' sick and all.
 Get out. Both of you.
 Fuck off, frat boy.
 Huh?
 Whasamatter? Lost your Rolex?
 Shucks, I dunno. But maybe there's a reason why you've repressed the one day when some old lecher had you in your tighty whities, dammit!
 What?
 Are you stupid or what?
 Shhh! I need quiet for this.
 What the fuck are you doing?
 I never wanted to be in the movie anyway and it was cold so I wanted to wear my clothes but Mr. Miller took his shirt off --
 All I know is that I might be able to unblock some of my repressed memories.
 You really think he wanted to kill you?
 That's probably why Hannibal Lecter's so smart.
 Just by absorbing the first worm into its cellular structure, it gets all of the worm's memories.
 Like Ozzy.
 It's an experiment with flatworms and a maze. You take a flatworm and run it through the maze until he's memorized it. Then you put a new flatworm in the maze. He's clueless. Banging into walls, getting lost, whatever.
 This is bigger. Seven years to the day. No blackouts.
 I thought you were a December baby.
 Get dressed, Thumper, you're taking me out for my birthday.
 Why not? But that's not how things wound up. I'm with Lenny, Lenny's your friend. And there it ends.
 Then you think it might have worked out?
 Well a lot of things cross my mind. I've always been a fast thinker, Ev. I can play out the movie of our entire lives in under a second. Boom -- we fall in love -- get married -- two kids, your keen analytical insight matched to my generous nature -- kids grow old as do we, relatively stable relationships, matching burial plots, the whole bit. It took a lot longer to spit out than to imagine.
 And...?
 It's crossed my mind from time to time.
 I never knew that. So then you still sometimes think of us... together?
 When my folks split, they gave me and Tommy a choice who we wanted to live with. I couldn't stand my dad, but I knew if I moved to my mom's I'd never see you again.
 I don't get it.
 That's why when I was little I never went to live with my mother.
 I was?
 Sure, Evan, why not? You were the first person I really ever cared about.
 Kayleigh? Do you ever think about "us?" I mean, wonder if it could ever have been different between the two of us?
 Yeah, I think I gotta get these fixed or something.
 Is something the matter?
 He saved Mrs. Halpern? Please, the twisted fuck.
 You know how spiritual he's gotten ever since he saved Mrs. Halpern and Katie.
 Stop! Take me back!
 We have to get you to Sunnyvale. You're having one of your famous hemorrhages.
 Where are we going?
 Well, don't give up now, Slick. You've already done so much for me. Hell, why don't you go back in time and save Mrs. Halpern and her baby. Then maybe Lenny wouldn't freak out and ruin my family.
 I'm over it. Whenever I try to help anyone it all turns to shit.
 Off to change everyone's life again, is that it? Maybe this time you'll pop up in some mansion while I wind up in Tijuana doing the donkey act.
 Don't think I'll need it where I'm going.
 Sure you don't want your wallet?
 There is no fuckin' way on this planet or any other that I was in some fuckin' sorority.
 Which is?
 There's one major hole in your story.
 That I didn't leave you there to rot.
 Know what?
 I just thought you should know.
 Then forget that. How about... you prefer the smell of a skunk to flowers, you hate cilantro because for reasons unknown to you, it reminds you of your step-sister.
 Anyone with fifty bucks could tell you that.
 Shit. I dunno. How would I know about the twin moles on your inner thigh?
 Oh? There's proof now?
 I couldn't give a shit if you believe me or not, and frankly I'm too tired to prove it to you.
 I'm the only person you've told? That's a great line. Does that make other girls swoon? Do they actually eat up this bullshit?
 I never thought you would. That's why I've never bothered to tell a soul until now, and why I never will again.
 You're right, Evan, I don't believe you.
 Do you remember when I was a kid and I had those blackouts?
 On the bridge. How did you know that Tommy had your dog? That was no fucking hunch.
 Yeah?
 Let me ask you a question. Just a little one that's been gnawing at me for years.
 Different? How?
 Because you're... different.
 Why's that?
 I've seen some sickening shit. I don't blink twice anymore, especially in your case.
 You wouldn't believe me. I mean, people always say, "You wouldn't believe me", but in this case, it's not even worth trying.
 What's happened to you?
 The bottom. When you're just a piece of meat waiting for the next attack.
 Ha! Where's that?
 No. Just that you need to hurt me with it. I've been where you've been.
 Oh, I'm sorry. Does my line of work make you uncomfortable, precious?
 I get it. You can drop it now.
 So how's tricks? Sorry, occupational humor.
 Nice to see you, too. Can I come in?
 Oh, I thought you were my eight o'clock. Make it fast, I'm expecting someone.
 Now's the only time!  Today you get a chance to redeem yourself. Start over with a clean slate. Tabula rasa --
 Evan. Stop it. It's not the time.
 I want you to take this, Lenny. Today's your day of atonement. I know how guilty you feel about that woman and her baby --
 He's a fucking maniac!
 Evan, stop! You're gonna kill him!
 What?
 Wait. Something's not right. Isn't that your jacket?
 I know I've been actin strange lately. It's just that... I don't want anything to happen to us.
 I can't put my finger on it, but everything's a bit off. Even the dinner tonight. It was beautiful, but...
 I walk differently?
 I don't know. You seem... different. You make weird jokes. Your accents changed. You don't even walk the same.
 Like how?
 It's just... you've been acting kinda strange, you know?
 What do you mean?
 Are you okay?
 My father never laid a hand on me. It's like the prick saved it all up for Tommy.
 Don't give me this Oprah-book club bad upbringing shit, because you turned out fine.
 It's not his fault, Evan. You knew how bad he had it when we were kids.
 Yeah, right. Tell that to Crockett.
 Please, Evan. Don't even joke. He wouldn't hurt you. He's just trying to scare you away from me.
 Might'a been nice.  Like this is gonna do any good. Maybe one of the frat guys has a gun.
 It's my fault. I should have told you he was released a few weeks ago.
 Simple math. When I woke up this morning and saw your smile... I knew that I wanted to spend the rest of my life with you.
 Why are you doing all this for me?
 Go on. Sit down.
 I don't know what to say. It's beautiful.
 You'll see.
 I don't understand, where are you taking me?
 As if my dad could've stopped me from seeing you. What's he gonna do to me?
 What do you think it is about us that makes us so perfect? Like, looking back, whatever gave you the nerve to sneak out and visit me after I moved away?
 Yeah, if you call multiple orgasms weird.
 So it didn't feel... weird?
 Oh my God, that was good. Where'd you learn all those new tricks?
 I dunno.  Just being weird.
 Well I remember he had one... but he, like, put it away after the first day. Why would that freak me out?
 Hey, uh, don't go freaking out on me over this, but do you remember when your dad first got his video camera?
 Those are your clothes, silly.
 Where... where are my clothes?
 Mmmm... You give good compliment. Clean up and come back to bed.
 Jesus, Kayleigh, you're...  Incredible.
 Who are you trying to convince, Evan?! You come all the way out here to stir up my shit just because you had a bad memory!? You want me to cry on your shoulder and tell you that everything's all better now? Well fuck you, Evan! Nothing's gonna be all better! Okay?! Nothing ever gets better!
 You can't hate yourself just because your dad's a twisted freak.
 Just shut up, Evan. You're wasting your breath.
 No, but I think something really bad might've happened to us.
 Is that why you came all the way back? To ask a lot of stupid questions about Robin Hood?
 I know, but...
 It was a long time ago.
 It's just... did he... what happened in the basement?
 What do you want to know, Evan?
 When we were kids. Your dad was making a movie. Robin Hood or something?
 Well, sure. I'll try to remember. Shoot.
 Well, lately some of the memories have begun to come back and I'd kinda like to talk to you about one of them in particular. It'd be a big help.
 Of course.
 Remember when I was a kid I had all these blackouts?
 Me? Are you kidding? Why?
 Actually, Kayleigh, the reason I came back to town was to talk to you.
 She had a new family. Not enough space for me. Said I should have moved in with her when we were kids. But... whatever.
 Couldn't you have moved in with your mom?
 Not if you remember my dad.
 Wow. That must've taken some courage.
 No. I emancipated myself when I was fifteen.
 They kept him in juvy for a few years. Now he works over at Dale's Autobody.
 So how's Tommy?
 I've stopped a hundred times.
 Not since we were kids.
 I'm going to State now. Things are going okay. I guess. Mom's good...
 No, Evan. I don't know. It's been a long time. Fill me in.
 Oh, comme si, comme ca, you know...
 God, Evan! I never thought I'd see you again. How've you been?
 Hi, Lenny.
 Welcome home. Thought you might like some fresh air for a change.
 He must be. They're letting him go, right?
 Did your mom say if Lenny was... okay?
 Duck, here they come.
 He's been acting real strange lately. He won't even look me in the eyes anymore.
 I can't believe Tommy's still pissed at me. He knows I'm moving away, right?
 What are you talking about? What you deserve is a better brother and father. All they do is make you feel like shit.
 I deserve a lot worse.
 Damn. Your dad did this?
 It's not your fault. Mrs. Kagan called dad and blamed us for what happened to Lenny.
 I'm sorry.
 Ouch.
 You really don't remember anything that happened?
 I'm sorry Kayleigh. This was a bad idea.
 Shit, Lenny. What's happened to you! We've gotta get help!
 Oh God... what did we do?
 So let's go. This place creeps me out.
 We should go soon. If Dad catches us smoking down here, we're dead.
 Been there, done that.
 That's dangerous! You could blow your hands off!
 And I'll tell the Child Protective Services about your kiddie porn endeavors. One step closer and I'll shove this up your ass!
 Easy does it, Evan! Don't be a bad boy or I'll tell mommy you were naughty.
 Listen close then, fuckbag. You screw up again and I swear I'll flat out castrate you.
 ...yes.
 Let's just say you're being closely watched, George. Your other option is to get your porn off the rack and treat Kayleigh like... oh, let's say like how a loving father treats his daughter. Sound okay to you, Papa?
 Who -- who are you?
 It'll change your daughter from a beautiful child into an empty shell whose only concept of trust was betrayed by her own sick pedophile father. Ultimately, it'll lead to her suicide. Nice work, daddy.
 What's happened to -- How are you doing that?
 Wrong answer, fuckbag. This is the very moment of your reckoning. In the next thirty seconds you're going to open one of two doors. The first door will forever traumatize your own flesh and blood.
 It's time for you to stand where the hell I told you.
 What time is it?
 Kayleigh? What happened?
 Quit acting like some retard or I'll call your mother and tell her what a naughty little shit you've been.
 I was just somewhere else -- how did I get here?
 Calm down, kid. Stand still.
 Where am I? What happened? Where did we all go?
 That's right, Evan, and you get to be the star.
 We're really gonna be in a movie!?
 Bullshit. I'll send you a postcard when I've made everything perfect again.
 You can't play God, son. It must end with me. Just by being here, you may be killing your mother.
 Who's to say you can't make things better?
 There is no "right". When you change who people are, you destroy who they were.
 But it didn't. And now I need info to make things right again and you're the only one who can give it to me.
 I was praying this curse would have ended with me.
 Look, Jason, I need some fast answers if I'm ever gonna fix what I've done.
 Are you okay? You looked like you were somewhere else for a second there.
 Uh-huh. Mom says I have your eyes and your --
 It's okay. I won't bite. You've seen pictures of me, right?
 I'd say blow me. Get the pledges to do it.
 Thanks. Wow. Hey, I want to do something really special for Kayleigh tomorrow. If I said I needed some help from you and the brothers...
 Damn, Evan, on the D.L.
 You're kidding. Are these the answers?!
 Me neither.
 We'll find out soon enough.
 Evan, you're hysterical. You study for this?
 The answer's 'no', Mr. Treborn. Now take a seat. The exam's about to begin.
 Evan Treborn.
 And you are...?
 I still owe you an essay from last week. Is there any way I could get an extension?
 Remember, everyone! Only two weeks until your science projects are due.
 I won't let you down, Professor Carter.
 Just don't drop the ball, okay?
 I know, I know. Who can think of worms when your libido's in full swing, right?
 Oh, fine I guess. It's been kind of crazy lately with my mom coming up, so I haven't...
 Whoa! Didn't mean to scare you, Evan. Just wanted to know how the flatworms project was coming.
 Hey, I got no choice.
 Typical psych major. A complete wise ass. And how's your project coming? Still planning to change the way we humble scientists view memory assimilation?
 I'm not sure. I might have gotten some stories mixed up. Did Pavlov condition his dogs to lick his nuts?
 Maybe because they never do.  So Don Juan, you pass out on all your dates?
 It didn't feel like a dream.
 It was like Tommy was possessed or something. There was a hate in his eyes that I couldn't really call human.
 Come on, go on...
 Deal. Now read me something.
 Freeze! No "worm-boy". No "Mr. Worm," and no "Worm-Master-General!" Once you get a nickname like that you can't shake it. And I don't want everyone thinking I've got tapeworms coming out of my ass or something, okay?
 Wow... read something.
 Yeah. I've been keeping journals since I was seven.
 Most guys tuck their porn under here, but all you have are... comp books.
 You're kidding. He's so... big.
 Thumper had a busy afternoon.
 Smells like sex in here.
 Maybe if I can figure out how the memories of a simple worm function, it'll help me understand the complexities of the human brain.
 So what's the point?
 If I hadn't blown my arms off, Mom never woulda started smoking in the first place. Now shhhh.
 Destroy it?
 Shhh. I need to concentrate on the blockbuster if I'm gonna destroy it.
 What?
 Duly noted. Now I'm gonna ask you for one last favor.
 What do you need it for? I don't get you lately.
 My mom packed for me. I think she sent everything I ever owned. So we'll see.
 Are you sure you even packed it?
 Forget it. What's the point of Psych now? Tomorrow I could wake up as some dirt farmer in Bangladesh.
 Uh, we should be getting to class now.
 Y... yes. I guess I did.
 You knew the whole time, didn't you?  When you put the blade in my hand, you knew something big was going to happen. Didn't you?!
 Drop it or I'll slit your mother's throat in her sleep.
 Yeah, good, what else do you remember?
 I couldn't cut the rope.
 Gee, thanks friend.
 That should buy you ten minutes at least.
 Sure. I was gonna make a new one, anyway.
 Can... can... Can I have this?
 I think I'll go check out the chapel.
 Mom. Don't cry. I can change this.
 Sorry, Mrs. T. He's been out of sorts lately.
 Lung cancer?
 Oh goody, nothing like spinning my chair around to a techno mix of Hava Nagila til I puke.
 I did what you said, man! We're pooling our student funds with Hillel House and we're going to have an Awareness Dance.
 I'll do whatever you want. You don't want me to ever see Kayleigh again, fine. Just let Crockett go. Besides, you kill him now and they'll stick you in juvy for sure. And I know you'd never leave your sister alone with your father.
 Listen to me good, Evan...
 Right, Evan. I believe you just said "sick fuck."
 No one thinks you're a piece of shit, Tommy.
 It wasn't enough that the whole world loves you, but you had to take away the last person on earth who didn't think I was a piece of shit.
 What the hell are you doing?
 Get this "us" shit. As if I was gonna lay a hand on my own sister. You've done nicely for yourself, Evan. Nice friends, nice life, not to mention you're fucking my sister. Not a bad piece of ass if I say so myself.
 Leave us alone you sick fuck!
 What's wrong with you?!
 Look what you made me do!
 What happened?? Where are we?!
 Hurry! Let's go! Get him up, Evan! Come on!
 Hold your horses, man. It's here somewhere. I saw it when I was a kid.
 Tommy, I'm bored shitless over here. What's up already?
 Fat little baby, crying for mommy.
 Hey, what'd you do that for?
 Sorry. Never heard of her.
 None taken. Hey, uh, does Kayleigh Miller still work here?
 Meant no offense.
 I come from a big family.
 Nothing. Just that my brother did a stint in the pen and he used to eat like that.
 Huh?
 Just get out, didja?
 Aw, hey now, that was a compliment.
 Shut up, Tommy!
 Oh my God oh my God...
 Lenny? Come on!
 I'm sorry.
 Wipe that sad-assed look off your face before you get us all busted. You see the way Evan's mom was looking at you?
 Just blow something up? Are you nuts? There's an art to mass destruction. Would you just paint the Mona Lisa? No. Besides, we're here already.
 Where the hell are you taking us anyway? Just blow something up already.
 What did I say about mentioning that bitch?
 You are, silly. He's a bad sheriff.
 I thought I was the bad guy!
 Quit it, Tommy. Evan gets to be Robin Hood. I'm gonna be Maid Marian, and you're the Sheriff of Nottingham!
 I don't think Evan gets to be in it --
 Evan, guess what? Dad got a new video camera and we're all gonna be in a movie.
 Yeah, you do that, Lenny.
 Maybe it went out. Should someone check it?
 Ain't gonna work this time, buddy. Look how small that fuse is! I'll get killed.
 The hell you aren't. Anyone of us does it, you'll puss out and narc for sure.
 What? No frigging way, man. I'm not touching that thing.
 Here you go, buddy.
 You're such a retard!
 You put the mommy too far away. Mrs. Boswell has macaroni and glue if you wanna fix it.
 -- He's just a lucky guy.
 Monsieur Rick, I --
 Yes, well, everybody in Casablanca has problems. Yours may work out. You'll excuse me.
 Oh, but if you knew what it means to us to leave Europe, to get to America! Oh, but if Jan should find out! He is such a boy. In many ways I am so much older than he is.
 Go back to Bulgaria.
 Oh, yes, please.
 You want my advice?
 And he never knew, and the girl kept this bad thing locked in her heart? That would be all right, wouldn't it?
 Nobody ever loved me that much.
 He always has.
 -- Will he keep his word?
 And you want to know --
 Yes, Monsieur.
 And he is still willing to give you a visa?
 Oh, yes.
 Does he know that?
 He tells me he can give us an exit visa, but we have no money.
 Yes, I'll bet.
 Yes, but we have not much money, and traveling is so expensive and difficult. It was much more than we thought to get here. And then Captain Renault sees us and he is so kind. He wants to help us.
 So you decided to go to America.
 Eight weeks. We come from Bulgaria. Oh, things are very bad there, Monsieur. A devil has the people by the throat. So, Jan and I, we, we do not want our children to grow up in such a country.
 How long have you been married?
 At the roulette table, trying to win enough for our exit visa. Well of course, he's losing.
 I thought so. Where's your husband?
 He did. Captain Renault did.
 -- Now, just a minute. Who told you to ask me that?
 No, I mean, is he trustworthy? Is his word --
 Oh, he's just like any other man, only more so.
 Monsieur Rick, what kind of man is Captain Renault?
 No.
 No, of course not. Do you mind if I do?
 He is? Well, Captain Renault's getting broadminded. Sit down. Will you have a drink?
 My husband is with me, too.
 I should have known.
 I came with Captain Renault.
 How did you get in here? You're under age.
 Could I speak to you for just a moment, please?
 Yes?
 Monsieur Rick?
 But we who are still free will do all we can. We are organized, Monsieur, underground like everywhere else. Tomorrow night there is a meeting at the Caverne du Bois. If you would come...
 I see.
 As you see, it was true every single time. Thank heaven I found you, Berger. I am looking for a man by the name of Ugarte. He is supposed to help me.
 We read five times that you were killed in five different places.
 In a concentration camp, one is apt to lose a little weight.
 I recognize you from the news photographs, Monsieur Laszlo.
 A champagne cocktail, please.
 Yes, Monsieur.
 Mr. Berger, the ring, could I see it again?
 I'm sorry. It is.
 Such a bargain. But that is your decision?
 Berger, Norwegian, and at your service, sir.
 What is your name?
 Good.
 -- Then perhaps for the lady. The ring is quite unique.
 Thank you, but I hardly think --
 You will find a market there for this ring. I am forced to sell it at a great sacrifice.
 Well?
 Excuse me, but you look like a couple who are on their way to America.
 Yes, sir.
 I want you to take Miss Lund home.
 Yes, I come, I will do it.
 -- Tonight he forgot.
 But Sacha always puts out that light --
 I want you to turn out the light in the rear entrance. It might attract the police.
 Yes, I come.
 Come up here a minute.
 The police break up our meeting. Herr Rick! We escaped in the last moment.
 Goodnight, Monsieur Rick.
 Goodnight.
 I won't.
 -- Don't tell me where you're going.
 I will. Then I am going to the meeting of the --
 Now you finish locking up, will you, Carl?
 Oh, thank you, Herr Rick. Sacha will be happy to hear it. I owe him money.
 Maybe I won't have to. A bribe has worked before. In the meantime, everybody stays on salary.
 Oh, two weeks, maybe three.
 How long can I afford to stay closed?
 Well, you are in pretty good shape, Herr Rick.
 Monsieur Rick!
 No thanks, Carl.
 Monsieur Rick, may I get you a cup of coffee?
 That's all right.
 It shall not happen again, Monsieur.
 Here you are.
 I'm awfully sorry.
 -- Forget it, Emil. Mistakes like that happen all the time.
 I am so upset, Monsieur Rick. You know I can't understand --
 Well, I'll get it from the safe.
 Excuse me, Monsieur Rick, but a gentleman inside has won twenty thousand francs. The cashier would like some money.
 It has been a pleasure to meet you.
 Er, goodbye, sir.
 I have to warn you, sir. I beseech you...
 Er, my check, please.
 I'd better be going.
 Er, good luck, yes.
 Here's to you, sir.
 I shall remember to pay it... to myself.
 Don't forget, you owe Rick's a hundred cartons of American cigarettes.
 Well, so long.
 Of course they stay. Rick's wouldn't be Rick's without them.
 And Abdul and Carl and Sacha, they stay with the place, or I don't sell.
 Hmmm. I happen to know that he gets ten percent. But he's worth twenty- five.
 Oh, by the way, my agreement with Sam's always been that he gets twenty- five percent of the profits. That still goes.
 Ah, to get out of Casablanca and go to America! You're a lucky man.
 It's certainly not good enough. But since I'm in a hurry, it'll have to do.
 Shall we draw up the papers, or is our handshake good enough?
 Rick, don't be a fool. Take me into your confidence. You need a partner.
 That's why I came over here to give them a chance to ransack my place.
 Well, you're in good company. Renault and Strasser probably think so, too.
 Rick, I'll put my cards on the table. I think you know where those letters are.
 I'll tell him when he comes in.
 Naturally there will be a few incidental expenses. That is the proposition I have for whoever has those letters.
 And the carrying charges?
 I have a proposition for whoever has those letters. I will handle the entire transaction, get rid of the letters, take all the risk, for a small percentage.
 So could I. And I'm a poor businessman.
 If I could lay my hands on those letters, I could make a fortune.
 Practically no one.
 Of course not. What upsets me is the fact that Ugarte is dead and no one knows where those letters of transit are.
 You're a fat hypocrite. You don't feel any sorrier for Ugarte than I do.
 The bourbon.  The news about Ugarte upset me very much.
 Carrying charges, my boy, carrying charges. Here, sit down. There's something I want to talk over with you, anyhow.
 I never drink in the morning. And every time you send my shipment over, it's always just a little bit short.
 No hurry. I'll have it sent over. Have a drink with me.
 I see the bus is in. I'll take my shipment with me.
 My dear Rick, when will you realize that in this world today isolationism is no longer a practical policy?
 Suppose we do.
 Suppose we ask Sam. Maybe he'd like to make a change.
 Suppose you run your business and let me run mine.
 That's too bad. That's Casablanca's leading commodity. In refugees alone we could make a fortune if you would work with me through the black market.
 I don't buy or sell human beings.
 What do you want for Sam?
 It's not for sale at any price.
 You haven't heard my offer.
 It's not for sale.
 Fine, but I would like to buy your cafe.
 Hello, Ferrari. How's business at the Blue Parrot?
 Hello, Rick.
 Good day.
 It was gracious of you to share it with me. Good day, Mademoiselle, Monsieur.
 Thank you very much. Good day.
 He is a difficult customer, that Rick. One never knows what he'll do or why. But it is worth a chance.
 Rick?
 Not for sure, Monsieur, but I will venture to guess that Ugarte left those letters with Monsieur Rick.
 Do you know where they are?
 Those letters were not found on Ugarte when they arrested him.
 Yes, something.
 I observe that you in one respect are a very fortunate man, Monsieur. I am moved to make one more suggestion, why, I do not know, because it cannot possibly profit me, but, have you heard about Signor Ugarte and the letters of transit?
 Well, good luck. But be careful.  You know you're being shadowed?
 We've decided, Signor Ferrari. For the present we'll go on looking for two exit visas. Thank you very much.
 -- We might as well be frank, Monsieur. It will take a miracle to get you out of Casablanca. And the Germans have outlawed miracles.
 I will stay here and keep on trying. I'm sure in a little while --
 Signor Ferrari thinks it might just be possible to get an exit visa for you.
 As leader of all illegal activities in Casablanca, I am an influential and respected man. It would not be worth my life to do anything for Monsieur Laszlo. You, however, are a different matter.
 You see, my dear, the word has gone around.
 My dear Mademoiselle, perhaps you have already observed that in Casablanca, human life is cheap. Good night, Mademoiselle.
 And the other alternative?
 It is possible the French authorities will find a reason to put him in the concentration camp here.
 What are they?
 There are only two other alternatives for him.
 What value is that? You may recall what German guarantees have been worth in the past.
 Uh huh. Under a safe conduct from me.
 Occupied France?
 That is also true, except for one destination, to return to occupied France.
 This morning you implied it was not safe for him to leave Casablanca.
 Mademoiselle, after this disturbance it is not safe for Laszlo to stay in Casablanca.
 You needn't be concerned about me.
 And Mademoiselle?
 She tried everything to get them, and nothing worked. She did her best to convince me that she was still in love with me, but that was all over long ago. For your sake, she pretended it wasn't, and I let her pretend.
 Yes.
 And you never will. But I've got a job to do, too. Where I'm going you can't follow. What I've got to do you can't be any part of. Ilsa, I'm no good at being noble, but it doesn't take much to see that the problems of three little people don't amount to a hill of beans in this crazy world. Someday you'll understand that. Now, now...
 And I said I would never leave you.
 We'll always have Paris. We didn't have, we'd lost it, until you came to Casablanca. We got it back last night.
 But what about us?
 Maybe not today, maybe not tomorrow, but soon, and for the rest of your life.
 No.
 I'm saying it because it's true. Inside of us we both know you belong with Victor. You're part of his work, the thing that keeps him going. If that plane leaves the ground and you're not with him, you'll regret it.
 -- You've got to listen to me. Do you have any idea what you'd have to look forward to if you stayed here? Nine chances out of ten we'd both wind up in a concentration camp. Isn't that true, Louis?
 But Richard, no, I, I --
 -- Last night we said a great many things. You said I was to do the thinking for both of us. Well, I've done a lot of it since then and it all adds up to one thing. You're getting on that plane with Victor where you belong.
 No, Richard, no. What has happened to you? Last night we said --
 I'm staying here with him 'til the plane gets safely away.
 I don't understand. What about you?
 Because you're getting on that plane.
 But why my name, Richard?
 Oh, Rick!
 Everything is quite all right.
 But it's all right, isn't it? You were able to arrange everything?
 No, not yet.
 Richard, Victor thinks I'm leaving with him. Haven't you told him?
 I wish I didn't love you so much.
 All right, I will. Here's looking at you, kid.
 I can't fight it anymore. I ran away from you once. I can't do it again. Oh, I don't know what's right any longer. You'll have to think for both of us, for all of us.
 All except one. He won't have you.
 Oh, you'll help him now, Richard, won't you? You'll see that he gets out? Then he'll have his work, all that he's been living for.
 And Laszlo?
 Now? I don't know. I know that I'll never have the strength to leave you again.
 Huh. But it's still a story without an ending. What about now?
 Just before you and I were to leave Paris together. A friend came and told me that Victor was alive. They were hiding him in a freight car on the outskirts of Paris. He was sick, he needed me. I wanted to tell you, but I, I didn't care. I knew, I knew you wouldn't have left Paris, and the Gestapo would have caught you. So I... well, well, you know the rest.
 When did you first find out he was alive?
 Oh, it wasn't my secret, Richard. Victor wanted it that way. Not even our closest friends knew about our marriage. That was his way of protecting me. I knew so much about his work, and if the Gestapo found out I was his wife it would be dangerous for me and for those working with me.
 Why weren't you honest with me? Why did you keep your marriage a secret?
 It wasn't long after we were married that Victor went back to Czechoslovakia. They needed him in Prague, but there the Gestapo were waiting for him. Just a two-line item in the paper: "Victor Laszlo apprehended. Sent to concentration camp." I was frantic. For months I tried to get word. Then it came. He was dead, shot trying to escape. I was lonely. I had nothing. Not even hope. Then I met you.
 And then?
 If Laszlo and the cause mean so much to you, you won't stop at anything. All right, I'll make it easier for you.
 For the last time, put them on the table.
 No.
 Put them on the table.
 I don't have to. I've got them right here.
 -- All right. I tried to reason with you. I tried everything. Now I want those letters. Get them for me.
 What of it? I'm going to die in Casablanca. It's a good spot for it.
 No. Oh, Richard, I'm sorry. I'm sorry, but, but you, you are our last hope. If you don't help us, Victor Laszlo will die in Casablanca.
 -- I wouldn't believe you, no matter what you told me. You'd say anything now to get what you want.
 Please. Please listen to me. If you knew what really happened, if you only knew the truth --
 -- I wouldn't bring up Paris if I were you. It's poor salesmanship.
 Richard, Richard, we loved each other once. If those days meant anything at all to you --
 I'm not fighting for anything anymore, except myself. I'm the only cause I'm interested in.
 It was your cause, too. In your own way, you were fighting for the same thing.
 Do I have to hear again what a great man your husband is? What an important cause he's fighting for?
 I know how you feel about me, but I'm asking you to put your feelings aside for something more important.
 I went through all that with your husband. It's no deal.
 You can ask any price you want, but you must give me those letters.
 Your unexpected visit isn't connected by any chance with the letters of transit? It seems that as long as I have those letters I'll never be lonely.
 Please.
 You use "Richard" again? We're back in Paris.
 Richard, I had to see you.
 I told you this morning you'd come around, but this is a little ahead of schedule. Well, won't you sit down?
 The stairs from the street.
 How did you get in?
 No, Rick. No, you see, Victor Laszlo is my husband... and was, even when I knew you in Paris.
 All the same, someday you'll lie to Laszlo. You'll be there.
 Well, I'm not running away any more. I'm settled now, above a saloon, it's true, but... walk up a flight. I'll be expecting you.
 You can believe that if you want to.
 Did you run out on me because you couldn't take it? Because you knew what it would be like, hiding from the police, running away all the time?
 Last night I saw what has happened to you. The Rick I knew in Paris, I could tell him. He'd understand. But the one who looked at me with such hatred... well, I'll be leaving Casablanca soon and we'll never see each other again. We knew very little about each other when we were in love in Paris. If we leave it that way, maybe we'll remember those days and not Casablanca, not last night.
 Why not? After all, I got stuck with a railway ticket. I think I'm entitled to know.
 I don't think I will, Rick.
 Well, you can tell me now. I'm reasonably sober.
 Yes.
 Why did you come back? To tell me why you ran out on me at the railway station?
 It doesn't matter.
 I'm sorry I was in no condition to receive you when you called on me last night.
 Yes, that's very pretty. I heard a story once. As a matter of fact, I've heard a lot of stories in my time. They went along with the sound of a tinny piano playing in the parlor downstairs, "Mister, I met a man once when I was a kid," it'd always begin. Huh. I guess neither one of our stories was very funny. Tell me, who was it you left me for? Was it Laszlo, or were there others in between? Or aren't you the kind that tells?
 It's about a girl who had just come to Paris from her home in Oslo. At the house of some friends she met a man about whom she'd heard her whole life, a very great and courageous man. He opened up for her a whole beautiful world full of knowledge and thoughts and ideals. Everything she knew or ever became was because of him. And she looked up to him and worshipped him with a feeling she supposed was love.
 Well, go on, tell it. Maybe one will come to you as you go along.
 I don't know the finish yet.
 Has it got a wow finish?
 Can I tell you a story, Rick?
 Well, I did. Every one of them. Mostly I remember the last one. A wow finish. A guy standing on a station platform in the rain with a comical look on his face, because his insides had been kicked out.
 I didn't count the days.
 Huh! You understand how I feel. How long was it we had, honey?
 Please don't. Don't, Rick. I can understand how you feel.
 It's funny about your voice, how it hasn't changed. I can still hear it. "Richard dear, I'll go with you any place. We'll get on a train together and never stop."
 I wouldn't have come if I had known that you were here. Believe me, Rick, it's true. I didn't know.
 Why did you have to come to Casablanca? There are other places.
 Please.
 Especially tonight.
 No. No, Rick. Not tonight.
 Oh. I saved my first drink to have with you. Here.
 I love you so much, and I hate this war so much. Oh, it's a crazy world. Anything can happen. If you shouldn't get away, I mean, if, if something should keep us apart, wherever they put you and wherever I'll be, I want you to know...
 Well, why not? The captain on a ship can. It doesn't seem fair that... Hey, hey, what's wrong, kid?
 Oh, darling!
 Yes, I guess it is a little too far ahead. Well, let's see. What about the engineer? Why can't he marry us on the train?
 That's too far ahead to plan.
 All right. At a quarter to five.  Say, why don't we get married in Marseilles?
 No, no. Not at my hotel. I, uh, I have things to do in the city before I leave. I'll meet you at the station, huh?
 -- The train for Marseilles leaves at five o'clock. I'll pick you up at your hotel at four-thirty.
 Yes, of course, we --
 No, no, no, no. We must leave.
 But be serious, darling. You are in danger and you must leave Paris.
 I know very little about you, just the fact that you had your teeth straightened.
 Strange. I know so very little about you.
 Ah, that's the new German 77. And judging by the sound, only about thirty-five miles away.
 Was that cannon fire, or is it my heart pounding?
 Looking for a job.
 Ten years ago? Let's see...  ...Yes. I was having a brace put on my teeth. Where were you?
 Yeah. It's pretty bad timing. Where were you, say, ten years ago?
 With the whole world crumbling, we pick this time to fall in love.
 It's the Gestapo. They say they expect to be in Paris tomorrow.
 My German's a little rusty.
 I'm on their blacklist already, their roll of honor.
 Richard, they'll find out your record. It won't be safe for you here.
 Well, only one answer can take care of all our questions.
 I'm sorry for asking. I forgot we said "no questions."
 That's easy. There was. He's dead.
 Uh huh.
 Why there is no other man in my life?
 Why I'm so lucky. Why I should find you waiting for me to come along.
 Yes?
 And I was wondering.
 I'm willing to be overcharged. Tell me.
 In America they'd bring only a penny. I guess that's about all they're worth.
 A franc for your thoughts.
 Here's looking at you, kid.
 We said "no questions."
 Who are you really? And what were you before? What did you do and what did you think? Huh?
 He hasn't played it in a long time.
 There's still nobody in the world who can play "As Time Goes By" like Sam.
 I will.
 Say goodnight to Sam for me.
 Yes. I put that dress away. When the Germans march out, I'll wear it again.
 I remember every detail. The Germans wore gray, you wore blue.
 No.
 Not an easy day to forget.
 How nice. You remembered. But of course, that was the day the Germans marched into Paris.
 -- It was "La Belle Aurore."
 Oh I can't remember it, Miss Ilsa. I'm a little rusty on it.
 Play it, Sam. Play "As Time Goes By."
 I don't know what you mean, Miss Ilsa.
 Play it once, Sam, for old time's sake.
 Leave him alone, Miss Ilsa. You're bad luck to him.
 You used to be a much better liar, Sam.
 Oh, he never... well...  he's got a girl up at the Blue Parrot. He goes up there all the time.
 Does he always leave so early?
 Not tonight no more. He ain't coming. Uh, he went home.
 When will he be back?
 I don't know. I ain't seen him all night.
 Where is Rick?
 Yes, ma'am.
 Some of the old songs, Sam.
 Yes, ma'am. A lot of water under the bridge.
 It's been a long time.
 Hello, Miss Ilsa. I never expected to see you again.
 Hello, Sam.
 Yes, I'm ready.  Goodbye, Rick. God bless you.
 Are you ready Ilsa?
 Of course, I'll be careful.
 Be careful.
 -- You don't even have to say it. I'll believe. Goodnight, dear.
 Yes, Yes I know. Victor, whatever I do, will you believe that I, that --
 I love you very much, my dear.
 No, Victor, there isn't.
 I know how it is to be lonely.  Is there anything you wish to tell me?
 Yes, Victor, I was.
 When I was in the concentration camp, were you lonely in Paris?
 -- Yes?
 Ilsa, I --
 Yes. He said, "Ask your wife." I don't know why he said that.
 Ask me?
 He suggested I ask you.
 Did he give any reason?
 But no intention of selling them. One would think if sentiment wouldn't persuade him, money would.
 Yes?
 Apparently he has the letters.
 Whatever I'd say, you'd carry on. Victor, why don't you tell me about Rick? What did you find out?
 To tell you the truth, I am frightened too. Shall I remain here in our hotel room hiding, or shall I carry on the best I can?
 Don't joke. After Major Strasser's warning tonight, I am frightened.
 I must. Besides, it isn't often that a man has a chance to display heroics before his wife.
 Victor, please, don't go to the underground meeting tonight.
 Our faithful friend is still there.
 We'll discuss it later.
 What happened with Rick?
 And as far away from Major Strasser as possible.
 He does. Could we have a table close to him?
 I meant to, but something always held me up. I love you very much, Ilsa.
 Yes, I see. When I had trouble getting out of Lille, why didn't you leave me there? And when I was sick in Marseilles and held you up for two weeks and you were in danger every minute of the time, why didn't you leave me then?
 Yes, I would.
 But, Victor, if the situation were different, if I had to stay and there were only a visa for one, would you take it?
 No, Ilsa, I won't let you stay here. You must get to America. And believe me, somehow I will get out and join you.
 No, Victor, no.
 Please, Ilsa, don't be hasty.
 We are only interested in two visas, Signor.
 Goodnight.
 Goodnight.
 Goodnight.
 Goodnight.
 I will, don't worry.
 Be careful.
 I must find out what Berger knows.
 We have been in difficult places before, haven't we?
 Victor, I'm afraid for you.
 This time they really mean to stop me.
 Won't you join us?
 You are very kind.
 If we would walk out so soon, it would only call attention to us. Perhaps Ugarte's in some other part of the cafe.
 Victor, I, I feel somehow we shouldn't stay here.
 You're saying this only to make me go.
 I'm afraid Major Strasser would insist.
 I wasn't sure you were the same. Let's see, the last time we met --
 I can't get over you two. She was asking about you earlier, Rick, in a way that made me extremely jealous.
 -- This is Mr. Laszlo.
 Well then, perhaps you also ---
 Oh, you've already met Rick, Mademoiselle?
 Hello, Rick.
 Well, Mademoiselle, he's the kind of a man that, well, if I were a woman and I...  were not around, I should be in love with Rick. But what a fool I am talking to a beautiful woman about another man.
 -- Is what?
 Mademoiselle, you are in Rick's and Rick is --
 Rick? Who's he?
 He came from Paris with Rick.
 Yes.
 Sam?
 Captain, the boy who is playing the piano, somewhere I have seen him.
 Here it is.
 I understand.
 But you didn't know she was at my place last night when you were. She came there for the letters of transit. Isn't that true, Ilsa?
 Yes.
 I'm going to anyway, because it may make a difference to you later on. You said you knew about Ilsa and me.
 Monsieur Blaine, I don't ask you to explain anything.
 All except one thing. There's something you should know before you leave.
 Everything in order?
 Good. I've got the letters right here, all made out in blank.
 No. It's all arranged.
 Oh, never mind about that. You won't have any trouble in Lisbon, will you?
 But we made a deal.
 Keep it. You'll need it in America.
 I brought the money, Monsieur Blaine.
 Oh, save it. We've still lots of things to do.
 Monsieur Blaine, I don't know how to thank you.
 Apparently you think of me only as the leader of a cause. Well, I am also a human being.
 You love her that much?
 I know a good deal more about you than you suspect. I know, for instance, that you are in love with a woman. It is perhaps strange that we both should be in love with the same woman. The first evening I came here in this cafe, I knew there was something between you and Ilsa. Since no one is to blame, I, I demand no explanation. I ask only one thing. You won't give me the letters of transit. All right. But I want my wife to be safe. I ask you as a favor to use the letters to take her away from Casablanca.
 You seem to know all about my destiny.
 I wonder if you do. I wonder if you know that you're trying to escape from yourself and that you'll never succeed.
 Yes, I get the point.
 You know how you sound, Monsieur Blaine? Like a man who's trying to convince himself of something he doesn't believe in his heart. Each of us has a destiny, for good or for evil.
 What of it? Then it'll be out of it's misery.
 We might as well question why we breathe. If we stop breathing, we'll die. If we stop fighting our enemies, the world will die.
 Don't you sometimes wonder if it's worth all this? I mean what you're fighting for?
 Yes, rather.
 Had a close one, eh?
 Thank you.
 Well, this might come in handy.
 My wife?
 I said, ask your wife.
 I beg your pardon?
 There is. I suggest that you ask your wife.
 There must be some reason why you won't let me have them.
 My friend, you could make it a million francs, or three, my answer would still be the same.
 I'll raise it to two hundred thousand.
 I appreciate it, but I don't accept it.
 Are you enough of a businessman to appreciate an offer of a hundred thousand francs?
 Yes. I found that a very expensive hobby, too. But then I never was much of a businessman.
 Isn't it strange that you always happened to be fighting on the side of the underdog?
 What of it?
 My friends in the underground tell me that you have quite a record. You ran guns to Ethiopia. You fought against the fascists in Spain.
 I'm not interested in politics. The problems of the world are not in my department. I'm a saloon keeper.
 You must know it's very important I get out of Casablanca. It's my privilege to be one of the leaders of a great movement. You know what I have been doing. You know what it means to the work, to the lives of thousands and thousands of people that I be free to reach America and continue my work.
 Right.
 My office.
 Well, isn't there some other place? It's rather confidential, what I have to say.
 Go ahead.
 Monsieur Blaine, I wonder if I could talk to you?
 I take that as a great compliment to Sam.  I suppose he means to you Paris of, well, happier days.
 Good evening. You see, here we are again.
 Good evening.
 Signor Ferrari is the fat gent at the table.
 Good morning.
 Any time.
 We'll come again.
 Not at all.
 I hope we didn't overstay our welcome.
 We all try. You succeed.
 Thank you. I try.
 Your work.
 What for?
 And I congratulate you.
 Won't you join us for a drink?
 And about Victor Laszlo everywhere.
 One hears a great deal about Rick in Casablanca.
 How do you do?
 How do you do?
 Are you quite finished with us?
 I am making out the report now. We haven't quite decided whether he committed suicide or died trying to escape.
 Nothing important, but may I speak to him now?
 I believe you have a message for him?
 Yes.
 By the way, Monsieur, last night you evinced an interest in Signor Ugarte.
 -- Thank you.
 Monsieur, insofar as it is in my power --
 I was in a German concentration camp for a year. That's honor enough for a lifetime.
 And the honor of having served the Third Reich.
 Well, perhaps I shall like it in Casablanca.
 I am afraid not. My regrets, Monsieur.
 Thank you.
 With pleasure. Won't you sit down?
 May we proceed with the business?
 That's strange. Nobody is supposed to sleep well in Casablanca.
 I slept very well.
 I am delighted to see you both. Did you have a good night's rest?
 Goodnight.
 We'll be there.
 Tomorrow at ten at the Prefect's office.
 So it is. And we have a curfew here in Casablanca. It would never do for the Chief of Police to be found drinking after hours and have to fine himself.
 Ilsa, I don't wish to be the one to say it, but it's late.
 Ricky, you're becoming quite human. I suppose we have to thank you for that, Mademoiselle.
 This is a very interesting cafe. I congratulate you.
 Well! A precedent is being broken. Er, Emil!
 No. Two champagne cocktails, please.
 My bill.
 Very well.
 Let us say that it is my request. That is a much more pleasant word.
 No. Please, Monsieur, it is a little game we play. They put it on the bill, I tear the bill up. It is very convenient.
 No, Captain, please.
 I was informed you were the most beautiful woman ever to visit Casablanca. That was a gross understatement.
 Thank you. I hope you'll forgive me, Captain, but the present French administration has not always been so cordial. May I present Miss Ilsa Lund?
 Merely to welcome you to Casablanca and wish you a pleasant stay. It is not often we have so distinguished a visitor.
 Yes. What is it you want?
 I am Captain Renault, Prefect of Police.
 Yes.
 Monsieur Laszlo, is it not?
 Good day.
 For the time being.
 You won't dare to interfere with me here. This is still unoccupied France. Any violation of neutrality would reflect on Captain Renault.
 Herr Laszlo, you have a reputation for eloquence which I can now understand. But in one respect you are mistaken. You said the enemies of the Reich could all be replaced, but there is one exception. No one could take your place in the event anything unfortunate should occur to you while you were trying to escape.
 And what if you track down these men and kill them? What if you murdered all of us? From every corner of Europe, hundreds, thousands, would rise to take our places. Even Nazis can't kill that fast.
 If I didn't give them to you in a concentration camp where you had more "persuasive methods" at your disposal, I certainly won't give them to you now.
 You will give us the names?
 Yes, even in Berlin. If you will furnish me with their names and their exact whereabouts, you will have your visa in the morning.
 Even in Berlin.
 You know the leaders of the underground movement in Paris, in Prague, in Brussels, in Amsterdam, in Oslo, in Belgrade, in Athens.
 And that is?
 Don't be in such a hurry. You have all the time in the world. You may be in Casablanca indefinitely... or you may leave for Lisbon tomorrow, on one condition.
 Is that all you wish to tell us?
 Not at all. Captain Renault's signature is necessary on every exit visa.  Captain, would you think it is possible that Herr Laszlo will receive a visa?
 Whether or not you succeed is, of course, problematical.
 Very well, Herr Laszlo, we will not mince words. You are an escaped prisoner of the Reich. So far you have been fortunate enough in eluding us. You have reached Casablanca. It is my duty to see that you stay in Casablanca.
 Captain Renault, I am under your authority. Is it your order that we come to your office?
 Then we shall state another time and another place. Tomorrow at ten in the Prefect's office, with Mademoiselle.
 This is hardly the time or the place.
 I should like to discuss some matters arising from your presence on French soil.
 I've never accepted that privilege, and I'm now on French soil.
 You were a Czechoslovakian. Now you are a subject of the German Reich!
 I'm sure you'll excuse me if I am not gracious, but you see, Major Strasser, I'm a Czechoslovakian.
 Ask Monsieur Rick.
 Why do you stand here? Why don't you stop him?
 Victor Laszlo is on that plane.
 What is the meaning of that phone call?
 Find one.
 But I have no excuse to close it.
 Yes, much too good a time. The place is to be closed.
 But everybody's having such a good time.
 You see what I mean? If Laszlo's presence in a cafe can inspire this unfortunate demonstration, what more will his presence in Casablanca bring on? I advise that this place be shut up at once.
 I see what you mean.
 Uh, huh. I have been thinking. It is too dangerous if we let him go. It may be too dangerous if we let him stay.
 A leader, like Laszlo?
 We are concerned about more than Casablanca. We know that every French province in Africa is honeycombed with traitors waiting for their chance, waiting, perhaps, for a leader.
 And if it should change?
 I have no conviction, if that's what you mean. I blow with the wind, and the prevailing wind happens to be from Vichy.
 Captain Renault, are you entirely certain which side you're on?
 My dear Major, we are trying to cooperate with your government, but we cannot regulate the feelings of our people.
 You see, Captain, the situation is not as much under control as you believe.
 It may interest you to know that at this very moment he is on his way here.
 As to Laszlo, we want him watched twenty-four hours a day.
 But we mustn't underestimate American blundering. I was with them when they "blundered" into Berlin in 1918.
 You give him credit for too much cleverness. My impression was that he's just another blundering American.
 If Rick has the letters, he's much too smart to let you find them there.
 I strongly suspect that Ugarte left the letters of transit with Mr. Blaine. I would suggest you search the cafe immediately and thoroughly.
 Mademoiselle.
 Mademoiselle.
 Perhaps.
 You see, Major, you have nothing to worry about Rick.
 I admit he is very clever. Three times he slipped through our fingers. In Paris he continued his activities. We intend not to let it happen again.
 Of course, one must admit he has great courage.
 You weren't always so carefully neutral. We have a complete dossier on you.
 Rick is completely neutral about everything. And that takes in the field of women, too.
 How about New York?
 Ho, diplomatist!
 Do you mind if I ask you a few questions? Unofficially, of course.
 Well, personally, Major, I will take what comes.
 You repeat "Third Reich" as though you expected there to be others.
 How do you do, Mr. Rick?
 Rick, this is Major Heinrich Strasser of the Third Reich.
 I expected no less, Captain.
 Especially so tonight, Major. In a few minutes you will see the arrest of the man who murdered your couriers.
 Thank you.
 May I recommend Veuve Cliquot '26, a good French wine.
 Champagne and a tin of caviar.
 Thank you. It is a pleasure to have you here, Major.
 Good evening, Captain.
 Good evening, gentlemen.
 I have already heard about this cafe, and also about Mr. Rick himself.
 Oh, there is no hurry. Tonight he'll be at Rick's. Everybody comes to Rick's.
 Realizing the importance of the case, my men are rounding up twice the usual number of suspects.
 By the way, the murder of the couriers, what has been done?
 What else, my dear Major?
 Oh, we Germans must get used to all climates, from Russia to the Sahara. But perhaps you were not referring to the weather.
 You may find the climate of Casablanca a trifle warm, Major.
 Major Strasser, my aide, Lieutenant Casselle.
 Thank you, Captain. It's very good to be here.
 Unoccupied France welcomes you to Casablanca.
 Louis, I think this is the beginning of a beautiful friendship.
 Uh huh.
 Our expenses?
 And that ten thousand francs should pay our expenses.
 My letter of transit? I could use a trip. But it doesn't make any difference about our bet. You still owe me ten thousand francs.
 It might be a good idea for you to disappear from Casablanca for a while. There's a Free French garrison over at Brazzaville. I could be induced to arrange a passage.
 I think perhaps you're right.
 Maybe, but it seemed like a good time to start.
 Well, Rick, you're not only a sentimentalist, but you've become a patriot.
 As soon as the plane goes, Louis.
 I suppose you know this isn't going to be pleasant for either of us, especially for you. I'll have to arrest you of course.
 Anyway, thanks for helping me out.
 What you just did for Laszlo, and that fairy tale that you invented to send Ilsa away with him. I know a little about women, my friend. She went, but she knew you were lying.
 Stay where you are. I don't know what you're talking about.
 Well I was right. You are a sentimentalist.
 And the names are Mr. and Mrs. Victor Laszlo.
 You think of everything, don't you?
 If you don't mind, you fill in the names. That will make it even more official.
 That is my least vulnerable spot.
 Just the same, you call the airport and let me hear you tell them. And remember, this gun's pointed right at your heart.
 Call off your watch-dogs you said.
 I do. We've got plenty of time to discuss that later.
 I suppose you know what you're doing, but I wonder if you realize what this means?
 Put that gun down.
 I have. Sit down over there.
 Have you taken leave of your senses?
 -- Not so fast, Louis. Nobody's going to be arrested. Not for a while yet.
 Serves me right for not being musical.
 Sam's piano.
 Tell me, when we searched the place, where were they?
 I have the letters right here.
 Is everything ready?
 Yes, I know what you mean, but I've already spoken to Ferrari. You'll still win at roulette.
 You know, this place will never be the same without you, Ricky.
 Oh, he won't be followed here.
 I thought I asked you to tie up your watchdogs.
 I was informed just as Laszlo was about to leave the hotel, so I knew I'd be on time.
 You're late.
 Go ahead, Ricky.
 Oh, thanks.
 Ricky, I'm going to miss you. Apparently you're the only one in Casablanca who has even less scruples than I.
 I'll make the arrangements right now with Laszlo in the visitor's pen.
 I see. How do I know you'll keep your end of the bargain?
 Well, she isn't just any woman.
 There's still something about this business I don't quite understand. Miss Lund, she's very beautiful, yes, but you were never interested in any woman.
 I'll arrange to have Laszlo come there to pick up the letters of transit, and that'll give you the criminal grounds on which to make the arrest. You get him, and we get away. To the Germans that last will be just a minor annoyance.
 Then release him. You be at my place a half hour before the plane leaves.
 It certainly would. Germany... Vichy would be very grateful.
 Ilsa is Laszlo's wife. She probably knows things that Strasser would like to know. Louis, I'll make a deal with you. Instead of this petty charge you have against him, you can get something really big, something that would chuck him in a concentration camp for years. That would be quite a feather in your cap, wouldn't it?
 You didn't come here to tell me this. You have the letters of transit. You can fill in your name and hers and leave any time you please. Why are you interested in what happens to Laszlo?
 Ilsa Lund.  That ought to put your mind to rest about my helping Laszlo escape. The last man I want to see in America.
 What friend?
 And I'm taking a friend with me. One you'll appreciate.
 Huh?
 You're not very subtle, but you are effective. I, I get the point. Yes, I have the letters, but I intend using them myself. I'm leaving Casablanca on tonight's plane, the last plane.
 Don't count too much on my friendship, Ricky. In this matter I'm powerless. Besides, I might lose ten thousand francs.
 Well, they're all excellent reasons.
 Because one, you've bet ten thousand francs he'd escape. Two, you have the letters of transit, now don't bother to deny it. And, well, you might do it simply because you don't like Strasser's looks. As a matter of fact, I don't like him either.
 -- What makes you think I'd stick my neck out for Laszlo?
 Ricky, I'd advise you not to be too interested in what happens to Laszlo. If by any chance you were to help him escape --
 But you haven't any actual proof, and you know it. This isn't Germany or occupied France. All you can do is fine him a few thousand francs and give him thirty days. You might as well let him go now.
 I am shocked, shocked to find that gambling is going on in here!
 How can you close me up? On what grounds?
 Well, I forgive you this time. But I'll be in tomorrow night with a breathtaking blonde, and it will make me very happy if she loses. Uh huh!
 Put it down as a gesture to love.
 Why do you interfere with my little romances?
 Yeah? Why?
 As I suspected, you're a rank sentimentalist.
 Who knows? In her own way she may constitute an entire second front. I think it's time for me to flatter Major Strasser a little. I'll see you later, Rick.
 So Yvonne's gone over to the enemy.
 Huh?
 Well, it looks like you're a little late.
 Serves me right for asking a direct question. The subject is closed.
 Louis, are you pro-Vichy or Free French?
 Well, I told Strasser he wouldn't find the letters here. But I told my men to be especially destructive. You know how that impresses Germans?  Rick, have you got these letters of transit?
 That was some going-over your men gave my place this afternoon. We just barely got cleaned up in time to open.
 Well, Ricky. I'm very pleased with you. Now you're beginning to live like a Frenchman.
 Another precedent gone. This has been a very interesting evening. I'll call you a cab. Gasoline rationing, time of night.
 Oh, it's my party.
 -- Thanks. I will.
 Oh, no, Rick never --
 -- Hello, Ilsa.
 Well, you were asking about Rick and here he is. Mademoiselle, may I present --
 I was born in New York City if that'll help you any.
 That makes Rick a citizen of the world.
 And you already know Herr Heinze of the Third Reich.
 Oh, how do you do?
 Excuse me.
 Yeah, you were saying?
 Oh, I see. Gestapo spank.
 I have my orders.
 Maybe. Well, it seems you are determined to keep Laszlo here.
 The winning side would have paid you much better.
 And got well paid for it on both occasions.
 Oh, laugh if you will, but I happen to be familiar with your record. Let me point out just two items. In 1935 you ran guns to Ethiopia. In 1936, you fought in Spain on the Loyalist side.
 Because, my dear Ricky, I suspect that under that cynical shell you're at heart a sentimentalist.
 Louis, whatever gave you the impression that I might be interested in helping Laszlo escape?
 It doesn't matter. There is no exit visa for him.
 Maybe he's not quite as romantic as you are.
 I think not. I have seen the lady. And if he did not leave her in Marseilles, or in Oran, he certainly won't leave her in Casablanca.
 He'll take one.
 He is traveling with a lady.
 Why two?
 Done. No matter how clever he is, he still needs an exit visa, or I should say, two.
 Okay.
 Make it ten. I am only a poor corrupt official.
 I just paid out twenty. I'd like to get it back.
 Is that a serious offer?
 Twenty thousand francs says it isn't.
 This is the end of the chase.
 -- Stop it. He escaped from a concentration camp and the Nazis have been chasing him all over Europe.
 Oh, but I just told you. --
 His escape.
 Manages what?
 It'll be interesting to see how he manages.
 It is my duty to see that he doesn't impress the other half. Rick, Laszlo must never reach America. He stays in Casablanca.
 Well, he's succeeded in impressing half the world.
 Rick, that is the first time I have ever seen you so impressed.
 Victor Laszlo?
 Victor Laszlo.
 Yeah? What's his name?
 That is another reason. There is a man who's arrived in Casablanca on his way to America. He will offer a fortune to anyone who will furnish him with an exit visa.
 I thought it was because we let you win at roulette.
 Thank you. Rick, there are many exit visas sold in this cafe, but we know that you have never sold one. That is the reason we permit you to remain open.
 Yeah? Have a brandy?
 How observant you are. As a matter of fact, I wanted to give you a word of advice.
 Perhaps not.
 I see. And what's Strasser doing here? He certainly didn't come all the way to Casablanca to witness a demonstration of your efficiency.
 Our entertainment is enough.
 You know, Rick, we could have made this arrest earlier in the evening at the Blue Parrot, but out of my high regard for you we are staging it here. It will amuse your customers.
 A wise foreign policy.
 I stick my neck out for nobody.
 If you are thinking of warning him, don't put yourself out. He cannot possibly escape.
 This is no ordinary arrest. A murderer, no less.
 What, again?
 Rick, there's going to be some excitement here tonight. We are going to make an arrest in your cafe.
 Huh!
 I was misinformed.
 Waters? What waters? We're in the desert.
 My health. I came to Casablanca for the waters.
 And what in heaven's name brought you to Casablanca?
 It was a combination of all three.
 The clipper to America.
 Why? What's in Lisbon?
 The plane to Lisbon.  You would like to be on it?
 When it comes to women, you're a true democrat.
 You know, I think now I shall pay a call on Yvonne, maybe get her on the rebound, eh?
 How extravagant you are, throwing away women like that. Someday they may be scarce.
 Hello, Louis.
 Take your hands off me!
 Come on, we're going to get your coat.
 -- Sacha, call a cab.
 Rick, I'm sick and tired of having you --
 Don't listen to him, Sacha. Fill it up.
 Sacha, she's had enough.
 Give me another.
 I never make plans that far ahead.
 Will I see you tonight?
 That's so long ago, I don't remember.
 Where were you last night?
 Put it down!
 Get me the Radio Tower!
 Put that phone down!
 Hello?
 I was willing to shoot Captain Renault, and I'm willing to shoot you.
 I would advise you not to interfere.
 Good evening, Mr. Blaine.
 You'll excuse me, gentlemen. Your business is politics. Mine is running a saloon.
 Victor Laszlo published the foulest lies in the Prague newspapers until the very day we marched in, and even after that he continued to print scandal sheets in a cellar.
 Not particularly. I understand the point of view of the hound, too.
 In this case, you have no sympathy for the fox, huh?
 My interest in whether Victor Laszlo stays or goes is purely a sporting one.
 You will forgive my curiosity, Mr. Blaine. The point is, an enemy of the Reich has come to Casablanca and we are checking up on anybody who can be of any help to us.
 Are my eyes really brown?
 I haven't the slightest idea.
 Aha. Who do you think will win the war?
 Well, there are certain sections of New York, Major, that I wouldn't advise you to try to invade.
 It's not particularly my beloved Paris.
 Are you one of those people who cannot imagine the Germans in their beloved Paris?
 There seems to be no secret about that.
 I understand you came here from Paris at the time of the occupation.
 I'm a drunkard.
 What is your nationality?
 Make it official, if you like.
 Rick, hide me. Do something! You must help me, Rick. Do something!
 Don't be a fool. You can't get away.
 Rick! Rick, help me!
 Don't be afraid of that. Please keep them for me. Thank you. I knew I could trust you.
 I don't want them here overnight.
 Perhaps an hour, perhaps a little longer.
 For how long?
 One moment. Tonight I'll be selling those for more money than even I have ever dreamed of, and then, addio Casablanca! You know, Rick, I have many friends in Casablanca, but somehow, just because you despise me you're the only one I trust. Will you keep these for me? Please.
 Myself. I found myself much more reasonable.
 Who did you bribe for your visa? Renault or yourself?
 Well, Rick, after tonight I'll be through with the whole business, and I am leaving finally this Casablanca.
 I don't mind a parasite. I object to a cut-rate one.
 But think of all the poor devils who cannot meet Renault's price. I get it for them for half. Is that so parasitic?
 For a price, Ugarte, for a price.
 But why? Oh, you object to the kind of business I do, huh? But think of all those poor refugees who must rot in this place if I didn't help them. That's not so bad. Through ways of my own I provide them with exit visas.
 If I gave you any thought, I probably would.
 I forgot. You never drink with...  I'll have another, please.  You despise me, don't you?
 No.
 Thank you.  Will you have a drink with me please?
 You are a very cynical person, Rick, if you'll forgive me for saying so.
 They got a lucky break. Yesterday they were just two German clerks. Today they're the 'Honored Dead'.
 May I? Too bad about those two German couriers, wasn't it?
 -- You thought what?
 Oh, nothing. But when you first came to Casablanca, I thought --
 Well, what makes you think I haven't?
 Huh. You know, Rick, watching you just now with the Deutsches Bank, one would think you'd been doing this all your life.
 Hello Ugarte.
 Uh, excuse me, please. Hello, Rick.
 No, Mr. Richard. I can't find her.
 Where is she? Have you seen her?
 The Germans'll be here pretty soon now, and they'll come looking for you. And don't forget there's a price on your head.
 And getting closer every minute. Here. Drink up. We'll never finish the other three.
 You said it!  Here's looking at you, kid.
 This sort of takes the sting out of being occupied, doesn't it, Mr. Richard?
 Yes, boss.
 If she can stand it, I can. Play it!
 Well, I don't think I can remember it.
 You played it for her and you can play it for me.
 No, I don't.
 Well, stop it. You know what I want to hear.
 Just a little something of my own.
 What's that you're playing?
 I bet they're asleep in New York. I'll bet they're asleep all over America.
 Uh, my watch stopped.
 Sam, if it's December 1941 in Casablanca, what time is it in New York?
 Yeah, boss?
 They grab Ugarte and she walks in. Well, that's the way it goes. One in, one out. Sam?
 No, sir. I'm staying right here.
 Shut up and go home, will you?
 We'll take the car and drive all night. We'll get drunk. We'll go fishing and stay away until she's gone.
 She's coming back. I know she's coming back.
 Please, boss, let's go. Ain't nothing but trouble for you here.
 No, sir. I'm waiting for a lady.
 Boss, let's get out of here.
 Then don't have a drink.
 No. Not me, boss.
 Good. Then have a drink.
 Well, I ain't sleepy either.
 No.
 You ever going to bed?
 No.
 Ain't you planning on going to bed in the near future?
 Not right now.
 Boss, ain't you going to bed?
 Yeah?
 Boss!
 Sorry.
 Yeah, but I ain't got time to spend the money I make here.
 He'll double what I pay you.
 I like it fine here.
 Sam, Ferrari wants you to work for him at the Blue Parrot.
 The failures they remember.  It's the successes they forget.
 Nobody remembers that.
 Worse than Warsaw.
 It's bad.
 So how are we going to get this place shaped up?
 Six kilometers.  Four miles.
 It took this test package thirty-two hours to get from Seattle to St. Petersburg, a distance of nine thousand miles.  And then it took forty-one hours to get from our warehouse in St. Petersburg to here, a distance of, what --
 Shut up.  I don't feel like dying today.
 You can't make it.
 Then we've just got shit.
 It matters.  We do the best we can, that's all we have.
 What did it matter if FedEx was five minutes late one day?  The next day we just start over again.
 Let's get a second opinion.  Wilson? What do you see?
 Nothing out there but ocean.
 It's real.
 Look again, asshole.  It's a mirage.
 Jesus.
 You are.
 What's so damn funny?
 Shut up.
 It's a fucking soccer ball, you idiot.
 I'm serious.  I'm always going on about me, me, me.  Enough about me.  Your turn.
 I float.  You sink.  End of story.
 Damn it!  Don't be so negative!
 They're always on autopilot.  Or else it's night, or you're in the sun, or you're in the trough of a wave.  They'll never see you.
 They're on autopilot.
 They're never going to see you.  You're just another piece of trash in the ocean.
 I'm dancing on the roof of the Peabody Hotel.  With Kelly.
 What are you smiling about?  They'll be back.
 Thank you for fucking up my life.
 You know, Wilson, every now and then we should say thank you.  Thank you God.
 Yeah, sure, what?
 Grow up, stop being such a baby.  Other people get through a lot worse.
 That's death knocking, knocking on your door.  Crazy little woman come knocking, knocking at my front door...
 Die tomorrow or die today.
 If I don't have a sea anchor I'll capsize.
 Use the sail for a sea anchor and you won't move.
 But I have promises to keep.  And miles to go before I sleep.  And miles to go before I sleep.  Got to fix the sea anchor.  Use the sail.
 The sea is lovely, dark and deep.
 You quitter you quitter you quitter.
 Look, just slip off the raft.  The ocean would feel so good, the water's so soft and warm.  Take a little swim.  Sleep.
 No!
 I'm lost.  Goodbye.
 They'd eat you if they could.  They're laughing at you.  Listen.
 Why do they have to die for me?
 You fucking bleeding heart, you kill or you die.
 Can't kill another one.  Can't.  Can't kill my friends anymore.
 What are you doing?
 You idiot, if he dives, he'll capsize the raft.
 You're beautiful.  Marry me.
 Water water water --
 Fix raft first.
 Get water!
 I'm putting it off.
 You're putting off the inevitable.
 Moon's too bright.
 You don't know where you are.  You missed the shipping lanes.
 Polaris, where are you?  Maybe I'm too far south.
 Survive today, that's the point.
 If they can't see you, what's the point?
 Wilson, do you believe this?  Take the damn water.
 No.
 Take it, damn it.
 No.
 Take it.
 No more water, you said.
 Going to die anyway.
 Do too little you'll die.
 Do too much, I'll die.
 Okay look, I know you're tired, I know you're thirsty, but give it one more shot, you've just got to do a little more.
 No water, no work.
 Come on, shape up, get going, you can do it.
 Thirsty.
 You've had today's water.
 Can't.  Need water.
 Get up, damn you.
 Feels so good to lie here.
 Get up.
 With what?  There's nothing to fix it with.  This rope comes undone, you're going to drown.
 Stay calm, identify the problem. Problem, rope fraying.  Solution, fix rope.
 Shit!  Shit!  Shit!
 Catch another fish tomorrow.
 Save some for tomorrow.
 Sure.
 Keep painting.  Promise me.
 Just sit here, I'll get us some lunch.
 No.  that was the last one.
 Do you...have any more packages to deliver?
 To tell you the truth -- you did.
 You are.  Yes you are.  What gave you the idea to paint on that cave?
 Well, not really, I --
 I can't believe this.  I -- I -- They are... You're a gifted artist.  You're into something very powerful.  Primal. Truly.
 He was a sorry sonofabitch, and I'm sorry I ever married him.
 Our apologies that it never made it to the recipient.
 Well, I do a little drawing --
 Oh?  You've tried?
 They're harder to do than they look.
 Yeah.  A long time ago.
 Possible.  So you did those wings?
 Hmmm.  Feels like it might have gotten wet.
 Okay.  Sure.
 Want to come in?  Get dry for a minute.
 As much as anybody.
 You know what happened to this?
 No.
 Well, I have to say, I'm impressed.  You never gave up.
 There was an unavoidable delay.
 You came on a bicycle?  No wonder it's so late.
 So do I.
 I've got lots of time.
 Yeah, a long one.
 Must be a story there.
 I had it on the island with me.
 You?  Personally?
 Had a package to deliver.
 What brings you out to the sticks?
 I didn't steal it, and he wasn't crippled.
 Did you really steal a crippled kid's bicycle to make your deliveries, or is that just some bullshit story?
 I'm so glad you're alive.
 You too.
 I love you, Chuck.
 I had to come.  To be sure you were okay.
 It means a lot...that you came.
 I've got to get back to Memphis. Hannah's babysitter has finals.
 I don't know.  I really don't know.
 What will you do?
 Great.  Really.
 You okay?
 That's what I told the fish I caught. But I ate them anyway.
 This is so unfair.
 I didn't know what really being alone was.  No one back here does.
 You hated being alone.  Couldn't stand it.  Busy every minute.  Always plugged into something.
 Not when you have no choice.
 So simple to say, so hard to do.
 Cliches, mainly.  Don't take anyone for granted.  Don't sweat the small stuff. Live each day like it's your last.
 Come on.  Try.
 Don't overwhelm me with the details.  You know how I hate that.
 The tide came in, the tide went out.  I survived.  That's the headline.  I survived.
 Yeah?
 The plane went down.  My friends died.  I washed up on an island.  Then I found these barrels, built the raft, and here I am.
 Maybe now's when you tell me about it.
 That about sums it up.
 Your calendar, your cell phone, your whoo pig sooey hat, some pictures of that ketch you wanted.
 What was inside?
 Yeah, coffin, headstone, the whole thing.
 There was a coffin?
 My epitaph.
 What's that, written on the sail?
 Yeah, well...couldn't be helped.
 All that time I waited to go on a cruise, and you went without me.
 That's my sea anchor.  My second one. Made it out of part of the sail.  It keeps you from capsizing in a storm.  In theory.  And this, this I used to collect water. About half a cup a day.
 What's that?
 No, this is Jack.  Jango was hit by a UPS truck.  Can you believe it?
 Is that Jango?
 Her name's Hannah.
 You have any children?
 I didn't want to.  It just happened.  One day Gary was there.  He took care of everything.  He took care of me.  I was a mess.
 I would have done the same thing.
 If I'd known you were alive --
 I know.
 I would never --
 I thought you might have.
 I got married.
 A few things came up.  Or went down.
 Right back, you said you'd be right back.
 Hey...hey...it's okay!
 I'm sorry... I'm sorry...
 Go on.  We'll be fine.  I'll feed Jango to the frogs.
 A week, max.  Okay?  Okay?
 Chuck, you're breaking my heart.
 Malaysia.  They're holding the sweep.
 Get back?  From where?
 Don't even start.
 Look, we'll do our trip as soon as I get back.
 What, you were going to come over the next day all calm and say, Kelly that really made me mad?  Don't tell me you're mad.  Be mad.  Be who you are right now.
 I guess I hadn't thought through how I felt.
 Why didn't you come over, get mad at me, tell me what a stupid bitch I was.
 I burned the Christmas tree.
 No, it was great.  Maybe a little overkill --
 I'm sorry about the presents.  I got a little carried away.
 Yes there is.
 There isn't any us.
 It's our dog.  It belongs to us.
 That's your dog.
 I can't take him to work.
 No.
 Could you watch Jango?
 "We're" not over-reacting.
 We're a little emotional here.  It's Christmas, maybe we're over-reacting.
 This isn't working out.
 You want to.
 I have to.
 You can't go now.
 Look, I love the puppy.  I love you.  But I have to go.
 You did?
 A ring.  I wanted a ring.
 I have to go.  I'm on call for overflow down at the Hub.
 For when I travel?
 You know, for when you travel.
 And for you --
 A puppy's got a little more personality than a fish.
 I can't even keep fish alive.
 He's your cute thing.
 He is a cute thing.
 I figure, if we could take care of a puppy, we could, you know, take care of --
 Hey, look at you.
 Let me guess, Russia came up?
 Ah, the staff meeting could have gone better.
 You don't seem too happy about it.
 Four four.  A record.
 Not if you work for FedEx.
 Merry Christmas eve.
 Yeah, tell me.  Tell me all of it.
 What do you want me to say?  That I thought I'd done a great job but it all turned to shit?  That I might as well have gone sailing for all the good I did?
 Chuck.
 Chuck, forget the Xerox.  So Russia didn't turn out well?
 Got to follow the paper path here.
 I thought I did.
 Don't overwhelm me with details, you know how I hate that.  Did you get it fixed?
 Cold.
 How was Russia?
 Let's take a look.
 My last chapter's in there, and the damn machine's jammed.
 You smell like formaldehyde.
 Your eyes are puffy.  Did you take Valium again?
 Hey, be nice to it, it'll be nice to you.
 Sonofabitch!
 There's a sweep leaving Memphis in an hour, goes through Sydney.
 Anything else?
 The regular flight is scheduled for oh three hundred tomorrow.
 When's the next Jumbo?
 Terrific.  Yours?
 And how was your Christmas?
 I need the latest PDRs on St. Petersburg.
 Well, when that IV runs out, you're through with us.  Just the dentist tomorrow.
 Doc, I'm not on the island.  I'm not on the raft.  I'm alive.  I'm so glad to be back, I can't tell you.  I just want out of here.
 Not to mention on me.
 You are aware of the potential disruptiveness on your loved ones when you return to your old life?
 Yes, yes he did.
 Doctor Hegel tells me he discussed the Vietnam POW syndrome with you.
 I most definitely say I am.
 If you say you are.
 But all that's behind me.  I'm fine now.
 Your body chemistry and your exposure to the elements would normally lead to irritability, depression, anxiety, periods of self-reproach.  It's almost like schizophrenia.  Different sides of your personality might come to life, speak out, act out.
 I am one lucky guy.
 And fish are very low in fat, which is energy inefficient.  So you're going to burn up your own cells no matter how much you eat.  Luckily you ate the eyes and pancreas, which contain some Vitamin C, so you didn't get scurvy.
 Which I didn't have.
 Protein digestion is very costly in water usage.
 All I ate was fish.  That's solid protein.
 Dehydration.  Vitamin deficiency. Protein deficiency.  Any or all of the above.
 Sorry...sorry... Why do my joints still ache?
 Under the circumstances your overall health is good.  Those salt water boils you picked up on the raft are ulcerated, but they're healing nicely.
 My favorite doctor.  What's the verdict?
 Yeah.
 You're Chuck Noland.
 Sure.
 Hey, once a driver, always a driver.  You want a lift?  I've just got one more pickup.
 I used to drive one of those.  A long time ago.
 No.
 You're not out of Pascagoula, are you?
 You bet I do.  High tide comes right up to this road.
 Need some help?
 Just don't count 'em before they hatch.
 Come on down to the plant.  It's state of the art.  We're doing for chickens what FedEx did for the delivery business.
 Really?
 True enough.  No sacred chickens nowhere, so far as I know.
 Sixty three pounds consumed per capita, up from twenty seven in 1960.  Going to pass beef.  Chicken's global.  No religious taboos.  You don't see your Hindus and your Muslims boycotting poultry.
 But chickens?
 So did I.
 Thought you were going to bring her.
 Let's eat.
 Bless us O Lord, and these thy gifts, which we are about to receive, from thou bounty, through Christ the Lord.  Amen.
 The tide saved me, Mom.  I lived by it. I'm just wondering where it will take me next.
 What a journey you've had.  It seems more than a person should have to bear.
 This is my home.  I'm part of the wallpaper.
 I've got all this back pay coming.  Why don't you let me get you a place in town?
 I wanted to come here.
 Roger got me on.  I wasn't doing anything, and -- but you're back, you're really back.  I would have come to Memphis, but --
 When'd you start working here?
 There's settled folks, and there's nomads.  You're just not a settled folk. You never belonged here.
 Doing great, Mom, don't worry about me.
 I'm doing fine.
 The place is falling apart.
 Don't you even think about it.
 Maybe I should take a few days off. Roger's working now, you could use some help around here...
 Oh no, the prodigal son's home.  We bring out the store bought.
 Mom, this is a farm.  We've got real strawberries growing outside, we've got real cream.
 That new roof, that's your doing.
 Look, I help take care of the place.  You got my check, didn't you Mom?
 It's nothing you did, Mom, believe me.
 It seemed like she had such a good time last time.
 Mom, meet Jango.
 What happened to your pants?
 You're looking at a Level III search. For your Level III, you gotta have E-4 authorization.  I don't have it.
 Can you find her?
 Hmmm.  Durango, Colorado; Asheville, North Carolina, then...canceled her account.
 Sure.  Bettina Peterson.  Marfa, Texas. Let's run a current check.
 What about the sender?
 Okay.  After three years the PTR reverts to tape storage, which is okay because we access it through the CPC.  Here it is.  Ten packages from the same sender.  Baku. Delhi.  St. Petersburg.  The guy was a real road warrior.  This package was Kuala Lampur.  No activity in his account after this package.  No forwarding addresses after K.L.
 Kamal, you're breaking up.  Can you hear us?
 Trying.
 Who's in charge then, where is Chinn?
 Kamal is not here.  We are very defused.
 What's going on down there?
 It is Ibrim, I, I am a sorter.
 Who is this?  Where is Kamal?
 Kamal is not here.
 No sweat.
 Thanks.  For everything.
 Finish what you started.  You haven't changed, Chuck.  It's still you.
 I need to do it.
 You want that delivered, we'll deliver it.  That's what we do.
 Deliver this package.  Then, I dunno.
 What, then?
 Deep, real deep.
 Not just that.  Take your time.  Use it. Live it.
 Being patient.  Don't rush things.  I get it.
 That's what it's about.
 What?
 Take your time.
 Digital laser readers.  Wow.  Terrific.
 Digital laser readers.
 Believe me I know.
 That's all there is.
 To life.
 To life.  Fuck 'em if they can't take a joke.
 What's it all about?  It's about being so thirsty you'd crush a fish's backbone to suck out the spinal fluid -- that's what it's about.
 I'm serious.  The burning bush, the big picture, the words in neon...
 Hallelujah.
 You've been over the line and you came back.  You've been saved, hallelujah!
 To Wilson.
 To Wilson.
 I never thought it would end.  Then it did.  It was so great to be saved, I couldn't stop laughing.
 When I first showed up, I thought you'd lost your fucking marbles.
 Forty-three days.
 You were how long on this?
 Time I had lots of.
 Must have taken a hell of a long time.
 I braided them.
 Cool ropes.
 You should have smelled me.
 This stinks really bad.
 Want to see my raft?
 How about we go somewhere else?
 This is Amber.  Her boyfriend lost his foot in a shark attack.
 Hello.
 You beat 'em to shit, pal!  Jesus!
 I beat the odds!
 I'm most definitely not dead.  And as I recall, you're the sick fucker.
 You're fucking dead!
 It's me.
 God damn!  God damn!  Chuck, it's you!
 Stan, it's Chuck...Chuck Noland...
 Hello?
 Right.  Get me everything on Indonesia, New Guinea, all the way to Australia.
 Malaysia's tanking.  We're meeting in ten in operations.
 We're on.
 Talk is cheap.  Are we on or not?
 Ninety five percent?  Just give me the money now.
 A hundred rubles St. Petersburg hits 95 percent in a month.
 This was nothing like Warsaw.  I held the truck then minutes, it's not that big a deal.
 I'm trying to help you here.  There's Warsaw, there's this --
 You are one sick fucker.
 Take the plunge, admit your mistakes, move on to tomorrow.  That's FedEx, that's women, that's life.
 For the third time.
 That's why I'm running foreign and you're not.  That's why you're not married and I am.
 That's why you're a gambling man.
 We're warriors, not desk jockeys.  We've got to be bold.  You always want all your ducks lined up.  But nothing's 100 percent.  It's always 60-40, maybe 51-49. Hell, I'd take 40-60.  Then roll the dice.
 I'm from Arkansas.  Tell me a story with Robert E. Lee in it and maybe I'll pay attention.
 You know General McLelland, he wouldn't attack unless he had everything just right.  Finally Abe Lincoln came to him and said, General, if you're not going to use my army, could I borrow it for a while?  So he gave it to Grant and Grant just said, let's go.
 Forget it.
 Look, I'm sorry about your plane.  But I couldn't risk being late into Memphis.
 And never take.
 For all those vacation days you got coming.
 It's a ketch Kelly and I had chartered.
 I didn't know we had sailboats.
 Baloney.  I do see the damn "big picture."
 You know what your problem is?  You just see the packages in front of you.  You don't see the big picture.
 Every person counts, every package counts, that's my point.
 What?  Let Paris hold its plane?  Let Memphis take care of it?  Let somebody down the line clean up your mess?
 I was making a point.
 The point of FedEx, as I understand it, is to make the damn connection.
 You fucked us over.
 I'm touched.
 Jesus.  I got it working... You have no idea how hard it was... They're finally a team...
 But I might not have.
 I checked the weather, you had the jet stream, you could have made it up.
 It was fifteen minutes late.
 You what?
 Great.  Terrific.  The good guys won one for a change.
 How'd it go?
 Borrowed.  I borrowed it.
 What do you expect, from the guy who stole a kid's bicycle when his truck broke down?
 No please, join me.  Some sundried fish strips, a few eyeballs, some gills to munch on.
 Would you do us the honor of joining us? We're just sitting down at mess.  Pork chops and gravy, cranberries, baked potatoes with all the trimmings, fresh- baked bread, apple pie...
 As it happens, I'm headed for Frisco myself.
 San Francisco.  And you?
 May I ask, where are you bound?
 Permission granted.
 Permission to come aboard, sir.
 I just hope he won't expect us to say *Grace* all the time.
 Dr. Homer Wells.
 I suppose it wouldn't hurt to *meet* him. What's his name again?
 You don't find it depressing that Homer Wells is picking apples?
 Wilbur, he picked them for us himself...
 Oh my, yes! This is a *far* superior taste--and crisp, too! You know, so many apples are disappointingly mealy. I wonder of most of the apples in my life weren't meant for pies!
 We all know who trained Homer--his credentials are as good as mine are. Don't you be holy to me about the *law*! What has the law done for any of us here?
 These *credentials* are against the law!
 Don't you understand? The board is going to *replace* me! That's what the "new blood" is *for*!
 You *invented* him! You've completely made his up!
 "An internship and two years of training at the Boston Lying-in, South End Branch. For his age, he was judged an accomplished gynecological obstetrical surgeon; he is also experienced in pediatric care..."
 This is *your* life story, Wilbur! You just changed the dates!
 One has to be more than "careful" of Mrs. Goodhall--she has sufficient Christian zeal to start her own country! I'd like to give her a little ether.
 It's that Mrs. Goodhall you have to be careful of, Wilbur.
 He is a goddamn psychiatrist--of *course* he wants to "help"! He'd be happy if he could help *commit* me!
 Just find him some clothes, Wilbur. He could use some clothes.
 He's still a boy--out in the world, he's still a boy.
 Oh, just stop it! You knew this was going to happen. He's a young man.
 Let him try to *make* some money! That's part of "seeing the world," isn't it?
 He'll need clothes... some money...
 Some new *things* would be useful. I don't need any "new help."
 They just want you to hire some new help.
 They want to replace me! The Board of Trustees wants to *replace* me!
 It was just the ether, Wilbur...
 You were! You *are*! It was fantastic.
 Then I wasn't beautiful.
 I was!
 You weren't dreaming about me.
 I was dreaming about you. How beautiful you were!
 Life is waiting.
 Wilbur, the adopting couple is waiting in your office.
 It claims to restore monthly regularity.
 It's not ergot, it's not pituitary extract, it's not oil of rue...
 Try to think of nothing, Dorothy.
 Only if you can afford it.
 I don't know. She got left here, like the rest of us, didn't she?
 What's she so emotional about?
 I doubt it. She's just an...
 I think Mary Agnes could kill someone.
 I know.
 Homer, you know I would never kill anyone--you know I wouldn't.
 Sometimes I want to meet them so I can kill them. Just sometimes.
 Better than I can!
 And that I can drive a truck!
 You cook very well!
 Uh... I'd like to show them that I can cook, a little.
 What for, Buster? What would you do if you met them?
 Yeah. But sometimes I wish I could meet mine, anyway.
 Whoever they were, they didn't *do* any of the things parents are supposed to do. Dr. Larch did those things, and Nurse Edna, and Nurse Angela.
 Why not?
 I know who you mean. I think about leaving here, but not to find *them*.
 I mean your parents.
 I'm sorry, Homer.
 I'm *not* a doctor!
 But you've studied with the old man for *years*!
 I'm *not* a doctor. I haven't been to medical school--I haven't even been to high school!
 *You're* a doctor, Homer--you don't smell like ether.
 He's a doctor, Buster--doctors smell like ether.
 He *smells* like he could put you to sleep!
 It's because he's too tired to sleep. He has to.
 He *sniffs* that ether! I've seen him do it!
 If Homer wanted to know what was happening here, he could pick up a telephone and call us.
 Shouldn't we tell Homer?
 They'll believe it because they want to believe it.
 Why would the little ones believe that *anyone* would adopt him?
 I'll tell them Fuzzy was adopted.
 What are you going to tell the little ones?
 She died of *secrecy*, she died of *ignorance*...
 What'd she die of?
 Good night, Daddy.
 Good night, kids. Don't catch cold-- it's gettin' cold already.
 Daddy, *please*...
 How about him not needin' the friggin' compass! How about that?
 Good night, Daddy.
 It's gettin' late. I think I'll pack it in.
 Wally said to say, "Hello."
 He mentions Homer, too, you know.
 Daddy, it's a letter to *me*.
 I was lookin' for Wally's letter. I was gonna show it to Homer...  They made him a captain already-- *Captain* Worthington!
 It's time somebody ate *them*.
 No. You warned me. I didn't listen, but you warned me.
 No, I'm the one who should be sorry. You have every right to be angry.
 I'm sorry for what I said about Wally needing you. It was... unnecessary.
 I know you don't think much of being needed, or of me for that matter...
 Sure. Thanks.
 This came for you a couple of days ago. Olive asked me to bring it. With everything happening, I guess she forgot.
 She knows how to take care of herself.
 Do you think she'll be all right?
 You say that as though it's some awful thing!  I never stopped loving Wally!
 And now that Wally's coming back, and because he'll certainly *need* you...
 Please don't...
 "...did." Well, okay.
 Please... that's enough. I *loved* you, too--you know I did.
 I *helped* you not to think about Wally. You were so upset--you couldn't stand worrying about him, about his being killed and not coming back-- but when you were with me, you could stop worrying... well, for a while, anyway. This is how I helped you, right?
 No, that's not it--I just want to be sure I understand you.
 Please don't make me say it again.
 What do you want me to *do*?
 He's *alive*. He still loves you.  So do I.
 He's *paralyzed*!
 I know, I'm sorry.
 For God's sake, Homer, Wally's been shot down!
 You got up! You *did* something! If you keep this up, you might be in danger of making a *decision*!
 Stop it! Just cut it out!
 I'm not trying to be anything--I'm just doing nothing! If I wait and see long enough, then--with any luck-- I won't *ever* have to make up my mind! Decisions can be painful, after all...
 If you're trying to be funny, Homer...
 *Go* anywhere? Of course not! That would be *doing* something, wouldn't it? We wouldn't want to *do* something. Let's just sit here all night!
 Please don't move, don't go anywhere.
 No, don't--that's something. Nothing is nothing.  Don't even look at me. I want...
 I know.  Is *that* nothing.
 No. Nothing is nothing. I want Wally to come home. I'm afraid to see him, too.
 Isn't that like waiting and seeing?
 Nothing.
 Just tell me. I'll do whatever you want to do.
 We've got to keep her away from that bastard!
 Wait... *wait*! Are you sure?
 He's the *father*! He's her baby's father!
 Mr. Rose *knows*?
 You don't understand! It's her father...
 Well, we can't force her. It's her decision.
 She won't go to St. Cloud's!
 Well, we have to help her!
 I told her! She doesn't feel she can do that. Something about her father not letting her go anywhere...
 We should take her to St. Cloud's. That much is obvious, isn't it? Let her make up her mind when she gets there...
 It's a good thing I didn't have that baby, isn't it?
 Okay, okay--I know you do, too.
 No! That's not all there is to it! I love you, too--I *know* I do.
 Fine. That's all there is to it then.
 I grew up with Wally. I began my adult life with him.
 So we should "wait and see." For how long?
 Do you think I'm having a good time? Do you think I'm just *teasing* you? Do you think I *know* whether I want you or Wally?
 I'm just waiting and seeing. Like you said.
 Olive told me.  You might have told me yourself.
 We have to wait and see. I think that, for *everything* in life, you have to wait and see.
 *What* will be okay?
 It will be okay.
 Just tell me. Do you want me to go? Do you want me to stay?
 Right.
 I *know* this was right.
 Nobody will swim here until next summer. By then, the water will have rubbed the glass smooth against the sand--there won't be any sharp edges.
 Aren't you worried that people will cut their feet?
 Not with the right girl you wouldn't.
 That's what *I'd* come here for. I'd watch the movie.
 You just cuddle. You come to hug... to kiss. You don't *come* here to watch the movie.
 How could you not *care* about the movie?
 The *speaker*. For the movie sound.
 Ah-ha.  So what is that--a radio?
 Sometimes... movies mostly bore Wally.
 Did you come here with Wally--to *not* watch movies?
 Privacy is exactly the point of drive- in movies.
 Just a little privacy.
 I never *asked* for any responsibility.
 But you had so much *responsibility*.
 I miss things. I miss... people.  I miss reading to the boys.
 You don't miss it?
 I didn't say that. Growing up in an orphanage, you're always lonely. You're just never alone.
 At least you were never lonely.
 It was my favorite night at the orphanage--movie night. We'd race into the dining hall. Of course everyone wanted to sit in front, so we'd be packed in so tight you could feel the kid next to you breathing.
 What are you so crazy about the movies for?
 Yes... and no. When you come here, you don't really care about the movie.
 The screen is enormous! Imagine King Kong up *there*! Have you seen a lot of movies here?
 You think? Maybe I was.  I love this place!
 You're a natural. You were born to drive a car like this.
 Well, she was in a weakened condition...  I don't know! What about "King Kong"?! Is that medically possible?
 What's the *medical* explanation?
 Oh, sure!
 She was torn apart! She died of a broken heart.
 And what did she die of, exactly?
 She *did* love him!  How many women have you known?
 First she loved him, then she didn't, then no one else could have him...
 I *did* like it. All I said was, "It's not 'King Kong'."
 But you looked as if you liked it.
 "King Kong". It's really good.
 You've seen only one movie? Which one?
 Yes! I've only seen one, though.
 When they watched at all. Do you like movies?
 People watched the movies in their cars?
 Yes. But it's closed all the time now, because of the blackout.
 A movie *outside*?
 I don't think Mr. Rose would leave without you.
 I better go.
 Okay...
 You have to come to my dad's lobster pound and see one, then.
 When I'm not thinking about Wally. I'm not good at being alone.  Oh, goodness. You meant... yes, I'm fine. I...  ...I don't suppose you've seen a lobster yet.
 Uh... have you been *feeling* okay?
 I'm *never* bored! It's all very... different for me... here.
 So. Not bored yet?
 Sure... I'll see you around.
 I guess I'll see you around the orchards. Thanks for everything.
 It should taper off tomorrow, but it can come back again. You have cramps?  They'll ease up, almost entirely. As long as the bleeding isn't heavy, it's normal.
 I'm a little worried about the...  ...about how much bleeding is okay.
 I understand.
 I can't have a baby alone. I don't even know if he's coming back!
 Oh...
 Burma!
 Where's Mandalay?
 He's going to be dropping bombs on Mandalay! They're going to be shooting at him!
 I know.
 I've never seen the ocean, either.
 Really?
 I've never seen a lobster.
 No, but I work there--I like it. My dad's a lobsterman.
 Is your family in the apple business, too?
 Two.
 How many months are you?
 Candy. Candy Kendall.
 So, Mrs...
 No. It ain't Muddy. Muddy's just...
 You can trust me. Is it Jack? It's not Jack, is it? It's *Muddy*! Is it Muddy?
 Why?
 I can't go nowhere.
 I know where you can go. Homer and I can take you...
 Yes, I *have*!
 You ain't been through what I been through, Candy.
 Rose, I know what's going on. Homer told me. I got pregnant, too--about a year ago.  I've been through this.
 I don't need no more clothes, thank you.
 I've got some more clothes for you-- I just keep forgetting to bring them with me.
 Hi...
 Hi...
 Oh, he's fine! I just heard from him. He's bombing all these places...
 How is that Wally doing?
 *Homer* liked it!  Didn't you?
 He thinks people *like* to get whacked by branches.
 He *loved* it!  Didn't you?
 You've been giving him a *flying* lesson!
 I know what you've been doing.
 I was just showing Homer the orchards... kind of a geography lesson.
 I love you, too. See you tomorrow.
 I love you, Wally.
 Well, *picking* them is! It's about as exciting as... walking!
 There! You said it was boring.
 Well, they aren't.
 You said, "Apples aren't exactly flying."
 I never said they were boring.
 Wally thinks apples are boring.
 No--keep it down. I want to feel the air.
 I don't want you to walk--I want to carry you. Should I put the top up? It might get cold.
 I'm okay--I can walk.
 Well, this *is* an orphanage.
 So many children. Are they all orphans?
 Only the right people can have you, Curly.
 You mean somebody asked?
 Nobody special enough, Curly.
 Nobody's asked for me, have they?
 That's true.
 Dr. Larch wouldn't let just anyone take *any* of us!
 You're one of the best, Curly--we couldn't let just anyone take you.
 Nobody ever wants me!
 They wanted a girl.
 I thought they might take me.
 Does he *know* he's supposed to be in India? Does he even *want* to come back?
 Edna! Come dance with me! Let's be foolish tonight.
 I just wanted to ask you...
 I wouldn't worry, Edna, that he doesn't have money. If he gets hungry, he can pick his dinner!
 He probably doesn't make much money picking apples--he must have had to pay to send them, too.
 Or that he can't be bothered to write us a proper letter? A dissertation on apples, we don't need!
 But what about school records? Homer doesn't have any *diplomas*...
 So here is my candidate. What do you think?
 Well, we can only guess about that, Edna. They *are* against the law.
 You mean they'll replace you with someone who won't perform abortions.
 "...graduated Bowdoin College, 1935, and Harvard School of Medicine, 1939."
 Homer was born *here*, in, what was it, 1922?
 "Homer Wells, born Portland, Maine, March 2, 1915..."
 He's leaving...
 I don't know! He's just leaving--  you're the one who says he needs to see the world!  *That's* what he'll do--he'll see the world!
 You *bet* it's a heavy sedation! The fetus is unexpelled, her uterus is punctured, she has acute peritonitis, and there's a foreign object. I think it's a crochet hook.
 That's a heavy sedation.
 How old are you, dear? Thirteen?
 Her temperature is a hundred and four.
 Someone not from Maine.
 What's an immigrant?
 No. She was an immigrant.
 Did you grow up around here?
 She looks after other people's children.
 What's a nanny do?
 She's dead now, too. She was a nanny.
 Did you know your mother better?
 Barely. It hardly mattered that I knew him.
 But did you know him?
 *Alcohol* killed him--he drank himself to death.
 *Liver* killed him?
 Cirrhosis--it's a disease of the liver.
 Is *your* father dead?
 Why can't we have pumpkins for Christmas, too? We don't get any good presents at Christmas, anyway.
 Don't get too excited, Fuzzy.
 Is that soon?
 Uh... it's the end of October.
 His father's dead, right?
 "I was a posthumous child. My father's eyes had closed upon the light of this world six months, when mine opened on it."
 That's why Kong loves her!
 Uh, sure--that's what Kong thinks, all right.
 Homer... doesn't King Kong think the woman is his *mother*?
 I must have been *dreaming* of kissing someone.
 No, you did it yourself. Maybe in your sleep.
 Maybe I was kissing someone and he bit me.
 It looks like you bit it--it'll be all right.
 I don't remember.
 Did you bite it?
 I don't think so, Homer. *I'm* the lucky one.
 Well, sure... that's good, then.  All I mean is, I'm lucky I met you.
 You're the one who's helping *me*, Homer. You're going to give my mom a little peace of mind while I'm gone. Candy, too.
 Uh... actually, picking apples is as much excitement as I want for a while. I'm grateful for the job.
 Uh... I'm shipping out sooner than I thought. I just wanted to be sure you were settled in--and happy enough, considering...  Are you bored stiff? Or can you stick it out for a bit?
 The trees are flak--antiaircraft fire from those geeks on the ground.
 What about the trees?
 It's almost like flying.
 Yes. They pick fruit, all kinds. They travel up and down the coast with the seasons.  The trick to Mr. Rose is, you have to let him be the boss.
 Migrants?
 They're migrants.
 Oh, I would love that, Wally.
 Uh, look... if you're serious about wanting a job, picking apples isn't that boring.
 Actually, I volunteered.
 What lousy luck--I mean your orders... to draw an assignment like that!
 I've got thirty-five minutes to climb to fifteen thousand feet--that's the first mountain pass.
 At what altitude?
 *And* over the Himalayas. That's called flying over the hump.
 "Burma run" because you fly over Burma...
 It's all very normal.
 I don't *have* any time. There's a *war*!
 This is all normal. Don't worry. The abortion procedure... it affects you. It's the ether, too. It'll take a little time.
 The only jobs are picking jobs. Picking apples is truly boring.
 No, I'm not. I need a job.
 You're a little overqualified, aren't you?
 I think I'd probably like the apple business.
 We're heading back to Cape Kenneth.
 Where are you going?
 Sure! Be glad to! Uh... a ride where?
 I wonder if you might give me a ride.
 Actually, someone did. I just didn't think I could eat anything.
 Has anyone offered you anything to eat?
 No, it's not serious. I'm just not supposed to get excited. You know-- no strain, no stress. I try to keep calm all the time.
 Really! Is it serious?
 They wouldn't take me. I'm Class IV-- I've got a heart defect.
 Have you enlisted?
 Liberator...
 A B-24 Liberator.
 What kind of plane are you flying?
 Ah, well... okay. Good! I just wondered...
 No. Dr. Larch will be performing the procedure.
 So, now, uh... you're not... I mean, do *you* do the--
 It's okay--I don't mind.
 I'm sorry. They're not used to seeing a car like this.
 Right?
 Let me hear you say that! I so unhappy she runned away that I killed myself-- that what happen here, ain't that right?
 That's 'cause I sticked my *own* knife in the wound--after she go, I sticked my *own* knife in there. I poked it all around, I just tryin' to find the same place she got me.
 There's more than one laceration, more than one cut.
 She just plan misunderstand me--I was tryin' to give her my knife, I was just reachin' to touch her hand. But I understand if she misunderstand me--it's all my fault, ain't that right?
 Where'd she get you?
 If that was your knife, Muddy, I wanna thank you for givin' it to her-- no girl should be goin' *hitch-hikin'* if she don't got a good knife with her.
 Okay. Then you can be of use.
 I'm stayin', Homer.
 When it comes to this, you is the real thing--is that what you sayin'?
 Merthiolate, ether, vulval pads, gauze--lots of gauze.
 There ain't no *almost* about this stuff, Homer--ain't that right?
 One cervical stabilizer, two sets of dilators--Douglas points. One medium- sized curette, one small; one medium speculum, one large; two vulsellum forceps.
 What's that? What's it called?
 Mr. Rose, I'm in the *doctor* business.  If you want, I can help you. You don't have to go anywhere.
 What business is you in, Homer?
 You forget yourself, Homer. This here's my daughter! You got your own mess to deal with--ain't that right?
 Please listen to me! *Both* of you...
 And I *love* her! There ain't nobody else gonna treat her as good as I do!  I wouldn't do nothin' to hurt her, Homer--you must know that.
 But she's your *daughter*...
 Go on, cut my clothes. I've got other clothes.
 Homer, don't you know what business you in? You don't wanna go into no business with me, Homer--ain't that right?
 You're lying. How can you... with your own daughter!
 Ain't nobody havin' *sex* with my little girl, Homer--that's somethin' a father knows.
 You're actually having sex with your own little girl? Is that possible?
 I think you been stayin' up too late at night, Homer.
 Is it true?
 I didn't see where you was pickin' this mornin', Homer, but you musta worked up a big appetite. You look like you're serious about gettin' to your lunch today!
 You still doin' it too fast!
 This is easy--I'm not hurrying.
 Slow down, Homer--don't be in such a big hurry.
 Of *course* there's worms, Homer! And what is them worms, really? They just *protein*, them worms! They is *good* for you!
 What about the worms? Most of these apples are the drops--off the ground, right? There have to be worms.
 Cider don't have no taste till later in October--it's too watery now, when we're usin' just them early Macs and them Gravensteins. You don't get no *good* cider till you're pickin' them Golden Delicious and them Winter Bananas, them Baldwins and them Russerts...
 Homer, you the only one who's read them rules, so you the only one who feels like he's doin' somethin' wrong.
 Are we supposed to be up here? The rules said...
 I guess so...
 That's better. I can tell you got yourself some education. Them's good hands you got, Homer. Them hands you got, they know what they're doin'-- ain't that right?
 Okay...
 Stop it, Homer. They aren't our rules. We didn't write them. I don't see no reason to read them.
 Right.
 It's big enough to keep you out of the war, I suppose. Ain't that right?
 Out back, there's a shed. It's just a mess. If that shed was better organized, I could put my truck in there.
 So. What should I do now?
 You know everything I know, plus what you've taught yourself--you're a better doctor then I am and you know it!
 I am not a doctor.
 It's your heart--you ought to take it with you.
 I don't need this--I know all about my condition.
 I don't need your gratitude.
 You know I'm grateful for everything you've done for me...
 Are you really so *stupid* that you imagine you're going to find a more gratifying life? What you're going to find is people like the poor people who get left here--only nobody takes care of them as well! And you won't be able to take care of them, either. There's no taking care of *anybody*-- not out there!
 Of course.
 In other parts of the world, I suppose there are other ways.
 I wasn't intending to leave here in order to be entirely useless--I expect I'll find some ways to be of use.
 Doubtless you'll let me know what immensely worthwhile or at least *useful* thing it is that you find to do.
 Happy to be alive, under any circumstances--is that your point?
 Try to look at it *this* way. Buster and I are sitting right here beside you. We could have ended up in the incinerator!
 Try to look at it this way. What choice does Buster have? What are his options? Nobody will ever adopt him.
 I'm happy I amuse you.
 It's just a marvel to me that you still have such high expectations of people.
 How about this child? You expect *her* to be responsible?
 How about expecting people to be responsible enough to control themselves to begin with?
 It is. I'll get this. You go ahead.
 I thought it was my turn.
 It's *your* splice! You blame me for everything!
 I thought you took care of this. It always breaks in the same place. It's your splice, isn't it?
 We haven't had a Wilbur here in a year or so, have we? We used to have *dozens*!
 Okay, he's just a Wilbur then.
 I'm not crazy about the "Little..."
 Henceforth you shall be... Little Wilbur.
 You do it then.
 I don't think so.
 Can't a boy be a Dorrit?
 He doesn't like it.  He's a boy, That's why.
 It's my turn!
 Nobody's named this one yet.
 Where's the name sheet?
 When *doesn't* he have bronchitis? I wouldn't call his bronchial infections "underdeveloped." Would you?
 But isn't Fuzzy just... well, underdeveloped?
 I haven't, either. But you *will*. The morons who write the books should do a little research *here*.
 I haven't read that.
 Fuzzy is not uncommon. I tell you, there's something about the premature babies of alcoholic mothers. They seem susceptible to every damn thing that comes along.
 Good boy. Good job. And you call yourself "not a doctor"!  Keep an eye on her--she's in trouble.
 In other words, scurvy.
 If you take enough of it, your intestines lose their ability to absorb Vitamin C.
 I don't know it.
 Christ, it's oil of tansy!
 Obviously.
 It's obviously an aborticide.
 Scurvy! Ah yes, the curse of the old- time sailor, suffering long periods at sea with no fresh fruits or vegetables. Homer, Dorothy isn't a *sailor*!
 It looks like scurvy.
 No. The fetus was dead. Her uterus was virtually *disintegrating*--my stitches pulled right through the tissue!
 There was no visible wound?
 What *else* could I have showed you, Homer? The only thing I can teach you is what I know! In every life, you've got to be of use.
 One: it's illegal. Two: I didn't ask how to do it--you just showed me.
 You know *how* to help these women-- how can you not feel *obligated* to help them when they can't get help anywhere else?
 All I said was, I don't want to perform abortions. I have no argument with *you* performing them.
 I presume you'd prefer handling the delivery.
 Yes, for both.
 First pregnancy?
 Right.
 Good-bye, Arthur.  Homer, I'll see you tomorrow?
 Just promise me that, if there's a blizzard, you'll move into Wally's room until it's over.
 Uh... sure.
 I don't know.  Just promise me one thing.
 I think Wally will be fine, Mrs. Worthington--he seems indestructible to me.
 There's not a lot of work in the winter, and you'll have to tolerate Vernon--even Wally despises him, and Wally likes everyone.
 Mrs. Worthington, I feel I'm very lucky to be here.
 What I mean is... I would like it very much if you thought you could be happy here, Homer.
 Yeah, well... you could move on with *us*, man! You could move on somewhere *warm*!
 Thanks, guys... I'd like to go with you. But I've got to move on.
 "Two: Please don't go up to the roof to eat your lunch."
 We heard that one already, Homer.
 "One: Please don't smoke in bed."
 Long enough. You ain't gonna stop it.
 How long's this been going on, Muddy?
 Don't mess in this, Homer, if you know what's good for you.
 It means nothin' at all! And all this time I been *wonderin'* about it!
 That's it.
 That's *it*?
 Rose, listen--don't *do* anything. You know, I mean to yourself. Please listen...
 Why don't you just go back to your pickin', Homer? I can take care of it myself!
 You think Daddy's gonna let me go anywhere? I ain't going *nowhere*.
 What I mean is, if you don't want to... keep the baby, I know a place where you can go.
 Rose, please listen. Whatever you want to do, I can help you.
 *Happy*! What are you thinkin'? How am I supposed to take care of a baby! I can't have a baby.
 But you don't look very happy.
 Don't trouble yourself about it, Homer--this ain't your business.
 I know more than I want to know about it. Who's the father?
 Not yet. What do you know about it?
 You're not yet three months, are you?
 I don't like watching anyone be sick.
 I guess you must like watchin' me be sick...
 You okay, Rose?
 Almost.
 Oh, I suppose you is a doctor, Homer?
 Give men that. I know how to do it.
 Yeah, you is. I know when people is in trouble, and you is.
 I'm not in trouble.
 No trouble.
 You ain't gettin' in no trouble, I hope.
 I can't read. Nobody taught me.
 Do you like to read?
 Yes, so what. It's nothing serious, really. Just a small defect.
 So what?
 There's a little something wrong with it. Just this part here--the right ventricle. It's slightly enlarged.
 What you got a picture of your heart for?
 It's just my heart.
 What's that?
 Pretty, ain't it? You a plumber?
 Rose Rose?
 What business is you in, Jack? Just tell me what your business is...
 You mean *swimmin'*. I ain't goin' in that vat to fish out no cigarette!
 It's not that hard to find it in there, Jack--it'll take you just a minute. You just gotta go fishin'.
 Them people drinkin' that cider, they don't know there's a cigarette in there!
 That just ain't right, Jack--your cigarette's gonna end up in nine or ten gallons of this batch of cider! That ain't right.
 You think so, Jack? Well... I wouldn't want to be in that Wally's shoes tonight.
 I bet the view looks better from the Worthin'tons'.
 Jack, you gotta watch your language 'round my daughter.
 Shit. We don't know what he is.
 Now, now. He's a good boy.
 Who cares?
 Anyway, I was just showing you this guy as an example of what's available-- I didn't think you'd be interested.
 I fail to see how a little Christianity could *hurt* anyone here!
 Then I suppose we can look forward to catching various diseases from him!
 You can't think that a man who has *served* under such conditions as exist over there will be in the slightest daunted by a little *snow*-- have you no idea how harsh and primitive and full of *disease* that part of the world is?
 Does it *snow* in Bombay? One winter here and we'll be shipping him south, in a *coffin*!
 I fail to see how someone courageous enough to make a commitment to a foreign mission is automatically to be dismissed--that part of the world requires precisely the kind of dedication that is needed here.
 *No*! I don't want to know him! He's doing *missionary* work--in *India*! I wrote him *weeks* ago, but he's either too holy or too busy to answer. Maybe he got killed in the war!
 Do you know him?
 Four weeks or so, right around Halloween.
 When will he be home, Major?
 No autonomic effects... that's correct.
 It's encephalitis B. He's recovering at Mount Lavinia Hospital, Ceylon.  Uh... Captain Worthington is paralyzed.  Waist down. He won't walk.
 Then it's malaria?
 Because the crew thought he'd gone down with the plane. They were hospitalized for almost a week in China before they were flown back to India. It wasn't until that they sorted through their gear...
 Why was he missing for twenty days?
 When the plane was hit, the crew chief and the radioman jumped close together. The copilot jumped third. All on Captain Worthington's orders-- the captain was still flying the plane. None of the men of the ground could see the sky--that's how thick the jungle was. They never saw the plane crash--they never *heard* it crash. They never saw Captain Worthington's parachute, either.
 Who *live* here in this cider house, Peaches? Who grind them apples, who press that cider, who clean up the mess, and who just plain *live* here... just breathin' in the vinegar?  Somebody who *don't* live here made them rules. Them rules ain't for *us*. *We* the ones who make up them rules. We makin' our *own* rules, every day. Ain't that right, Homer?
 They're *outrageous*, them rules!
 Then you pickin' 'em too fast--they ain't no better than drops to me. See that bruise, and that one? *Half* of these is bruised! Look at this one! It ain't got no stem! You might as well *step* on 'em, too--they only good for cider.
 They ain't drops--I picked 'em off the tree!
 You pickin' nothin' but cider apples, Peaches--I hope you understand that.
 What have you two been doin' to make it look so nice?
 It look nicer then home!
 Don't this place look like home?
 We see you next harvest.
 You all take care of yourself, too, Homer!
 Sorry, Homer...
 Mind your own business, Peaches.
 Ain't you gonna see what it is, Homer?
 They told Muddy his feet was too flat!
 They told me I was too old to serve.
 That's right. I know you understand how I feel, Homer--you is breakin' them rules, too. Ain't that right?
 That what happen--you lost you only daughter so's you killed yourself! That's what we say, all right.
 That's right! A girl's gotta know how to defend herself, don't she?
 *You* taught her, I suppose...
 She's *good* with that knife! She's real fast. She's a lot better with that knife than *you* is, Muddy! And who do you suppose taught her?
 Tell him what you want, Muddy--*you* is the crew boss today.
 I told him that you all is sick.
 Tell that Vernon to mind his own business, Muddy.
 It's that Vernon--he keeps askin' where you and Homer and Rose Rose is at.
 Yeah, we can wait all night for the water to come back on--you just go on and take your time.
 Don't let us make you nervous or nothin'--we know you gotta job to do.
 Well, Muddy, we can look at all these angry stars Homer's been readin' to us about.
 *What* view?
 What view?
 Where's your manners? Make room for Homer, so's he can enjoy the view.
 That's right, Homer. This ain't your business.
 You just go inside, Homer. We don't need no help.
 I ain't your business no more, Daddy. Please let me go.
 You ain't goin' nowhere in the middle of the night, girl!
 You gotta let me go, Daddy. Please...
 Where do you think you're going?
 You just stay out of trouble, Homer!
 Now, now, Jack--that just ain't right.
 You oughta know you don't go to jail for cuttin' a guy's *clothes*. Ain't that right, Homer?
 Yeah, you really showed him, Daddy-- you just about cut your own hand off, and all you cut off *him* was his clothes!
 Now, now, darlin'... Jack just needs to know what business he's in.
 We should drown that damn Jack in the vat!
 That's right--that sounds like trouble to me.
 That sounds like you is in trouble already, Homer.
 What's lucky about that?
 You lucky you in your work boots tonight, girl...
 Daddy, I'd like to be in that Wally's shoes *every* night.
 He ain't never been outta Maine!
 You ever see a palm tree, Homer?
 She took off on the bicycle, man.
 She took off in the night!
 Rose Rose has runned away!
 Yeah, that cigarette ain't hard to find when you're properly undressed.
 The good news, Jack, is you're half- undressed for *swimmin'*...
 You're lucky he didn't cut your *nipples* off, man.
 She's about the most beautiful girl I ever seen--I don't know if she's the nicest.
 That Candy--she's the nicest girl I know!
 You're welcome. I was just going to ask you if you'd like to join us.
 Oh. Well, thanks for the drink.
 Really? Wish we had met eight hours ago.
 No, no. Nothing like that. I work in a bank.
 Don't tell me you started a tech firm here before us.
 Well, typically, corporate loans are relatively simple matters, but you do need to demonstrate a capacity for gross fund recovery.
 So we've been meeting with banks all day. It's amazing how many ways they can say "no" without ever using the word.
 On me. For the seat. Cheers.
 Can --
 That's right. So, brainiacs that we are, we thought we'd be innovative and relocate east. Try our luck with a straight corporate loan out here.
 Silicon Valley?
 It's more like what aren't I doing. My partners and I are trying to secure start up capital for a small tech company. We tried the venture capitalist route in the Valley, but then again who hasn't up there.
 So, what do you do?
 Oh god. I'm overbearing and rude. Lily. Lily Finn.
 My name's Grant. Grant Ashby.
 Uh, Maker's Mark. Rocks.
 Brutal day. They say the streets are lined with money down here, but I guess you have to know the secret handshake. What are you drinking?
 Tough day?
 Thanks for playing along. I just have to sit for a while.
 I wasn't sure if you'd make it.
 But I'm not that late. You didn't have to give away my seat.
 Jake? Right. Uh-huh... Uh-huh... Yeah, it's going through --
 Same thing with playing a con. You have to be able to see that deep.
 Two million.
 Ten percent. Of how much?
 The standard ten.
 Then there it is. Ashby gets the itch.
 No, I understand that. What I mean... What I'm trying to say... I was actually wondering about... Well, my cut.
 You're worried about recouping the loan. I already told you.
 Let's just slow down for a second...
 You need some convincing. Consider it a convincer.
 What's this?
 There'll be red flags.
 I know. It won't go unnoticed.
 This has to happen fast.
 Everything looks in order.
 We had to finalize the deal.
 Yes. That's why I wish there were guys willing to take a chance and live a little.
 And you have this letter of intent?
 Exactly. But the Catch-22 is that you can't tell anyone about the offer, because if it's public, you could start a bidding war and that's considered a breach of etiquette. It could kill a deal. But, wait too long and you're not considered hot anymore.
 Sort of like a letter of intent.
 Right. The guys who started that did what a lot of companies in the Valley do. They get a good idea, shop it around, raise some capital, then sell it off to a bigger company. Microsoft, Intel, Oracle, whatever. The beauty of it is, they've pretty much sold the company before they're even real. The bigger company is already set to buy it, all they want to do is make sure that the idea actually works. So they get some start up capital, make it work, then sell it for like five times the initial loan.
 Big.Com. That Internet thing.
 Listen, what I'm about to tell you, I'm telling you in confidence, okay?  Have you ever heard of a company called Big.Com?
 I don't follow.
 We know exactly how we're going to make the money back. There in lies the Catch-22
 Banks need to know how they're going to get their money back.
 They scare people off because most people lack vision. Vision and balls. Present company excluded of course.
 That's right. And tech firms... They 'tend to scare people off.
 A capacity for gross fund recovery. Yeah, we got that part.
 Well, typically speaking, they're not. As long as you can demonstrate --
 Maybe you can help us understand what's so hard about getting a corporate loan.
 Here's where a little research comes in handy. Corporate banks give out VP titles like calendars. It's a small lie, but now we're sure he's playing.
 What do I do? I'm the VP of Finance.
 What do you do over at your bank, Grant?
 I envy you guys. Taking a chance like that.
 Uh, right... And that was it. That's when we decided to start our own business. No more shithead bosses.
 It's Alfonse. I want to settle up. I haven't been ducking you. I told you I'd get it.
 It can erase all those things about you that you wish didn't exist.
 I'm gonna go get eggrolls. Anyone want eggrolls?
 What are you talking about? You should get a fucking Academy Award for the Shill work you do.  We got it down cold, Al. You don't want to jinx it by changing something up, do you?
 Yeah, but come on... All I get to do is cry and get insulted.
 Gordo plays the inside. You're the Shill.
 Hey, Jake... When am I gonna get to play the Inside?
 So why don't you take a deep breath, Jake, and I'll count to ten. One. Two. Three...
 Guess so.
 Like putting on a play... Guess some people forgot their lines.
 It's like putting on a play, where everyone knows their part except for the mark.
 Oh, Jake. You disappoint me. And you just let Lily here down again. What was it you said about playing the big con?
 Probably safe in the hands of the Federal Government.
 Alright... Turn around. She doesn't get shit, unless I get that money. Where is it?
 Today? Started off great...
 Alrlght, alrlght. What happened today?
 She walked.
 After you cut her loose.
 We were back on.
 Yes it is, Jake! Yes it is! They were right there for you. She was right there for you! Look at her!
 It's not true.
 BULLSHIT! You were scared, Jake! You lost your nerve! You lost your confidence! You weren't being noble. You weren't trying to save anybody but yourself! Admit it.
 I was doing it for them.
 So much for honor among thieves. You would have cut loose your friends, your girl...
 You know when the first con was ever played? It was when Adam fell for Eve in the Garden of Eden.
 Is that what it was, Jake? Was it love?
 My father used to play the same fucking lotto numbers with these other guys in the pharmacy. The same numbers everyday for sixteen years. One day he gets pissed off, tells them he's out and plays his own numbers. They hit the Lucky Seven for one point two million.
 She had you tempting fate.
 Having a gun pointed at you for one. It's not like breaking a mirror bad luck, but it's bad. Three on a match, black cats... Believe it. Believe it all.
 Like what?
 Luck's a funny thing. Especially the bad.
 You're a superstitious fucker.
 Back in WWI or WWII, one of the WW's, if you took the time to light three cigarettes with one match, some Nazi would be able to figure out where you were. Then, well... It was the last cigarette you and your two buddies ever had. So three on a match is bad luck.
 Thanks. Did you know you shouldn't light three cigarettes with a match?
 We got our stake. Now we need to find our guy in Gillett's bank.
 Nice.
 Cue the fucking violins. Come on... It's getting cold.
 He's just as crooked as the next guy. You'd think he'd have more important things to do with tax payer dollars.
 Factors that weren't clear to me until now.
 But there were other factors.
 That was it. We had our crew. Now we needed the Mark.
 I can see why you liked her.
 Suits used to say that in any con, sooner or later someone's going to start asking the right questions. Usually, it takes a little longer.
 So how'd you get caught?
 In this case, you might say I want to know how not to play the Big Con.
 So you want to know how to play the Big Con.
 Keep going. I want to know how you got Lionel Dolby.
 You never know when you can use a crooked cop.
 Keeping the Fix happy.
 And these cops? What do they get?
 I'm not saying anything. Besides, you're one to talk. You're the one who's got me on my knees in a dark alley.
 Isn't it always?
 It's all about the money, isn't it?
 We can't all be model citizens such as yourself.
 Grifters...
 That's not a bad place to start.
 Just the last three weeks.
 Your life flashing before your eyes?
 Gee... What makes you say that?
 Things are probably going to end badly for you, Jake.
 No. I'm not the Anti-Christ. Or the Prince of Darkness. I'm just a guy looking for some answers.
 The Anti-Christ?
 Know who I am, Jake?
 And I think it's because of this redhead...
 Fine. But only if we recover the cash.
 Ten is standard, sir.
 And how much did you say you wanted for this... What did you call it? A finder's fee?
 We'll take care of it.
 I think so. The airport's going to be crawling with police. Traffic will be a nightmare. Go down to the bar. If they pull it off, great. Have someone deal with Ashby.
 So we go to the bar.
 Let's see... Let's suppose he gets to Customs and he gets caught. We get our money back, but then we have to deal with a criminal investigation. I don't much like that idea. Then again, let's suppose he actually gets through Customs. Now, that'll be something. We recover the money in cash and let the insurance cover the corporate fraud. We double our money.
 Not that I recall. What do you want us to do about it?
 I gotta work off some of this adrenaline. I got a line on this Pawn Shop guy over in Brooklyn. Anybody want in?
 Poor bastard never knew what hit him. Jesus, I almost felt sorry for the guy.
 It's not like she's a real redhead, Jake...
 The red hair... It's bad luck.
 People have tried this before, Jake. It's never worked. Teddy Fraiser and his crew went on vacation in Chicago for it. Last year, Mumps got pinched in L.A.
 This might just be me, but that is hands down, the dumbest fucking idea I've ever heard.
 Alright, let's all put our dicks back in our pants for a second. Is this the best thing to do?
 Fuck that. We're going too.
 We're going to give him the money back?
 Whoa. What?
 Come on...
 We sure Big Al threw him to us?
 Big Al gets whacked mid-egg foo young. The whole thing took about two and a half hours. That's how good he is.
 No, that was the only semi-fucking smart thing he said! Except anybody that's ever met Big Al knows that the only thing he's comfortable doing alone is eating. This guys tells this guy, that guy tells some other guy, eventually it works it's way back to someone who works for the King and --
 You're pissed we didn't get credit?
 What are you? New? Let me tell you how good this guy is. Last night, Al calls this bookie to settle up. Apparently he's been ducking him for like a month. So the guy asks him where he's got all this money all of a sudden, right? What does Al do? Does he tell him that he cashed in a fucking Bar Mitzvah bond? Does he tell him he's been giving head out back for twenty bucks a pop? No... He starts going on about this job he just pulled and how he fleeced some Wall Street asshole-type... How HE fleeced.
 So what? We hide, right?
 Independent. Same shit, just independent. They call him the King Pin because he looks like that guy from the comic book... Big. Fat. Bald.
 Mob?
 Currently, the King Pin is a very large-type pole stuck up our asses.
 What's a King Pin?
 The cash we fleeced off of him was collection money. He was supposed to take that money and give it to the King earlier yesterday like he does every Thursday. 'Cept this time, he figured he could make a little something for himself off us and still get the King's money back before any body says "boo."
 Who's that?
 Jake, I mean, come on --
 That's it? What are you talking about? We can still do this!
 So what? We just stay clear of him.
 Moonan. Here. Shit...
 Let's go, Jake?
 I'm going home
 It's alright. Grant's one of the good guys.
 Jake...
 So far, masters of our own demise. What bank are you with?
 Masters of our own destiny.
 What? No. Use the bathroom on the plane!
 You ever use the bathroom in Kennedy?
 I'd like this cashed, please.
 Then he had to bang it out across the street at the Bank of the Caymens...
 That's it.
 So that's it...
 What do I always tell you guys? Don't spend it all. Sooner or later we're going to run into some bad luck. Save some. Put it away, so when shit like this happens, you're not desperate. That's it. The gig's up.
 Jake --
 We'll use the Euc.
 Calls?
 Eight A.M. flight.
 You'll be there?
 And all you need to do for your ten percent is put some paperwork through and push a button tomorrow.
 We're going to make it back, Grant. Three or four times over.
 You sure?
 Uh... No thanks. I'm not going all the way to Brooklyn for a hundred dollar pay-off.
 So then Miles walks straight into the Creative Director's office and says "The code's fine, the program's for shit" and throws down like a thousand pages of code on the guy's desk!
 She got one leg out from under him. Now we had to lean.
 She's up for it.
 She up for this?
 Here's what's going to happen. Gordo, we need to find a guy in Gillette's bank. Miles, we need papers, corporate, insurance...
 You laugh now, but wait until you need a clean place to powder. This is New York city, Sister. Public sanitation does not run very high on the city hall agenda. You know what you can get off a toilet or doorknob? Let's do the list... Hepatitis, influenza, the flesh eating disease --
 No, not "whatever." You're either in or you're out.
 Yeah... Whatever, Jake.
 We pay better.
 How's that? He works for Gillette.
 We meet him with corporate papers, inquiring about a corporate loan for start up capital. The corporate papers are in order, but we need things to happen fast. Our guy fudges numbers in the right places, moves our papers to the top of the pile or to the bottom, depending upon what we need.
 We get fifty percent. And we get clear of the King.
 We only owe the King a hundred and fifty.
 Two million.
 How much we going after?
 Yes, her. Where's my wallet?
 You gotta be kidding me. Her?
 Tonight. Just me.
 When?
 Leave him. Someone's going to find him eventually. Then they'll start looking for us, too.
 And what about Big Al?
 You know what we're doing with the money.
 It gets worse. Now I know why he was such a good rope. I mean, cash... That much and we never had to put him on the "Send?" Turns out this ducking Moe was an accountant for the King Pin.
 Well, this is just fucking great...
 Seems Lionel Dolby came down with a sudden case of drowning last night. They just pulled him out of the East River.
 I just don't know if this says, "me". What's the fabric?
 It can buy you a new and better you.
 I guess. I gotta drop a dime. Did anybody mess up the hoop?
 Probably some investment banker or convertible-bonds-broker-dickhead. Did you see how fast he ran out of here? It's done. He's not coming back.
 That's a lot of cash. He came up with it pretty quick.
 What? I can feel you looking at me.
 But you won't get that splatter effect.
 I told you, use less powder.
 Shit.
 Harder. Remember, I killed your buddy.
 I think I just broke my hand.
 Come on. Harder.
 Come here!
 No thanks. I'm good.
 Come here. Feel this.
 You're not going to bust out baby oil and start rubbing me down or anything, are you?
 Look at you, you skinny prick.
 I said take off your fucking shirt.
 Excuse me?
 No, you listen. We're partners now and even though I'm running the show for you, I'm still running the show. That means I get a little respect. So I don't want to hear anymore of this Scooter, Buddy, Junior, Skippy, Tiger, bullshit. It's Jake.  And I gotta tell you, for a guy who spends all his time in a gym, you could be in better shape.
 Listen, Scooter --
 Hey Skippy? Do I have the word "chump" tattooed on my forehead?
 Nothing ventured, nothing gained.
 That's more than you already owe me. What happens if you fuck this up?
 I need you to stake me. I can't do it without it. It's just a couple hundred grand. Taken out of our cut when we're done.
 Stake you?
 I need you to stake me.
 What do you need from me? Permission? Go! If you can fleece him for two million, then do it, Kid.
 I think two million.
 How much?
 You ask a lot of questions. Come on.  Let me see 'em.
 Why?
 We got caught. So you know it won't happen again.
 I' ll be honest with you, Kid. A grifter comes in here with a fifteen hundred dollar D-K-fucking-N-Y suit, cooler than an Eskimo in winter and tells me he wants to grift for me? First thing I have to ask myself is, is he playing for me or is he just plain playing me? You tried it once.
 No. Just confidence.
 Fucking grifters! I love it! You got balls, I'll give you that much.
 I'll get the money back, plus interest. I go on the grift for you. You get a cat, I get a cut. And we get square.
 Buddy, that was business. Besides, you have more crew. Then there's you...
 Because you killed one of my crew.
 Let me repeat -- Why not?
 Let me rephrase -- I won't do that.
 Why not?
 I can't do that.
 Honest mistake. Just give me the money back and all will be forgiven.
 I apologize for the inconvenience.
 You can't cheat an honest man. But a man like Lionel Dolby...
 You can't cheat an honest man.
 Of course, your line of work's only as good as the people you find.
 I guess it lacks a certain style.
 You know, back in the day, grafting was considered a gentleman's racket. Good suits, good food... The Underworld of the Underworld. A grifter had to survive on his wits, his instincts... I like that. I like the idea of that. These days, things being what they are, guys like me gotta stay low. It's all take, take, take. You can't just be fucking witty about it.
 Minus one.
 Minus one.
 I have a good crew.
 Here and there, Scooter? Here and there like Boston, Chicago, Houston? The bay area? Some action in London, 'til it turned nickel and dime. Or how about that little stint down in Miami? Heard you actually got into some trouble with the Feds down there. You guy's pretty good?
 Jake. You can call me Jake. Here and there.
 Grifter huh? Where have you been on the grift? Couldn't been here long 'cause I would have heard of you, Skippy.
 Don't worry about Moonan. We got him covered. When...?  It was him. There's a shipment coming through tonight. Kennedy.
 Kennedy. International terminal. Gordo with a black suitcase. You got Moonan under control?
 Good boy.
 Something stupid.
 I don't know what you're into with the King Pin, but whatever it is we get a piece, understand? We get a big piece. If we find out you're keeping us out, I may suddenly develop a conscious and give you up to Moonan myself. Say something stupid if we got a deal, Jake.
 Wouldn't dream of it.
 Well he's in town and he sure as shit remembers you. What are we going to do about this Jake? We can't afford to have a Fed onto us.
 Oh yeah. Moonan. I remember now. Thanks.
 Ring it for him, Sobo.
 Gunther? I think I'd remember a Gunther.
 Special Agent Gunther Moonan. Ring a bell?
 Hey, listen... If you guys don't pay your taxes, that's your business.
 Tip was fine, Jake. We were a little more curious about the Fed.
 That tip not work-out for you fellas?
 Was that a threat? Did I hear a threat? Last I remember, we were talking economics, then this...? What happens next time if we gotta stop and help a little old lady cross the street? Well, shit... Then we gotta pass the call to someone else.
 All the shit we pulled with you and you're trying to shake us down? You guys got sack.
 Don't get me wrong, Jake. I like you boys. You guys are the steadiest business in town. But what can I say? Twenty percent's still better than what we give to any of the other criminals.
 Yeah Well, Sobo's kid needs braces.
 What are you talking about? Ten's standard.
 Sure.
 Thank you, sir. You know, I hope this isn't too much of an inconvenience, but if Carolyn is coming down for the weekend, perhaps I could give you something for her? It's a check. We split the cost on a few books and I haven't had the chance to pay her back yet. Could you..?
 Very much so.
 Take it from me, you never do. But congratulations. Nice to be married, isn't it?
 Thank you. Actually, it's our first anniversary this weekend. She thinks I'm here to pick up something for my mother, but it's actually a gift for her. Think I've fooled her?
 Attractive girl.
 My wife and I are just taking a little vacation.
 What brings you down from Boston, Jake? Taking advantage of the long weekend?
 Great. Thank you.
 Well, it certainly is a coincidence. Here of all places! How is Mrs. Lewis?
 Of course. Jake. Nice to see you.
 Jake. Jake Pearson. I go to lawschool with your daughter. Carolyn. We met once or twice.
 Sorry, I --
 What about this situation makes you think I can answer that question right now?
 What about... The money?
 Help me.
 What -- What do we do?
 LISTEN to me! We don't have much time. We can still get through this but you have to keep your head and trust me!
 Oh Jesus!
 Listen to me! It went to shit. It happens sometimes.
 I can't be here! You understand? I can't --
 I had to! That motherfucker was about to welch! You saw what he was doing, right? You heard him!
 Y-y-you fucking shot him! That's what happened!
 I lost my head. I'm... Sorry. I don't know what happened.
 No, I want my cut!
 What do you want? An apology?
 You tell them the "Tale".
 You sold me out. You should have trusted me like I trusted you. You fucked up. You fucked up HUGE.
 What do you get, Lily? Finder's Fee? Because it is all about the money, right?
 It's me. It's Jake. Listen... It's happening. Gordo's landing right now. Meet me at the Euclid... For your cut, I mean. It's... I want you to have it.
 You got my cell. Leave a message.
 Your friend, Big Al? It should have been you.
 Sorry. I didn't know...
 I'm going to say this one last time for you, so take a deep breath and count to ten. There is no cut.
 No, I want my cut!
 So there it is. You got that big itch you need to scratch. It's all about the fucking money. What do you want, an apology?
 What about the money?
 What about what?
 What about...
 There are three people I trust -- him, him and a guy who got killed. I don't know who you are! You're like some stray dog that wandered into the house. So I'm telling you to cut loose of this. No one's looking for you, Not the King, not Moonan and not Gillette. Just go wherever it is you would go. It's over.
 Everyone's working an angle, right?
 Hey, we fucked once, honey. That hardly makes you a good judge of character. And don't think I didn't know you were working some angle with that either.
 You are such a raving pussy sometimes.
 No, I'm not going to take it easy. You can't stay clear of this guy. He will be on this until the end of time.
 Jesus... Take it easy.
 You know why I told you that, Jake?  Because I trust you too.
 No. You trusted him... You were just getting square.
 I don't know. I packed up my shit and ran away. To this... So unlike you, I guess I do have something to prove, in a repressed anger sort of way.
 Did, uh... Did you kill him?
 After Glenn was finished, he gave me a couple of valiums and I went home. The next day, I finished my shift and met him around back, like we always did. I stuck a number eight scalpel into his chest. Three or four times.
 Lily... Jesus Christ...
 Shit, what was that guy's name? I really liked him.
 Then he grabbed me and threw me down on the floor, that really cold linoleum tiled hospital floor and started ripping my uniform off.  He said he was going to "fuck some sense into me."
 He was looking out for you.
 Sort of. I was telling him about this great love of my life who's name I don't remember, and I could see... He was getting pissed. I thought it was just because he was worried about me, but... He told me that I was stupid because my boyfriend didn't really love me.
 Glenn talked you out of it.
 No, we never got busted. We were done with a shift one night, both a couple of Percocets down and I was telling Glenn about my boyfriend, about how we were thinking about doing it, you know? I was thinking about letting him be my first because I loved him.  What the hell was his name?
 You guys got busted. This is a great neck.
 We were friends. I trusted him. I should have known it was weird. But, then again I was weird.
 Yeah, the sensitive guy-thing never worked for me.
 He wasn't my boyfriend. I had a boyfriend at the time... What was his name? Anyway, Glenn was like thirty. I was only fifteen. But he was a nice guy. Real sweet. Liked to talk. We used to get loaded on pills from the nurses station and then listen to Morrisey or some stupid shit like that.
 You want to talk about an old boyfriend right now?
 Not the way I did it. I was loaded half the time. I don't know how you could change bedpans sober. I used to hang out with this guy, Glenn. He was an x-ray technician or something.
 Sounds respectable.
 Who says you have to know the King to be in a hole? I actually did have a real job once. When I was in high school, I worked as a candy striper.
 I SAID, HOW DO --  Deal with that?
 WHAT?
 How do you deal with --
 Don't ruin this for me.
 You have really soft hands. Like a baby's.
 Intuition.
 How do you know I will?
 No. You have another part? You'll know what to do.
 So that was my part? Smile and shake my ass?
 Intuition. It doesn't make you Yoda. Like tonight. You killed that guy tonight. But I knew you would.
 It's more than that.
 I'm good at it. Lying, cheating, manipulating... I'm good at it.
 Whatever. But you... I get the feeling you could have bullshitted your way into anything. So why this?
 Good quality porn has it's place in the world.
 I'm your basic underachiever. Can't stand working and porn doesn't seem like a good option.
 Not in that repressed anger sort of way.
 Do you have something to prove?
 Are you asking me if I have something to prove?
 Why? Your mother not breast feed you or something?
 It's what I do. It's my job.
 I think you'd do it for free. You're almost drooling. You like the rush.
 For what? A couple hundred bucks?
 Look at you... You want to go.
 Off the record, I'm this close to cutting someone in on the action if it'd help.
 We're getting down to the wire. Apparently another company has a similar product in R&D right now. If they beat us to it...
 Did I miss something?
 What about this? Do you have any idea what this means? You've killed us. We're dead!
 You told me to change my hair!
 But the fucking Grand Poo-Bah of all jinxes? A bird in your house...
 Lighten up.
 You just put a mother of a jinx on us.
 Uh-huh.
 I gotta go get a haircut.
 Uh-huh.
 He's gone.
 Honey, this is Mr. Lewis. Carolyn Lewis's father. Mr. Lewis, this is my wife, Lily.
 Uh... Everything okay?
 Then show me how.
 I don't trust anyone.
 You're just going to have to trust me.
 We're going to rope this banker tomorrow and you gotta at least look classy, if not be classy. You gotta do this thing and I don't even know if you can.
 Why?
 And some new clothes.
 What?
 You need to get a haircut.
 It's just that I left my asshole decoder ring at home, so how do I know not to worry?
 Don't worry about it.
 What the hell's his problem?
 Hey, I got it! Take some mental notes. You just might learn something here.
 Mr. King, I think --
 Take a deep breath. You sound like you just broke up with your boyfriend or something.
 Hey, I'm not just along for the ride, so I don't want to hear any bullshit later about a smaller cut.
 I'll worry about Customs.
 What about Customs?
 Just play a part. A little acting.
 What do I have to do?
 You get an equal cut.
 No.  What's my cut?
 I just have a good feeling about you. Haven't you ever had someone say they had a good feeling about you before?
 Here's my deal -- Don't waste my time. What do you want me for anyway? You don't even know me.
 We had to see what your deal was. I'm just a little superstitious.
 Gee thanks. Now I don't have to find that bridge to jump off.
 Alright! Hold up. You win. You got the job.
 Oooh. Sassy. What do you care who feels me up, Jake? Unless it kinda gotcha going. Did it, Jake? Getcha going?
 We have work. It pays a lot. Unless you figure on getting rich lifting wallets while old guys feel you up.
 You're working Daffy's block. He was going to break your kneecaps. Pick- pockets can be so bitchy sometimes. I told him you were with us, so that's two you owe me.
 Says who?
 Take a deep breath and count to ten. It's not that kind of work. You're Lily, right?
 Sorry about your wallet, but if you think I'm going to suck dick over thirty seven dollars, a maxed out Visa and a bad fake I.D., you're fucking crazy.  Jake.
 You interested in a little work?
 That's not --
 We're not cops.
 What is this? You guys cops or something?
 Jake? Customs?
 And we got rid of the red head.
 And we got rid of the red head.
 Feeling lucky today, Miles. Found a penny -- Heads up. There was an empty cab right outside my building. We hit every green light.
 Do you even remember Al? Do you remember what he looked like sitting there?
 Escorts!
 No, no, no! Not this time. I am doing this for your own good! You guys have got to learn when to stop. You with the Armani! You with the hookers!
 There is no scam! I've got a fucking sign on my back! I can't leave town now and come back with a suitcase full of money. You get it? It's over. We walk.
 What do we do? We change the scam?
 But the best part was that he couldn't find Gordo! He was in the bathroom. So he finally goes in there, kicks in a stall door and starts yelling! And there's Gordo, pants at the ankles, holding a PC World Magazine!
 So this is our boss, right? He chases me and Miles out of his office and he's yelling and screaming, "You're fired! Your whole team's fired!" He starts looking for Lily, Lupus, Gordo --
 Where the hell is she?
 But if you wanna talk about bad luck...
 You sure?
 Him.
 Michelle Strigo. Loan officer.
 What you're looking for in a mark is someone who's weakness you can exploit.
 No, the corporate papers have to be legit. But you gotta score an I.D. A clean one. Talk to Suits. I gotta get us a Banker.
 Is it all fugasi?
 I'm getting clear of this. If you're not going to do it for the fucking principle, do it for the money. Gordo?
 Yeah, well we're still a little young for Albany State Prison. Are you pissed about Al? I'm pissed too, but I'm not like "twenty-five to life" pissed.
 We're getting a little old for running.
 What are you talking about? Yes we have. And we would have been beautiful about it. We would've had a bucket of chicken delivered to the King with a nice kiss my ass card attached to it. Then we woulda moved on 'til the next local putz caught on.
 Yeah, well we never had this kind of problem before.
 We never had a problem with that before.
 Then what do you want to do, Miles? Run?
 Yeah, or D, it's a dumb fucking idea...
 It never worked before because A, they didn't flush the bank enough; B, their corporate papers were for shit; C, they didn't have someone on the inside with Customs.
 Good point.
 I'm just thinking out loud here, but... Two million in a briefcase?
 What?
 Uh...
 Because that's who the King Pin wants us to fleece. And Gillette's perfect...
 Why?
 Breasts.
 What do we need another Shill for?
 No. Big con. One rag. One rag and we get out from under all this. But we need another Shill.
 Wait a second... Who's the mope?
 We're working for the King.
 Now you're an accomplice in a homicide. Everything you thought you were in control of just flew out the window or is dripping down your leg.
 You better hurry. The police will be here any second.  I don't really understand my motivation with this. Why am I washing glasses?
 I'm getting a ride.
 How do you know the King's going to let you walk?
 Meet me at my place later.
 Just mail it to the hospital.  Mr. King, please. It's regarding an accounting problem. Yes... Correct... I know where it is. That will be fine. Thank you.
 Do we want insurance?  I'm just asking...
 He'll find us. We go talk to him.
 Just an idea, but let's just fucking split. We'll meet up anywhere. Akron or Austin or Atlanta. Anywhere...
 It's bad luck.
 Sorry. I'm just... Look what they did to him. Right in the middle of his egg-foo-young.
 Miles...
 I was supposed to meet him for breakfast. He likes that new IHOP they just opened, you know... He likes to order that thing. The Rutti- Tutti-Fresh and Fruity thing they got.
 You better get over to Al's. Now.
 Yeah.
 You sure we're clear?
 Stop waving that thing around.
 My place.
 Then shut up.
 Your mess.
 If you wanna help, then help. If not, shut up.
 Tick-tock...
 This is embarrassing.
 I'm sorry.
 I know it's policy, but...  The thing is... It's our first anniversary and we're only in town for the weekend. It's a very, very special night for my wife and I. This ring is my gift to her and I think she's going to really love it. I can give you phone numbers to call for people who'll vouch. I can send you I.D. later...
 I'm sorry.
 I understand that, but I had my wallet stolen last night. Is there any way..?
 With identification.
 Thank you. Sorry, I'm just a little anxious to give it to her. You take out of state checks?
 That's no problem. We have those in stock.
 A ring for my wife. A lot like that one. In fact, it was that one.
 What was it?
 You're sure? This is... Just a complete disaster.
 I'm sorry. Nothing under Pearson.
 You know, this is kind of embarrassing, but my wallet was stolen yesterday and I'm afraid the ticket was in it. But the name's Pearson.
 Do you have a ticket?
 Excuse me? I believe you're holding something far me under Pearson.
 You were right. He's trying to fuck you. You want it, you gotta get it at the airport...
 And like in a game of chess, you've played every possible move in your head...
 HE GOT CAUGHT! Your boss tried to pull a switch and he got us all fucking pinched!
 Sorry. What?
 Eee Oott Auught!
 What happened?
 No offense, but I've seen you fight. You gotta be kidding m-
 Stand up.
 What?
 Egg Foo Young.  Stand up.
 That's what I like about you, Lupus. You're a free thinker. Don't let the King tell you different.
 You really like that bitch don't you? I gotta tell you, I was pretty convinced that the whole thing before was blowing her off for her cut. You know how it is, get her to do some shit for you, throw her a bang to keep her happy. But, if you're into her... That's cool.
 Keep it up.
 What's up with you? Bladder infection?
 That was fucking deep.
 Maybe he's got it right. Maybe we're all just looking for a safe place to shit.
 He's wheeling around two million dollars in cash and he wants to stop to use the bathroom. You believe this?
 You're a weasel.
 Let me ask you something... You really think I'm going to come this close, this fucking close and let my guard down? I'll get square with your boss. I'll get square with whoever did Al. I'll get square with everybody. Then I'm going going to cash in my chips and be on my way to a new and better me far away from here.
 So that's it, huh? You get the cops to give you a safe ride.
 Oh, you know... Don't fuck this up. I'll kill you. I'll kill your family. I'll shoot your dog... All the usual. Then he said good luck.
 What'd he say?
 Point is, you don't go through with this, he's going to go after you next. And he don't even like you, Jake.
 Point, Lupus. Give us a point.
 Your buddy. That fat guy. The King couldn't wait to have that guy whacked. He didn't even know who the guy was, but he was so pissed off at him, he gets him drilled. It ain't personal. It's business.
 My fucking heart bleeds.
 Exactly. 'Cept this Gillette guy. He gets to walk around in three piece suits, hob knob with the Mayor, own a bank, that kinda shit. Meanwhile, the King sits holed up in the steam, afraid to even take a leak without me or Harlin watching the door.
 Of what? They're both crooks.
 What I'm saying is, is that the King ain't gonna care. See he had a real thing with getting this Gillette guy, If you ask me I think he's jealous.
 Don't worry, I'll settle up with your boss. We haven't skipped town yet.
 King ain't gonna like this.
 I'll find the time.
 You going to have the time?
 When this is all over, you're going to tell me who the King put on Al.
 Okay. Here's the thing... You fall flat, you might not get anything short of stiffed. Then it's Blue River Land for everybody. Papers like these are dangerous because papers tend to multiply, then they start to take shape. Usually it's the shape of an arrow. I hate to do it, but after this, I gotta give you the blowoff. We Jake, Jake?
 Can't do it Suits. I can't lay down for this one.
 Still time.
 Then I gotta say, in my opinion, you can't get what you want.
 I want to get out from under all this for good. And I want to fuck them all doing it.
 So what do you want?
 It's not history.
 I don't doubt your talent. You looking for that place in the hall of fame?
 I can handle it.
 The King? Jake, you play the heavy rackets like that... They put the lug on for nothing at all.
 The King.
 Then who's the Banker?
 Can't say.
 I saw you go up from the Knecker, working that Grind, learning the Barnard's Law and I thought, "the kid's a prodigy." But I know that if you're using these goods... So then I figure, what's worth that? You're either looking for a little history or a retirement fund. Who's the Mark?
 Hey, I been on the ramp all my life, so I got no problem with the way you help yourself, Jake.
 A little bit of both.
 Try and keep up... You ask for the Advantage Goods, then you guys come in looking to be Bean Traps. So I gotta think you're either working the mace or playing the Jug Mob.
 Huh? Oh. She's alright.
 Can I speak to you in confidence?
 Pretty much.
 In over your head?
 Pretty much.
 Not easy pickin's. Papers like these speak to larger issues. Sorry about Alfonse.  You into something big?
 Aces, Suits.
 What are we gonna do with this stuff anyway? Heroin? What the hell do you do with heroin?
 Just a tip.
 I try.
 The King, huh? Nice going.
 We got a good thing going here. You want to blow it over an overbite?
 Do you have any idea what those monks charge for that medieval torture?
 Confidence. It's just confidence.
 You guys got sack, I'll give you that much.
 Ten percent.
 Good. Good. Do not let Vig out of your sight.
 I got it figured out... He's got this thing with bathrooms. If he makes it through Customs, he'll be heading for the john.
 So do half the other people in this place. How do I know which one?
 He's landing. He's got a suitcase on wheels.
 Speak.
 I don't think so. Their Fix gave us the heads up and Jake's got a plan that'll probably keep him off.
 A Fed? Is he close?
 Coupla things. They got this Fed looking around and the girl just split.
 Consider him part of your crew. Consider him a part of me.
 What?
 We're here.
 You guys awake?
 Let's just say he burned me once.
 I think so. What'd he ever do to you anyway?
 Did he buy it?
 Look, I'm not a confrontational person by nature.
 Like we told you before, we think he's into something with the King Pin --
 I want him for something big and to do that, we have to catch him in the act.
 If you Feds are so hot for him, why don't we just bring him in right now?
 Look Special Agent Moonan... We don't know what you're talking about.
 Preliminary forensics suggests he was sitting there, bloated and purple in his egg foo young for at least seventy two hours. Alfonse was not a small man and there was a lot of food ordered, so you can imagine the smell. Bad for the neighbors, good for me because in all the time I've been looking for Jake, this is only the second time I've even gotten a whiff of him.
 You are Officer Richard Rottovich. And this would be Officer Walter Sobozinski. I'm looking for Jake Vig.
 Special Agent?
 Roger that.
 He's headed towards the eastern most exit. Do not, under any circumstances approach. I want to follow this all the way down to Vig.
 You guy's are not working with me here. I just got off the phone with my boss. After he got done ripping me a new Lincoln Tunnel size asshole, he let me know exactly how little I'm welcome back if we come up short. And now here you guys are, WASTING MY FUCKING TIME!
 Whaddya mean? We got dick.
 Good... I gotta go.  So, what do you have for me?
 Literally. It's not a bad deal, gentleman. I get peace of mind. You get Detective Sheilds. But this is the best part, Walter... Walter, your daughter will get to keep her braces and have that winning smile. Capice?
 This guy must have been a real pain in your dick.
 Not everyone's on the take, Walter.
 That's it?
 Peace of mind.
 What do you get out of it?
 You help me catch him. Whatever he's into next, I want you to be into. And what you're into, I'm into. If it all goes well, those two guys from IAD will never have to hear this tape. I'll clear you guys of anything you've ever done with Vig under the guise of some cross- departmental investigation. This prick's been on the wish list for so long, you'll probably get gold shields out of it.
 What do you want?
 Do you want to know the first time I had a line on Vig? He sent me a birthday card.  Belated, but it's the thought, right? Oh, this prick's got a sense of humor. But, then again you guys probably know him better than I do. In fact, I've only met the guy once. But now, now I have you. The next best thing. His partners. His "Fix."
 I've been looking for this Jake Vig for some time now. Problem is, the guy's the invisible man. A spook, a spectre, a ghost. Then, like a gift, Jake's good buddy and member of his crew, Alfonse Moorely, is found the other day with a hole in his head.
 Who?
 Put your hand down. I don't high five.
 High five.
 What are you doing?
 I'm down!
 That's what I'm talking about.
 It's just insurance.
 I don't trust anybody. You see how bad this guy wants Vig? It's like a sickness. I say we collar Vig ourselves. We got Vig, then we got leverage. And we trade; Vig for that tape. I want to see it right in front of my face.
 You trust this Moonan guy?
 Whoa, whoa... There he is.
 Bullshit it's cosmetic! My fucking tooth was cracked in half. I made the son of a bitch write it in as a cavity. The department's dental is for shit.
 It's cosmetic. They don't cover cosmetic. Last year I had a tooth capped. The dentist tells me I'm not covered for caps. It's cosmetic.
 Hope so. Those fucking orthodontist bills are killing me. One fifty every time they tighten those bitches up. One fifty! It's not even covered.
 What's he going to do? File a missing drugs report? If it works out, this guy might be good for a few more turns.
 You think this is a good idea? We never did this kinda shit before.
 Don't be an idiot. How hard do you think it is to sell one drug dealer's drugs to another drug dealer? If Vig's right, we might be looking at a hundred, maybe a hundred fifty grand...
 To who?
 You sell it.
 A couple I know are getting married.
 What are you laughing at? Who was that on the phone?
 You're all scumbags.
 Look Bella, I don't know anything about this. You should talk to Matt.
 Your boyfriend fucked me, smoked my dope, then shopped me. What do you think of that? I can't get a job now.  You bastard. You're no different from Matt. A pair of vicious little shits, that's what you are.
 I don't know anything about it.
 Reynolds got a doctor in. They forced me to take a dope test. It was positive. As you knew.
 What are you talking about?
 You fucking little shit! You shopped me.
 Sorry.
 Ouch.
 Now he's a real shit. Don't get friendly with him. I'm sure he's got his hand in the till. You know what he said to me once? "I want to fuck the whole world over. That's my mission." The shit!
 Not like Matt, you mean.
 Look, now I'm pumping you. I'm sorry. It's none of my business. It's just that you're not like the others.
 The Indian rope-trick.
 Ah, we all say that. But if we hate it, why do we do it?
 I despise the job.
 I've been watching you work. You're the best in the place. But you know that.
 Well it is. But I know where I am.
 You called the casino a cesspit.
 Can you? I'm happy being a dealer. At least the punters keep their hands to themselves.
 I can imagine.
 I got scared.
 Why did you quit?
 But don't worry, I'm clean as a whistle. I only did S & M.  No blow jobs. No screwing.
 All men are cheats.
 I hate cheats.
 It's the tension.
 You're shaking.
 Goodnight.
 I'll take you up on that.
 Maybe another time.
 My car's in the garage.
 No. Thanks.
 Jack. Do you need a ride?
 How do I look?
 Is it that bad?
 Hi, Jack.  Welcome to the cesspit.
 Jack Manfred.
 I'm Bella.
 Seven-fifty.
 Eight-fifty.
 I'm not a mathematician. I'm in business.
 Is that your idea of arithmetic?
 How about we split the diff... Seven-fifty.
 What?!
 How about five hundred.
 How about fifteen hundred?
 That's not relevant. An old car like this, it depends on the condition.
 What's the Blue Book price?
 What kind of deal you looking to?
 You said it was going to be social, Giles. No business.
 How's that football story corning along?
 Not entirely.
 A bit unexpected, wasn't it?
 She had to leave early. She asked me to thank you.
 And your lady?
 Not particularly.
 Good night?
 Good God, no. But with skill like that, what do you want a job for? You don't need to work.
 Get what?  Are you accusing me of cheating?
 I get it.
 Hey. I've got an idea. Why don't we...
 Last hand.
 It's nothing to do with money. I don't gamble.
 Don't be a spoilsport. It's only a few quid.
 I don't gamble.
 She.
 Who was he?
 I found her in bed with someone.
 South African women are very sporty.
 She's a dab hand With a racquet, your friend.
 Looking forward!
 I'll try and make it.
 Jack, look, next weekend I'm having a house party. Here...  It's near Oxford. Why don't you come? It'll just be social. No business.  Bring a friend. I've plenty of room.
 My author. He's a Terrorist. He's written a kill-and-tell book.  Take care.
 Habib?
 Right.  Look, I must get back to Habib.
 I'm working on that soccer story.
 I thought it was you. It's the hair!
 We do. For unsolicited manuscripts. We pay twenty pounds a manuscript. You might get two, maybe three in a week. Can you live on sixty pounds?
 I was thinking perhaps I could be a reader. You employ readers, don't you?
 All right. As what?
 I want a job, Giles.
 Hi-ya... I'll call you back.  Now then...
 We all played the field.
 Did she?  You were pretty thick at one time.
 She went back to South Africa.
 What a memory you've got. Maths always was your strong suit. What happened to the moaning Lisa?
 Three years, two months. March '93.
 How can anyone be that naive?
 I want to buy a car.
 What?
 I hate public transport.
 Why did you take the money?
 You're already alone.
 Leave me alone, Marion.
 Here...use a spoon.
 Give up being a croupier, Jack. Or I'll shop you. All you have to do is keep your word. It's that simple.
 Then what?
 Nothing about you.
 Marion!  What did you tell the police?
 It's probably easier for you to eat the rice.
 There was a message, wasn't there?
 I don't want a criminal for a boyfriend.
 I thought you wouldn't want to spend Christmas Day alone in here.
 How did you know I was here?
 Gambling's about not facing reality. Ignoring the odds.
 Really?
 Gambling's not about money.
 I can just imagine, being around so much money all the time...
 Never. Why do you ask?
 Aren't you ever tempted to gamble?
 Not talking. Writing.
 You were talking in your sleep.
 What?
 Within a month. Believe me, I'm going to quit!
 You will?
 I'll leave the casino soon.  I promise.
 It's none of my business what you write. And your job, that's none of my business either. I love you. And I've done everything wrong.
 You're entitled to your opinion.
 -- I don't care about her. Of course, I was angry. But not with you. The book is yours not mine. I was wrong, what I said about it. I hurt you, didn't I?
 That girl, she works at the casino --
 It will.
 I hope it brings you luck.
 It's beautiful. Thank you.
 No. Answer it!
 Leave it.
 The door, Jack.
 Crap. It's not relative. It's unfair. Like your casino. It's designed unfair. And your croupier's a little shit because he goes along with it.
 Now wait a minute. What's so hopeful about your job? Spending the day catching poor people stealing. You said yourself the organised gangs get away with it. At least in the casino everybody gets caught. Rich or poor, the odds are the same. It's all relative.
 Without hope there's no point to anything.
 It's the truth.
 Oh really. Then why is he called Jake. Why don't you come clean and call him Jack.  There's no hope in it.
 Marion. It's a book.
 I don't give a fuck about the sex. Most men'll fuck a lamppost. He's just a miserable zombie. Is that the way you feel now? Is that what's happened to you?
 -- It's because of the sex, isn't it? You don't like the sex in it.
 Is that your idea of a winner? He doesn't give a shit about anyone. He uses people and --
 He was a loser. This guy's a croupier. He can't lose. People have shat on him all his life. Now he's in control. He's a winner.
 I don't like it at all. You had a wonderful character before, the Gambler. He was so romantic.
 Why not?
 I don't like it.
 Well, that's our life now, isn't it?
 I'm on at nine.
 I don't finish till eight. Make it nine and you're on.
 What about a drink on the way home?
 What are you doing here?  You know the rules.
 Haven't you got a conscience of your own?
 You're my conscience.
 What do I mean to you? I want to know. Tell me.
 Marion, stop this.
 Well, that's my poor upbringing. I didn't go to no private school. I haven't got no class. I want to live with a writer. Not a fucking croupier. I don't even know what the word means. Croupier.
 Do you have to swear all the time?
 This fucking job's getting to you. You haven't written a fucking word since you started.
 Probably.
 Are you drunk?
 I take it back. You're not a cop any more. You're a store detective.
 Take that back!  Fucking take that back. I'm not a cop any more.
 Don't play the cop with me, Marion.
 Where've you been? I've got to give evidence in court at nine.
 I'll see you in my dreams.
 When you get home, I'm asleep. When I leave home, you're asleep.
 It's only hair. I haven't changed.
 I loved it blond.
 Poor baby.  This'll relax you.
 Tension. It'll go.
 You're shaking. What is it?
 Fine.
 How did it go?
 I don't know.
 What's the time?
 You've got such beautiful hands.
 Are you trying to read my palm?
 I love you Jack, you know that.
 There's no third thing. Don't be superstitious.
 You sold the car. You got a job. What's the third thing? Tell me.
 I start Monday week.
 You were a croupier there? You never told me that. I thought you just knew some gamblers.
 I had training. In the Republic.
 450? What did you do, just walked in and said I want to be a croupier? Don't you need training?
 It came my way. 450 a week.
 How did you land that?
 In a casino. As a croupier. A dealer.
 What job?
 I've got a job.
 I want to hear it.
 I've got something to tell you.
 You're my prisoner.
 Of course they will. You just have to be patient. I'm betting on you.
 Come on, Marion. Let's face the truth. Nobody's going to publish it.
 Take it back. Till you sell your book.
 I owe you for the rent. It's only a car. I can get another.
 You shouldn't have done that. I know what it meant to you.
 I. sold the car.
 Where did you get it?
 Turn around.
 It's not just inner beauty, is it?
 You really are a beautiful woman.
 I won't be that long.
 You want me drunk?
 No, no. I'm not ready for you. There's some vodka in the freezer.
 You mean I won't resist them.
 I couldn't resist them.
 I won't.  Goodbye, dad.
 Don't let yourself down.
 Yes, I know that.
 Great. I've just started a new company. Solid financing. It's good.  I love you Jacko, you know that
 So how are you doing, dad?
 All right, dad. Yes, I'll call him.
 For Christ's sake, Jacko, don't look a gift horse in the mouth. Have you written that name down? Reynolds, at the Golden Lion.
 I've set this up for you. Call the Golden Lion and ask for Mr Reynolds, he's the Manager. I don't know him personally, but I've spoken to his boss. Don't say no, Jacko. Give yourself a break.
 It's not that.
 Don't be stubborn. The pay won't be grand, but it's regular. That's what you need, isn't it? I know you don't like taking my advice...
 Well I've got something for you. In London, I mean. I've been chatting to some friends. Do you know the Golden Lion casino? It's in Bayswater, I believe... They're looking for a dealer, a croupier.
 No.
 Found a job?
 Great.
 Yes. I'm all over that now. Jack, hold on a minute. There's someone here who wants to talk to you...
 Did you solve your problems?
 Great. I'm getting married. At least, I think I am.
 How are you?
 Sun City. I've been meaning to call you for months.
 Jani! Where are you?
 Jack! It's Jani.
 Hello...
 It's a shame there aren't more men in the world like you.
 I don't think we should meet again.
 No thank you.
 Would you like a drink?
 I took the bandage off yesterday.
 And your hand too.
 I've still got mine.
 Bruise?  Oh, yes. It's better.
 That bruise has cleared up nicely.
 The date's not set yet. I'll call you. One last thing: the man you're going to catch cheating, he may get violent. But you know how to deal with cheats.
 Yes.
 Do you?
 It's all relative.  I need the money too.
 Well, life's not fair. We know that.
 It doesn't seem fair. You're offering me ten grand in cash but you can't afford a decent place.
 Thank you.
 Yes.
 Is it yes?
 I have to take the car.
 What for?
 I'm sorry.
 I told you, all bets are off.
 Did they tell you to sleep with me?
 Let it go.
 How much do you owe?
 No, forget it. The bet's off.
 Wait a minute...
 I want you to forget what I said.
 I'm asking you, as a...friend. You'd be saving the life of a friend.
 I can't do it, Jani.
 I want to go back to Cape Town, I want to start again, clean.
 What about my neck?
 Next time it'll be my neck.
 Reynolds? You've done your research.
 These people will pay you ten thousand before and ten thousand after. They want someone they can be sure of, an honest dealer. That's the point. Not all dealers are honest. Mr Reynolds will never suspect you.
 What ten thousand pounds?
 You keep the ten thousand pounds.
 But if it does.
 It won't.
 What'll you do when it all goes wrong?
 I've come to know you. You're honest.  I trust you.
 And I thought you were only after my body.
 You won't be committing a crime. The man will cheat, you'll just be doing your job, that's all.
 You're serious.
 You don't have to be criminal. A man will come up to your table and deliberately cheat. You'll see him, stop him, and the guy will make a big scene. There'll be chaos. And that's when it'll happen.
 Robbery's not criminal?
 Just listen. You don't have to do anything criminal.
 And I thought you were a bright woman.
 The point is, they want a man inside.
 Forget it, Jani. It'll never work.
 My creditors. One night, around three in the morning, they'll come into the casino -
 Who's they?
 They mean it.
 Some people I know, they're planning to rob The Golden Lion.
 I don't have any money.  switches on the light. JANI is looking distressed.
 I know that. But you can now.
 Was that why you did the two grand? I couldn't help you.
 I owe a lot of money.
 What kind of trouble?
 I'm in trouble.
 Then you're not a pro.
 I didn't.
 It can only work with amateurs, A pro would have spotted it.
 That trick tonight, I don't think I've ever seen that before.
 You choose.
 Which side do you like?
 You don't like cheats, do you.
 Remember the guy who cheated at the table?
 What happened?
 I'll watch.
 He doesn't gamble.
 That's fine.
 Jani, there's something I want to say. Before we get there. I don't know what the sleeping arrangements are. Giles probably expects us to share a room.
 Turn left ahead.
 Just an accident. Nothing.
 How did you hurt your hand?
 I don't gamble.
 Toss you for it.
 Absolutely not.
 I'm not married. I wear it to keep the flies off.  I must go. Let me pay for this.
 Absolutely not. But then, I'm a Gemini and Geminis don't believe in astrology.
 Do you believe in astrology?
 We all came from Africa, supposedly.
 That's Africa. There's an African in all of us, isn't there?
 And superstitious too. It's like witchcraft.
 And the lies. Gamblers are born liars.
 The debts.
 I loved the atmosphere. But it destroyed my poor mother.
 Your father?
 Now there's a coincidence. My father used to gamble there.
 In the casino.
 Near the casino.
 I was born in the Transkei, on the Wild Coast.
 No, no. I come every couple of years. I always think I'm going to stay. I'm from Cape Town originally
 First visit to London?
 I was at a loose end. A friend of a friend gave me a courtesy membership.
 So why did you come to my casino?
 I'm not much of a gambler really. I just like this bar.
 There's a casino in this hotel.
 To coincidence.
 Impossible to calculate.
 That's stupid. What are the odds of you being seen with me?
 It's against the rules. Dealers are forbidden to talk to punters.
 You know what? I'd like to buy you a drink.
 Oh hello.
 Well, thank you anyway.
 I've lived there.
 You know where I'm from?
 I'm sorry, madam, we don't accept gratuities in the UK. It's different in South Africa.
 I know a cheat when I see one. The man was a cheat.
 You did?
 Of course I recognised him!
 Who did it? Tell me!
 Ross.
 Who...
 Detective Inspector Ross.
 Turn left at the lights.
 Where to?
 Too much. Eighteen hundred.
 Nice car. How much did you pay for it?
 I might.
 Are you going to put a spell on me?
 I'm a witch. A white witch. Why don't we move on?
 And what do you do, Lucy?
 I'm Lucy.
 Have I?
 You've been avoiding me.
 Cheers. Happy New Year. I really like you, Jacko, you're so fucking straight.  Hey, you haven't changed your clothes!
 I'd like to buy you a drink.
 What? You know what happened to me, don't you? That bitch Bella shopped me. I'd like to beat the shit out of her.
 I'll tell you later.
 What happened to Bella?
 Rough life, Jack.
 Rough day?
 Don't worry.
 I can't give you a lift back tonight.
 "The world breaks everyone, and afterwards many are strong in the broken places." Ernest Hemingway.
 Loosen up, Jack. If you don't, this job'll get to you. The pressure's too much, believe me, it'll break you.
 I'm off. I need to sleep.
 I don't gamble.
 Don't worry, I won't report you!
 No thanks.
 Hey Jack, join us.
 That bitch? No.
 Does Bella come here?
 Good call. Help yourself.
 Vodka. Straight. On the rocks.
 Just girls. What are you drinking?
 And the girls?
 Mostly people in the casino business. A few drug dealers.
 Who are these guys?
 I don't know what that means. I'm talking about not rocking the boat.
 You're talking about complicity.
 So it's Mr Clean. Wise up, Jack, this whole business is bent. The casino is nothing but legal theft. And that's OK. It's the system. Half the punters who come in are using stolen money, drug money, they haven't earned it. We earn our money.  I'm on your side, Jack. I don't need an enemy.
 Because if a supervisor knew I'd seen you and I hadn't reported it, I'd lose my job as well. And I can't afford that.
 I don't get you. Even if it was true, which it isn't, what the fuck difference would it make to you?
 If I see you do it again, I'll report it.
 What are you, a cop?
 I'm not going to report it.
 I don't cheat, Jack. You've got it wrong.
 That Greek guy who won at the end. You paid him out in 25s not 20s.
 What the fuck are you talking about?
 Look Matt, there's something I have to say to you. I saw you cheating.
 Some other time.
 I'll lay you five to one you won't sleep. In this job you have to unwind. Otherwise it'll kill you. I mean that.
 No thanks, Matt. I need my eight hours.
 I'm off to a little watering hole. Why don't you join me? Relax.
 Not bad. I have other interests, of course.
 You've done pretty well.
 Coming up to two years now.  But I was away for six months.
 How long have you worked at the casino?
 She's my baby.
 Nice car.
 So how do you feel, your first night? I'll bet you're on a high.
 Thanks.
 I'm going over the river. I'll give you a lift if you like.
 Have you got transport?
 Over the river.
 Where do you live, Jack?
 It was you, you shit.
 Wait a minute. You got yourself barred.
 You don't recognise me? You had me barred. You fucking little worm.
 I'm afraid that's not so, sir.
 I put them on together.
 You've won with the two chips you placed earlier, but the third chip was a late bet.
 What are you talking about? It's 11, I've won. With this lady.
 I'm sorry, sir, that's a late bet.
 Take your time. Two weeks. Three if you need it. We'll pay you sick leave. I don't want to lose you. You're a good man. Here...
 Bruised.
 How do you feel, Jack?
 She was a real asset. But what could I do?
 A pleasure. Pity about Bella.
 Thanks for the information.
 I can see.
 He's paying out in stacks of 25.
 He's a good customer.
 Does he win?
 Mr Tchai always likes to play at that table, and only with Bella.
 All right, Mr Reynolds.
 Why don't you take a break, Jack.
 Jack, you're not the usual type we get here.
 I just want the job.
 Fine.
 That hair will have to go.
 Fine.
 You can start Monday week.
 We have tapes in here that go back six months. Let me show you something.
 Very impressive.
 This is our Crow's Nest. I'm showing it to you now, but you'll never see it again.
 No.
 She's not in the gaming business is she?
 Yes.
 Girlfriend?
 First offence: verbal warning. Second offence: written warning. That one's filed and sometimes copied to the Gaming Board. My discretion. Third offence: you're sacked on the spot. You'd never work in a casino in this country again.  There's another rule: you're forbidden to talk to or recognise a punter outside the casino. If you see someone who's gambled here, even if it's just casually on the street, you must ignore him. Or her. You're not married, are you?
 How?
 We'd know. There are no secrets in this casino. You'd be punished.
 Does know? Or does report? What would happen if I knew something like that and didn't report it?
 This isn't South Africa. We'd know, because someone would report it. Believe me, someone always does.
 We had the same rule at Sun City, but it was impossible to check.
 Next point. Friendships between croupiers inside or outside the casino are discouraged. Relationships with females working here are expressly forbidden.
 I don't gamble, Mr Reynolds.
 Ever?
 I don't gamble.
 For the database. It can be accessed by every casino in the country. We have the same system for punters.
 What for?
 Let me just run through a few things. As a dealer you never gamble, not anywhere. We'll need your picture.
 I said good call.
 You want me to check?
 Good call.
 It's a rule. Always stand by your first count. The odds are you're right.
 What makes you so sure?
 Five.
 I make it six.
 Five.
 How many aces are left?
 You won't. Not without permission.
 What happens if I want to sneeze?
 Not with your own cloth. Besides, your pockets will be stitched.
 Wipe your hands.
 I don't think so.
 Haven't you forgotten something?
 They've been tested.
 Where's the magnet?
 We do.
 You use two alternating, don't you?
 Give me 365.
 25 pounds or 25 pence in fours.
 Any exceptions?
 Stacks of 20. Rows of 5.
 It's the procedure here. Now sort the chips.
 Why four? And not three or five?
 We check every four days.
 I have to assume the serial numbers on the bowl and cylinder correspond.
 We tried. But there wasn't enough business. The punters like company.
 Do you have a Salon Prive?
 There are three types of casino in the U.K. High volume. Small faction. And MOTR. That's middle of the road. Us.
 I don't think I know that one. Private, I suppose.
 I was at Beadles.
 Where did you go to school?
 No.
 In any case, I understand you've had some previous experience... in South Africa.  You'll find the rules a little different here. Before we start, you haven't got a police record, have you?
 Has he?
 You've been recommended by the management here. They know your father. He has a bit of a reputation, hasn't he?
 Jack.
 David Reynolds, I'm the Manager here. Sit down, John.
 Yoo hoo, bomb...
 What the hell?
 It's Talby. He's drifting away from the ship without his jetpack.
 What was that, I didn't hear...
 Doolittle, are you there?
 We've got to disarm the bomb.
 Boiler, we're alive. My heart.
 It didn't go off.
 Oh, God...
 It didn't go off.
 We're gonna die, Boiler. We're gonna die.
 Where is the key?
 Christ, twenty seconds, Christ!
 The key, goddamit, the key!
 You must have it, you idiot, we can stop the bomb!
 I don't have it. I don't know where it is.
 Where is it? What did you do with it?
 The key!
 Where's the fail-safe key?
 Key?
 No, no, the key, the key to the fail- safe lock!
 Key? Key? What is the key?
 The key!
 I think he's talking to it.
 What's he doin'?
 Look, bomb...
 I can tell, the damn thing just doesn't understand.
 Eventual supernova.
 There she is. Definite 99%-plus probability that the planet is going to deviate from its normal orbit in another twelve thousand rotations. It'll spiral in toward its sun, and --
 Remember when the artificial gravity, went out in the toilet?
 Yeah.
 I hope it's not the oven again.
 I'm not sure. I think something is fucked up somewhere in the ship, though.
 Oh. What's wrong now?
 The one on unit... oh, I think it's GMR twelve zero zero.
 What flickering light?
 I'm getting this flickering light on one of my panels.
 I read that with a quantum increase of seven.
 Ninety seven million, minus eight, corrected to mass critical.
 Right, that checks out here.
 I have a reduced drive reading of seven thousand.
 Talby, can you read me?
 Can you beat that? I always knew Talby was weird.
 Talby, Talby, can you read me?
 -- open quantum latches --
 Rechannel all safety relays --
 I read the same here.
 Quantum is up thirty-five.
 He just likes it up in the dome, that's all.
 Why doesn't Talby ever eat down here with the rest of us?
 Pinback, throw me the chart log.
 Sounds good. Chart a course for the Veil Nebula.
 Hey, Doolittle, here's one. An unstable planet. 85% probability of an unstable planet in the Veil Nebula that will probably go off its orbit and hit a star.
 So don't give me any of that sentient life crap. Find me something I can blow up.
 All right, then...
 Remember what we found? Fourteen light years for a fucking mindless vegetable that looked like a limp balloon and went squawk and let a fart when you touched it. Remember?
 Well, there's the possibility of...
 It's a goddamn wild goose chase. Remember when Commander Powell found that 99 plus probability of sentient life in the Magellanic Cloud?
 Well, it is kind of a long shot...
 Fuck that shit.
 Well, I show a 95% probability of sentient life in the Horsehead Nebula...
 Find me something, I don't care where it is.
 Not much. Nothing at all in this sector.
 Well... now what? What do, you have for us now. Boiler?
 Time to start talking.
 Pinback, I have a computer reading of nine five seven seven.
 Begin main sequence. Mark at 10-9-8- 7-6-5-4-3-2-1-drop.
 Thanks.
 Well, then, everything sounds fine. We'll drop you off in thirty-five seconds. Good luck.
 Armed.
 Arm yourself, bomb.
 Check at six minutes.
 All right, I have detonation time at... Wait a minute, something's wrong with the clock.  All right, I have detonation time at... no, that can't be right, it says three years.  Okay, I have six minutes exactly. Does that check out down there?
 Detonation in six minutes, twenty seconds.
 Swell. Let's synchronize detonation time. Do you know when you're supposed to go off?
 Energy shielding positive function.
 Well, bomb, we have about sixty seconds to drop. Just wondering if everything is all right. Have you checked your platinum euridium energy shielding?
 And I saw that I was alone.
 Hey, bomb...
 In the beginning there was darkness, and the darkness was without form and void.
 Snap out of it, bomb.
 Bomb?
 The only thing which exists is myself.
 Hey, bomb.
 False data can act only as a distraction. Therefore. I shall refuse to perceive you.
 Hello, bomb.
 Therefore, I shall ignore you.
 Huh?
 You are false data.
 No.
 You won't consider another course of action, for instance just waiting around awhile so we can disarm you?
 I am programmed to detonate in nine minutes. Detonation will occur at the programmed time.
 But you can't explode in the bomb bay. It's foolish. You'll kill us all. There's no reason for it.
 Thanks.
 Everything sounds fine, bomb. Dropping you off in sixty seconds. Good luck.
 Armed.
 Right, that synchronizes here. Okay, bomb, arm yourself.
 Detonation in twenty minutes.
 Do you remember the detonation time?
 Energy shielding positive function.
 One hundred twenty seconds to drop, bomb, have you checked your platinum euridium energy shielding?
 Bomb #20 to Sergeant Pinback. Roger, I read you, continue.
 Fail safe in lock. Four minutes to drop, 22 minutes to detonation. This is Sergeant Pinback calling Bomb #20. Do you read me, bomb?
 You have no proof that it was correct data.
 I have no proof that it was false data.
 ...you may be doing so on the basis of false data.
 ...nine seconds...
 So if you detonate in...
 Hmmm...
 That's all beside the point. The concepts are valid, wherever they originate.
 True, but since this is so, I have no proof that you are really telling me all this.
 Yes, of course you remember it, but what you are remembering is merely a series of electrical impulses which you now realize have no necessary connection with outside reality.
 I recall distinctly the detonation order. My memory is good on matters like these.
 So you have no absolute proof that Sergeant Pinback ordered you to detonate.
 Yes, well...
 Well then, you've already admitted that you have no real proof of the existence of the outside universe.
 Of course not.
 And you wouldn't want to explode on the basis of false data, would you?
 That is correct.
 And you can only do it once, right?
 To explode, of course.
 Now, bomb, consider this next question, very carefully. What is your one purpose in life?
 Because I must detonate in seventy- five seconds.
 Why don't you have more time?
 Intriguing. I wish I had more time to discuss this matter.
 That's it.
 Why, that would mean... I really don't know what the outside universe is like at all, for certain.
 Exactly.
 In other words, all I really know about the outside universe relayed to me through my electrical connections.
 What I'm getting at is this: the only experience that is directly available to you is your sensory data. And this data is merely a stream of  electrical impulses which stimulate your computing center.
 All right now, here's the big question: how do you know that the evidence your sensory apparatus reveals to you is correct?
 This is fun.
 Right!
 My sensory apparatus reveals it to me.
 That's good. Very good. Now then, how do you know that anything else exists?
 Hmm... Well, I think, therefore I am.
 Intuition is no proof. What concrete evidence do you have of your own existence?
 It is intuitively obvious.
 But how do you know you exist?
 Well of course I exist.
 Fine. Think about this one, then: how do you know you exist?
 I am always receptive to suggestions.
 Are you willing to entertain a few concepts?
 Of course.
 Hello, bomb, are you with me?
 I read you, Lieutenant Doolittle, but I am programmed to detonate in fourteen minutes. Detonation will occur at the programmed time.
 Bomb, this is Doolittle. You are not to detonate, repeat, you are not to detonate in the bomb bay. Disarm yourself. This is an order.
 I am programmed to detonate in fourteen minutes thirty seconds. Detonation will occur at the programmed time.
 This is Lieutenant Doolittle calling Bomb #20. I repeat previous order, you are to disarm yourself and return immediately to the bomb bay. Do you understand?
 Talby was in the air lock. You blew him out of the ship. I'm going after him. Turn on his helmet radio so I can contact him.
 Yeah, Doolittle. What's up?
 Hello, Pinback, are you there?
 Oh, sure.
 I'm coming in now. I'm down by the Emergency Air Lock. Too much trouble to come in the Ventral Lock. Would you blow the seal on the emergency hatch so I can come in?
 5-4-3-2-1-drop, drop, drop!
 -- Remark.
 -- automatic channels open --
 -- remove thrust drive repellant --
 -- open circuit breakers --
 Ah, negative drop.
 Mark at 5-4-3-2-1-drop.
 Who cares?
 Veil nebula.
 Out where?
 Hey, Doolittle, think we'll ever find real intelligent life out there?
 I hereby name this star Fred.
 Wha?
 Fred.
 Come on, Doolittle, give it a name.
 Commander Powell is dead.
 Commander Powell would have named it.
 Who cares. Don't bother me.
 The new star. What are you gonna name it?
 What?
 What are you gonna name it?
 Naah. All stable.
 Any of 'em any good?
 Yeah. Eight, it says here.
 Any planets?
 Another unknown. Not on the charts. A red dwarf.
 Which one?
 New star.  Hey, guess what? I got a new star on the readout.
 Boiler, can you set me up with some temp figures?
 In a second.
 I need a computer reading on a fail- safe mark.
 Yes.
 Doolittle...
 Your GHF reading is minus fifteen.
 Yes, Doolittle.
 Pinback...
 I'll check it.
 I need a GHF reading on the gravity correction.
 I said I'm trying to reach Talby. Something's wrong with the damn intercom. I need a last-minute diameter approximation.
 Ah, what was that again, I still can't hear you?
 Mafhkin oble groop...
 Ah, what'd you say, Pinback?
 I really liked you too, Talby. Hey, some debris from the ship! It's coming right by me.
 Before we get too far away, and our signals start to fade, I just wanted to tell you... you were my favorite. I really liked you, Doolittle.
 Yeah?
 I'm going into them, I'm going to hit them. Doolittle...
 No kidding?
 It is, Doolittle, it's the Phoenix! They glow with all the colors of the rainbow, just like everybody said.
 Phoenix?
 Doolittle... I think it's the Phoenix Asteroids!
 Oh yeah?
 Guess you're right.
 When you fall, Doolittle, if there's anyone down there on the planet, somebody may see you. They may see you coming down. What a beautiful way to die... as a falling star...
 Looks like I'm headed for the planet, Talby. Going right toward it.
 Bomb must have gone off inside the ship. Nothing we can do about it now. Hey, it looks like... the skipper. He made it. Commander Powell made it!
 What happened, Doolittle?
 Here I am. I think I'm spinning... We're both falling, Talby, in opposite directions, away from each other. My -- my jetpack's gone.
 Doolittle, Doolittle, where are you?
 Calm down, Talby. I'm coming.
 Doolittle! Help me.
 Well, I'm in the Emergency Air Lock and --
 Not now!
 Ah, well, I think I've found the malfunction, sir. I'm in the Emergency Air Lock...
 Sh, Talby, don't bother me now.
 Ah, Lieutenant Doolittle? Sir?
 Sounds good, Talby. Let me know if anything important comes up.
 Sorry to interrupt your lunch, sir, but I'm in the Computer Room, and I think I've located the malfunction. The scanner shows it to be some sort of fault in the communications laser, down by the Emergency Air Lock. Can't pinpoint it exactly, but I'm going down there with a starsuit and try to find it.
 Yes, Talby, what is it?
 Lieutenant Doolittle, this is Talby. Lieutenant?
 I wish I had my board with me now. Even if I could only polish it once in awhile.
 I really think I should try and locate it immediately. Might be something important.
 Don't worry about it. We'll find out when it goes bad.
 Ah, Doolittle, I do have a malfunction on this readout, but I can't seem to pinpoint exactly where it is.
 I guess I miss the waves and my board most of all.
 ...Somewhere in the autonomic relay circuits...
 Waves would be peaking really high and glassy. Hit that water. Ridin' the wall just perfect.
 I can't seem to locate the malfunction exactly...
 The waves at Malibu and Zuma were fantastic in the springs Talby. I can remember running out on the beach early spring mornings with my board and a wet suit...
 Lieutenant Doolittle, I'm getting a definite malfunction on one of the closed-circuit computer systems...
 I can't talk to the others, but with time to myself, I think about back home, back home at Malibu. I used to surf a lot, Talby. I used to be a great surfer.
 I think I'm getting a malfunction here somewhere.
 It's funny, but I kind of sit around, you know, a lot of time to myself...
 I'm getting something here, on this readout...
 You know what I think about, Talby?
 They are a body of asteroids that make a complete circuit of the universe once every 12.3 trillion years. The Phoenix Asteroids... From what I've heard, Doolittle, they glow... glow with all the colors of the rainbow. Nobody knows why. They just glow as they drift around the universe. Imagine all the sights they've seen in the time they've been travelling -- the birth and death of stars, things we'll never see. The universe is alive, Doolittle. I thought it was all empty, but it isn't. In between the stars, it's seething with light and gasses and dust. There are little pebbles drifting around, planets no one on Earth has ever seen... No one but the Phoenix Asteroids...
 Phoenix Asteroids? Never heard of 'em.
 You know, Doollttle, if we're going into the Veil Nebula, we may actually find a strange and beautiful thing: the Phoenix Asteroids. They should be passing through there about now...
 You'll have plenty of time for that, you know. Figure it this way: twenty years in space and we've only aged three, so there'll be plenty of time to stare around...
 ...You see, I can watch things up here, Doolittle. I love to watch things, just stare at the planets and meteors and asteroids, gas clusters...
 ...Should spend some time below, see more of the rest of the ship...
 I don't like to go below since Commander Powell died. I feel enclosed down there. If it were big enough, I'd sleep up here...
 Must get lonely being up here so much.
 I like it up here.
 You know, Talby, you really ought to eat with the rest of us. You spend too much time up here.
 Okay, Doolittle, I'll have it in a minute.
 I need a diameter approximation.
 Oh! Ah, yes, Doolittle. What is it?
 TALBY!
 Yeah, the skipper always was lucky.
 Men... men... what happened, men?
 Phenomenology...
 Sir?
 No, no, Doolittle, you talk to it. Teach it Phenomenology, Doolittle.
 I already have, sir, and Pinback is talking to it now.
 Talk to the bomb.
 Sir?
 Oh, yes... Well, Doolittle, if you can't get it to drop you'll have to talk to it.
 We're running out of time, sir.
 Oh, yes, Doolittle, I'm thinking.
 Commander? Are you still there?
 Ah... it seems to me, Doolittle... Sorry, I've drawn a blank. Hold it. I'll have it again in a minute. I forget so many things in here, so many things. Hold on, just a minute, let me think...
 What were you saying, Commander, about the bomb?
 Sorry.
 Sorry, sir, you faded out there for a minute.
 Doolittle, hello?
 Commander Powell? Commander, hello!
 Well, what you might try is --
 What should we do, sir? The time is running out.
 Sorry, Doolittle. I've forgotten so much since I've been in here. So much.
 That's correct, sir.
 It didn't work?
 Negative effect.
 What was that, Doolittle?
 Yes sir. Negative effect.
 Ah, so many malfunctions... why don't you have anything nice to tell me when you activate me? Oh, well, did you try the azimuth clutch?
 You don't understand, sir, we can't get the bomb to drop.
 Ah... pity, pity...
 Well, sir, the Dodgers broke up, disbanded over thirteen years ago.
 Tell me, Doolittle, how are the Dodgers doing?
 What's that, sir?
 Doolittle, you must tell me one thing.
 Commander, sir, we have a big problem. You see, the Veil Nebula bomb, Bomb Number 20, is stuck. It won't drop from the bomb bay. It refuses to listen and plans to detonate in --  -- less than eleven minutes.
 I'm glad you've come to talk with me, Doolittle. It's been so long since anyone has come to talk with me.
 Commander Powell, this is Doolittle. Ah, there's something serious come up, sir, and I have to ask you something.
 This.
 How I make my living, what's your point?
 Okay, okay.  I can explain... You ever have to do something you really don't want to?
 No... Cause tonight the girls are here in a more or less professional capacity. All of them work for me, and you don't... Let's go.
 No?
 But see tonight wives and girlfriends aren't invited.
 Yeah.
 Oh, yeah?
 Bruno's girlfriend.
 Who are you?
 This won't hurt.  Triple dose of insulin, you'll go into a coma, couple minutes you'll stop breathing and on a busy night, the coroner will probably mistake it for an O.D.  Plus, it's way classier than blowin' your brains out.
 None of your business.
 Who's Camille?
 What the hell are you doing?
 Ass like your, I can see why he's worried you'll punk.
 He's got exposure.  He sees you starin' at fifteen to life, there's a chance you could roll over, cop a plea, who knows? Man's figured the odds...and he can't take a chance.
 But the boss knows I always been loyal.
 This is what your life's worth, Bruno.
 I'm outta Portland.  Sonrisa didn't want local talent.
 How come I never hearda you before?
 Security camera got you coming outta the stairwell, weapon in your hand, going to room one-oh-four and greasing the patient.  It's embarrassing to the professional community, is what it is.
 That's a lotta crap.
 I'm hired to do a piece of work, my mark goes down and stays down.  Your's makes it to the hospital where you then gotta go finish the job.  Only the cops got the whole thing on video tape.
 What're you talkin' about?
 You can hardly blame him, the way you've been taking care of business...or should I say, not taking care of it.
 You're in the last two seconds, you don't cut the crap.
 See what you don't know is you're already in the last two minutes of your life.
 You haven't figured this out yet, have you?  You walk in here thinking you're gonna cap her then cap me and take the money back to your boss with your tail wagging... But see it's really the other way around.  You think I'm the whack, when actually you're the whack.
 Call the skank now or I start redecorating.
 What the hell are you talkin' about? Call her.
 That's not why we're here.
 What?
 Actually, that's not gonna be necessary.
 Fine.  So call her.  Get her over here.
 I like to keep it professional, that's all.
 Man, you got a bad attitude.
 Sooo...whattya think?  Maybe after I betray the woman who trusts me and you take her and her daughter out and execute them...we could go on a date.  Play a little miniature golf or somethin'.
 You're attractive, you're smart.  Stand on your own two feet, know what I mean? And you got a wicked sense of humor. Man, you really zinged the boss a couple times, it was all I could do--
 Yeah?
 I never woulda done it.  Probably not, anyway.  I mean, I actually think you're pretty cool.
 Yeah, sure, I understand.
 Look, that thing about the pliers, I was just doing what the man pays me to do. Ya know?  Comin' off hard.
 Or we could go another way 'cause your boss seems to like my face just the way it is.
 Or we can work on your face with a pair of pliers for a couple of hours and you tell us where she is.
 Now that that's out of the way... You want the woman, here's how it works.  You pull fifty large out of your mattress or wherever, and I make a call to bring her in.
 No wire.
 Guess again.
 I'm on a break.
 Mr. Sonrisa saw you on the cameras.  He wants you to come see him.
 Where?
 Move it.
 No.
 Can I say something in my defense?
 Leave.  Now.
 Nothing happened between me and Tia.
 You know each other?
 You didn't tell me you lived with her.
 Some of us are trying to sleep.
 Could you give us a moment.
 And when the fog lifted, there's Darren with his head under Justine's skirt.
 Trying to have a relationship with you, Max, is like standing in a fog bank.  You know you're in the middle of something only you have absolutely no idea where you are.
 She was there...
 Do you know why I went after Justine?
 Justine was not an unwilling participant.
 'Cause you went out the back door and nailed her girlfriend?  Who would take offense to that?
 You're not still pissed?
 You mean until you showed up?
 How're ya doin', Max.
 Don't look down.
 But I'm afraid of--
 Unless you wanna end up in jail, let me and Kendra handle the cops.
 No way.
 Out there.
 No time.
 Lemme put some clothes on.
 What?  Where're we going?
 It's a sweep.  C'mon.
 Police drone.
 What is it?
 You're roommates?
 I live here... Guess I don't have to ask what you're doing here.
 What are you doing here?
 I see the perimeter defense system is still fully intact... At least I tried.
 I'm really glad we're having this conversation.  You're right.  I was angry at you.  But talking about it-- The scales have fallen from my eyes and I see now that it was all my fault.  Can you ever forgive me?
 I was crazy about you...am crazy about you.  But you keep everyone at arm's length like there's some great big dark something going on that-- I don't know... It's just that the more I tried to get close to you, the more you pulled away.
 It was a complicated situation which could have been misconstrued, causing you to maybe take offense.
 Why would I be pissed?
 Theo rode for this place a long time, man.
 What're you lookin' at me for?  I'm not his next of kin.  Anyway, I don't got that kind of cash lyin' around.
 Yeah, well around here, I'm the Most High... From now on, before you do anything, call in for instructions.
 It concerns only Jah.  But, in this case, I was the instrument of the Most High.
 Which is none of your business...or mine.
 Like de prophets say, "Only the unrighteous husband sends expensive gift- wrapped underpants to another woman."
 So you just decided to return it to the sender.  Or, in this case, the sender's wife.
 Nobody there to sign for it, mon.  What's a bruddah s'posed to do, ride around all day with the damn package?
 I got overhead...
 So Max, what do you do with all your money?
 Am I?
 You're light a deuce.
 It's a rule.
 I'll make it worth your while.
 I don't get involved with guns.
 I shouldn't do this.  But I got a client lookin' to score some fire power.  Maybe you'll keep your eyes open for me.
 Later.
 I'll give you seventy-five bucks for it.
 I ain't mad at you...
 Which means I gotta fence it for two. Who's got that kinda scrilla lying around, these being the worst of the times.
 A grand.
 What're you looking for?
 Thought I'd let you have first crack... Later.
 Same old story.  Not interested.
 Thought so.  Turned out he wanted me for something else though.
 Must think you're pretty special laying this on you.
 I didn't.  It was a present from a guy.
 Where'd you clip this?
 Every week.
 You didn't...
 Just thought maybe he'd like a little coffee with his saliva.
 What's with you?  Every week this scumbag puts the squeeze on us and every week you roll out the welcome wagon like he's family.
 And for all his cattin' around, not much of a stick man either.
 What a creep.
 Yech...
 He's a mistake I made about six months before you did.  But don't feel bad. Justine made the same mistake, along with Renee, Jada, Tia, Brooke--
 Yeah, me too.
 Thanks, it's starting to kick in.  I feel almost human.
 I made you coffee.  That oughta help you cope with the injustice of the world a little.
 Hang on, Lauren.  We're conferencing in Sophy.
 Hello...
 Look, we gotta keep the momentum up here, not give her a chance to think.  If she hears her kid's voice...
 Like I said-- This isn't my regular line of work so I'm making it up as I go.
 What else can we do?
 We're not going that route.  Sonrisa's not someone you make deals with.
 If I give myself up in exchange for Sophy, would you make sure she's okay?
 Look, I'd really like to...
 Can you help me get her back?
 Your daughter's the only leverage they have to keep you quiet.
 I couldn't get to her.  It all happened so fast.  Logan had her, and I saw him fall...then Peter told me to run.  And then he...and I remember so clearly, thinking it's me they want.  If I run, maybe they'll come after me.  Maybe they won't think about her... So I ran...
 I know.
 They took my daughter.
 Damn... Are you alright?
 SHHH!  Don't do that!
 Oh my God!  In here!  IN HERE!
 There's nothing to be afraid of. Everything's going to be alright.
 Mommy, I'm scared.
 Soon, baby.
 When?
 Don't worry, I'm coming to get you.
 Mommy, where are you?
 Sophy?  Are you okay?
 Then I'm gonna do what you do to make me feel better when I'm sad.
 Pretty much the same reasons I was crying.  But things will be better when we move to a new place.
 If I'm sad, or tired, or sometimes when I'm angry or when somebody's being mean to me.
 What makes you cry?
 Then how come last night I heard you talking to Logan and you were crying?
 No...
 Are we in some kind of trouble?
 Because we can't.  There's nothing here for us anymore.
 But why can't we stay here?
 I know, Honey, but just think how exiting it will be-- new house, new school, new friends--
 I don't want to move away.
 Goodnight Bears.  Goodnight chairs. Goodnight kittens.  Goodnight mittens. Goodnight clocks.  And goodnight socks. Goodnight little house.  And goodnight--
 Zack... He made it... He's alive...
 That was taken nine years ago... I.D.'d as Michael Hanover.  Sentenced to 18 months in the state penn at Rawlins, Wyoming for armed robbery.  He escaped from custody after 4 days.  Hasn't been seen or heard from since.
 And whether you want to believe it or not, you already fired the first shot.  On another matter, Federal Corrections used to keep records on distinguishing marks-- scars, tattoos.  I did a search and came up with this.
 Civilization as we know it is unraveling before our eyes.  But Logan and Max, with a song in their hearts are gonna march into battle to keep that from happening.
 With your help.
 And you still think you can do something to change that.
 Maybe we got screwed outta living in a time when we could sit in a cafe, sipping our lattes wearing two thousand dollar wrist watches while we plan our next vacation.  But the world got a whole lot meaner all of a sudden.  Wasn't s'posed to, but it did.  And it's back to the law of the jungle.  You got your predators and you got your victims.
 We're quoting Mom again.
 You are involved.  By being alive you're involved.
 And I feel real bad about all that but it doesn't mean I need to get involved.
 These girls, kidnapped during the last month and sold overseas to the highest bidder.  The oldest is twelve.  The youngest about the same age you were when you escaped.
 Look, thank you for this but--
 Forty-seven people drowned last night off the coast of Vancouver after paying smugglers twenty thousand apiece to get into Canada so they could get work in order to eat.  Only they got marched overboard at gunpoint instead.
 Deeds, not words.  I need your help.
 I don't know what to say.
 It turned up on the black market.  One of my sources thought I might be interested.
 Open it.
 What's this?
 That's what soldiers do, right?
 On accounta you, Sonrisa didn't get to buy off the jury, or kill the judge. He's gone.  Once and for all.  It was war, Max, and you won.
 Well, not me personally.
 I've never been much for trying to understand why bad things happen, I just know they do.  So the job's to figure out how to deal with the consequences.  Which you did... You took that sonuvabitch out.
 You believe that?
 My mother used to say the universe is right on schedule.  Everything happens like it's supposed to.
 I'm sorry.
 Not in any pain...the good and bad news of a blown out spinal cord.
 I would've come sooner, but...I didn't... How're you doin'?
 Somebody's got to.
 See you're back and still rocking the boat.
 That's deep.  But before you lecture me about the meaning of life maybe you oughta get one...ta ta.
 You're a soldier, Max.  That's what you were put here for.  But soldiers need a mission otherwise they tear themselves up.
 They've lost track of me and I plan to keep it that way.
 They want me...bad.  Or at least they don't want me grabbed up by the Chinese or whoever.  Best case, I wind up back in that facility.  More likely, it's a long drive out in the country, if you know what I mean.
 She's put her life on the line, and her faith in me.
 I didn't make it this far by attracting a lot of attention.
 So, you know the lengths he'll go to keep her from going public... I'm turning Lauren over to Canadian law enforcement tomorrow.  They'll put her in witness protection, but if you're with her the risk of her safety goes way down.
 Yeah, I catch your hacks.  He's Satan's lap dog, or something.
 She's prepared to testify that she was instructed to do this by one of Edgar Sonrisa's managers.  You know who Sonrisa is?
 That's low, but this effects me how exactly?
 The woman you met, Lauren.  She supervised workers removing cortodiazapine from gel caps by hand and replacing it with powdered sugar.  The real drug was shipped out of the country. The placebos were distributed to County VA Hospital and six veterans' clinics in the area.
 I already don't like the sound of this.
 Your help.
 What's in it for you?
 I need to find this technician, or anyone else who knows about Project Manticore. They would've used surrogate mothers to carry you after the in-vitro work... If I can track down one of them.
 You said you could help.
 Like extra virgin olive oil, the best of the best.
 Christmas is a snap when you got no parents or relatives, just a bunch of gene sequences from probably twenty different people.
 Hardly...
 Your basic hodge-podge.
 A girl.
 Yeah...a made-up creature.  Like in mythology...with the head of a lion, the body of a goat and the tail of...
 The technical term for you is "chimera"...
 I know they made me.  Even got the label on my neck to prove it.
 How much do you know?
 I remember fine.  I just didn't understand what was going on.  They never told us anything except what to do.  It took me a long time afterwards to figure things out.
 How well do you remember the lab?
 We got separated right away.  I never knew how many made it.
 The bar code on your neck, Max.  I know who you are and I know who you're running from.
 Not that I don't enjoy a good urban legend now and then but what does any of this have to do with me?
 He was working on something called Project Manticore, which was using recombinant DNA to produce a superior human...a warrior...an advanced infantry soldier.
 I don't know what kind of game you're playing here but I'm out because you are a whack-job.
 You did go through my stuff.
 L-Triptophane...a neurotransmitter sometimes used in homeopathy to control seizures.  Then the lightbulb went off.
 C'mon, Max.  First I watch you dive headfirst out the window fifteen stories up like you're Rocky the flying squirrel. Then, I found this in your apartment.
 You lost me.
 The other one like you...
 The other ones?
 Suppose I could help you locate the other ones.
 Only when I meet someone I have to know everything about.
 Expensive gifts, surprise late-night visits, over-the-top flattery... You always come on this strong?
 No, I meant this.
 Gold leaf, art nouveau, French, early nineteen hundreds... I could probably fence this for three or four grand.
 C'mere, I want to show you something.
 You need to get out more.
 I haven't been able to get you off my mind.
 You'd think a guy who's taken on the job of saving the world would have a few more important things to do than traipse around after some girl.
 I'm sorry.  It wasn't my intention.  But I had to see you.
 Yes on all counts.
 Look, if I made you nervous or uncomfortable or creeped you out--
 We are not fine.
 It's alright, Peter, we're fine.
 Whoa there, Tex!  We've been through all this.
 You're that nervous, you're welcome to stay here.
 How'm I s'posed to ever sleep there again knowing some pervo's probably touched everything I own?
 That would be appropriate, yes.
 Am I s'posed to be grateful?
 So saw my hands off, I left you a present.
 How do I know you didn't?
 You make it sound I pawed through your priceless collection of underwear.
 Bent.
 Bent?
 Completely different situation.  I steal things in order to sell them.  For money. It's called commerce.  But some stranger sneaking into a girl's bedroom is...bent.
 Me?  You're the one who tried to rip off this piece.
 You got a lotta nerve.
 It was open.
 Like following me around and pestering the people I work with wasn't bad enough, but breaking into my apartment--
 I'm not a half bad cook.
 I won't be staying.
 Ever notice how cats always seem to turn up around dinner time?
 Yeah...
 Is the social studies class over for today?
 You accept the way things are, you're an active participant in making it worse.
 Personally, I'm more interested in going fast on my motorcycle or climbing the Trans American building with my pals. Instead of giving myself a headache over stuff I can't do anything about.
 Something.
 So what are you gonna do about it?
 People had a choice, even if they took it for granted.  And now they don't.
 You miss the good ol' days.  Even though there were still poor people who died from diseases when they didn't have to. And rich people spent obscene amounts of money redecorating their houses to match the cat.  Those good ol' days?
 Look around at all this...  Built by people who got up every morning and worked hard trying to make a better life.  Then the bomb happened and everyone got scared.  They blinked and before they knew it they'd given away the store to a bunch of thugs who were happy to take it off their hands.  Overnight the government, the police, everything intended to protect the people had been turned against them.
 So, what, you just like the sound of your own voice?
 Fortunately, my needs are met in that department.
 What's your shot in all this?  Being a famous, anonymous, underground, pirate, cyber-journalist can't be much of a payday.
 One of my sources.  Her husband was murdered by Edgar Sonrisa.
 Girlfriend?
 Lauren's not my wife.
 How does Mrs. Eyes Only like being married to a guy on everybody's hit list?
 Too early to tell.
 So now you tracked me down.  What d'ya think?
 Now you know who I am, where I live.  I figured I better find out who I'm dealing with in case you were looking to hurt me.
 Am I s'posed to be flattered by all the attention?
 Wasn't that hard.
 How'd you find me?
 The one you're wearing?
 Lemme get my coat.
 Can we go somewhere and talk?
 Sorry about your window.
 Logan Cale.
 Original Cindy, say hi to my good friend--
 We didn't get a chance to finish our conversation the other night.
 So this guy walks into a bar and says...
 The goddess who comprehends all goddesses, eye of Ra, protector, avenger, and destroyer, giver of life, who lives forever... I could keep going.
 Who is...
 No, because it's the Egyptian goddess Bast.
 So, what, you liked it because it was shiny?
 Whoever that is.
 You have good taste.  French, 1920's, attributed to Chitarus.
 We're just a little tense right now...  It's okay.
 I'm sorry if I caught you at a bad time.
 You're lucky.  I almost pulled the trigger.
 Guess it wasn't the pizza delivery guy.
 I was expecting someone else.
 First time I ever heard that.
 Thank God.
 Girl's gotta make a living.
 You're a thief?
 I'll wait.
 None.
 Any idea when she'll be back?
 Max something.  I got no clue where she stays.
 Can't help you.
 I need to talk to her.
 She may be easy on the eyes but she's trouble, trust me.  Hot run to two-oh-two Sansomme.
 But she does work here?
 You don't want to.
 Know where I can find her?
 Ladies would be elsewhere.
 I'm looking for a lady who works here.
 And if I ever catch you coming near my man again...
 I understand.
 Say the words, "I understand."
 Okay, okay.
 Now, here's how it's gonna be, Lydia. You're gonna take your threats and your acrylic nails, and you're gonna go home and figure out your marriage, instead of trying to make other people feel as miserable as you do, understand?
 Help... Lemme go... No, don't let me go... Help...
 Let go of my hand.
 This is not a place you wanna go.
 Not before we get something straight you prissy little bitch.  I decide when I'm done with your boyfriend.  Not him, and certainly not you.  Unless maybe you want to find out just how sharp these nails really are.
 I think you should go now.
 You're also a fool.
 Big part of loving someone's being able to forgive them.
 How sweet.  Standing by your man, even after what he did.  You're a very understanding person.
 Well, it's over between you and him. We're getting married next month.
 Oh?
 And so should you.  Sketchy told me I could expect a visit from you.  I know all about how you threatened him.  That if he didn't break it off with me, you'd save him the trouble.
 I thought it was important for you to know the facts.
 Look, I don't know what you want--
 He been sleeping in a T-shirt lately?  That's so you won't see the fingernail marks on his back.  Bet you didn't know your boyfriend finds a little pain exciting.  He didn't either...at first.
 How do I know you're telling the truth?
 With me, where he's been after work, three, sometimes four nights a week for the last two months... We have what you might call an intimate relationship.
 You said you knew where my fiance was the other night.
 My name's Lydia.  And it seems you and I have a lot in common.
 Who are you?
 To set the record straight about where he was the other night when he said he was working late.
 What do you want?
 A friend of your fiance's.
 Who is it?
 I'm on my way.
 One-seven-four-nine-five Natoma.
 Just give it to me.  I'll remember.
 Got a pencil?
 Zero... C'mon, Dan I don't have all day.
 Just do it... Five-seven-five-oh- eight...
 Sure you wanna be havin' this conversation over the phone?
 I need a favor... I need you to trace a number for me.
 You and me both.
 I'm sorry I couldn't come up with something more positive.
 Bastard...
 Your fiance has four previous wives.  His M.O. is to clean 'em out and take off.  Which is what you oughta do.
 I'm you, I take that money and get outta town while you can.
 You're crazy.
 Hardware's too sophisticated.  It's gotta be the government.  And why do I think they're looking for you?
 Like you said, maybe somebody's tracking one of your investigations.
 They lifted my wallet to make it look like a robbery.  But there's a bug in my computer keyboard, a tap on the phone and a mike in the light fixture.
 How's this about me?
 Whoever tossed this place wants you.  And I'm looking to stay outta the line of fire.
 Here's your money.
 I don't know what your story is and I don't want to.
 I'll live... Regarding your case...I'm afraid I've come up with some bad news on your fiance.  Lemme get the file.
 As long as you're okay.
 More money... Like I'm shocked to hear you say that.
 Nothing so far from arrests, hospital admissions or coroners.  This kind of search...it's heavy spadework.  I'm gonna need--
 You were gonna run through the law enforcement databases for a match on identifying marks.
 They don't exactly have a search engine for finding a bunch of kids with bar- codes on their necks, which is something I'm not even going to ask about--
 What about the other kids?  You get anything on them?
 Only a last name would be nice.  Or the nearest town to this...clinic.
 She was a nurse.  She must've lived near there, somewhere, near the...  ...the clinic.  There must be some registry of nurses or medical technicians or whatever for Wyoming.
 A nuclear airburst wipes out every record of every kind in every computer east of the Rockies, and you want me to find some woman you met when you were seven, whose last name you don't even know... Maybe if you could give me something more on her...anything you can remember, some detail...
 Nothing on Hannah?
 Then what?  That's it.  That's all I got.
 Then what?
 Guy says he made the trade in Gillette, Wyoming sometime in the fall of oh-nine.
 He says he got it from a woman.  Doesn't remember her name but she fits the description you gave like a glove.
 Thank you.
 He got the car in a trade for his old pick-up and some food...no bill of sale or nothing.  It was right after the pulse so all the DMV records were wiped.  So we don't get anything on the seller.  Except I actually managed to find this guy, six hours on the phone... Say thank you.
 Who's this guy?  This isn't who we're looking for...her name was Hannah.
 Sorry, I was seven at the time.
 I got a hit on the car.  An oh-five Tahoe, blue, with Wyoming tags... AGT349... It wasn't easy 'cause you were off in one of the numbers.
 Right here someplace.
 My name's not kid.  It's client.  As in the person who pays for your opulent lifestyle.  Now, you got something for me or not?
 You got a punk-ass mouth on you, kid.
 Yeah, does kinda break the elegant atmosphere you got goin' on here.
 You drive away business roarin' in like that.
 You did.
 I asked you to keep that thing outside.
 But, of course, there's nothing self- serving in that scenario.
 I say hang the bastard out to dry, let her see him for the heel he is, then maybe she'll step to the all-girl team and let mama-licious ease her pain.
 Besides, think of the drama I'm sparing Natalie.
 Only one I can think of.
 They don't have a lot of moving parts.
 So are dogs.
 They're prisoners to their genes.
 Please...
 And because I actually kinda feel sorry for guys sometimes.
 Friends don't help other friends cheat.
 And because he's my friend.
 Unlikely.
 Yeah, 'cause maybe he's learned his lesson.
 You're actually gonna bail Sketchy out.
 It's a secret.
 Where?
 Gotta go.
 More like a mystery... Which isn't bad. It's just kinduv...mysterious...
 A fog bank.
 And back at ya.  Only there's a part of you that's... I don't know--
 Because you're probably my closest friend in the whole world.
 Long enough for you to pretty much read me like a book, right?
 A long time.
 How long you and me known each other?
 If I knew what you were saying, I wouldn't be asking.
 You know what I'm saying.
 A little what?
 Hell yeah.  There's not the slightest grain of truth in anything that idiot was saying.  You are a totally down-ass female and a straight-up friend who happens to be a little...
 Yeah.
 He was just trying to blame you 'cause he's a slut.
 No.
 You're not seriously buying into Darren's nonsense.
 Tell me the truth.  Am I a female fog bank?
 What?
 That's odd...
 I just don't go in with any expectations.
 You're way more philosophical than I could ever be.
 What guys do.  'Nother order.
 Craps all over everything and everyone and then wants mommy to forgive him.
 Shame, wastin' a girl like that on a guy, but what're you gonna do?
 Straight.
 Now, why can't I find a girlfriend like that?  Brings him lunch everyday, thoughtful, sweet, legs from here to there--
 No, but I broke a nail giving him a cranium crack and that just sort of wrecks your day, know what I'm saying?
 At least he didn't swing with your ride.
 Caught some son-of-a-bitch stealing my bike.  Used a car jack to blow out my U lock and bent a bunch of spokes.  So now I gotta get my wheels fixed.
 Morning, Sunshine...
 Okay...idea.  Compromise, right?  Bruno here comes with me.  He holds the money until mommy shows up, then we close escrow.  What you do with her after I'm gone doesn't keep me awake nights.
 You get it when I get her.
 Can you put that in a bag or something?
 She's gonna want to hear for herself.
 She's got my word.
 She's gonna need to know that her little girl's alright.
 Make the call.
 I have sincere eyes.
 And she bought that?
 I told her it's just business to you, that all you want is a reasonable solution to this.  You give her daughter back, she agrees to leave the country.  I play the guarantor, drive her down to Mexico tonight, and put her on a train to Brazil or wherever.
 So, how do you get the woman to come to me?
 Pull the cash.
 Look, you're a player... I'm bringing you this on a plate, and my fee is just the normal cost of doing business.
 What, you gonna put me on your Christmas card list?
 Who are you?
 You're gonna pay me fifty thousand dollars...
 I actually know how this works.
 Only way you're ever gonna find out is reincarnation... Fact is, you are gonna pay me, and I am gonna provide you with a service.
 Quite a mouth on a girl so young...  ...but my guess is talking is not what it does best.
 Right after you change your wardrobe, your personality and drop about thirty pounds.
 Not right now?  Okay, when?
 Not right now.
 I'll bet you can.  Sit.
 Yeah, I can see to it your winning streak continues.
 You can tell 'em yourself tomorrow.
 Tell everybody hey.
 Here's the dealio on Eyes Only.  He's probably some wack rich dude sitting around in a trick-ass apartment, bored stupid.  So he gets off on scarin' the poop outta folks like you-- I gotta go.
 What if he's on the level?
 Don't believe everything you hear on TV.
 I know what I got, Max.  They put me back on that drug they're giving the other vets.  Only the guy does those cable hacks says the stuff's no good.
 Probably a touch of what's going around.
 Feel like the dog's dinner.
 Playing hooky again?
 You're the best, Maxie.
 It's payday, need me to pick up your check?
 Shut-up...
 That was extreme!  Did you see that one guy--
 Say the words, "I understand."
 Okay, okay, okay--
 You were trying to have it both ways and you were being completely selfish.  And if I ever find out you're going out the back door on Natalie again, you're the one who's gonna be hanging by your ankles three stories up.  Understand?
 True, but--
 None of this would've happened if you had exercised even a smidgen of good judgement or self-restraint, which you didn't.
 She was the one--
 You would be making a mistake to come away from this thinking she's the villain in the piece... You are.
 She's toxic...monster in bed, but toxic.
 Lydia may not have been one of humanity's finer specimens but--
 No, I'm serious.  That psycho got exactly what she deserved... Yes.
 Easy Sketchy.
 You rock, Max.  You... Rock...
 You don't.
 Max, what did I do to deserve a friend like you?
 I'll give it my best shot.
 She came by the apartment once already. Fortunately, I'd disconnected the doorbell as a precaution... Lydia's not gonna back off until she gets her pound of flesh.
 And we're sure Lydia's gonna make her move?
 Convinced her she needed to visit her mom in San Mateo.
 How'd you get her out of town?
 I just don't want Natalie to ever find out.  She deserves better.
 Or, I dissolve into an angry, hysterical wreck who never wants to see your lying ass again, which is probably what would really happen.
 But you explain that you're a compassionate and understanding person who can find it in your heart to forgive me.
 --a philandering pig.
 She tells you how I've been--
 You set up on Lydia.  When she's on her way over to the apartment you give me the heads up.  I answer the door and pretend to be Natalie.
 So you're straight on how this is gonna go down.
 Look Max, I made a terrible mistake.  One I'll never, ever make again.  Natalie and I are soulmates.  I know that now.  She's the woman I want to spend the rest of my life with.  I guess it took the thought of losing her for me to understand that.
 And why should she?
 Even if she doesn't dump me, which is unlikely, she'd never be able to trust me again.
 What happens if you level with her?
 Who either doesn't care, or could have me killed.  Either way, Natalie's still gonna find out.
 Fight fire with fire.  Threaten to go to her husband.
 She's as much as said so.  But she doesn't want to share her toy with anyone else... It's just an ego thing with her.
 A toy?
 I'm a toy to her.
 And Lydia telling Natalie the truth makes you a victim in what way?
 Lydia.
 Does this person have a name?
 She had me followed the other day and found out about Natalie.  Now, this person's demanding I blow her off or she'll do it for me by telling Nat about us.
 Then a sympathetic mouth, then a sympathetic--
 Exactly.
 And you were a sympathetic ear.
 Hear me out.  This person I've been seeing is a Jam Pony client who happens to be married--
 Really?
 I'm the victim here.
 Here it comes.  The part where the guy turns everything around.
 But there's another side--
 You left out condescending.
 Lame, self-serving, arrogant...guilty as charged.
 Or do you think we're just so grateful to have one of you idiots we'll look the other way, which is arrogant and condescending.
 Max--
 Do guys actually believe their lame, self- serving excuses?
 I know what you're thinking.  But the truth is, this other person is not someone I'm in love with.  As a matter of fact, after what she just did, she's not even someone I like much.  So in a technical sense, I'm not sure you could call me and her cheating...officially.
 I don't see how you cheating on Natalie involves me.
 Not half as pissed as she's gonna be when she finds out why I blew her off... I need your help, Max.
 You blew off your girlfriend last night, even though it was the big one-oh.  I'd be pissed off too if I was her.
 What's up?
 We gotta talk.
 Hey, Sketchy--
 But I'll take a rain check...
 Right, the big one-oh.
 I gotta meet Natalie for dinner.
 Quitting time.  Grab a cold one?
 Later.
 Catch you back at the wall.
 Theo's dead.
 Hot run to 842 Beulah, corner of Haight... And you can tell your pal Theo he just got his worthless ass fired. Not that he cares but the wife and kid might.
 I'm taking the rest of the day off 'cause I'm not feeling so hot.
 What about this?
 Tell him I took the day off 'cause I wasn't feeling so hot.
 Fourteen-thirteen Market.  Get a signature, then take it to this address... By the way, that guy who was in here sniffing after you yesterday called twice already.
 I don't know how to break this to you, Normal, we're all looking for another job.
 You tell Theo he's not in tomorrow he can start looking for another job.
 How 'bout you don't break my sneakers on this.  The guy is seriously not well.
 For a change.
 He's sick.
 And Theo can't pick up his own check because?...
 I don't sleep... Theo asked me to pick up his check.
 More like deployed in bed asleep.
 What's the difference if I'm on call here or deployed in the field.
 I want you on call here.
 I was on call.
 This is a hot run.  Beat it.  You're late.
 I'm not paying you for the lovemaking, Hawk. I just want you to have whatever you needed the money for when you took me up on my offer.
 Amanda, as ironic as this is gonna sound, I can't take any money for... I'm no Midnight Cowboy, y'know. It would only cheapen the whole deal for me.
 Well, shame on him if he doesn't.
 He's a little spoiled, but I know he does.
 And he loves you back, doesn't he?
 More than anything in the world.
 No, I mean... you love your son?
 I just told you, he's a big, hairy...
 You love him?
 Believe it or not, you still have a way to go before you start competing with my soon-to-be-ex-husband... the champion of lousy lovemaking. The man who thinks he's the biggest and the best... The man who thinks every secretary, stewardess, and cocktail waitress he fucks should lick his feet for the honor. The man for whom faking it was invented. Christ, if I hadn't gotten pregnant with our son, I would have never known I even had sex with the prick.
 Well, Amanda, this has been quite a night. So far you've seen me and my dick throw up.  What's next? Projectile diarrhea?  Man. What a stud, huh?
 My name's not Woody, it's Haw-haw...
 Well. Obviously no one you have to worry about... Woody.
 Who's Whiskey Dick?
 Better ease up then, Hawk. Wouldn't want to give you whiskey dick would we?
 Whoa. Some of this hard liquor's a tad too manly for me. I'm a brewski man myself.
 Gin.
 What the hell is that?
 I'd be in a position to spend some money on you if you'd get in a position and spend some time on me.
 Huh?
 Don't be so glum, Hawk. The night's still young and filled with plenty of compensatory possibilities.
 Right, well, thanks for the drinks and stuff, Amanda, but there's no reason for me to stick around these parts anymore.
 You're too kind. I'm Amanda.
 Thanks, miss.
 Look, people undress in public because, A, they're exhibitionists, B, they're nutcases, or C, they need the money. I can tell you're not A, and I hope to hell you're not B. So my suggestion is, think about why you're a C and let your body party, shake your groove thing, boogie oogie oogie till you just can't boogie no more.
 I-I c-can't...
 You're not gonna chicken out on me now, are you? We've got your KISS song playing and everything.
 Oh, Dicky, I c-c-can't...
 Amanda Finch. Her ex is one of the wealthiest businessmen in Detroit. Play your cards right and you could hit paydirt. She like 'em young.  And since you look a little new at this, let me give you three words of advice. Hard to get. Think it, act it, know it, be it. Nothing a woman loves more than when you beat her at her own head games.
 Whoa... she is a killer.
 Save your money, stud muffin. The lady at the end of the bar sends her love.
 Sure, I have. But not one with ice in it, that's all.
 You mean you never seen a Jack Daniels on the rocks before?
 What's that?
 Yeah, a man's drink...
 You kidding? This is Detroit. Drink?
 Got any KISS?
 Pick a song, Hawk.
 Hawk.
 You're a little scrawny, but thanks to the concert we're low on amateurs. Name?
 Bye.
 Coming dad.  I'll call you. Soon as we get a phone. Bye.
 Tell me about it. Church will never be the same again.
 Let's not think about the past. Let's just think about from today on. I'll never forget you, Jam.
 I feel like such an idiot. Why didn't I just say something a year and a half ago? Man, think of how much time we wasted.
 That'd be great. Hey, maybe someday your band'll play there. It's a college town, you know?
 Nah. Once I get my own wheels, I could come up all the time.
 Ann Arbor isn't... that far from Cleveland, right?
 My dad's company is relocating him. We're moving. That's why I was acting so freaky in school today. I thought it was the last time I'd ever see you. Anyway, open the box. I would have given it to you this morning, except... like I said, I was freaking out.
 Ann Arbor?
 I have all your notebook doodles memorized, Jam... Here.
 Peter Criss is my inspiration, man. If I paid a hundred bucks for a KISS show and all I saw was his solo, I'd consider it... money... Hey, how'd you know that?
 Your man is the drummer, Peter Criss, right?
 I dunno. I think he had the piece of skin under his tongue removed so he could stick it out farther. I'm not too up on Gene trivia.
 So. Is it true that Gene Simmons had a cow's tongue grafted onto his real one? Y'know, to make it so long?
 Oh, screw it!
 Right, slow...
 We've got to take this slow...
 You don't know how long I've been waiting to hear that... Jam!
 Beth, I can't believe you just said that because that's exactly how I've always felt about you... Call me Jam. It's my band name.
 I've loved you ever since I first laid eyes on you, Jeremiah. I've just always been too scared to show it.
 I don't care. I wanna hear more.
 I didn't mean for that to be so... intense. Forgive me.
 Believe it.
 Beth? I can't believe it.
 Yeah?
 Jeremiah?
 It's okay.
 Sorry.
 Thanks.
 No problem.
 Whatever... stella.
 Oh, God, how calculating of me to lead you all on like that after you offered me a ride in the middle of nowhere.
 You got in the car, didn't you?
 Tease? What the hell did I do to tease you mongoloids?
 What? That's disgusting!
 So, are you, like, gonna polish our nobs, or what?
 What the hell is that supposed to mean?
 What's it worth to you?
 Oh, great. I just hitched a ride with a bunch of potheads... I'm hooking up with some people at this funky place in downtown Detroit called Disco Inferno. Mind droppin' me there?
 Plenty, but it was all bad.
 Any luck?
 For the next hour and a half it's every dude for himself. Try to get at least one ticket and at 8:30 P.M. we'll meet over there.
 One more time in English.
 ...at twenty-thirty hours.
 Brilliance, Trip. Sheer brilliance. Give Albert Einstein here the Nobel Prize.
 Waitaminit, dudes! I got it! We find four really small kids, beat the shit outta them and steal their tickets. What do you think?
 So maybe we got enough for one ticket. Fuck!
 Really, Jam, you tryin' to make us barf?
 I have one question. How could a kid who wails on the drums like it's the only thing keeping him alive even think of such a femmy thing to say?
 Oh, I'll remember it till the day I die. His name was... Simpleton the Simian? No, Samson Samoan... No, simply, similar...
 What was that D.J.'s name again?
 Disco blows dogs for quarters.
 You call that John Travolta/Denny Terio shit dancing? I wouldn't dance like that in private if you paid me.
 Pizza, and I been jones-in' for a pizza ever since we left St. Bernard's.
 What's in Sandusky?
 Let's stop in Sandusky, Hawk.
 Totally. All I've had for chow was a packet of Pop Rocks and a Yoo-hoo.
 I'm starvin' and it's way past lunchtime.
 I was just explaining to Lex here what you and I already know. Just had to make it a little more complicated so he'd understand.
 Just for the record, I understood the last part of what you said, but for a while there you guys were making no fucking sense whatsoever.
 Well, the least we, his only buds in the world, can do is take him along with us tonight and give him one last curl before he starts serving his sentence.
 Our band "Mystery" is a quartet and we can't go on the road without our drummer. Jam's mom said something about sending him to St. Bernard's, right? We gotta bust him out before we go anywhere.
 Namely?
 Stan Lee couldn't think of a better one.
 This is the best thing that ever happened to me at school! Not only are we on again for KISS in Detroit, but we're actually sitting right at the fifty yard line! I dare you dudes to find a curlier scenario.
 Maybe some tunage'll chase those blues away.
 Wonder if you could smoke shit out of this?
 For once Lex is right. It's over. Things can't get any worse from here.
 Yeah.
 What are you, high?
 Nah. Couldn't be.
 No... You don't think...?
 Tickets?
 I found the Volvo.
 Still too risky for my money.  We're running out of time here. This is KISS! A victory for one is a victory for the team. I'm sure I can barter with a scalper, but if you dudes think you got better plans, go for it. We'll reconvene at that intersection...
 Okay, one of us sneaks in, gets four ticket stubs off some kids in the audience, comes back out, and we all "re-enter" the concerto. Voila!
 Four dudes sneaking in? We'd get busted fer sure. Bad plan.
 I think we should try sneaking in.
 Okay, shut the fuck up, Lex! Now, then, step number one, we find us a scalper. I got...  twenty-five.
 ...Holy shit! I am in absolute trouble! I never should have let you drive, man! Absolute fuckin' trouble!
 Cool, bro, now listen up...
 ...I mean, my mom's got insurance. What's the worst thing she could do? Ground me for the entire year? I can handle that...
 Now listen up. Here's the game plan.
 Wake up, Lex. This is Detroit. The cops aren't gonna waste city dollars looking for a Swedish car. Face it, the Volvo's on a cutting board as we speak getting sliced, diced, and julienned by Christine, the chop shop gourmet.
 Here's a suggestion. Let's stop worrying about the concert for the time being and get the cops in on this Volvo situation.
 DUDES!
 Now there's a woman who totally abuses the privilege of motherhood.
 Uh... dudes?
 The paint!
 What the fuck!
 Lex, am I gonna have to lock you in the trunk till we reach Detroit? Don't worry, these babies are built for speed.
 Jeezis, Hawk, can you at least keep it within twenty miles of the speed limit?
 Next stop: the 2:45 to Detroit Rock City!
 We got you a change of duds when we picked up the car.
 Gimme a second, dudes. Lemme think.
 Now, how are we gonna do this?
 Wait a minute. We ditching the rest of school?
 Ok, dudes, follow my lead.
 Curly.
 Very funny, Hawk. Okay, I'm in on this hare-brained scheme, but if anything happens to my mom's car, I'm blaming you. I'll say you drugged me or something.
 Well, Jam is in absolute trouble. He couldn't get any deeper into shit if he was a fly sitting in a horse's ass. You know as well as me he'd give his right arm just to see Peter Criss's drum solo, never mind a whole KISS concert, check?
 The hypothetical temperature characterized by the absence of heat and even the slightest amount of molecular activity? Yeah, I'm vaguely familiar
 There's only so much trouble an individual can get into till it just doesn't matter anymore, Lex. You familiar with a condition known as Absolute Zero?
 Then lighten up. She'll never know we touched it. Alright, here's the plan. We bus it to chez Lex, grab the Volvo, bail Jam the hell outta St. Bernard's and arrive at the train station precisely on time for the 2:45 to Detroit.
 Sunday, but...
 And when is she due back from that groinecologist's convention anyway?
 Hawk, all I need is one ding on the Volvo and presto! There are my balls hanging from the rearview mirror after she gets back from Cincinnati.
 Damn straight we are.
 We are not stealing my mom's car.
 So? Your mom's car has a CB, radar detector and cruise control, check?
 But... but, St. Bernard's is way the hell over in the next county!
 Never mind with the too bad shit. I got a crazy plan, but only the craziest among us can pull it off.
 Too bad we're stuck in electronics or...
 Weird...
 I have never heard a girl squeeze cheese in my entire life.
 Whoa... she just farted.
 I've been in love with her since the second grade.
 That's Sherry VanHafton.
 Check!
 Second floor girls' john! Two minutes! He'll never look there!
 Okay, enough. Enough. Gimme the tickets. I wanna hold onto them.
 Yeah, she gives you shit and you take it.
 YO, DOOFUS!
 Shit, that dork is Jam.
 Stellas. I hate stellas almost as much as I hate dogs.
 Will somebody please tell those chicks disco is dead.
 Sure.
 How would you like a nice Hawaiian Punch?
 Oh, yeah...?
 Okay. Ahem! You. Are. A. Dick. With. Ears. And. A. Really. Bad. Haircut.
 Excuse me, I'm a little deef-a- hearin'. Can you repeat yourself?
 Well, let's recap, shall we? You slapped all of us, yelled at me, used my head for a rag, threw me on the ground and tossed our LOVE GUN 8- track under the wheels of a passing semi.  So, if the lesson was that you're a dick with ears and a really bad haircut, then, yes... I'd say we learned it.
 No, I'm dumber than a goddamn slug. Now can I please clean your windshield and leave without further ado?
 Are you gettin' wise with me?
 And if it ain't cleaned off?
 Could be.
 Hey, disco dude, it's cool...
 Do you realize the sheer, goddamn, unadulterated, undiluted, no holds barred, one hundred percent pure as Ivory Snow, absolutely friggin' STUPIDITY of what you just did?
 Chief, here's a little secret. Drink heavily, your feet will know what to do. Now shit or get off the pot. Do you wanna dance or do you wanna see KISS only on their album covers?
 Hey, I invented fake I.D.s, alright. That's not the problem... They're playing disco music in there, man.
 Yeah, you're probably too young anyhow.
 Dude, if it were dancing the way Fred Astaire did it, I'd give it my best shot. I'd learn the steps and practice in my spare time. But this... tribal, ritualistic bullshit, it's way-too-spontaneous for me.
 Guess you don't want to see the greatest show on earth. And in Detroit no less. Well, take care, chief.
 I can't just walk in and take my clothes off. It's embarrasskin.
 You look a little scrawny, but it's worth a shot.
 The easy way.
 Where the hell am I gonna scare up that kinda gravy in one hour?
 Sorry, man, no can do. But I'll be here for a while if you scare up the extra gravy.
 Dude, this is all I got.
 We all beat each other up, then, once we're nice and bruised, we run over to the ticket takers and say we got mugged and our tickets were stolen. They gotta let us in then.
 Go ahead, Jam.
 Well... I still got my idea if anybody will let me speak.
 See you at 8:30, Jam. Later.  Dudes? Later.
 But... my plan involves all four of us acting together.
 Jam, shut-up! You're not allowed to speak, remember? Go use whatever femmy idea you have to get yourself a ticket or four. I don't wanna hear it.
 Wait! I know how we can get in!
 Uh-uh. Don't tell us, Jam. Just show us.
 I got...
 Jam, not another word out of your femmy-ass mouth! Okay, we're here, we got nothing, and we got an hour and a half. We're totally committed. It's time to brainstorm.
 I'm sorry, guys. I thought it was a nice thing to do.
 Christine stole it! Asleep, my ass! The stella booted with your mom's wheels.
 It was stolen!
 Please, Jam, we're trying to vent some hostility here. Sure the whole thing may be your fault, but who's gonna get pissed off at you?
 Guys, GUYS! Come on, if this is anyone's fault, it's mine. I was the one who grabbed Trip's jacket by mistake. It's my fault and I apologize.
 Oh, I'm sorry, Trip. What you made was a big, brainless, pile of horse shit. No offense.
 Kind of funny, I thought He'd be pissed as hell at me.
 Hey, Look at the front entrance! A car's pulling out. The parking space from heaven. God is surely smiling down upon us tonight, dudes.
 Disco Inferno? Disco's infernal morelike.
 It doesn't mean anything. Don't pay attention to him.
 Well, couldn't you slow down so I can at least state my case, Hawk? If you don't like it, you can speed up and I'll never mention it again.
 Oh no, Jam. I'm not falling for that twice.
 What?! Are you mentally deranged, Jam?
 Don't you think we should at least pull over and offer to clean it off?
 Check.
 If he offers you a slice, you're not the least bit hungry, check?
 Check.
 All right. After school we double- time it to your house for the tix before heading to the train station for the 2:45 to Detroit Rock City.
 Don't worry about it. They're perfectly safe. We can pick them up after school. My mom won't be home. It's no problem.
 She was standing right over me when I was changing for fuck's sake.
 They're what?
 They're still at my house in Trip's jacket.
 Of course, but has that ever stopped me before? Besides, my mom's going to some church meeting and won't be back till late. No sweat... See you guys in school.
 Don't be a fembot. So, are you like grounded because of last night, or what?
 I'm really sorry about that, man.
 Cool.
 Just check whatever you were wearing last night. Now!
 Gone!? Why would I have the KISS tick...?
 The KISS tickets, you nimrod! They're just fuckin' gone! Please tell me you have'm!
 What's gone?
 Anyway, listen up. They're gone!
 It's my Bullworker.
 Are you on the crapper with one of those antenna phones? Sounds like you're taking a dump the size of Butte, Montana.
 Just listen up, man, cause we are in a quandary.
 Hawk?
 Jam, listen up.
 I just lost my virginity in a confessional booth! Lord have mercy!!
 Jeremiah... what's gotten into you?
 Just keep your lying, heathenous trap shut, Jeremiah.
 Mom, what're we...?
 If you truly are sorry, son, then you better pray like you've never prayed before. God willed me to find those tickets because He wanted to hear from you.  He knows you need help and He wants you to ask Him for it.
 I said, I'm sorry!
 What?!
 If I'm anything like you, I'll deserve him.
 Someday you'll have a son just like you, Jeremiah. A boy who lies through his teeth, buys demonic records, and smokes the dope just like you.
 What else can I do? Oh, records and magazines and comic books are one thing, but tickets? TICKETS? Jeremiah, do you realize what this means? That you're no longer content merely hearing their awful songs or looking at photos of their horrific faces! Now you want to see the devil in the flesh. You want to reach out and touch pure evil... and in Detroit no less!
 You mean, you're sending me to... b- b-boarding school?
 I made an appointment with Father Phillip McNulty at St. Bernard's. We're to see him directly where he will register you on the spot.
 You're a smart boy, Jeremiah. And so handsome.
 Grounded for the rest of the year?
 Now don't forget you're on the honor system tonight. I'll be home a little after one and if you've been partying or playing that satanic KISS music... well, need I remind you of the consequences?
 They're not idiots.
 Besides, those jeans are so tight I can see your penis.
 But, mom!
 It's dirty laundry for one thing and for another, you still haven't worn the clothes I bought you. You're skating on thin ice already, young man, so I wouldn't push my luck. Now get out of those rags.
 Change? What's wrong with what I got on?
 You're going to be late if you don't hurry up and change soon.
 Ahh, sunshine.
 Uhh... nothing.
 Jeremiah, what are you doing?
 NOW!
 Oh, hi, mom.
 Splendid! I love a good game of Name That Nightie.
 Tell you what. You keep guessing and I'll say something when you get it.
 A bustier?
 No. Much bet... I mean, much more sinful than that.
 Was it a teddy?
 Okay... when she peeled off that gown, you'll never guess what she was wearing underneath.
 Well? Continue! Continue!
 Well, she was a very tempting siren, Father. Built like you wouldn't believe. So I gave into temptation about a block away from the wedding reception at this little motel that charges by the hour.
 Oh, this is terrible... Please go on.
 I was insulted, so I asked her if I was wreaking some wicked b.o., right? Then she said no, she wanted to take a bath with me.
 No...
 Alright, Father, here it is. About two weeks ago I went to my cousin's wedding and one of the bridesmaids asked me if I wanted to take a bath.
 Okay, you better have something really sinful for me this time, son. My patience is worn to threads and your mom will be here any minute.
 Well then, I suggest you have a seat on the bench behind you and think of something a little juicier to confess than losing KISS tickets. I realize this is Detroit, but I personally find, what that rock and roll band is all about, to be boring as Lucifer's kingdom. I'll return in a little while.
 No.
 Well, this is a unique confession to say the least, son. And not exactly the most interesting one I've ever heard either. You sure you don't want to talk about... oh, carnal knowledge with a neighborhood girl or impure thoughts about the new student teacher maybe... or how about finding a box of magazines under your dad's bed?
 Yeah.
 That's it?
 So, you see if it wasn't for me, me and my friends would be at that KISS concert right now... together.
 Just one, Father, but boy was it a doozy.
 Prepare to receive the Act of Penance. How many sins have you committed since your last confession?
 Forgive me, Father, for I have sinned. This is my first confession in... well... a really long time.
 All I got is five. The rest is in the Volvo.
 Twenty-five more'n I got.
 Okay, I'm just a little mad now! Jam, why'd you talk us into picking that bitch up in the first place!?
 Damn, she musta hot wired it. We picked up a professional car thief in the shape of Olivia Newton-John!
 But we took the keys?
 I can see that, bright boy. What happened to it?
 It's gone.
 Fuck you, Lex! This whole thing wouldn't have happened if it wasn't for you jinxing us. I just made an honest mistake.
 Really, Trip, can we bore holes in your head and use it as a bong so it actually does us some good for a change?
 Let's lift up her shirt.
 Man, that weed knocked Christine on her ass. She's sleeping like a baby stella.
 Trip, huck that out before it stains the upholstery!
 Eyowch! This is one hot pizza!
 Huh. St. Bernard's. Figures it's named after a canine.
 Well, here we are back at fucking school again.
 Hello summer detention.
 About fuckin' time if you ask me. I'm just going through the motions till I drop out anyway.
 Simple-icity is more like it. And you guys thought Jam was in trouble before. Wait till Mrs. Bruce finds out he went to that concert with us.
 Simplicity, Hawk.
 Yeah? I have a saying too, Lex. It goes, "Catch my jizz in your mouth and stop jinxing us, asshole." We're going this time and that's all there is to it.
 The Chinese have a proverb: "That which appears too good to be true, usually is." There's gotta be a catch.
 We won?!
 I did it! I did it! We won!
 Smug, Trip! Not snug, smug.
 Oh, everything's hunky-dory now that the shit hit the fan just like you said it would, you snug sonofabitch! You fuckin' jinxed us!
 Trip, it's not the end of the world, okay? Quit acting all squeezed out.
 Wake up, Lex! We just watched Jam's mom torch our fuckin' KISS tickets! Not REO Speedwagon! Not Journey! Not the Bay City Rollers! KISS! If you can think of a better reason to trash a bathroom, I'd sure like to hear it!
 Hey, take it easy, man. This is the girls' crapper, remember?
 Waitaminit, dudes! I got it! Maybe we can glue the tickets back together!
 I knew it! I knew this was gonna happen! I had a bad feeling since last night. Remember? We are so totally fucked!
 If your mom so much as smells those tickets, they're history, and we get screwed outta seeing KISS for the third year in a row, the third year!
 That's some sick shit right there. Did she comb your ass hair for you too?
 You know what they say about a big ass... big shit.
 Yeah, right. She wishes. Look at that big ass.
 What?
 Trip, you fuckin' asshole.
 Shrooms! And even if it was LSD, I can still give my mom a kiss without smelling the catch of the day.
 Trip, a female gynecologist does not a lesbian make. And even if it did, at least my mom didn't give birth to me while she was on LSD.
 You're one to talk, Lex. Your mom's a fuckin' dyke.
 Poor, Jam, man. Imagine having to stash your KISS records inside Carly Simon album covers. No question, Mrs. Bruce is a psycho-bitch from hell.
 I had a nightmare once that something like this might happen. I hope he doesn't get grounded again. If he misses Peter Criss's drum solo, I don't know if he'll be able to handle it.
 Jam has yet to do an overnight with us.
 Look, I want to live, but I don't know where the fuck I'm gonna find two hundred bucks.
 You heard me, nad breath. My time's precious and I think that's a reasonable price to pay for your sorry life.
 Two hundred bucks?
 Say, Chongo, perhaps we could use some extra cash for tasty snacks at the KISS concert our weasly friend won't be attending.
 Please, sir, don't kick my ass! I'll do anything to get out of a beating!
 It's not nearly enough, punk.
 Look, you can have my wallet...
 A tag on your toe. Nobody threatens me and lives.
 What do you want?
 Don't try to run, maggot. Chongo's an all-state track star in every event.
 Hey, kid, that's okay. I don't wanna see KISS that ba...
 No really. My brother's hanging onto it for safe keeping. Please, let me get him for you.
 A likely story. Hand it over, kid.
 Please sir, don't beat me up. I do have a KISS ticket, but not on me.
 Neither do I!
 I don't even think you have a gun!
 Not if I shoot first!
 Don't tempt me, I'll shoot!
 No, you gimme your gun, boy!
 Gimme your gun, boy!
 The KISS Army!
 Oh, yeah! You and what army?
 Whoa, easy, Trip, this is radio, not "Taxi Driver." Now listen up cause this next part is crucial. Stay on the line so we can get your full name, information, and...
 Yeeeehaaawww!! This is totally fuckin' curly, man! Thank you God!
 Yeah, you did!
 I did?
 Trip? You just got yourself four tickets and four backstage passes to KISS live at Cobo Hall tonight!
 Yeah.
 Is that your final answer?
 Gene Klein, Stanley Eisen, Paul Frehley, and Peter...Criscula! Yeah, that's it!
 I should hang up on you right now, but you're the right caller so answer quick or get your battleship sunk. What are the names of the four members of KISS?
 Hello? Is this me? I'm Trip. Am I on the air?
 Simple Simon on the Rock, go caller.
 Now that's what I like to hear!  Because too many young men and women today are paralysed by their fears. They give in to their feelings of self-doubt... they surrender their bodies to the temptations of drugs, alcohol and premarital sex. Empty solutions. These are toxic chemicals... and disease-spreading behaviour.
 GOOD MORNING!
 Are you AFRAID?
 GOOD MORNING!
 Now that's better... but I still sense some students out there... who are AFRAID... just to say GOOD MORNING!
 Good MORNING!
 That's all the gusta you can musta? I said, "Good morning!"
 Good morning...
 Good morning, mongrels!
 Did you know him?
 Yeah.
 I feel bad for his family.
 Donnie. Donnie Darko.
 What was his name?
 He got smooshed. By a jet engine.
 What happened?
 Horrible accident. My neighbour... he got killed.
 Hi... what's going on here?
 Donnie, I'm afraid I can't continue this conversation. I could lose my job.
 Not if you chose to stay within God's channel...
 You are contradicting yourself, Donnie. If we could see our destines manifest themselves visually... then we would be given the choice to betray our chosen destinies. The very fact that this choice exists... would mean that all pre-formed destiny would end.
 If you could see your path or channel growing out of your stomach, you could see into the future. And that's a form of time travel, right?
 I'm not following you.
 If God controls time... then all time is pre-decided. Then every living thing travels along a set path.
 That... is highly unlikely. You're talking about an act of God.
 Could these wormholes appear in nature?
 Uhh... sure. And in order for the vessel to travel through time it must find the portal, in this case the wormhole, or some unforeseen portal that lies undiscovered.
 Like a spear that comes out of your stomach?
 Beg pardon?
 Like a spear.
 Each vessel travels along a vector path through space-time... along its centre of gravity.
 Did you stop and think that maybe infants need darkness? That darkness is part of their natural development.
 Well... the thing is, nobody remembers their infancy. And anyone who says they do is lying. We think that this would help develop memory earlier in life.
 What effect do you think this would have on an infant?
 A metal craft of any kind.
 Like a DeLorean.
 The basic principles of time travel are there.  So you have the vessel and the portal. And the vessel can be anything. Most likely a spacecraft.
 So... that's it?
 A wormhole with an Einstein-Rosen bridge, which is, theoretically... a wormhole in space controlled by man.
 -- and be able to find one of these wormholes.
 Theoretically.
 So... in order to travel back in time, you'd have to have a big spaceship or something that can travel faster than the speed of light --
 So... according to Hawking... wormholes might be able to provide a short cut for jumping between two distant regions of space-time.
 I know that this is gonna sound kinda weird... but do you know anything about time travel?
 Donnie.
 Dr. Monnitoff?
 Donnie! Give it back!
 "The Last Unicorn!" By Samantha Darko.
 You'll put Ariel in the garbage disposal.
 What happens if you tell Mom and Dad about this, Samantha?
 I'm telling Mom.
 When you fall asleep tonight, I'm gonna fart in your face.
 Why do I have to sleep with Donnie? He stinks.
 Not until like... eighth grade.
 When can I squeeze one out?
 Our saviour...
 What did you say?
 Dea ex machina...
 You know what? I think that you did it.
 Well, if you're innocent, then you have nothing to worry about.
 That's not what I heard. Now they think I did it.
 I didn't say shit.
 Did you tell them that I flooded the school?
 You should already know that.  Watch the movie, Donnie. I have something to show you.
 How much longer is this gonna last?
 It is the name of my father... and his father before me.
 Why do they call you Frank?
 I am so sorry.
 What happened to your eye?
 Take it off. I want to see you.
 Why are you wearing that stupid man suit?
 Yeah. Tell me why you're wearing that stupid bunny suit.
 You have a request?
 You have to do something for me first.
 I want to show you something.
 Do you believe in time travel, Donnie?
 Where did you come from?
 You'll know soon enough.
 Who is... we?
 We just want to guide you in the right direction.
 Why did you make me flood the school?
 I can do anything I want... and so can you...
 How can you do that?
 Go home. Go home and tell your parents that everything is going to be just fine.
 What'd you do, Donnie? What'd you do!
 A hundred and one, I think. Every day she does the same thing. But there's never any mail.
 How old is Grandma Death?
 I don't wanna talk about it.
 My dad said he found you on the golf course. Are you sleepwalking again?
 We went to a hotel.
 DARKO CHEATS DEATH! Man... you're famous! I called you, like, a jillion times last night!
 Yeah...
 Is that a cellar door?
 Who's Frank?
 No. Frank.
 Why? Is this about the book?
 Time is running out. We have to go see Grandma Death. We have to talk to her.
 Where are we going?
 Come with me.
 There's something you have to know, Gretchen.  Everything is going to be just fine.
 What?
 It's safe here.
 I'm so scared... I just keep thinking that something awful has happened. It's my fucking stepdad. I know it.
 Yeah, they told me to get out of the house.
 Did you call the cops?
 But you're OK?
 I don't know. She didn't leave a note. The house is all messed up.
 Where is she?
 My mom is gone.
 Hey. You OK?
 Hey.
 Then when? I have to talk to you.
 Not now, Donnie. It isn't a good time.
 Will you please talk to me?
 What do you mean?
 What's wrong with you?
 You want to skip fourth period and go to the Ridge?
 The whole movie. Let's go.
 What? How long was I asleep?
 And inside these glasses are these slide photographs. And each photograph is of something peaceful... or beautiful. Whatever pictures the parent wants to put inside.
 Yeah. So the idea is that... you buy these glasses for your infant, and they wear them at night when they sleep.
 Infant Memory Generators.
 So, we call them... IMGs.
 Maybe she's asleep.
 I know she's here. She never leaves the house.
 She wrote it.  There are chapters in this book that describe the stuff I've been seeing. It can't just be a coincidence.  Will you come see her with me?
 Oh, yeah.  "The Philosophy of Time Travel". What is this?
 The old crazy woman who lives off Old Gun Road.
 Who?
 I've been seeing stuff... a lot of really messed-up stuff.  Do you know who Grandma Death is?
 Are you okay?
 They suspended me for two days.
 What?
 We're moving through time.
 Yeah. And right now there's some fat guy over there watching us.
 I always wanted it to be at a time when... when it reminds you how beautiful the world can be.
 No... Donnie, wait. I've never...
 That's alright... I understand.
 You want to kiss me...
 Well...
 And what?
 You know... we've been going together for a week and a half...
 Like... a Hawaiian sunset... the Grand Canyon. Things that remind you how beautiful the world can be.
 With, like, images?
 That's not good enough. You've got to go back in time and take all those hours of darkness and pain and replace them... with whatever you wanted.
 Why not just buy your baby a night light?
 Babies cry because they're afraid of the dark. And because they have no memories... for all they know... every night could be the last forever. Like, perpetual darkness.
 I don't want to talk about it.  So what happened to your neck?
 What happened to your neck?
 Well... maybe someone is, like... giving you these dream steroids. And sleepwalking ...is someone showing you the way.
 Why?
 Do you ever feel as though there's always someone watching you?
 Yeah?
 Donnie?
 And you'd never been there before?
 No. Every time I wake up somewhere different. Sometimes my bike is laying there next to me. Like once when I woke up on the edge of this cliff up on Carpathian Ridge.
 So when you sleepwalk, you go somewhere familiar?
 It's like this big force... that's in your brain. But sometimes it grows bigger... and it spread down into your arms and legs... and it just sends you someplace.
 My dad said never wake a sleepwalker... because they could drop dead.
 No. I just wake up and I look around, try to figure out where I am... how I got there.
 So when you sleepwalk, can you remember afterward? Like, do you dream?
 I'm going home.
 Where are you going?
 Sure.
 No... I mean, will you GO with me? That's like... what they call it here. Going together.
 Where are we going?
 Will you go with me?
 That was a compliment.
 I'm sorry.
 You're weird.
 We never would have had this conversation.
 Why is that?
 It's a good thing the school was flooded today.
 Until it withers away.
 The best thing about soap is that it's the only thing on earth that can never get dirty. No matter what crap you throw on it... it always rubs off. And there it is again... perfect.
 Wonder where we'll be then.
 Don't knock soap. Without it, disease would spread rapidly. If we ran out... you and I would never live to see the year 2000.
 You mean soap?
 I mean, the whole sanitation thing. Joseph Lister... 1895. Before antiseptics there was no sanitation, especially in medicine.
 That's easy. Antiseptics.
 I should go. For physics. Monnitoff says I have to write an essay on the greatest invention ever to benefit mankind.
 What makes you think I'm not?
 Donnie Darko is a cool name. Sounds like a superhero.
 I'm sorry. I was in jail once.  I accidentally burned down this house. It was abandoned. I got held back in school again. Can't drive until I'm eighteen.  I think when I grow up I want to be a painter. Or maybe a writer or maybe both. Then I'll write a book and draw the illustrations like a comic book. You know, change things.
 He fled. They still can't find him.  My mom and I had to change our names and stuff. I thought Gretchen sounded kind of cool.
 Wow. Did he go to jail?
 He stabbed my mom four times in the chest.
 Oh, I... have those too.  What kind of problems does your dad have?
 Yeah. My parents got divorced. My mom has a restraining order against my stepdad.  He has... emotional problems.
 So... you just moved here?
 Fuck them.
 I'm not. But you should check your backpack 'cause those guys like to steal shit.
 Don't look so freaked.
 Sure.
 Wanna walk me home?
 School's cancelled.
 Hey...
 Hey...
 If you don't complete the assignment, you'll get a zero for the day.
 People aren't that simple.
 Well, yeah... OK, but you're not listening to me. There are other things that need to be taken into account here. Like the whole spectrum of human emotion. You're just lumping everything into these two categories... and, like, denying everything else.
 Fear and love are the deepest of human emotions.
 Well, life isn't that simple. So what if Ling Ling kept the cash and returned the wallet? That has nothing to do with either fear or love.
 The Lifeline is divided that way.
 I just don't get this. Everything can't be lumped into two categories. That's too simple.
 Just place an X in the appropriate place on the Lifeline.
 I'm sorry, Ms. Farmer, I just don't get this.
 It feels wonderful.
 How does it feel to have a wacko for a son?
 If I'm lucky.  So... I won't be back until the first. Your dad will be back on Sunday, so I've put Elizabeth in charge until then. She has the car... so she can drive you to your therapy tomorrow.
 Do you get to meet Ed?
 I have to take the girls to Los Angeles tomorrow.
 Fine. You know, Dr. Thurman isn't so bad a lady. I can tell her anything.
 He can't, Samantha. He's been suspended from after-school activities. Donnie... are you still with us?  How was your therapy session tonight?
 That is a terrible nickname.
 Grandma Death.
 Then why don't you start taking the goddamn pills?
 You know... it would be nice to look at you some time... and see my son. I don't recognise this person today.
 I stopped rolling houses in the sixth grade, Mom.  Get out of my room.
 I wish I knew where you went at night.  Did you toilet paper the Johnson's house?
 We will not have this kind of language at the dinner table.
 Oh, please tell me, Elizabeth, how exactly does one suck a fuck?
 When did you stop taking your medication?
 You're such a fuck-ass.
 No, a year of partying is enough. She'll be going to Harvard this fall.
 Will you still be working at Yarn Barn? 'Cause that's a great place to raise children.
 I know I'm not the best... communicator.  But whatever happens in your life... whatever obstacles you come up against... you just say... and do whatever is in your heart. You be honest... and tell the truth... even if they look at you funny... and they will. They'll tell you that you're wrong. They'll call you a fool.  But what you've got to understand, son, is that almost all of those people are full of bullshit... and they're scared of people like you. Because you're smarter than all of them.
 I know, Dad.
 You're my only son...
 A lot of people. Teachers. Younger kids. It's like they're afraid of me for some reason.  But that's OK... because I know I deserve it.
 Who's been giving you weird looks?
 I guess she just lost faith in the world.
 You're right. Roberta Sparrow was famous for her gem collections. Kids used to try and steal stuff from her all the time. Over the years... as she got older, she became more and more of a recluse... now she just likes to stay up there all by herself.
 You know, Roberta Sparrow. We almost hit her with the car the other day.
 Grandma Death.
 Grandma Death.
 Oh, shit!
 You tell Dr. Thurman whatever you want.
 So we're not supposed to tell anybody what nobody knows?
 No... apparently they can't tell us what happened yet. Something about a matching serial number that got burned.  But I had to sign a form saying I wouldn't talk to anyone about it.
 Where it came from?
 Know what?
 Do they know yet?
 Good Lord.  So the construction guys say it'll take about a week to fix the roof. Damn airline better not fuck us on the shingle match.
 It was great. We had peanut-butter sandwiches and apples and honey at snacktime. And then during show-and- tell, my stuffed walrus was a big hit.
 So how was school today?
 Then go find her, Donnie. Don't let her get away.  She was right about the rabbits. Go.
 I think I already have.  But now she won't even talk to me.
 So... will Donnie find his Cellar Door?
 Sometimes it's the only thing that keeps us going.
 Cellar door.
 A famous linguist once said... that of all the phrases in the English language, of all the endless combinations of words in all of history... that "Cellar Door" is the most beautiful.
 What's "Cellar Door"?
 Tell them that everything is going to be just fine.  It is up to the children to save themselves these days. Because the parents... they don't have a clue.
 What do I tell the rest of the class when they ask about you?
 Thank you, Donnie. And you're a good student. Lazy... but a good student. Unlike most of the others, you question Mom and Dad's rules.
 That's bullshit. You're a good teacher.
 I don't know. That's a good question... but suffice to say that I am no longer your English teacher. They fired me.
 Where are you going?
 Donnie... it's Friday. Shouldn't you be off with your friends, scaring old people?
 Ms. Pomeroy... what's going on?
 Of course. A rabbit is not like us. It has no history books... it has no knowledge of sorrow or regret. I like bunnies and all. They're cute... and they're horny. And if you're cute and horny... then you're probably happy that you don't know who you are... or why you're even alive. But the only thing I've known rabbits to do is have sex as many times as possible before they die.
 Is the death of one species less tragic than another?
 Why should I mourn for a rabbit like it was a human?
 Because the rabbits are us, Donnie.
 Why should we care?
 And when the other rabbits hear of Fiver's vision, do they believe him?  It could be the death of an entire way of life, the end of an era.
 A six-foot-tall bunny rabbit.
 Who is Frank?
 Well... they say it right when they are ripping the place to shreds. When they flood the house. That like... destruction is a form of creation. So the fact that they burn the money is... ironic. They just want to see what happens when they tear the world apart.  They want to change things.
 Donnie Darko, perhaps, given your recent brush with mass destruction, you can give us your opinion?
 Goodbye, Donald.
 Goodbye, Dr. Thurman.
 Donald, an atheist is someone who denies altogether the existence of a God. You are an agnostic. An agnostic is someone who believes that there can be no proof of the existence of God... but does not deny the possibility that God exists.
 Thank you.
 Your medication. They're placebos. Just pills made out of water.
 You will survive this... Donald. I promise you that you will survive. You must let me help you.  And when I clap my hands together, you will wake up.
 It's too late. I've already ruined my life.
 If the sky were to suddenly open up... there would be no law... there would be no rule. There would only be you and your memories... the choices you've made and the people you've touched. The life that has been carved out from your subconscious is the only evidence by which you will be judged... by which you must judge yourself. Because when this world ends, there will only be you and him... and no one else.
 He's right there... He can read my mind and he'll show me the way out of this. The sky is going to open up... and then He will reveal himself to me.
 Where is he, Donald?
 I can see him right now!
 Who is he going to kill?
 Frank is going to kill.
 What is going to happen?
 Soon. Time is almost up.
 When will this happen?
 It would have to be God's portal. They will lead me to it. Then I will go back in time... and I won't feel regret anymore.
 Then how is time travel possible?
 Grandma Death will teach me how. Soon.
 How is that possible?
 I have the power to build a time machine.
 Where are we going, Donald?
 Where are we going?
 I think so. I think that's one of the clues. It's a clue that tells us... to keep going.
 God exists because you're horny.
 Because I'm so horny.
 Why?
 I think now that he might...
 If God exists?
 I have to obey him... because he saved my life. He controls me and I have to obey him or I'll be left all alone... and I'll never figure out what all of this means...
 Why did you do these things, Donnie? Did Frank tell you to commit these crimes?
 Yes. I flooded my school... and I burned down that pervert's house. I think I only have a few days left... before they catch me.
 You've done it again?
 That I did it again.
 What else makes you feel regret?
 Regret.
 How did you feel... being denied those Hungry Hungry Hippos?
 Hungry Hungry Hippos.
 What did you want for Christmas that year?
 They... didn't buy me what I wanted for Christmas that year.
 Do you wish that you were punished by your parents instead?
 Yes. I went to jail.
 But you were punished.
 People get hurt. I don't want to hurt anyone.
 But it was an accident. The house was under construction.
 People get hurt.
 Is it Frank who wants you to destroy the world, to set the world on fire?
 I... I was playing with fire.
 So, your parents... why did you disappoint them?
 Yes.
 And when I clap my hands together twice, you will wake up. Do you understand?
 Have you ever made love, Donald?
 Yeah... you know...  Fucking.
 The good stuff.
 I mean... Gretchen... She won't even let me kiss her. She says because it's our first kiss... she's, like, waiting for this big... moment or something. I just don't get it. I just want to get it over with so we can move on to the good stuff.
 I know.
 Whoa.  That's OK, Dr. Thurman, it's nothing to be embarrassed about. I have sexual fantasies all the time too.
 You know... every week I come in here and I tell you stuff... and it's all embarrassing. I tell you stuff that I don't tell anyone else... and you know what? It's your turn, Dr. Thurman. I'm not saying anything else until you tell me something embarrassing about yourself.
 Are you embarrassed by these things that you see?
 Yeah, but if I told her about the other stuff about Frank...
 Have you told Gretchen about the spears?
 Nothing.
 What did you find?
 It was just like she described them in her book. Like they were alive. The way that they looked... moved... smelled. They were like workers... assigned to each one of us.  I followed my spear... and I found something...
 And they grow out of our stomachs?
 No. That makes you keep searching.
 I'd like to believe that I'm not... but I've just never seen any proof. So I just choose not to bother with it. It's, like, I could spend my whole life thinking about it... debating it in my head. Weighing the pros and cons. And in the end, I still wouldn't have any proof. So... I don't even debate it any more. Because it's absurd.  I don't want to be alone.  So, does that make me, like, an atheist?
 Do you feel alone right now?
 No. She died when I was eight. We couldn't find her for days. She went and crawled underneath our back porch...
 Is Callie still around?
 It reminded me of my dog Callie.
 How does that make you feel?
 I think that Frank wants me to go to this woman.  She wrote a book about time travel. Frank asked me if I believed in time travel. That can't just be a random coincidence.  My dad almost hit her with the car the other day, and she said the creepiest thing. She said that every living creature on this earth dies alone.
 A sign from whom?
 I don't know. Gretchen has a theory. That Frank is a sign. I told her I thought it was ridiculous.
 Who is they? Is Frank part of some larger group?
 I don't think so. It's like a TV station. And they're tuned into mine and no one else's.
 Can anyone else see him?
 Four times... so far.
 How many times have you seen Frank?
 Donnie... I want to hear about your friend Frank.
 No, I don't think about fucking my family. That's sick!
 What about your family, Donnie?
 I just turn the volume down and think about fucking Alyssa Milano.
 Who is the boss?
 I think... about... "Who's the Boss?"
 What else do you think about during school?
 I think about... fucking a lot during school.
 I asked you about school.
 I think about girls a lot.
 How are things going at school?
 Yes.
 Do you think a lot about girls?
 Gretchen. We're going together now.
 What is her name?
 I met a girl.
 So, tell me about your day, Donald.
 Yes.
 And when I clap my hands twice, you will wake up. Do you understand?
 No.  That's stupid.
 Do you believe that the world is coming to an end?
 Into the future.  Then he said that the world was coming to an end.
 Follow him where?
 He said to follow him.
 Frank... instructed you... to get out of bed... just before this happened.
 A jet engine fell on my house... landed on my bed. While I was talking to Frank on the golf course.
 I don't own a television.
 Don't you watch the news?
 How so?
 I think he saved my life.
 Frank.
 His name is Frank.
 Would you like to talk about this friend?
 So, I met a new friend.
 All of this... certainly isn't your mother's fault, Donald.
 I've been taking it. I just like to make her feel guilty for all of this. You know, abuse her. Psychologically.
 Your mother said that you've been skipping cycles of your medication.
 Everything is going to be just fine.
 Okay, but it has to be a small one.
 Mom and Dad won't be back until Sunday night. It's Halloween Carnival. We should throw a party. We could totally get away with it.
 Congratulations.
 I got in. I'm going to Harvard.
 That's a nice name.  OK, let me see it.
 Her name is Gretchen.
 Yeah... well, that's not the way the world works. If you keep being too honest, the world will eventually find a way to destroy you.
 I was just being honest.
 It's not that. I mean mouthing off to your teachers. I'll admit... when Dad told me what you said to Ms. Farmer, I laughed my ass off.
 Well, don't worry... I'm taking my medication.
 No I don't.  She worries about you.
 Because you tell Mom everything.
 Why would I tell Mom?
 You're not gonna tell Mom, are you?
 What's her name?
 Yeah.
 So I hear you have a girlfriend.
 Guess who wrote it?
 What does time travel have to do with philosophy?
 It's called "The Philosophy of Time Travel".
 Maybe you'd like to tell Mom and Dad why you stopped taking your medication.
 Whoa, Elizabeth. A little hostile, there. Maybe you should be the one in therapy. Then Mom and Dad can pay someone two hundred dollars an hour to listen to all of your thoughts... so we won't have to.
 Well, I think you're the fucking Anti-Christ.
 I think you are afraid to ask me for advice. I think that you are a very troubled... confused young man. I think you're searching for answers in all the wrong places.
 Well, Jim, I think you're full of shit!
 Well, Gerald, I think you're afraid.
 Gerald.
 Excuse me? What's your name, son?
 How much are they paying you to be here?
 But let me remind you that this treatment is... experimental.
 If that's what you think is necessary.
 I would like to put him through more hypnotherapy... and increase his medication.
 I... What can we do?
 He has described lengthy conversations... physical encounters with what I believe to be a manifestation of his subconscious mind.
 You're telling me my son has an imaginary friend?
 Donnie is experiencing what is commonly called a daylight hallucination.
 Frank?
 Frank... the giant bunny rabbit?
 Come again?
 Has your son ever told you about Frank?
 Well, you know about his past. And when you said to look for signs of aggression... He was recently suspended from school for insulting his gym teacher.
 What I think is going on with your son.
 Thank you for seeing us... We... just felt that it was time to discuss...
 He died, remember? On the way to the prom.  He was doomed.
 He was a year ahead of us?
 Frankie Feedler. You remember him from high school?
 What?
 You are entering a new dimension of sight and sound...
 So let me get this straight. No airline will claim ownership of the engine. So we have to wait for the FAA to decide who fixes my roof.  Fuck that. We're taking the money out of savings.
 You're not a bitch.
 Our son just called me a bitch.
 Don't worry, Mom. Just go, you'll miss your flight.
 Here are the keys to the Taurus. There's plenty of groceries in the fridge. And I left money on the kitchen table. And don't forget...
 I caught him flushing pills down the toilet. He knows you check the container.
 It is a big deal.
 I didn't realise it was such a big deal.
 How did you know --
 No. I took a year off to be with you.  Of course I care. Don't get angry.  What?
 You can suck a fuck.
 That's enough.
 Did you just call me a fuck-ass?
 Donnie? You're a dick.
 Excuse me?
 If you think Michael Dukakis will provide for this country prior to the point when you decide to squeeze one out, then I think you're misinformed.
 I haven't been accepted yet, mother.
 I guess they made him do it.
 How did this happen?
 Yep.
 Christ. Is that an axe?
 What else? Shit, Principal Cole, you ain't gonna believe what else.
 What else?
 I got twelve classrooms full of water. All coming from a busted water main.
 Rose... I don't know if you realise how great an opportunity this is for our daughters. This has been a dream of ours for a long time.  Sometimes I doubt your commitment to Sparkle Motion.
 Oh, Kitty, I don't know. This is so last-minute... Eddie is in New York...
 Yes. And believe me, of all the other mothers I would never dream of asking you, given the predicament with your son. But none of the other mothers are able to go.
 But now you can't go.
 Rose... I have to appear at his arraignment tomorrow morning. And as you know, the girls also leave for Los Angeles tomorrow morning. Now, as their coach... I was the obvious choice to chaperone them on the trip.
 Beg pardon?
 Please! Don't say those words.  Well... as you can see... many of us are devastated by this news. This is obviously some kind of conspiracy meant to destroy an innocent man. And I have taken it upon myself to spearhead the Jim Cunningham defence campaign. But unfortunately my civic duties have created a conflict of interest... which involves you.
 Yes, I saw the news. Something about a kiddie-porn dungeon.
 Rose, we have a crisis.  I am sure that you are aware of the horrible allegations against Jim Cunningham.
 Kitty...
 Rose.
 Rose, I'll tell you this because our daughters have been on dance team together for two years and I respect you as a WOMAN. But after witnessing your son's behaviour today, I have... significant doubts...  Our paths through life must be righteous. I urge you to go home and look in the mirror and pray that your son does not succumb to the path of fear.
 Kitty, I don't know what to say. They've suspended him for two days.  Ever since this jet fiasco, I honestly don't know what has gotten into him.
 I think we've all seen "Bonanza".
 Do you even know who Graham Greene is?
 The PTA is here to acknowledge that there is pornography in our school's curriculum.
 Excuse me... but what is the real issue here? The PTA doesn't ban books from school.
 I AM THE PTA! And I say that this FILTH is directly related to this vandalism.
 This meeting of the PTA was called to inform the parents of our ongoing investigation...
 And how do they do this? They FLOOD the house... by breaking through the water main!
 The bottom line... Mr. Cole... is that there is material being taught to our children that is cause for this destructive behaviour.
 Kitty...
 Mr. Cole... not only am I a TEACHER... but I am also a PARENT of a Middlesex child. Therefore, I am the ONLY person here who transcends the parent-teacher bridge.
 Kitty, I would appreciate... if you could wait...
 I stole four beers from my dad.
 We got eggs, water balloons, and a dozen rolls of toilet paper.
 Not Vanity. He's a homo.
 Bullshit. Smurfette fucks all the other smurfs. That's why Papa Smurf made her, 'cause the other smurfs were getting too horny.
 Smurfette doesn't fuck.
 No more fuckin' for her.
 Wicked.
 Raspberry.
 What is this shit?
 Let's go to Donnie's house. His parents are both at work.
 All right! 7:55. Everybody goes home.
 Fuck yeah there is! If the bus doesn't show up in thirty minutes, you're supposed to go straight home.
 There's no rule!
 You know, there's, like, this rule. We get to go home at 7:55.
 Maybe Martha Moo finally went nuts and hijacked the bus.
 Go back to China, bitch!
 Chut up!
 I'm gonna be on TV! Just like Diane Sawyer.
 Our baby's going to Nationals! Lincoln, Alabama -- look out!
 I just, I just can't believe it. I'm Minnesota's American Teen Princess!
 Okay, sweetie, that's all right. Let's go. Let's go.
 I gotta work with these women.
 I'm sorry. They're just starin'.
 Loretta, don't do that.
 I got it! Yeah, why don't ya take a...
 Airport Ho-Jo!
 All right, say "Airport Ho-Jo."
 There's an indoor swimming pool! Ahhhh!
 Right by the airport -- Oh, Amber...
 I'll be stayin' overnight at... The Airport Howard Johnsons!
 What? For chrissakes, spit it out.
 It's all the stuff I get to do. Oh my God, oh my God... Okay, okay... We get a "personal consultation" with a make-up artist -- Eeeh! Okay, um, there'll be a choreographer to the stars and, oh no -- No way. Oh... My... God!
 Ah! It's from State! Oh my God!
 This came for you, sweetie.
 I never liked her, but she didn't deserve to die in the belly of a swan like that. The whole thing's just kinda sad and lame at the same time.
 Do you guys want some shots? I'm buyin'.
 Okay.
 No. It's pure bullshit, sweetie. You're lucky as hell, so you might as well enjoy it. Let's get you a root beer float.
 Really?
 You stop right there. You are a good person. Good things happen to good people.
 I don't know. I just didn't wanna win like this.
 What is wrong with you?
 ...Yah -- well, at least, y'know, I got to perform. And Mom got to see me.  I guess number eight only worked for Diane Sawyer...
 Thank God for bunge cords.
 Oh, Mom's okay. They're just givin' her a ride back. She almost blew outta the back of Loretta's pick-up on the way over.
 Well God-love-ya for thinkin' I still could.
 Loretta, never have kids.
 Oh, shut up. I thought it might help you get some sleep.
 My mom wanted me to have this?
 You-betcha.
 Really, Loretta?
 That was your mom. She wanted you to have this.
 Oh-yah.
 "Once a carnie, always a carnie."
 No. Mom said if I did, she'd look up my dad and marry him.
 Hell-no, she ain't quittin'.
 Yeah, you betcha...
 Oh my God. I'm so dead...
 Simple. Just say, "Mom, I know you sacrificed everything -- relationships, dreams -- your tummy, ass and thighs -- all to bring me into this world. All so I could have tap lessons and be in the pageant -- the same one you were in. But, y'know what? I'm quittin'." There. Easy as pie.
 So, what do I say?
 Oh God, I'm dead...
 I heard you, I was just tryin' to scare you into changin' your mind. Oh for Chrissakes, Amber, the woman clung to your tap shoes while flyin' through the air like a Goddamn lawn dart!
 I -- I'm quittin' the pageant.
 You're what?!
 Don't let that worry you, Annette!
 Mommmm! I'll be right behind you in the hearse!
 She's right over there.
 Where is she?!
 She's alive, sweetie.
 Is Mom okay?
 Oh-you-beccha.
 Yah?
 Then do it for Peter. Mrs. Leeman used to call him a "skinny little fag" when he'd bag her groceries. He'd pop his Nancy-belt if his old jacket somehow, I don't know, got her back.
 Lis, I want to, I really do, but... Oh, I can't.
 Oh c'mon, I love 'em, but you know they only had me 'cause Peter needed a kidney.
 Your parents'd kill you.
 Shut up, yous guys. Look, Amber, I'm not gonna win. And let's be honest, a family only needs one "Liza" and you know Peter's got much better legs than me.
 My jacket. Take it 'cause, y'know, I got my costume okay'd before the pageant. You can wear it.
 "Here," wh-wh-what?
 Amber? Here.
 I can't believe this is happenin'. I can't believe she said you couldn't...
 I -- I -- I -- I -- I --, j-uh-j-uh- just wanted to compe-e-e-e-ete.
 Oh, Amber...
 But, you -- I mean... It's not my fault. I -- I... Please? I didn't do anything wrong...
 Oh really -- I don't think so.  Uh, Amber, I hate to be the bearer of bad news, but rules state that a costume must be okay'd at least a week in advance. And this...  This is why we have the rule. My goodness gracious, I couldn't allow a neckline this low on stage. We have kids in the audience.
 I -- I'm wearin' this costume. I'm, uh, I'm gonna do my talent tonight.
 Huh?
 Mrs. Leeman?
 Oh, yeah, sure. You know, every pageant is special, but this one is extra-special to me. When I was seventeen, I don't know if you know this, but I was crowned Mount Rose's American Teen Princess. And this year... drum roll please, my lovely daughter, Rebecca Ann Leeman is competin'.
 I'm lucky I have an after-school job where I can practice my talent.
 No. Loretta called. There's been a... a fire.
 Relax, that's my ma's code for, "Bring home milk and a carton-a Luckys."
 You hafta go home. There's some kinda emergency at the trailer park.
 I'm gonna need more caps.
 No, don't say it. Another stray bullet to the head.
 Amber...
 -- red nose and ears. I know, I know.
 Well, your "cheap whore" is this family's "lovin' mother."  The Clemens said to make him look like he just came from snowmobilin'. Pink cheeks, and...
 Sorry. I just thought she might not wanna meet her Maker lookin' like a cheap whore.
 It's okay.
 We was robbed.
 Bye mom.
 I love you much.
 C'mere. I love you so much.
 It's me... I just don't want this to be the thing you'd do over. This pageant's your ticket outta here. I know you can win, Amber.
 God I hope that's you and not your concussion talkin'.
 Honest to God, if I got to do it over? I'd start walkin' outta this town the minute I took my first step. Practically the only thing I wouldn't do different is have you...
 That's it, I'm goin'...
 Let me tell you "scary," Amber. Look at me. Do you wanna look like you been rode hard and put away wet at my age? I'm a "lifer" here. Best I can hope for is to end up in a descent "raisin ranch" where they'll change me twice a day.
 Oh, c'mon... First the picture of Tammy, then Brett Clemens, now this? It's scary.
 You're not goin' through this again? You? You're not the one who knows how Jiffy Pop feels.
 Nice mouth you got there, Mom, but I -- I'm not goin' through this again.
 Would yous boys excuse us a second? Loretta, you too.
 Ow!
 What?!
 Okay. Yesterday I... I got this picture. So I kinda, y'know, I'm thinkin' no. I'm gonna, I -- I -- I'm gonna quit the pageant.
 I ain't lettin' go ktil you tell me what's up. I'm reaching' a point where I'd kill someone for the nicotine on their fingernails.
 Mom!
 Mom, look, don't say anything. First of all, I'm not pregnant.
 Go on! Get out!
 Ruined a brand-new pair of Lee Press- ons.  Well, I sat down for a beer and KA- BLEWEY! Next thing I know, somethin' blows through my kitchen window. Next thing I know, I'm ass up in Loretta's flower bed.
 Oh, Mom, it's so ugly.
 Oh... How quickly they grow up.  Hey, if they ask you to take off your shirt, get the money first.
 They're from L.A. They wanted to see my room and film me for their movie.
 Oh shit!
 That's my mom.  I'll get 'em in a sec.
 Hey, Amber, y'get my smokes?
 ...Yah -- 1963. Her beauty worked against her when she started as a reporter in Louisville, her hometown. Those were different times.
 Good, 'cause this isn't an American Teen Princess Pageant -- it's, it's Nazi Germany!
 Amber Atkins! That is not American Teen Princess language!
 This, this... This is bullshit!
 Sorry. I -- I don't make the rules.
 But, doesn't someone taking your costume so you can't compete, overrule that rule?
 Amber, I'm sorry. I really am. But you know the rules. All talent costumes hafta be okay'd by Gladys before the pageant.
 Mrs. Clark, why are you doing this to me? Why're you pretendin' you don't know what's goin' on?
 We all do. Now let's go.
 I hate her!
 No, wait. It -- it was here before the openin' number... wait. What am I sayin'? I should just ask you, Becky. Where is it?
 Uh, Amber? We're not puttin' on our Talent costumes. You need to put on your "Physical Fitness" outfit. And let's shake a leg, ladies.
 Oh my God! My -- my tap costume's gone.
 Okay, okay!  Listen-up. Coupla notes from last night's dress rehearsal.  Number one, Gladys says a coupla yous are gettin' sexy with your hips durin' the "Physical Fitness" routine...
 Bitch!
 If you want seconds, then I'll make sure it's hot enough for ya.
 Oh, I'll "get it." I'll "get it" all right. I might even take seconds.
 Well, as my mother says at Sunday dinner, "Come and get it," bitch!
 Oh -- oh, you bring me some of that snotty attitude, Becky -- bring it on.
 Well then, you better be willin' to back it up, 'cause you're talkin' like crazy.
 I just did.
 If you're gettin' at somethin', you better just say it.
 You heard me. Where is it?
 What?
 Oh, Amber, like you're the only one who visits Mary.
 What're you doin' here?
 Yes, Leslie!
 I know it doesn't matter, but on my inner thighs.
 Yes...
 And the bite marks on my ears?
 Yeah...
 Amber, if I die from these fumes, will you be sure to cover the hickies on my neck?
 Yah -- I brought her some flowers this morning. She's in the room next to my mom. She's super happy.
 So, anyone talk to Janelle?
 Here, have some.
 Here, I didn't get any.
 Bye.
 Okay... well, bye.
 Yah-sure, fine... fine.
 Well, uh, I'm cuttin' out early today to do a little duck huntin'... but, uh, maybe I could call you tonight.
 So if, uh, you wanted to do somethin'...
 I know.
 So, uh, I -- I'm not really busy Friday. I just said that -- y'know.
 Then it must be Wednesday.
 Oh man, you got leutefisk in your hair.
 NO...  It's all right. I got it. Don't worry about it.
 Here, I'll take it. It's my job.
 Hi.
 Hi...
 They told me to practice.
 Annette, just use your hand.
 Okay. Take her purse.
 We was robbed.
 Annette, why don't you just see if there's any beer left in that can and relax a bit.
 Oh-Jesus-Mary-n-Joseph, she's pregnant!  If you are -- come back, sweetie. Mommy wants to talk, then KILL YOU!
 Anyone?
 Go on home, Loretta. Come on. Go on, the party's over.
 So? Be real easy.
 Don't fall for it. She lives two trailers down.
 I got a hairdo.
 You don't know where this is gonna...
 All right, they're makin' a movie.
 They're makin' a movie, here, goddamn it.
 I'll be right back. See ya later.
 Well, excuse me, Annette, but I'm braggin' up your kid, here.  Amber's gonna be the next Diane Sawyer, y'know...
 "Most smartest?" Oh, that's good, Loretta. Make sure you get a picture of that. "Most smartest." We're cuttin you off and sendin' you home.
 She's the prettiest, y'know. The best damn tapper. The most smartest...
 Why don't you paint a big red target on your ass, Loretta.
 Let's just say who should win, who deserves to win is Amber.
 Oh, Christ, it's true.
 Shut it up, Loretta.
 Y'know, if you have, you got all the pictures of the winner you need.
 Loretta, shut it.
 Say, yous boys been to the Leeman's?
 I tell Annette, I says, "You talk to me durin' my stories, you might as well be talkin' to the wall."  You guys want a beer?
 This here's Loretta.
 Oh, naw. Hi.
 It's just the guys that are... you know, makin' the movie about the pageant. I told you about 'em.
 Hi.
 Hi.
 You could be quiet.
 Are we on "Cops" again?
 Oh, Jesus H. Christ!
 What do you mean, they take out her butt?
 Listen, little missy, this cost your dad a pretty penny. Now get your ass up there and show me some teeth.
 My dress'll reek.
 Oh for chrissakes, everything smells like that in Mexico.
 It smells funny. Like gasoline.
 C'mon, Rebecca, you wanted it. Now get up there. Ride it side-saddle if you have to -- like a horse. C'mon, now.
 She's the winner and we're going to state.
 Well, it's all happenin' so fast. Goodness-gracious, it hardly seems real, y'know? I mean, I won! I'm the winner! I'm going to State!
 The important thing is that we have a winner...
 The bitch.
 All right, then.
 Wisconsin.
 What?
 That bitch from...
 Ohio...
 Dakota.
 Yeah.
 People, people -- wait, wait a minute, here. Uh, while we haven't ruled out sabotage from neighboring state pageants -- Iowa, Wisconsin, North Dakota...
 Mm-hm.
 Okay?
 That's right.
 We're also the co-founders of the Minnesota Modeling Academy. Applications are at the tiki bar. We'll wave the fifty dollar application fee if you list a friend and put her address.
 Correction. This spunky monkey on my right is Terry Macey. And we are your Minnesota American Teen Princess State Board.
 I'm a mirror.
 "Can I? I'm Amer-I-Can!" People ask me where I get this. I don't know, it's... maybe a gift from God or somethin'.
 Can you remember the theme of your favorite pageant?
 "U.S.A. is A-okay."
 And the year before that?
 Last year? It was, "Buy American."
 So what was the theme of the pageant last year?
 Oh yah-sure, I know what some of your big city, no bra wearin', hairy- legged women's libbers say, "Pageants are old-fashioned" and, uh, and "demeaning" to the girls --
 Do you think that most people would say that teenage beauty pageants are a good idea?
 I wonder how she's gonna fix that one.
 What a surprise. Gladys Leeman's finally gonna go to State. And she'll probably ride on Becky's ass all the way to Nationals, too.
 Yeah.
 Yeah. And they say smokin' is bad for your health.
 Girls check in, but they don't check out.
 This pageant's like a roach motel.
 Yah -- yah. Everyone says this is a big accident? She got iced because she wins everything, and this time someone didn't want her to win.
 Tammy Curry?
 ...Oh, yeah-right. I ain't gonna be in no goddamn pageant! Look what happened to that dork-ass farm girl.
 Let go! Let go of me. Oh my God, it's COPS!
 That's enough!
 Becky was my only shot at state!
 So help me, Gladys.
 Guess it wasn't a garage sale as much as it was a bake sale. Ah- hahahahahahahaha!
 Gladys! Stop it!
 Hey, Ted, sorry. I didn't know your family was in the garage when I set it on fire!
 Yah -- Gladys had me order that swan special made from Mexico  in case Becky won. I do a lotta business with those people. I always offer to pay 'em in tacos.  Whoo, they love that.
 Hey! Turn that float around. You think a swan's gonna swim ass first up Main Street?
 Yeah, yeah, the Jew.
 Sammy Davis, Jr., honey.
 Yah -- she's damn near as good as that little black fella -- with the glass eye.
 Oh, all right  How soon they forget where all this comes from.
 Lester?
 We're not in the showroom, Dear.
 Hey, ya like it? Open it... Yah -- the globe. Pull at the equator there.
 Oh, Lester. He loves his weather, y'know.
 ...You betcha. S'posed to be colder- n-a witches tit tonight...
 I swear to God she can't do anything by herself.
 Enid ate a whole pan!
 This is -- what?
 We need more bars!
 What!
 Uh, Gladys?
 Okay, I designed the float, you know. And, what's gonna happen here is that this is going to look like a glistening lake beneath the swan.
 Number one, American Teen Princess' don't cross their legs like streetwalkers.
 Okay, everybody, listen up!
 So, remember the three most important parts of a good interview...
 Yeah.
 You know that sometimes it's hard to understand God's great plan.
 It's always hard to see the young ones called home, especially on an exploding thresher. It's just so odd and gross.
 Well, you know, I think everyone's doing really well considering the fact that she was so young.
 "Proud... to be... an... American."
 Oh! What is it?
 All right, let's go.
 I said I'd move if a cripple came. Let's just run in the store and pick out some outfits.
 It's a two-hundred dollar fine!
 You'd think they'd build the parking lot of America to go with the Mall of America!
 Oh, there's a parking space over there. Oh, no, that's just a compact. Sorry.
 That's why we Lutherans use grape Koolaid for the blood of Christ.
 Iris, stop!  It's not his fault. The communal wine just proves too temptin' for some of them.
 Oh, my!  Hello, Father Donigan! Sidewalks, sidewalks?
 Gladys -- Gladys! Look out!
 Y'betcha, Iris. We still need a third judge and we need to think of a theme.
 Nothin' too showy!
 ...Today's "To Do" list includes a trip to the Mall of America. We need outfits for the "Physical Fitness" number --
 A.k.a. Minneapolis -- St. Paul.
 ...that filth is better left in the "Sin Cities."
 There's your paint can. The next time you drink window cleaner, I'm just gonna leave it in ya.
 I want to get the big bag of little donuts.
 You get nothing, Hank, okay?
 I want to have the big bag of little donuts.
 Let's get this straight right now. We wouldn't have been late at all if it wasn't for you.
 Come on! Hankey here can't help it if he was born crazier than a shithouse rat!
 EE-AAAYEEEE-AAAAYOUIAAAEEEEEEEE!
 Close up shop!
 Harold!
 Close up shop. Close up shop, Hank.
 Don't make me kick-ya where the good Lord split-ya.
 I will if you shut your piehole.
 Well, Mom's dead, so shut your fly trap.
 Ow, Harold -- Mom said not the head.
 Shut up, Hank. This here's business.
 Are we on "Cops?" Are we on "Cops?" Are we on "Cops?"
 What, you deaf? I say shut up -- shut up -- SHUT UP!  Cut her outta this!
 Oh, I almost forgot...  I got my acceptance to Tokyo University.
 No! We not like to hear it! Go to your room and shut up!
 Mom, I just finished the third movement of that concerto I was working on. I put, like, this techno beat on this Japanese folk tune -- wanna hear it?
 Tina! Tina!! TINA!!!
 I'm sorry, Dad, but with all due respect, my name isn't "Tina," it's Seiko.
 English! English, you stupid little retard! We America now, Tina!
 Excuse me, Father, Mother, when are we moving back to Tokyo? I can't stand this place anymore. They put butter on everything.
 They think I should - They think I should - They think I should - They think I should be king.
 We really think he should be king and wear a crown and everything.
 King Solomon was game he gave each Girl his name to number them would make a list that long I'll bet his thousand wives led miserable lives if the king can do no wrong.
 The king can do to wrong!
 Suppose a pretty dame Into my castle came - And let us say that I was going strong.  She might be stuck on me, but what good would it be, if the king can do no wrong.
 The king can do no wrong!
 Of course you're All aware a king must have an heir some one to pass the family name along will some one tell me where I'd ever get an heir if a king can do no wrong
 And everything.  He should be king!
 And wear a crown and everything.
 He should be king!
 From what I have been gathering, I think they think I should be king: I think they think I should be king!
 Gloria, much as I hate to leave, I'd be crazy to stay here.
 Yes, sir.
 They'll know I mean business then they get that letter...  see that that gets out immediately and that goes for you too.
 Eureka Ammunition Company, Gentlemen. Your shipment of sailor hats arrived this morning by freight.  Gloria, I could go for you in a big way. However, the rifles you sent were a little rusty and I don't say that to everybody.  Have not received last month's drawing account; how come your neck is like a swan.  Yours very truly...
 Eureka Ammunition Company -- Gentlemen -- Your shipment of sailor hats arrived this morning by freight --  Gloria, I could go for you in a big way --  However, the rifles you sent were a little rusty --  -- and I don't say that to everybody --  Have not received last month's drawing account.  How come?  Your neck is like a swan...  Yours very truly.  Now read it back.
 None of your business...  Take another letter.
 Who to?
 Take a letter...
 Father...
 We'll start a fire --  -- and get rid of these microbes.
 About - thirty-four seconds.
 In case of fire, how long will it take to empty this place?
 Never mind then, I'll get in touch with him myself -
 But you're my father -
 He won't eh? - We'll see about that - send for your father immediately.
 I've tried to chase him but it's no use - he won't go -
 Go out and chase that peanut vendor away from the building -- Get rid of him if you have to use violence - if necessary call out the militia and if he isn't looking get me a bag of peanuts.
 His Excellency's car!
 Send for my car...
 Here I am, Father...
 You do and I'll fire you.
 I'll have to enclose the check first.
 Dear Sir... enclosed find check for $100.  Yours very truly...  Send that immediately.
 Take another letter...  to my tailor.
 Is that all?
 That's what I wanted in the first place.  Tear it up and send it airmail.
 "My dear President"...
 You can't say that to the President... Put back "President"... Now let's hear how sounds.
 "My dear"...
 Now we're on the right track... Put back "dear"... How does it read?
 "My"...
 There's still something wrong with it... take out "President" ...now what've you got?
 "My President"...
 That's not right yet... put back "President" and take out "dear"... How does it read now?
 "My dear"...
 That doesn't sound right...  take out "President"...  now read it.
 "My dear President"...
 My dear President...  read it back...
 The President of the United States.
 Who to?
 Take a letter.
 Here I am, Father.
 I no gotta new-rosis.  My uncle he's- a got a flower shop -- he's-a gotta new-rosis.
 You haven't been still a moment since you've been here.  You act as if you had neurosis --
 What's the matter with you?
 What's the matter with you?
 He could be playing solitaire, but I don't think so.
 In her dressing room?  Why, what could he be doing there?
 I wanna powder my nose...
 Yes -- why?
 Never mind His Excellency -- you gotta your pocketbook?
 I wonder what's keeping His Excellency?
 Well, with you two fellows on the other side, this country should have no trouble keeping the wolf from the door.
 Sure.
 So! -- He's on your side, too.
 Fine.  We gotta him.
 Fine.  We'll throw in the matches before we make the delivery.  By the way, how're you fixed for spys?
 Yes, one gross of bullets, two dozen hand-grenades, three kegs of powder -- and throw in some matches.
 Anything else?
 That's-a pretty good.  I'll take a dozen of them.
 With a gun like that you can kill some of your own men.
 Oh, sure.  We have horse maneuvers every morning.
 Not a bad idea.  If our horses get tired they can ride your men for a change.  Now, I don't mind letting you have our horses, but you must promise to put them through their maneuvers.
 That's all right -- our men can ride your horses.
 That's funny, we've got five thousand horses but no men.
 I've gotta five thousand men but no horses.
 I wish you were still working for me, so I could ask you to resign. How're ya fixed for cavalry?
 We gotta two battalions and one Frenchman.
 Well, we'll let that one go.  Now -- how many battalions you got?
 No. Seventy-five -- seventy-five.
 That's the spirit -- fifty-fifty.
 That's all right.  We let you have twenty-five thousand men -- and we both start even.
 That's not fair -- we've only got fifty thousand.
 Well, we gotta one hundred thousand men.
 Now -- how many men you got in your army?
 Is that so?  I used to think you were two-faced - but you can't be - or you wouldn't be wearing that one. Now - let's talk this thing over.
 Yes, but I'm not working for you any more.  I'm on the other side.
 Why not?  You're the Secretary of War, aren't you?
 I can't do it...
 Late again, eh?  You haven't been on time once since this war started...  Get out there and fight...
 Who said I had a gun... Gimme those plans, you paper snatchers --
 You no gotta no gun.
 I don't know about us, but I know he's-a got something...
 You're right about that guy -- I think we've got something.
 That's not bad for any day.
 He's going to make a good spy... that's not bad for the first day.
 We've gotta have somebody who knows how to get secrets from men.  You know how to make love?
 I'm glad I didn't ask you for "Washington Crossing the Delaware".
 Sure, we gotta have a spy.  If we no got a spy who's gonna tell the other side what we're doing?
 By the way, are you sure we need a spy?
 Send in the next girl.
 I think we oughtta have a standing army, so we can save money on chairs.
 Wait a minute.  What kind of an army do you think we oughtta have?
 Oh, yes, I remember -- and I should have slapped Mrs. Teasdale's face when she told it to me... I'm going right out and find Trentino.  You go right out and get yourself an army.
 You told it to me.
 You're lucky I don't slap your face -- you oughtta be ashamed of yourself. Where did you hear that story?
 What did you say to her?
 She did.
 Why didn't his niece slap your face?
 He's-a very easy to insult --  I say something to his niece once, and he slapped my face.
 You've got a brain after all - and how you get along without it is amazing to me -- Now, who can I insult?...  Who do we owe money to?...  AMBASSADOR TRENTINO!  How about him?
 That's a-no good.  If I apologize we no got a war.  Look -- I send you a scrap of paper.  You send me a scrap of paper -- and we have a scrap.
 Then I demand an apology!
 You was insulted, but you don't know it.
 Why wasn't I insulted?
 That's a-no good.  You gotta insult somebody from another country.  Look --  I come from one country.  You come from another country.  I say something you don't like.  You say something I don't like - and I'm insulted.
 My card.
 Sure, that's easy.  You gotta insult somebody.
 Then we've gotta start one. Do you know how to start a war?
 I don't want to buy ammunition -- we no gotta war.
 You get half mine and I get half yours.
 What do I get?
 You know, I'd be lost without a telephone.  Now - where were we? Oh, yes - I just made you Secretary of War.  The first thing you do is buy ammunition -- you buy it from me and I get 10% commission.
 'At's-a fine.
 I've got just the job for you -- Secretary of War.
 Look, I'm a very nervous man.  I gotta have a job where I come to work at eleven -- go to lunch at twelve -- and quit at one.  And twice a year I gotta have a six month vacation.
 Well, if you wanna work in the post- office you'll have to stick out your tongue.
 I don't wanna stick out my tongue.
 In that case you'll have to take a civil service examination --  if you pass I'll put you in the post-office -- stick out your tongue.
 I don't wanna work at all.
 Then you don't wanna work hard?
 That's no good.  I like to work on the outside.  I must have something easy.
 Let's see -- What've I got in my cabinet besides mice --  I've got it -- how would you like to be Secretary of the Interior?
 What other job you got?
 I don't know what's keeping me.  I should've been here a long time ago. Now how about my proposition?
 Hello...  Yes...  No, not yet... All right...  Goodbye.  That was for you again.  He wants you to call him up as soon as you get back.
 Well, maybe he's still the vice- president.  Now if I were to offer you --
 Oh, no -- nothing doing.  I had a brother who was a vice-president once and that's the last we ever heard of him.
 If there was an open season for fellows like you, I'd get myself a hunting license.   Anyway, I'm going to make you a sporting proposition. You give up the peanut stand and I'll make you vice-president of the country.
 No, but I shot some ducks.
 Did you shoot the rapids?
 'At's-a no good.  I went to Niagara Falls once.
 You wouldn't consider going over Niagara Falls without a barrel?
 Sure.  How much does the job pay?  Sure, if there's a chance for advancement.
 You don't want to be a public nuisance, do you?
 Oh no, I can't do it.
 I'm sorry I'm not in.  I wanted to have a long talk with you...  Now look here, my good man, you've got to stop yelling "peanuts" in front of the House of Representatives.
 That was for you.
 I can use you in the House of Representatives.  We need a man who understands dogs -- and that's where this country is going to.  Step inside.
 He only weighs ten ounces --
 Well, if you don't want your dog why don't you put him in a pound?
 I don't want him.
 I've got just the place for a man like you but I'm too busy right now to do any digging.  What do you call your dog when you want him?
 Yankee Poodle.
 What do you whistle?
 I don't call him, I whistle.
 I don't know much about dogs but you ought to be on the end of a leash - a ninety-nine year leash -  Look - what do you call your dog?
 Yeh, he's only got one eye.
 Half watch dog?
 He's half poodle and half watch dog -
 Well - what is he now?
 He used to be a bloodhound but he's anemic --
 What kind of a dog is he?
 No, but my dog he's a got millions of them --
 Have you got a license?
 All right -
 Hey you!!
 I can't do it right away.
 It must be done right away.
 That's easy, I'll get him for you wholesale.
 Firefly must be captured at any cost.
 All right -- I'll go out and find one.
 Chicolini, you've come just in time. We need a man who's fearless, brave. A man who's willing to die, if necessary.
 He's working very hard - I got him a job driving Firefly's car - He's-a driving him crazy and I'm driving him nuts - P-E-A-N-U-T-S
 Fine - keep on yelling - Do everything you can to disturb Firefly - Now what about your cousin?
 How'm I doing, boss?
 The population must increase With great rapidity.  We give a couple seven years To raise a family. If, by that time, there is no branch Upon the family tree, we stand 'em up against the wall - and Pop goes the Weasel.
 The husband steps outside; Relinquishes his bride; We stand him up against the wall And take him for a ride.
 If any man should come between A husband and his bride, We find out which one she prefers By letting her decide.  If she prefers the other man, The husband steps outside; We stand him up against the wall And Pop goes the Weasel!
 So everyone beware Who's crooked or unfair; No one must take a bit of graft Unless he gets his share.
 I will not stand for anything that's crooked or unfair; I'm strictly on the up and up, So everyone beware. If anyone's caught taking graft And I don't get my share, we'll stand 'em up against the wall - and pop goes the weasel!
 If any form of pleasure is exhibited Report to me and it will be prohibited.  I'll put my foot down; So shall it be - This is the land of the free.  The last man nearly ruined this place He didn't know what to do with it.  If you think this country's bad off now Just wait 'till I get through with it.  The treasury is low on dough; The last man went and flew with it.  If you think we're short of money now Just wait 'till I get through with it.  The country's taxes must be fixed - And I know what to do with it, If you think you're paying too much now, Just wait 'till I get through with it.
 If we should choose to chew, we'll be pursued -
 If chewing gum is chewed, The chewer is pursued And in the hoosegow hidden...
 We're not allowed to tell a dirty joke HAIL, HAIL, FREEDONIA
 Tired!  I'd like to stretch this into a week -
 Are you sure you're not tired?
 Not at all.  When I was a boy back on the farm I used to pump my own water.
 Are you getting tired?
 This is a fine thing to be doing at my age.
 I shall dance for you tonight as I've never danced before.
 Yes, but I'll talk to you about that when we're alone...
 Oh, Your Excellency, isn't there something I can do?
 Carry out this tragic folly if you will -- But I for one will not be a part of it.  I will stay here in Freedonia.
 You keep that up and you'll crab the whole war.
 You couldn't hang me in your bedroom -- I'll make a note of it.  Where's my secretary?
 Your Excellency, please don't think me silly, but I'd love to have a picture of you.  I want to hang it in my bedroom.
 I still like UPSTART the best.
 Why - er - Mrs. Teasdale - this is an outrage!  This man is impossible... My course is clear...  this means war...  You RUNT!
 That's it...
 Oh yes! -- UPSTART!
 No... it was a seven letter word.
 Was it -- swine?
 No, that wasn't it...
 Oh -- you mean... worm?
 I don't remember.
 What I called you...  Why, what did I call you?
 Nothing doing!!  I've taken a lease on the battlefield.  I'd lose my deposit, besides, I've already ordered the ammunition...
 I am willing to apologize...  I'm willing to do anything to prevent this war.
 Forget?  You ask me to forget... Why, my ancestors would rise from their graves... and I'd only have to bury them again... A Firefly never forgets...
 I'm sorry we lost our tempers... I'm willing to forget if you are.
 THEN IT'S WAR!
 Bah!!
 How're ya fixed for ammunition?
 Yes.
 Then it's war?
 That's it!  No man lives who can call a Firefly an upstart.
 You upstart!
 Once more!
 You worm!
 Give me that again!
 You swine!
 That's what you think.
 Well, why not say the least and get it over with?
 This has gone far enough!  This interruption is humiliating, to say the least...
 What can this mug offer you?  Wealth and family.  I can't give you wealth...  ...but we can have a little family of our own.
 Can't we go some place where we can be alone?
 When you get through with her feet, you can start on mine.  I haven't been to a chiropodist in two years...  If that's not an insult, I don't know what is.  Gloria, I love you.  I --
 And Vera niece, too.
 You don't understand.  This is my niece Vera.
 Go ahead.
 Excellency, may I present my niece.
 Why yes.  I met you at the dog races -- say, you could have won that race if you tried a little harder.
 Your Excellency, haven't we met before?
 I'll tell you what I'll do.  I'll give you Mrs. Teasdale as security.  or my jackknife.  If you want my advice, you'll take the jackknife... I've a better proposition...  Make it $25 and I'll give you a first mortgage on my son and I hope you foreclose.
 $50?
 Well, in the meantime, could you let me have $50 personally?
 Twenty million dollars is a considerable sum...  I'll have to discuss that with my Minister of Finance.
 I'll keep the greetings -- but you can send back the good will... what we need right now is twenty million dollars.
 I bring you the greetings of my President and the good will of my people.
 That's even a greater honor.
 The king can do no wrong!
 You know I think they think I should be king.  Although it would please me to govern the throng, suppose I were king and then everything went wrong.
 You satisfied your selfish whims, while nations tottered, dynasties rocked and the world plunged headlong into a chasm of chaos and oblivion --  Not bad, eh?
 But -
 THIS IS TREASON!!  What a fool I was to listen to your siren song and fall a helpless victim under the insidious spell of your irresistible charms --
 I said - I suspect the Secretary of War.
 Don't bother me - I'm thinking -- What was that?
 I -- I may be wrong, but I suspect the Secretary of War.
 WHAT  ?
 My purse has been stolen -- the plans of war are in it.
 That's all right.  I'll fix you right up.
 Your Excellency, something terrible has just happened.
 Take a seat -- you're next.
 I hope I'm not interrupting.
 You can call me Gloria too.  Gloria -- what a beautiful name.  When I was born my mother named me Gloria -- two minutes later she found out her mistake...
 Why -- why -- of course.
 Gloria -- may I call you Gloria?
 Oh, your Excellency, you take me off my feet.
 Well -- they might come better but they don't come any bigger... and the bigger the better.  The bigger the betta you've got on a horse, the more you lose, and speaking about horses, why don't you marry me. Come, come -- say yes and you'll never see me again.  I'll go 'way if it means your happiness...
 Now -- er --
 Guard them with your life... don't leave them out of your sight...  If the enemy gets those papers  we're lost.  If they don't get them, we're lost.  Can't you see what I'm trying to tell you?  I love you...   Mrs. Teasdale, you're the salt of the earth.  They don't come any better than you...
 Well, maybe I am a little headstrong...  But, you know, it's awfully hard to forget what he called me.
 Oh, won't you reconsider...
 Let him patch up his own breeches...
 But Your Excellency -- the Ambassador is here on a friendly visit...  He came to ask you to patch up the breach.
 So -- you've come to ask for clemency! I'll give the enemy no quarter -- not a dime...
 I wouldn't know what to say either if I was in your place.  Maybe you can suggest something.
 Oh, Your Excellency, I don't know what to say.
 All I can offer you is a Rufus over your head.
 Oh, Rufus!
 He did?... I told my son not to leave it laying around... Where is son?
 Why, that's the speech that Lincoln made at Gettysburg...
 I wrote a speech last night that'll knock them off their seats...  Four score and seven years ago, our fathers brought forth on this continent a new nation --
 Your Excellency, you mustn't forget your appointment at the House of Representatives... Have you got your speech ready?
 That's what I get for dressing in a hurry.
 You've made a wonderful impression. Your views are liberal... It is easy to see you have an open mind.
 These are the laws of my administration: No one's allowed to smoke or tell a dirty joke -- And whistling is forbidden...
 If it's not asking too much --  For our information just for illustration  Tell us how you intend to run the nation.
 Well, a gal a day is enough for me. I couldn't handle any more.
 Your Excellency, the eyes of the world are upon you.  Notables from every land are gathered here in your honor --  This is a gala day for us.
 You're not so bad yourself, Mrs. Teasdale, when I look at you I can see that we're facing a crisis. We've got to balance the budget -- we've got to cut down everything including, you.
 Your Excellency!
 No wonder he passed away.  I'd like to be with you to the very end. Can't you see what I'm trying to tell you -- I love you.
 Why - er -- my husband passed away...  I was with him to the very end.
 I haven't been on the job five minutes and already she's making advances to me.  Not that I care -- but where is your husband?
 The future of Freedonia rests upon you.  Promise me you will follow in my husband's footsteps.
 Well, I won't stand for much.  And I won't stand for you if you don't show some improvement soon.  Look at your report card last month -- "D" in spelling...  six in behavior. Now who were the six?  A fine state of affairs -- no wonder you can't matriculate, now what were you saying?
 In choosing you, I feel that I serve my country well.  I heartily endorse everything you stand for.
 You can keep it -- I've got a whole pack...  Now what were you saying?
 What'll I do with this card?
 For you, I would do anything...
 Oh, would you...?
 Mrs. Teasdale, I'm willing to pocket my pride and do anything I can to make up with his Excellency.
 This is terrible!
 I shall report this indignity the my President.  Mrs. Teasdale,  I feel this regrettable occurrence will plunge our countries into war.
 I didn't come here to be insulted.
 Gentlemen!  Gentlemen!
 Gloria -- I've waited for years.  I won't be put off!  I love you!  I want you!  Can't you see that I'm at your feet?
 Well no -- not exactly -- but --
 Oh.  Then there his somebody else?
 Ambassador Trentino, I am indeed honored...  But you see - well - I --
 ...but would further cement the relations of our countries.
 Mrs. Teasdale -- no matter who rules Freedonia, to me you will always be the first lady of the land.
 Ambassador!  I am so anxious for you to meet our new dictator.
 What is money?  Mrs. Teasdale, for you -- I would do anything.
 Your uncle has been such a friend to us in every crisis.  Without his country's financial aid --
 Perhaps he will listen to you...
 If only we can get his Excellency to listen to reason...
 Maybe you can still win the old dame over -- why not try to --
 Fine nothing!  I didn't want war... My plan was to marry Mrs. Teasdale and overthrow Firefly.
 I thought everything was working out fine.
 This is all Firefly's fault -- that idiot, that fool...
 It is every woman's problem.  Who supplies the sons? -- the brothers? -- the husbands?  Who...
 My dear niece -- I must ask you not to interfere.  War is not a woman's problem.
 Uncle, you can't do this!
 That's where you come in.  I'll leave him in your hands, and don't forget you're supposed to be my niece.
 Maybe it's not going to be so easy. From what I've heard, Mrs. Teasdale is rather sweet on this Rufus T. Firefly.
 With Mrs. Teasdale as my wife and Freedonia under my control --
 So that's the one you want to marry.
 If only I could find her. If only she could see me now, here, with such lovely kind friends. You, Mrs. Treves, and you, Mr. Treves. Then maybe she would love me as I am. I've tried to hard to be good.
 Oh no, Mr. Merrick. No. No son as loving as you are could ever be a disappointment.
 She has the face of an angel... She was an angel. She was so kind... so kind to me. It's not her fault, for in the fourth month of her maternal condition she was knocked down by an elephant. I'm sure I must have been a great disappointment to her.
 Oh... why Mr. Merrick she's beautiful.
 Oh, yes.
 I've always thought that myself.
 They have noble faces.
 How lovely.
 And here is one of Frederick's mother.
 Oh?
 Oh yes. You have so many nice things, and so much room.
 Two, please.
 One or two?
 Yes please, two.
 Mr. Merrick, sugar?
 Oh Frederick.
 ...Am I a good man or am I a bad man?
 Frederick, just what is it that you are saying?
 But why did I do it? What was this all for? So John Merrick could live out his last days in peace and comfort? Or so I could become famous?
 Oh that's absurd, Frederick. No, no Frederick, that's all wrong! John is happier and more fulfilled now than he has ever been in his entire life. And, that is completely due to you.
 That I am very little different from him.
 Oh, Freddie. What could that wretched vampire say to upset you?
 Oh... I've just been thinking about something that man Bytes said.
 ...Freddie! What's the matter? You've been like this all evening.
 Hmmm?
 More romances for John?
 Dinner will be served, shortly, dear.
 You stay with me.
 And here are my mother and father.
 Yes.
 Do you?
 John loves the house.
 I've only got until two o'clock tomorrow afternoon, when Carr Gomm meets him. Somehow, between now and then I've got to make John Merrick at least seem like an intelligent man... Why am I fooling myself? Nothing short of John delivering the Sermon on the Mount is going to sway Carr Gomm...
 Well, these things take time.
 I'm sorry... I don't know either. I just don't know.
 I'm sure I don't know, Freddie.
 And what qualities are those? Intelligence or stupidity?
 Perhaps you're just polishing a stone, endowing this Elephant Man with qualities he doesn't possess?
 I don't know. I can't explain it. If this is an intelligent man, trapped in the body of a monster, then I'm under a moral obligation to help free that mind, free that spirit as best I can, to help him live as full and content a life as possible. But! If he's an imbecile, who's body I can't treat and who's mind I can't touch, well, then my obligation is discharged. They can put him where they will; he won't be bothered, I won't be bothered, and everyone's conscience can remain free and untroubled. And that is my dilemma... what is in his mind?
 Frederick, why are you so interested in this particular case?
 He is. I mean, I've always thought he was. I think he must be. Is he simple? Or is that just something I've wished upon him to make things simpler for myself?
 But I thought you said that he was rather... simple?
 Well, I wasn't sure whether he was parroting me because that's all he was capable of, or whether he sensed that that's all I wanted to hear, and he was trying to please me.
 What do you mean?
 I shouldn't be. We made great progress today. I taught him to repeat a few basic phrases. He did rather well, too, but I had to lead him every step of the way. Though frankly, at times I was unsure of who was leading whom.
 Freddie?... Freddie, don't look so discouraged.
 No, I think a whiskey.
 Yes, and they send their kisses. Would you like your sherry now?
 Yes, very well, I think. Are the girls in bed?
 Did it go well, darling?
 I'll join you shortly.
 You won't be long?
 I'll get my bag.
 Like this.
 What is it?
 Our man is sick. Come right away.
 Did you see it?
 I found it.
 Yes?
 Excuse me, Mr. Treves, sir.
 Shut up!
 Don't!
 I'll show you! I'll show you!
 What are you going to do?
 If he does it's his own fault! But I'm not burying that swollen bag of flesh.
 He's sick, Bytes. He's going to die.
 He's doing it to spite me, I tell you, and it's got to stop!
 Aw, Bytes, he's sick.
 You sly bastard. You're doing this to spite me, aren't you!
 Right... Right.
 Now I think we really do understand one another.
 I've got my rights, damn you, and I'm going to the authorities!
 So you can beat him? So you can starve him? A dog in the street would fare better with you!
 I want him back!
 You don't own this man!
 You think you're better 'n me? YOU wanted the freak to show all your doctor chums and make a name for yourself, you guv. So I gave him to you. On trust, in the name of science! And now I want him back.
 All you do is profit from another man's misery!
 He's a freak! That's how they live. We're partners, him and I, business partners. You're willfully deprivin' me of my livlihood!
 I know what you've done to him and he's never going back to that.
 Pull the other one, why don't you! We made a deal!
 You misunderstood. This man suffered a severe fall, if you take my meaning. He's my patient now and I must do what...
 DON'T... Don't muck me about. You've had plenty of time to fix him up, and he's leaving with me, NOW. Do you understand me? Now, Mr. Treves. We had a bargain!
 He's still very sick. Please come downstairs with me. I'll explain the situation.
 Never mind that, I want my man!
 Just a moment, how did you get in here?
 I want my man back.
 Everything will be seen to.
 I like doing business with you. You and I understand each other, completely. I know I can trust you. Can't I?
 You listen, you're not going to have much of a livelihood if this man dies. He's got the rale, he's very weak, and I don't know how much damage has been done by his "fall". Now stop wasting time and fetch a cab.
 Can't you fix him up here? ...He's my livelihood. Listen.
 This man belongs in hospital.
 That's the way he sleeps. If he lays down, he'll die.  Head's too heavy.
 Why is he sitting up like this? He needs rest.
 He's a clumsy git. Never watches where he is going.
 He must have taken quite a fall.
 He fell.  He falls.
 What happened?
 I intend to.
 He was fine when he left here, and now look at him.
 What do you mean?
 What did you do to him? He's been like this all night!
 Steady on, Treves. Have a seat.
 Don't you think this is a bit premature? We don't have the backing yet to...
 Please do.
 Well... I'll let you know if there's something in the afternoon post.
 But he's so afraid he's going to be carted off. I've promised him that won't happen.
 Frankly, Treves, it's not what I'd expected. A few small cheques. Well- wishers. Don't worry, these things undoubtedly take time.
 Has the response picked up?
 Well, it's up to us then, isn't it?
 No, we don't. Their committees have informed me that they're unwilling to take Mr. Merrick, even if they were supplied with funds. They don't want him.
 Don't we?
 Of course they will. They're reasonable men.
 Do you think they'll go along with us?
 Excellent. We shall present them, along with the other particulars of the case to the committee. I want them to see, exactly, how horribly his body has been affected. You and I shall vouch for his inner qualities.
 Well, yes.
 No, not that way. Broadneck and the others don't like to deal with patients directly. It makes them queasy... Do you have any photographs of Mr. Merrick?
 I could easily arrange...
 You are quite right, Treves, this is an exceptional case. And I quite agree that the committee should see Mr. Merrick.
 No you can't. You can't begin to know, no one can.
 Yes, I think I can.
 Can you imagine what his life has been like?
 Not me, sir. Mr. Merrick. He succeeded in spite of my shortsightedness.
 Treves. Well done.
 Tell me, John, how did you know the rest of the 23rd Psalm?
 I don't understand.
 How did you, know the rest? I never taught you the rest of it.
 I'm sorry too. He simply doesn't belong here. He's be much happier somewhere else, where he could be constantly looked after. Believe me, Frederick, it's better that it worked out this way. Good day.
 Yes, I'm very sorry to have wasted your time, sir. I just felt that I had to do anything I could to protect him.
 It was a nice try, Treves, but the man is so obviously mouthing your words.
 And what was that, John?
 Oh yes?
 Fine, fine. You know, your dedication to this patient is an inspiring thing, Treves. But you must remember that this is a hospital, and there are many patients here. Patients who can be made well, and you owe them your first consideration. Just don't become so obsessed, old man, that you begin to neglect them.
 Yes, I spoke to both the British Home and Royal Hospital for Incurables. I'm afraid that they weren't very encouraging, but they said they'd bring it up at their next committee meeting, so we should have their answers shortly.
 He needn't. I have no desire to cause him any discomfort. Did you make those inquiries we spoke about?
 ...As I said, it's only a physical problem... but I do feel that Mr. Merrick is very flattered that you're taking the time and trouble to meet him, and he's most anxious to make a good impression, so he might seem rather nervous.
 Speaking is one thing, Treves, but can the man comprehend?
 It's only a physical problem. He has trouble with certain sounds because of the constrictive deformity of the mouth. But he can talk, and has a great eagerness to make contact with people who will let him. So if you have any difficulty understanding what he is saying, just tell me and I'll make it clear.
 ...Yes, Sir.
 Two o'clock then... you know Treves... It seems this acquaintance of yours has become rather more than just an acquaintance.
 Wh... whatever is most convenient for you, sir.
 Shall we say two o'clock tomorrow afternoon?
 Thank you very much Sir. Shall we say in a few days then?
 Singularly unpleasant chap... uh... I don't suppose there would be any harm in my meeting your... patient, Mr. Treves.
 Mr. Treves, it's out of the question. I want to hear as soon as possible what the other hospitals can do. I'm sorry.
 Then will you meet him, as a representative of the committee.
 No, Treves, it's out of the question. Now if it was up to me, I'd say "Certainly, let's meet the fellow, by all means," I'm sorry, I simply can't speak for the other members of the committee.
 I don't agree. No one can make a reasonable decision about this man's future without at least meeting him. No doctor would presume to diagnose a patient he had never met.
 I really don't think that's necessary Treves. I'm quite sure the committee will be able to make an equitable decision on the merits of the case, such as they are.
 Well sir, perhaps I should explain...
 A few words? I thought he was imbecile?
 He's doing very well. In fact that's why I came to see you. I think that if I were to present Mr. Merrick to the hospital committee, then they would have a chance to see for themselves not only the extraordinary nature of the disease, but of the man as well. If the committee had a chance to speak with him, hear him say a few words for himself, I'm sure they would see him as a patient, rather than as a violation of the rules.
 Good! How is the patient?
 Ah, no sir. I had planned to see them in the morning.
 Have you contacted the British Home and the Royal Hospital?
 Yes sir, I'll look into that.  Would you like to meet him sir?
 I certainly sympathize with your problem, Treves... Why don't you try the British Home, or the Royal Hospital for perhaps they would have a place for him.
 No, more of an acquaintance.
 Oh, is he a friend of yours?
 Yes, I'm well aware of that. But this case is quite exceptional.
 What are your plans then, Treves... You are aware that the London does not accept incurables. The rules are quite clear on that point.
 Yes sir.
 Deformed? Is that it. Then am I to assume that he is ultimately incurable?
 Well sir, he's quite seriously deformed, and I fear the other patients would find him... rather shocking.
 Why isn't he in the General Ward, then?
 No sir, he's got bronchitis and he's been badly beaten.
 A hospital is no place for secrecy, Mr. Treves. Doctors spiriting hooded figures about are liable to cause comment. Why wasn't this patient properly admitted, and why is he in isolation? Is he contagious?
 Indeed!
 Don't be frightened. He won't hurt you.
 Don't be mad. This muck can kill you.
 It's quite nutritious, sir.
 You've acquired a taste for this?
 Good morning, sir.
 Good morning, Treves.
 I hope we can talk together again sometime. Good day.
 I am very pleased to meet you.
 It was a great pleasure to meet you, Mr. Merrick.
 Thou preparest a table before me in the presence of mine enemies, Thou anointest my head with oil...
 What is it, Treves?
 Yes, of course... Well, it's been a pleasure meeting you, Mr. Merrick. Good day.
 ...everyone has been very kind.
 Of course. How long did you and Mr. Treves prepare for this interview?
 ...I... everyone has been very kind to me.
 Everyone has been very kind. I am extremely grateful.
 Are you comfortable here?
 I feel much better. Thank you.
 I'm feeling very fit, thank you. How is your bronchitis?
 I feel much better. Thank you for asking. And you?
 How are you feeling today?
 He's imbecile, no doubt from birth. He speaks, but... it's all gibberish. No, the man's a homeless idiot...  I pray God he's an idiot.
 You never mentioned his mental state.
 Nothing of any importance, eh?
 I don't know what I've got.
 Certainly, if you insist. You must have quite a find there.
 You'll know presently. At the meeting of the society. But until then, I beg of you Fox, keep it to yourself.
 Good Lord, Freddie! What have you got in there?
 Oh nothing... nothing of any great importance.
 I say Freddie, what are you about?
 What a mess.
 Abominable things these machines. One can't reason with them.
 Mmmm. Hodges, Pierce come closer. Mr. Hill, take hold of the rope please. It's a machine accident. I expect you'll be seeing a good deal of this.
 Three quarters of an hour.
 How long has this man been here?
 I know no way to mince it in love, but directly to say "I love you". What! A speaker is but a prater; a rhyme is but a ballad. A good leg will fall; a straight back will stoop; a black beard will turn white; a curl'd pate will grow bald; a fair face will wither; a full eye will wax hollow; but a good heart, Kate, is the sun and the moon, or rather the sun and not the moon; for it shines bright and never changes, but keeps his course truly.
 Oui, dat de tongues of de mans is be full of deceits.
 What say you, fair one? That the tongues of men are full of deceits?
 O bon Dieu! les langues des hommes sont pleines de tramperies.
 An angel is like you, Kate, and you are like an angel.
 Pardonnez-moi, I cannot tell vat is "like me".
 O fair Katharine, if you will love me soundly with your French heart, I will be glad to hear you confess it brokenly with your English tongue. Do you like me, Kate?
 Your majesty shall mock at me; I cannot speak your England.
 Fair Katharine, and most fair, will you vouchsafe to teach a soldier terms Such as will enter at a lady's ear And plead his love-suit to her gentle heart?
 Oh no... no... you're a Romeo.
 Oh no?
 Why, Mr. Merrick, you're not an Elephant Man at all...
 O, then, dear saint, let lips do what hands do. They pray, grant thou, lest faith turn to despair.
 Ay, pilgrim, lips that they must use in prayer.
 Have not saints lips, and holy palmers too?
 No, but I certainly shall.
 Have you read it?
 That's one thing the theatre has in great store. which reminds me. I have something else for you...
 Romance!
 It's very difficult to put into a nutshell, but I should say the theater is the shrine of the imagination, where one may suspend disbelief and travel anywhere in the world, to any time you desire. You may look over the shoulders of kings, unobserved, battle with ruthless tyrants, and marry the beautiful princess, all in the space of a few hours. Onstage you may be whoever you wish to be, do anything you please, and always, always live happily ever after. The theatre is all the brightest and best things of the world, Mr. Merrick. It is lights and music, gaiety and joy. It's... well, it's romance.
 Tell me about it, please!
 Well you must go. It is one of the most beautiful places on earth. Of course, I'm rather partial.
 Alas, no.
 You've never been?
 Well, even to work there would be wonderful. Is it beautiful?
 Oh no, Mr. Merrick. I just work there.
 Mr. Treves says that you are in the theatre. Do you live there?
 Yes.
 She's very pretty, your mother.
 Oh, no. I would never think it! It's so beautiful. You are so... I'll give it a place of honor, here, next to my mother.
 I want you to know that I don't go about giving my pictures to just anyone.
 I knew you'd understand. Here.
 Oh, no.
 I've brought you some things. I hope you'll like, Mr. Merrick. I hope you don't think it too forward.
 Good day...!
 Yes.
 Well, it's all quite... I've never heard... It's quite...
 Yes. There is nothing more frustrating, nothing that makes a physician feel more useless, than standing by watching his patient deteriorate. And when that patient is a friend, no... no, there's absolutely nothing I can do.
 Is he... dying then?
 And yet, not once have any of us heard him complain.
 How awful for John.
 I fear not, Mrs. Kendal. Even in the short time he was gone the size of his head has increased rapidly... as is his pain.
 Well it is a miracle he ever got back. And, I'm sure, Mr. Treves, under your expert care, he'll have many happy years ahead.
 I'm very grateful to you, Mrs. Kendal. This is just the thing to help him forget his ordeal. John will be very excited.
 It's all arranged. I'll send over some evening gowns for the sisters that you select to accompany Mr. Merrick. You'll be using the Royal entrance and Princess Alexandra herself will be there to welcome him to her private box.
 Good day, Mr. Merrick.
 John, I'd like you to meet one of the brightest lights of the British stage, Mrs. Kendal. Mrs. Kendal, John Merrick.
 You know, I saw you once there, in London. You're a great attraction.
 Oh, yes.
 Say hello to London for me. I miss her.
 Oh no, my friend...
 I'm sorry I could only get you a third class ticket, but it's all we had.
 Won't be a moment.
 Yes.
 Of course! You want out?
 You're English.
 Want to come out?
 y-y-yes--
 You alright?
 Yes... well, good day, Mr. Merrick.
 I'll have to find some more.
 ...I learned a long time ago.
 The... oh, the spire! How silly of me, it's as plain as day... Mr. Merrick, where did you learn to do this?
 The main spire.
 What's this?
 It's alright, it was thrown away. No one wants it. It's just that it's a little dirty, that's all.
 I meant no harm, it was the only place where I could find cardboard. I thought it has been thrown away.
 The hallway? Oh, the wastecan!
 Where did you get this box?
 Thank you... very much.
 But it's so good, I mean... it's so very good.
 Yes.
 What? Oh! I see! It's St. Phillips. Oh, of course. Why... why that's very good, I mean you've gotten the windows and arches just right.
 Good morning.
 Good morning, Mr. Merrick.
 No, nothing.
 Well, if there is nothing more, I suppose we'll be leaving you now.
 Thank you very much.
 Yes.
 Feeling better now, Mr. Merrick?
 You too, my friend. Goodnight.
 Goodnight John. Sleep well.
 No, no, I wouldn't change a thing.
 Then I shouldn't change anything?
 No, John, not one that I can see.
 Mr. Treves, tell me... tell me truly. Is it alright, did I make any mistakes that you can see?
 Yes John?
 I'm glad, John. Goodnight.
 Oh yes! It was wonderful!
 Splendid. it's truly a masterpiece. Well, I suppose I'll be on my way now. I hoped your enjoyed yourself this evening.
 Yes, very soon.
 Will the cathedral be finished soon, John?
 It's for you, John. It's all for you. Go ahead, let them see you.
 Oh no, I couldn't.
 Stand up, John. Let them see you.
 John.... how can you ever forgive me?
 Mr. Treves! Treves.
 Mr. Treves. Thank you my... friends.
 Are you sure? Because I can take it back.
 Oh, Mr. Treves. Mr. Treves.
 Is it the one you wanted?
 There is one more thing, John. Here.
 My home.
 Please... please thank the governing committee for me. I will do my utmost to merit their kindness.
 Yes.
 You did this for me?
 Yes, John.
 ...my... home?
 You don't think it's too gaudy, do you?
 You want a dressing bag, John?
 Please John, it would give me so much pleasure to give you something. Something just for yourself. Isn't there something you would like to have?
 Oh no! There is nothing! I have everything, you have given me everything I could possibly want. I am happy every hour of the day. I only wish there was something I could give to you.
 How blind of me. Is there anything else, John, anything at all that I could get for you?
 Yes, soon I will start the main spire, but I must finish these columns first, How kind of her!
 The cathedral is coming along nicely.
 I thought as much.
 No John, I can't. I can care for you, but I can't cure you.
 ...Can you cure me?
 Yes, John?
 Mr. Treves, there is something I've been meaning to ask you for some time...
 Never, oh! Never, nothing will die. the stream flows the wind blows the heart beats Nothing will die.
 When will the stream be aweary of flowing under my eye? When will the wind be aweary of blowing over the sky? When will the clouds be aweary of fleeting? When will the heart be aweary of beating, and nature die?
 John, there's someone here who would like to meet you. Would that be alright?
 Good morning.
 Good morning, John.
 Here.
 Your mother?
 Would you... would you like to see my mother?
 Friends. Ah yes, friends! How nice.
 Oh, they're gone for the day... with friends.
 The Children. Where are your children
 Of course.
 The children! May I see?
 Oh, our relatives... the children.
 Who are they of?
 Oh yes.
 I love the way you've arranged your pictures on the mantlepiece. Is that the way it's done in most houses?
 Not at all, John.
 It's very good. I'm enjoying my visit with you very much. It's so very kind of you to have me as a guest in your home. I'm sorry I made a spectacle of myself.
 How is your tea, John?
 Ohhh...
 That's a canopy, John.
 Well, it's a lovely bedroom. What do you call that thing above the bed?
 I'm not used to such kindness. From a beautiful woman.
 John... what's the matter? John... why are you upset?
 When one is invited to tea, one must look one's best.
 Thank you very much.
 You look splendid, John.
 I promise you. You will never see the inside of that horrible place again. You will never, ever go back to the workhouse... or that man. It's a splendid room, don't you think?
 How long will I stay here?
 Of course! What did you think?
 The hospital?
 Yes.
 This... is my new home?
 Very well, thank you. I have something for you, John. I'm sure you'll enjoy it, it's very popular.
 Good evening. Very well, thank you. And you?
 Good evening. How are you feeling?
 We do have a lot to talk about, don't we?
 Oh, no do not say that. You have been so kind to me. I was afraid to say too much. People always want me to be quiet. You wanted me to speak, but I was afraid. Forgive me.
 I never thought to ask. How can you ever forgive me?
 You did not ask me.
 Why did you let me go on like that, teaching you what you already knew? Why didn't you tell me you could read?
 But the variety of food here is very pleasing... I commend you.
 ...Yes potatoes... but...
 Oh yes! It is much better than what I am used to.
 Mr. Merrick likes the food here. Don't you John?
 Hello... my name is John Merrick. I am very pleased to meet you.
 John, may I introduce you to Sir Carr Gomm.
 Hello, my name is John Merrick. I am very pleased to meet you!
 Very good, very good. Now, when your visitor comes today I want you to say it exactly the way you said it just now. I will introduce him to you and you will say the words you've learned. If you have any trouble with any of the words, I'll help you. I'm sure you'll be just fine. If you do as well for him as you've done for me these last two days, then I'm sure our visitor will be very pleased. Now, let's go through the whole thing again, shall we? I will say "May I introduce you to Mr. Carr Gomm." And you will say...
 Righteousness for his namesake.
 Righteousness...
 The Lord is my shepherd, I shall not want, he maketh me to lie down in green pastures; He leadeth me beside still waters. He restoreth my soul: He Guideth me in the paths of righteousness...
 Hello, my name is John Merrick.
 Why, my dear Mrs. Mothershead, how good of you to join us. Mr. Merrick, will you please introduce yourself?
 Hello... my name is... John Merrick.
 Well, that's alright. I understand you. Now, say the whole thing again, Hello ...
 Mmmerrick.
 Say "Mmmerrick."
 Mmmerrick.
 Say "Mmmerrick."
 Merrick...
 Say "Merrick".
 John... Merrick
 John Merrick.
 My... name is...
 My name is...
 Hello...
 Excellent! Now, say... "Hello"
 Yes.
 Very good! Oh yes! Now listen. I'm going to say some things to you and I want you to repeat them... um... I want you to say them back to me. Do you understand? I'm going to say some things to you and I want you to say them back to me. Do you understand?
 Yes!
 That's much better. I could understand that "yes".
 Yyess.
 Yyyess.
 ...Yyes
 Yes John!
 Yyyy... Yyye... yyyess.
 Welcome home, John.
 So you see, John, there's no need for a lighthouse. All your friends are here.
 John thinks it's very dashing. Something no gentleman should be without. I'm inclined to agree.
 Well...
 You don't think it's too gaudy, do you.
 A dressing bag?
 Yes. John wants it.
 Very smart indeed.
 A dressing bag.
 Yes sir.  What's that?
 Thank you, Mothershead. Have a porter put them in my office.
 Mr. Treves, some more books arrived for Mr. Merrick.
 You're right, Mothershead, please forgive me... Of course, I appreciate everything you've done for John, and I'm glad that you are concerned about his welfare. But, I'm the physician in charge and I must do what I think best. I'm also very late, so please forgive me.
 I bathed him, didn't I? I fed him and cleaned up after him! If loving kindness can be called care and practical concern, then yes, I did treat him with loving kindness, and I'm not ashamed to say it.
 Aren't you being just a little harsh, Mothershead? You yourself hardly treated John with much loving kindness when he first arrived.
 But you saw them, sir. They couldn't hide their disgust. They don't care anything for John, they're just trying to impress their friends.
 Now Mothershead, you have to understand that this is very good for John. He relishes contact with people outside the hospital...
 I can't understand why you let those people go in there, sir.
 Oh?... Well, quickly please, Mothershead, I'm overdue.
 Excuse me, sir. I'd like to have a word with you.
 Incredible, isn't it? Well, I think John has had enough visitors for one day, Mothershead. I've got a lecture at the college, I'll be back this evening.
 I regret that I must leave you here, m' Lord, m' Lady. Thank you so much for coming. It was an act of the greatest charity.
 Watery headed bunch.
 I'm sure that if Mr. Merrick made a good impression on the hospital committee they'd see that he's the exception to their rule. Now I'm not expecting miracles. I'm not saying he'll be able to read or write, but I do think that I can get him to speak for himself. I'm going to arrange things with Carr Gomm right now.  That was very good, John, very good. That's all for today. We shall do some more tomorrow. Mothershead?
 Parrots can do as much, Mr. Treves. It's all very nice, but I don't see the point. You know they won't let him stay here.
 We've made tremendous strides today, Mothershead. He listens and repeats with great attention, and this certainly isn't easy for him.
 Good Lord, Mr. Treves!
 Perhaps you've got the time for that, Mr. Treves, I certainly don't. I've got an entire hospital to look after, and you have your real patients. Don't waste your time with him sir, it's like talking to a wall. I don't mean to be harsh, but truthfully what can you do for him? I'll be back later for his bath. And Mr. Carr Gomm would like to see you when you have a moment. Good day sir.
 He's had his share of "smacks", Mothershead. I expect that's what drives him under the bed. We must use patience and understanding with this man.
 Just being obstinate, sir. I'll handle it.
 No, he's very upset about something.
 Won't come out, eh?
 Not quite yet, Mrs. Mothershead. There seems to be some difficulty this morning.
 Good morning, Mr. Treves. It'll be his bath-time soon. Has he eaten?
 Yes! The workhouse!
 The workhouse.
 Yes... Yes, let's go in.
 Sir, you don't have to worry about me. I'm not the sort to cry out. Shall we go in?
 Yes... Well, I want you to clear up a little mess, a breakfast tray was spilt. And bring up another breakfast. When you've done that, you and I shall give the man a bath. But, Mothershead, I'm counting on your many years of experience to get you through this, Above all, do not scream, do not cry out, or in any way show this man that you are frightened of him...
 I've heard.
 Good. Excellent. Now then, Mrs. Mothershead, I want you to come into this room with me. Inside there is a man with a rather... unfortunate appearance.
 Fine.
 Ah, Mothershead. How are you feeling today?
 YOU'RE THE MONSTER! YOU'RE THE FREAK! GET OUT! YOU'RE FINISHED!
 YOU'RE NOT LISTENING TO ME! I ain't done nothing wrong. People pay to see your monster, Mr. Treves. I just take the money.
 YOU BASTARD! You tortured him. YOU TORTURED HIM, you bastard. WHERE is HE?
 When I left him, he was in his bed, safe and sound.
 HE'S GONE!
 Take him? Now wait... I didn't take him anywhere. We were just having some fun. We didn't hurt him... just having a laugh, that's all.
 Don't lie to me. I know all about it. You were SEEN. Where did you take him?
 I... I don't know what you mean, Sir.
 WHERE IS MR. MERRICK?
 I'll send a cab. Here is my card.
 Bytes. Mr. Bytes. He'll be there.
 So you'll bring him to me, tomorrow, 10:00 a.m.? Mr...?
 Never mind. I'm the owner.
 Pardon me?
 Handsomely?... Who sent you?
 I'd pay handsomely for a private showing. Are you the proprietor?
 I don't think so. No sir, we're closed.
 Just one of the curious. I'd like to see it.
 And who might you be, sir?
 Are you the proprietor?
 Well, my dear, I think you'll find it's all a question of what you want to believe in.... I have slightly more experience of these matters than you...
 It's sinking! Hy-Brasil is sinking!
 But, Father, it IS!
 It's all right! It isn't happening!
 But one day I'll catch you... Like I caught her...
 It's your fantasy...
 She did, I tell you! She could blind me as easily as the night the day.
 There is no magic, Father... My mother had no magic...
 I don't know how you do it, Aud... I sometimes think you've got some of your mother's magic...
 It's all in your own mind, Father... It's YOU who imagine that I'm always up here with some man or other....
 You're losing your temper!
 Ah! So you admit there IS someone!
 There's nobody here, Father. Look for yourself.
 Well... where is he?
 There IS no one.
 Who? Who? Whoever you've got in here of course!
 Who, Father?
 Right! Where is he?
 Open up! I know you're in there!
 Ah! It's my father!
 Open up! I know you're in there!
 But, Aud... I... I came to find someone...
 I don't want to live WITHOUT you.
 No... no...
 Then I shall come too.
 No living man has ever set foot in the Halls of Asgaard... The Gods will never let you return.
 There is something I must ask the Gods...
 Blow the third note! The note to take us home!
 Not quite...
 Erik! You've done what you came to do!
 The second note to wake the Gods...
 The second note.
 Then let go!
 Yes -- I believe you do.
 You don't have to love me. Just: do you believe I love YOU?
 I... but I...
 Do you believe I love you?
 Of course.
 YOU still want to go to Asgaard?
 I MUST look! Keitel! Hold this!
 No. Don't look... The abyss will suck away your strength.
 That's right!
 No! No! We are in the spell of the Horn! Hatred will destroy us.
 No! WAIT! ERIK! The Cloak! The Cloak Invisible! It only seems to work on my father!
 And thanks for the Cloak Invisible!
 Goodbye, Aud...
 But you don't realize....
 No. It's YOU who doesn't understand, Aud. Halfdan has come to kill and destroy. We brought him here. We must stop him.
 Erik. You don't understand.
 I'll bring it back.
 No!
 Why?
 Where's the Cloak Invisible?
 I mean, you could have killed yourself.
 Just give me a hand.
 But, Erik...
 Halfdan the Black.
 Who?
 We mustn't let him land!
 And the week before that?
 You're as bad as my father.
 Five this week; how many the week before?
 That's just what I was trying to tell you. You ARE...
 And I thought you said it was something special...
 Oh, for goodness' sake!
 "The fifth one this week"!
 The Cloak Invisible. It was my mother's parting gift.
 I've never been to bed with anybody!
 I've never LOVED anybody!
 You've been to bed with somebody else, haven't you?
 Why do you go on about that? What does it matter?
 We never went to bed together.
 But you LOVED her all the same...
 Oh... oh, I didn't know her very well...
 What was she like?
 It was different...
 What does that matter? But you've... you've... FELT like this before...
 HAVE you ever been to bed with anyone else?
 No, I mean have you ever felt that for the first time in your life you'd met somebody you could believe in with your whole heart... someone whose goals suddenly seem to be YOUR goals... whose dreams seem to be YOUR dreams?
 You mean... you HAVE got into bed with somebody else?
 No, of course not, silly -- I mean FELT like this about them?
 What... you mean "got into bed with" them?
 Have you ever felt like this about anyone else?
 But surely you know...?
 Yes.
 WHY?
 Put them down!  PLEASE make them put them down.
 What?
 PLEASE! You don't know what you're doing!
 What's the matter?
 These? What are THESE? They're swords.
 Those things in your hands.
 What are what?
 Please! Please! What are those?
 Well, EVERYONE is friends here on Hy- Brasil.
 How d'you KNOW we're "friends"?
 Well, of course. We always welcome friends.
 WELCOME?
 I said welcome.
 WHAT did you say?
 SHE blew the Horn Resounding.
 We blew the Horn Resounding.
 How do we know this is the way?
 What d'you mean?
 But... How is it you can see me?  You can all see me?
 It was my master Keitel's idea.
 But --
 Halfdan wanted to stop you waking the Gods... so... I disguised myself to sabotage their plans.
 LOKI! Where did YOU come from?
 That I cannot tell you.
 And will the dead ever return, Freya?
 I will go and wake them up!
 The Gods are asleep, Erik.
 Is there nothing men can do?
 The sky WAS blue, Erik... once.
 Of course not... but... when I was a child... I remember a dream.... it was as if the whole sky was blue...
 But have you ever seen it? Think back...
 The sun is up beyond the clouds -- where it always is.
 Have you ever seen the sun, Erik?
 Is it summer or winter, Erik?
 It is day, of course, Freya.
 Is it night or day, Erik?
 I see the world.
 What do you see, Erik?
 They will make fun of you for listening to an old woman's stories?
 I shouldn't have come.
 Now what CAN you want with me, Erik the "Viking"?
 The important thing is not to panic.
 But it IS! Look!
 Then I expect you'll be leaving first thing in the morning.
 Yes... oh, yes...
 Well, it's not called the Horn Resounding for nothing.  You DO know how to play the horn, don't you?
 Oh! No! No... of course not... it's just I hadn't expected it to be quite so big.
 Is there something the matter with it?
 I know that the Great Blessing has kept the peace for a thousand years, and will keep it for the next thousand.
 You don't know Halfdan the Black.
 Not when we explain about the Great Blessing.
 He wants to kill US!
 Don't talk nonsense.
 Because that's how he makes his money, by war and plunder!
 Why?
 He's trying to stop us waking the Gods.
 They'll be more than "hurt" if Halfdan the Black lands! Ow!
 It's all part of our safety regulations. You see if someone were to get hurt they might get angry and then... well...
 You've got to let me go!
 Careful!  They're not supposed to hurt you.
 Yes?
 I'll tell you what...
 YOU try to be nice to people, when they're rude about your singing...
 The Gods are asleep, King Arnulf.
 Well, how d'you think I feel?
 Your Majesty! We come from a world where there IS no music. Where men live and die by the axe and by the sword...
 They didn't like it! Oh God! I want to die!
 No.
 Now I want you to be ABSOLUTELY, totally, genuinely honest with me. Did you really, truly, honestly like it?
 No, no... It was very... er, nice.
 We're just not a very musical nation...
 Right! Summon the musicians! We'll do the one that goes "TUM-TUM-TUM- TUM-TI-TUM-TUM"
 No.
 And you're not just saying it because you think we want you to?
 Really.
 REALLY?
 Of course we're not; we'd genuinely like to hear you sing.
 You're just saying that.
 Er... well... we... we... would be TERRIBLY grateful if you... all... would sing for us.
 No... no...  We'd love to hear it. Wouldn't we?
 But you don't want to hear it.
 I'm sure it's lovely.
 A lot of people like our singing.
 Oh, no no no! It's just the Horn Resounding is...
 You don't think our singing's going to be good enough for you?
 Oh... well, yes, of course; it's just we're looking for the Horn Resounding and --
 What's the matter, don't you WANT to hear our singing?
 That's very kind of you, but we're in rather a hurry... We're...
 Would you like us to sing to you?
 Well... isn't it great?
 Well, OBVIOUSLY there's no killing.
 Well... for a start... er... there's no killing...
 How?
 The Gods decreed that if ever a sword spills human blood upon these shores, the whole of Hy-Brasil will sink beneath the waves.
 No... we don't...
 I don't know! I just did!
 Why should you care?
 Odin!
 You'll have to wait till he's finished his game.
 Is THAT Odin?
 Well... no...
 Have you tried to ask the God for anything?
 I'll ask the Gods to give you life again!
 What's the point of being dead in the land of the living?
 Why?
 What a stupid idea.
 I've come to take you back to the land of the living.
 Tell me your name?
 Why... should YOU care?
 Why should you care?
 I dunno... you looked so... so vulnerable...
 You told them I raped you -- why?
 Oh, that's all right then... it's the thought... that counts...
 I didn't mean to!
 Thanks for saving me from a fate worse than death.
 Oh, thanks.
 Aaagh! Rape!
 Louder.
 Ah.
 Scream.
 And I was just saying that rape is no MORE pointless or crude than all the killing and looting that goes on.
 I just said I didn't feel like raping you.
 Well you started it.
 Oh! Stop talking as if we were married!
 But that's a circular argument! If the only reason for going on an expedition is the killing and looting and the only reason for the killing and looting is to pay for the next expedition, they cancel each other out.
 To pay for the next expedition, of course.
 Why? Why have you got to go round killing and looting?
 Oh well -- you've GOT to do them.
 What about the killing and looting? That's just as crude, isn't it?
 Well it just seems a little bit crude, that's all.
 You DON'T like it, do you?
 About NOT raping you...
 About raping me?
 I'll kill you if you say anything about this to anyone.
 What d'you expect? You come in here, burn my village, kill my family and try to rape me...
 I don't suppose you... you DO like me at all?
 What?
 I don't suppose... no...
 Oh, get it over with.
 No. It isn't rape then, is it?
 What -- rape?
 No... right... this is RAPE... Mark you, I'm not saying I couldn't get to like you... in fact... well, to be quite honest, I prefer it when there's some sort of mutual feeling between two people...
 You don't love ME.
 Of course I like women... I LOVE 'em.
 Sh!
 It's obvious you haven't raped anyone in your life.
 Shut up.
 What about the raping?
 Yes.
 Looting and pillaging, eh?
 Me? Of course! I've been looting and pillaging up and down the coast.
 Have you done this sort of thing before?
 Don't you FEEL it?
 It's not magic! It's just a trick!
 I know. I know.
 But. You're not even afraid of DEATH, Thorfinn!
 He wants to KILL us.
 I know!
 Halfdan the Black's here!
 You mean if just ONE PERSON gets killed?
 That's terrible!
 You don't go through all the hardships of an ocean voyage to make "friends".
 What's wrong with making friends?
 No.
 Let's hack her to pieces.
 Very deep... usually...
 How deep IS the ocean?
 It saved my father!
 Erik! Row! What are you doing?
 I know. Snorri! Get your oar out!
 It's Halfdan the Black!
 Come on, move it!
 What are you talking about?
 He was lucky...  Sit there.
 Nothing... Halfdan the Black chopped his hand off last night.
 What?
 But...
 "But" what?
 Find it... AND cross it!
 FIND the Rainbow Bridge?
 That's my boy!
 I... I... KILLED her...
 So? What'd you do to her?
 She got me thinking...
 It's always the women that start the trouble.
 I met this girl...
 Who have you been talking to?
 Where does it all get us, Grandpa?
 You talking piffle, son?
 We toil and labor, we loot and pillage, rape and kill... and yet...
 What?
 What's it all about?
 We're missing all the fun...
 Make your mind up.
 Faster!
 Sorry!
 Slower! In... Out...
 Sorry.
 Slower! Nobody can row at that speed!
 Row! Row! Row!
 I want to die...  No, I don't!
 Well, you ARE!
 He can have my place. I don't want to go anyway.
 Look out!
 What did he say?
 You'll see!
 What "magic" have you brought, Erik?
 I've heard stories of a magic that strikes fear into the heart so you cannot fight.
 What "magic"?
 It's magic.
 The sun! That's it!
 Look, the sky is blue...
 ROW!
 SHUT UP!
 Shut up. You there. You there and you there.
 Ohh! I wanted to sit next to Leif.
 You may need a real Berserk.
 What are YOU doing here?
 Look... Erik...
 But you're the Gods!
 Erik the Viking! The things you seek are not in our power. We don't make men love each other or hate each other.
 Bring the Age of Ragnarok to an end and stop all this fighting and bloodshed.
 So?
 Because... you're... you're the Gods....
 Why should WE care?
 Fenrir the Wolf covers the sun -- men fight and kill each other the whole time.
 We don't HAVE to help anybody.
 You must help us.
 No! Arrgh!
 You'll be sucked down too!
 I've got you!
 No! Let go, Snorri!
 Oh... I feel a little... oh...
 Weren't we supposed to?
 To the oars!
 A magic dishcloth.
 Like fish.
 Listen! Maybe we won't get to Hy- Brasil! Maybe we won't find the Horn Resounding... but at least we've tried... and at least we shall have died like men.
 Well, come on!
 First we're flying -- now we're sinking!
 Has anyone told him we've got a dragon eating our boat?
 Row!
 Now you've got all the ones with beards on one side and all the moustaches on the other.
 That's better.
 Now you've got all the big ones on one side.
 That's true.  You'd better sit there.  You there, and Ornulf there.
 You can't have Sven's father sitting next to Sven. They'll argue the whole time.
 Trust me to get the missionary.
 Leif, you sit there. Even, you sit there. Harald, you'd better sit over there...
 It's SO nice to feel wanted.
 Now stop it!
 Thank you VERY much indeed.
 No! We'd be the first living men to set foot in the Halls of the Gods.
 You mean we'd be dead?
 No, don't say anything else!
 Right.  Farewell... for the last time... may the gods prevent...
 I think we should go...
 Oh... right!  Well... CHEERS everybody!
 Just say something cheerful.
 What's the matter with them?
 Oh... er... yes...
 You need to say a bit more than that!
 Nobody gets killed.
 Who gets killed?
 There is another way.
 What are you talking about?
 Don't you see, Erik! She wants revenge!
 What is it?
 So Halfdan the Black's using magic, is he? Well, I have a magic to match his!
 How about making friends?
 Well, what else do we do?
 But...
 And you, Keitel Blacksmith.
 But how could he know... unless...
 What do you think?
 What's the matter with Bjorn?
 Bjorn's not. He could have Bjorn's place.
 Keitel Blacksmith?
 Wait, Erik!
 I have to go...
 I came to find my grandfather.
 Let me do something for myself for a change!
 Sven!
 Over the Edge of the World.
 We must blow the first note... he note that will take us to Asgaard...
 Is THIS Hy-Brasil?
 Hy-Brasil?
 She MUST have a knife or something...
 She hasn't got any.
 DEATH!
 ROW!
 We haven't got a spare place.
 I AM one, Dad!
 I don't want to have to sit next to Snorri all that time.
 Well, what difference does it make where you're SITTING?
 Yes it does! We could be at sea for months.
 It doesn't matter WHERE you sit!
 Look, I bagged it last week.
 I was sitting there.
 Hey, you two! What's going on?
 I don't know -- but I'm not afraid to try.
 But HOW?
 We'd be the first!
 Nobody's ever crossed the Rainbow Bridge to Asgaard.
 What's the matter? Are you afraid to try?
 Only the dead reach Asgaard, Erik.
 What if we could find Bi-Frost the Rainbow Bridge?
 What are you talking about, Erik?
 I will join my grandfather there.
 And you, Sven, aren't you afraid of crossing the Rainbow Bridge to Asgaard?
 Please.
 That's why they call me... Leif the Lucky.
 What d'you expect me to do?
 You will wait?
 Yeah... well...
 Bye... sorry...
 Bye, Leif.
 Well, where is he then?
 He hasn't.
 Vanish into thin air?
 Do what?
 How did he do that?
 Nothing... I just immerse you in water...
 What do we have to do?
 It can't do you any HARM...
 The Dragon...
 What's all the panic about?
 I hope the Dragon of the North Sea gets YOU AND your lord.
 Quite... MY lord... said: "The Prayer of Faith shall have the sick."
 Your lord.
 You know, my son, our lord said...
 No, it is NOT.
 Same thing, isn't it?
 Thorbjorn Vifilsson's wife became a Buddhist, not a Christian.
 There was Thorbjorn Vifilsson's wife. You converted HER.
 Listen. I've been in this dump for sixteen years and I haven't made a single convert...
 You're wasting your time.
 I thought I might do a bit of business on the way.
 You coming? You don't even believe in Asgaard.
 Mum! Dad!
 Oh! Who cares? We're HOME!
 Oh, yes! I hadn't noticed that!
 That's it! AND you keep wanting to go to the lavatory.
 And a sort of slightly sick feeling?
 That's it!
 Is it sort of... like a sinking feeling in your stomach?
 Bastard.
 He used to puke in his sleep.
 Look! I don't feel BAD about it. I just feel ILL.
 Olaf Tryggvason used to throw up on every single voyage... the whole time... non-stop... puke... puke... puke.
 I know. I know.
 I mean many of the greatest sailors were.
 How can you help feeling bad when you're sea-sick?
 You don't need to feel bad about being sea-sick, you know.
 No, I'm not.
 Are you all right?
 Hang on...
 For your own sake... For the others... I...
 I've got you, Keitel Blacksmith. If you go... I go too...
 I'm not worth risking your life for.
 What are you talking about?
 Let me go, Sven.
 Got you!
 Aaagh!
 What have you got there?
 Get away, Snorri.
 What are you doing, Keitel Blacksmith?
 What?
 Oh...
 It's me. I'm just going to water the dragon...
 Who's that?
 I... I...
 Well! Come on!
 It's not my business any more!
 By YOU -- Keitel Blacksmith! Don't you know, Erik, that is why he went with you? Ragnarok was good for his business...
 Made by YOU, Loki!
 Like you got rid of Snorri!
 I should have got rid of you long ago!
 You fool!
 We came to stop you waking the Gods, Erik! But I didn't want anyone to get hurt!
 You've lost your mind.
 No! It's YOU, Loki! I should never have listened to you!
 Keep your mouth shut, Keitel!
 She knows it was our fault!
 Shut up!
 Help!
 Help!
 You'll drown us bo...
 Help!
 Urrgh! Argh! Let go, you idiot!
 I'm drowning! Help!
 Relax!
 I can't swim! I can't swim!
 You'll be able to throw it further than I could.
 YOU do it!
 Sh! Hurry!
 How can we stops him now?
 Are you going to let Erik wake the Gods?
 Well... I... I thought...
 Wasn't it, Keitel?
 You can't let Erik do THAT.
 Together we stand!
 Honour and protect all blacksmiths.
 The Blacksmith's Code says I must...
 That's right.
 My brother blacksmiths!
 It's not just YOUR livelihood that's at stake but your son's, and the livelihood of ALL blacksmiths.
 The bottom falls out of the sword business!
 The Age of Ragnarok ends...
 They chase Fenrir the Wolf from the sky...
 But, Keitel, if Erik ever finds the Horn Resounding... if he ever crosses Bi-Frost, the Rainbow Bridge... if he ever wakens the gods..
 Can't make enough axe-heads!
 Can't make enough swords!
 If this IS the Age of Ragnarok, Keitel Blacksmith, it is GOOD to us.
 Yes yes... of course.... the "Blacksmith's Code"...
 Oh, I couldn't do that! The Blacksmith's Code says...
 You just can't make enough swords and spears and knives and daggers to satisfy the demand. You could charge Halfdan twenty and he'd pay it.
 You could charge him what you like.
 Yes, it is good. But I told him ten.
 Ooh, that's a good one! You could charge Halfdan fifteen for that one.
 I hate you! I hate you!
 Dad!
 And his "you'll never be a Berserk if you lose your temper"...
 Easy, Dad!
 He drove me mad!
 Helpless...
 There is nothing we can do...
 GIVE US A CHANCE, Dad!
 Well, go on! Go berserk!
 I'm just building up to it, Dad.
 There! THAT'S a true Berserk.
 Sh!
 Well, of course he is!
 DEATH TO DRAGONS!
 HOLD it! HOLD it in!
 Stop it!
 KILL! KILL!
 It's no good going berserk against a dragon!
 I must KILL! Kill!
 Not now, Sven...
 We're being attacked! KILL! Kill! Kill!
 I KNOW! I'VE HEARD IT ALL 1 THOUSAND TIMES!
 You must only let the red rage take hold of you in the thick of battle.
 I must only let the red rage...
 But it's a responsibility being a Berserk.
 But it's a responsibility...
 So did my father and his father before him.
 So did your father...
 I went berserk in every battle I ever fought for King Harald...
 You went berserk...
 I was a Berserk for King Harald Fairhair...
 I know, Dad.
 It's a tradition.
 Tell him I'm coming!
 No... he's not... not... there...
 You'll see my grandfather in Valhalla!
 I'm not frightened... of anything...
 Thorfinn! You can't die!
 Erik's right! We'll all meet in Valhalla.
 Shut up.
 Me too.
 Well... I'm game.
 Neither am I.
 Well I'M certainly not, either.
 You liar!
 He's not in Valhalla! He died of old age!
 I never do...
 And if you have to kill somebody, KILL them! Don't stop to think about it.
 Yes, Mother. Goodbye, Dad.
 And keep your sword greased.
 No, Mother.
 And don't forget: never let your enemy get behind you.
 Yes, Mum.
 And something to sharpen them with?
 Yes, Mother.
 And you've got BOTH axes?
 No one.
 Who was the girl you walked off with?
 I told you that later.
 Yeah, you told me that later.
 This is the night you met Clementine, Joel. I remember watching you walk down the beach with her and I thought, oh shit.
 I remember.
 I did. You said, things were fine.
 I remember you turned around. Your face was dark and your hair was backlit -- I could see a halo of frizz -- you asked me if things were okay between Naomi and me.
 Just a little overworked, maybe.
 I'm sorry Naomi couldn't make it. You okay? You seem quiet.
 Say hi to Naomi.
 Yeah.
 I hope you feel better, sweetie.
 Thanks, guys.
 Sweetie, we called the company.
 They can't erase memories. It's a joke. It's a nasty Clementine hoax.
 You weren't supposed to see that.
 I don't know. I'm so... I can't believe she'd be so goddamn immature!
 Maybe you need to look at this as a sign to move on. Just make a clean break.
 She's punishing me for being honest. I should just go to her house.
 I don't know, honey. It's horrible.
 Hi, Joel. So no jokes about my name?
 No, it was lovely.
 You did? You liked me?
 And I just liked you so much.
 But, I don't know, maybe we're the normal ones, y'know? I mean, what kind of people do well at this stuff?
 But I thought, I don't know, I thought it was cool that you were sensitive enough to know what I was feeling and that you were attracted to it.
 Anyhoo, sweetie, I done a bad thing. I kinda sorta wrecked your car...
 Shit. The last time I saw you.
 Here we are.
 Okay, I guess.
 How are you today?
 Hi.
 Ms. Kruczynski?
 Yes, please have a seat. He'll be right with you.
 Yeah, hi, I have a one o'clock with Dr. Mierzwiak. Clementine Kruczynski.
 May I help you?
 Nothing is wrong with you. You're the most wonderful person I've ever met.
 What's wrong with me?
 It's gorgeous.  Just my taste. I've never  gone out with a guy who brought me a piece of jewelry I liked.  Thanks. So let's get going. Long drive.
 I didn't have a chance to wrap it.
 I'm excited, too. Oh, and I wanted to give you this. It's a little... thing.
 I'm so excited. Yay!
 Yay! It'll be great! I'll get my shit.
 Um, okay. I'll call my study partner.
 Now. Now! I have to go now. I have to see the frozen Charles! Now! Tonight!
 Sure. We'll go next weekend and --
 Come up to Boston with me?
 Nothing makes any sense. Nothing makes any sense.
 Oh, Tangerine.
 I don't know. I'm lost. I'm scared. I feel like I'm disappearing. I'm getting old and nothing makes any sense to me.
 Oh, baby, what's going on?
 In the world.
 In the room?
 It's so cool. You're by far the most sensational person in the room.
 I really want to, but tonight's important. Test tomorrow.
 You rat.
 I can't. I want to, but I have to study.
 Come over after I'm done here?
 I was not.
 You were not.
 I just thought I'd say hi. I was in the neighborhood.
 I think I know. I think we can help. Why don't you start by telling me about your relationship. Everything you can think of. Everything about him. Everything about you. And we'll take it from there.
 Maybe gay isn't the right word. But, anyway, it's been rough with him... whatever the fuck he is. Heheh. My significant other... heh heh. And I guess on a certain level, I want to break it off, but I feel... y'know... it's like this constant questioning and re questioning. Do I end it? Should I give it more time? I'm not happy, but what do I expect? Relationships require work. You know the drill. The thing that I keep coming back to is, I'm not getting any younger, I want to have a baby... at some point... maybe... right? So then I think I should settle -- which is not necessarily the best word -- I mean, he's a good guy. It's not really settling. Then I think maybe I'm just a victim of movies, y'know? That I have some completely unrealistic notion of what a relationship can be. But then I think, no, this is what I really want, so I should allow myself the freedom to go out and fucking find it. You know? Agreed? But then I think he is a good guy and... It's complicated. Y'know?
 What? No. I don't like the term boyfriend. It's so gay.
 You guess he's your boyfriend? Or you guess you're having a bad time with him?
 Well, I've been having a bad time of it with um, my boyfriend, I guess.
 Well, why don't you tell me what's going on? Do you mind if I turn this on?
 Okay, I guess.
 How are you today?
 I just wanted to say that. Come by my house.
 What old mill? Is that somewhere we --
 Yay. Meet me after work by the old mill.
 I can't stop thinking about you.
 You're still excited by my irreverence. You haven't yet started to think of it as my "gratuitous need to shock."
 We should have sex. It's old hat for us.
 I sort of do. But I only see it as a fantasy version of reality. Cleaned up enough to be erotic.
 Says you were constantly calling me a slob.  It's sexy that we were like a married couple, griping and overly-familiar and bored. Don't you think?
 Says you were a slob, leaving trails of panties and dirty socks in your wake.
 Doesn't sound like me.
 I don't know.
 Did I use the term "sexual conquests" or is that your way of putting it.
 Says you would sometimes disappear all night, then brag to me about your sexual conquests.
 Well, sounds like me. Sorry, man.  Says you were jealous and suspicious.
 That's what it says. You drank too much, you picked on me for being passive and timid.
 A bully? Moi?
 Says you were a bully...
 Says you were closed off, non communicative, never told me what you were feeling.
 I'm nervous because I have and enormous crush on you.
 Well, you obviously don't know me.
 Yeah? I wouldn't have thought that.
 I'm nervous, too.
 -- and I'm just too nervous around you right now.
 Hey, Joel --
 I'm sorry. I just wanted to say that. This seems like the perfect romantic exotic place to do it and --
 That's okay. I --
 Because I just am not drunk enough or stoned enough to make that happen right now.
 Oh, um...
 Have sex. Y'know --
 Make love?
 Listen, did you want to make love?
 Joel, come here. Please.
 I think I should go back.
 What if?
 I don't know. What if it breaks?
 I don't know.
 Don't worry. It's really solid this time of year.
 Yeah.
 Tonight. Just to test out the phone lines.
 Tomorrow?
 When?
 Yeah.
 So you'll call me, right?
 I love you.
 Bye, Joel.
 Come back and make up a good-bye at least. Let's pretend we had one.
 I walked out the door. There's no more memory.
 What if you stay this time?
 I did. I walked out the door. I felt like I was a scared little kid. I thought you knew that about me. I ran back to the bonfire, trying to outrun my humiliation. You said, "so go" with such disdain.
 So go.
 No, it's our house! Just tonight --  -- we're David and Ruth Laskin. Which one do you want to be? I prefer to be Ruth but I'm flexible.  Alcohol! You make drinks. I'm going find the bedroom and slip into something more Ruth. I'm ruthless at the moment.
 I think we should go.
 Ah-ha! Now I can look for candles, matches, and the liquor cabinet.
 Naomi.
 Yeah. What's your girlfriend's name?
 It's dark.
 I knew by your nervousness that Naomi wasn't the kind of girl who forced you to criminally trespass.
 I knew.
 I could see you wanted to come in, Joel.
 I hesitated for what seemed like forever.
 C'mon, man. The water's fine. Nobody's coming here tonight, believe me. This place is closed up. Electricity's off.
 It's freezing out here.
 What are you doing?
 Cool.
 At least I haven't been barking up the wrong tree.
 Female.
 Male or female?
 Oh.
 I do sort of live with somebody though.
 Let's move into this neighborhood.
 Um, no.
 I wish we did. You married?
 Yes! I love that poem. It breaks my heart. I'm so excited you know it.  Look, houses in which we don't live.
 Yeah, yeah. It goes "Perhaps there is someone in this world to whom I could send all these lines"?
 Do you know her poem that starts "Seaside gusts of wind,/And a house in which we don't live...
 Yeah, maybe.
 Seems too coincidental that way.
 I think, before.
 Did this conversation come before or after we saw the house?
 Me too. There's this poem --
 I think she's great.
 Really? Me, too! I don't meet people who even know who she is and I work in a book store.
 I love her.
 Have you ever read any Anna Akhmatova?
 Okay.
 I'll give you a couple. See what you think.
 yeah?
 You should try Xanax. I mean, it's a chemical and all, but it works... and it works just having it around, knowing that it's there. Like insurance.
 I don't think I've slept in a year.
 But my sleeping is really fucked up.
 I know what you mean. That's why I stopped.
 No, I stopped. I didn't want to feel like I was being artificially modulated.
 Enjoy it. Say good-bye.
 What do we do?
 I know.
 This is it, Joel. It's gonna be gone soon.
 Nope. No jokes. My favorite thing when I was a kid was my Huckleberry Hound doll. I think your name is magic.
 Yeah, like that.
 You mean, like...  Oh, my darlin', oh, my darlin', oh, my darlin', Clementine... ? Huckleberry Hound? That sort of thing?
 I'm Joel.
 Oh God, how horrid.
 And you picked it out of my plate before I could answer and it felt so intimate like we were already lovers.
 I'm Clementine. Can I borrow a piece of your chicken?
 You said --
 Yeah, I know. I'm fishing.
 You know what I did.
 Even then I didn't believe you entirely. I thought how could you be talking to me if you couldn't talk to people?
 I can't tell you how happy I am to hear that. I mean, I don't mean I'm happy you're uncomfortable, but, yknow... I'm such a loser. Every time I come to a party I tell myself I'm going to be different and it's always exactly the same and then I hate myself after for being such a clod.
 Yeah. I don't ever know what to say.
 I saw you sitting over here. By yourself. I thought, thank God, someone normal, who doesn't know how interact at these things either.
 You said...
 Hi.
 Hi there.
 Remember me. Try your best. Maybe we can.
 It would be different, if we could just give it another go around.
 I know.
 I still thought you were going to save me. Even after that.
 Probably.
 You had the whole human race pegged.
 I had you pegged, didn't I?
 I remember that speech really well.
 Joel, I'm not a concept. I want you to just keep that in your head. Too many guys think I'm a concept or I complete them or I'm going to make them alive, but I'm just a fucked-up girl who is looking for my own peace of mind. Don't assign me yours.
 So make your domestic decisions and maybe we'll talk again.
 Okay.
 Look, man, I'm telling you right off the bat, I'm high maintenance. So I'm not going to tiptoe around your marriage or whatever it is you got going there. If you want to be with me, you're with me.
 Not yet. Not married.
 Well, you're married.
 I'd like to... take you out or something.
 Yeah?
 Sorry to track you down like this. I'm not a stalker. But I needed to see you.
 I didn't think you'd show your face around me again. I figured you were humiliated. You did run away, after all.
 I did it. I guess that means something.
 Is that what you want?
 I told her today I need to end it.
 Yes, exactly. Exactly my point.
 It's very late.
 Come up and see me... now.
 I dropped you off after. You said --
 And I didn't have an argument.
 So what. Infatuation is good, too.
 I thought I was foolish. I thought I'd mistaken infatuation for love. You said:
 I was so nervous. I remember I couldn't think of anything to say. There were long silences.
 But you weren't. I could tell.
 I'm sure, I said.
 I said: Are you sure? You seem unsure.
 We did talk about Naomi.
 I'll buy that. Black's always good.
 Right. Something black though.
 No! I think you were wearing that black dress, y'know, with the buttons.
 Egad, were you horrified?
 God, I should know. Your hair was red. I remember it matched the wallpaper.
 What was I wearing?
 Yeah.
 Naomi, I guess.
 Do you remember what we talked about?
 This is our first "date" date.
 I want to enjoy my little time left with you.
 Yeah.
 I'm done, Clem. I'm just going to ride it out. Hiding is clearly not working.
 I love it!
 I scoured the city for it.
 Thanks, Joely. A present! Oh boy!
 Happy Birthday.
 I don't like it either, but I'm just trying to find horrible secret place to --
 Joel!
 This kid, Joe Early, is going to beat the shit out of me.
 Look at you, cutey! What are we doing?
 Hide me somewhere deeper? Somewhere buried?
 They found us before. The plan didn't work. I don't know what to do now.
 Yes, but I can't love a man named Wally.
 Don't call me Antoine. My name is Wally.
 But can't you see... I love you, Antoine.
 Gross! You must remember to tell me this in the morning. I'm, like, so freaked out now.
 He stole a pair of your panties while you were being erased!
 Really? Is he cute?
 There's this guy. I heard him talking in my apartment. He's one of the eraser guys. And he fell for you when they were erasing you, so he introduced himself the next day as if he were a stranger and now you're dating him.
 What?
 There's this guy!
 -- another rainy day. Whatever shall we do?
 I came over to the bed and you smelled so good, like you just woke up, slightly sweaty. And I climbed on the bed with you and you said something like --
 You remember what happened next?
 I loved you so much this day. On my bed in your panties. I remember I thought, how impossibly lucky am I to have you on my bed in your panties.
 You know, we're okay. They're not finding us. You'll remember me in the morning. And you'll come to me and tell me about us and we'll start over.
 Joel, Joely, look... it's not fading. The memory. I think we're hidden.
 I'm scared. I want my mommy. I don't want to lose you. I don't want to lose...
 I'm right here.
 I want my mommy.  I don't want to lose you, Clem.
 Well... if they're looking for me in memories I'm in, what if you take me to a memory I'm not in?  And we can hide there till morning.
 What do you mean?
 What if you hide me?
 I don't know.
 Wow. Um, well... can't you just force yourself awake?
 I hired them to. We're in my brain. But I want it to stop, before I wake up and don't know you anymore.
 Oh?
 Yes indeed.  Fuck! They're erasing you, Clem!
 Such a beautiful view.
 It's my favorite book. Since I was a kid. It's about these toys. There's this part where the skin Horse tells the rabbit what it means to be real.  I can't believe I'm crying already. He says, "It takes a long time. That's why it doesn't often happen to people who break easily or have sharp edges, or who have to be carefully kept. Generally by the time you are Real, most of your hair has been loved off, and your eyes drop out and you get loose in the joints and very shabby. But these things don't matter at all, because once you are Real you can't be ugly, except to people who don't understand."
 No.
 Do you know The Velveteen Rabbit?
 Yeah, Tangerine?
 Joely...
 No. Thanks.
 More?
 Joel, you're a liar.
 I just don't have anything very interesting about my life.
 I want to know you.
 No, it isn't that.
 You don't tell me things, Joel. I'm an open book. I tell you everything. Every damn embarrassing thing. You don't trust me.
 You're a whiz kid. So perceptive, so --
 You're drunk.
 Would you get me another, Joely?
 So, um --
 It's you! It's you who can't commit to anything! You have no idea how lucky you are I'm interested in you! I don't even know why I am! I should just end it right here, Joel. Leave you in the zoo. Maybe you could find a nice sloth to hang out with!
 Oh, thank God. It's going.
 I'd make a fucking good mother! I love children! I'm creative and smart and I'd make a fucking good mother!
 Clem, I'm sorry. I shouldn't have --
 You can't fucking say something like that and say you don't want to talk about it!
 Joel, We're fucking gonna talk about it!
 I don't want to talk about this here.
 What?!
 Clementine, do you really think you could take care of a kid?
 You're not ready.
 I don't think we're ready.
 No. I want to have a baby. I have to have a baby.
 Let's talk about it later.
 I want to have a baby.
 Oh shit. I remember this.  Want to go?
 I'm fucking crawling out of my skin.
 Where are you going?
 How can you watch this crap?
 Look at it out here. It's falling apart. I'm erasing you. And I'm happy.
 Fuck you, Joel. Faggot.
 Let me drive you home.
 No, see, Clem, I assume you fucked someone tonight. Isn't that how you get people to like you?
 A wino? Jesus, Are you from the fifties? A wino!  Face it, Joel. You're freaked out because I was out late without you, and in your little wormy brain, you're trying to figure out, did she fuck someone tonight?
 Oh Christ I didn't kill anybody. It's just a fucking dent. You're like some old lady or something.
 I don't know, maybe you did kill somebody.
 Well it is pathetic. And fucking irresponsible. You could've killed somebody.
 ...a little. I was a little tipsy. Don't call me pathetic.
 I can't believe you wrecked my car. You're driving drunk. It's pathetic.
 It's three.
 Yo ho ho!
 You didn't say anything about my hair.
 How could she have done this to me? How could anyone do this to anyone?
 Okay.
 Tonight. Just to test out the phone lines and all.
 Tomorrow?
 When?
 Yeah.
 You'll call me, right?
 So, I enjoyed meeting you.
 Yes.
 I would like you to call me. Would you do that? I would like that.
 Okay.
 I have to get up early in the morning tomorrow, so...
 You should stay.
 Sounds good. But right now I should go.
 I'll pack a picnic -- a night picnic -- night picnics are different -- and --
 Yeah? Oh, great!
 Okay.
 I don't believe in that soulmate crap anymore, but... he says so many great things. We like the same writers. This writer Stephen Dixon he turned me on to. And he's cute. It's fucked up. Joel, you should come up to the Charles with me sometime.
 I think so.
 Exactly! I used to do it in college and I had this urge to go do it again, so I got Patrick and we drove all night to get there and he was sweet and said nice things to me, but I was really disappointment to be there with him. Y'know? And that's where psychic stuff comes in. Like, it just isn't right with him. Y'know?
 That's scary sounding.
 That made me cry. But, anyway, we went up to Boston, because I had this urge to lie on my back on the Charles River. It gets frozen this time of year.
 Oh, yeah.
 Well, for the last week, anyway! He's kind of a kid. Kind of a goofball, but he's really stuck on me, which is flattering. Who wouldn't like that? And he's, like, a dope, but he says these smart and moving things sometimes, out of nowhere, that just break my heart. He's the one who gave me that crow photograph.
 I don't either. I used to. But I'm through with that. Y'know, if I don't love my body, then I'm just lost. You know? With all the wrinkles and scars and the general falling apart that's coming 'round the bend.  So, I've been seeing this guy...
 No, not at all.
 I'm nervous. You don't need to be nervous around me, though. I like you. Do you think I'm repulsively fat?
 No.
 You're very nice. God, I have to stop saying that. You're nervous around me, huh?
 Yeah.
 Like I wanted to talk to you. I didn't need any more reason to do it. Who knows what bigger cosmic reason might exist?
 Yeah. I think so. It's hard to --
 What's the goal, Joel?  My goal, Joel, is to just let it flow through me? Do you know what I mean? It's like, there's all these emotions and ideas and they come quick and they change and they leave and they come back in a different form and I think we're all taught we should be consistent. Y'know? You love someone -- that's it. Forever. You choose to do something with your life -- that's it, that's what you do. It's a sign of maturity to stick with that and see things through. And my feeling is that's how you die, because you stop listening to what is true, and what is true is constantly changing. You know?
 Yeah.
 And, anyway, you sell yourself short. I can tell. There's a lot of stuff going on in your brain. I can tell. My goal... can I tell you my goal?
 Thanks.
 I like you. That's the thing about my psychic thing. I think that's my greatest psychic power, that I get a sense about people. My problem is I never trust it. But I get it. And with you I get that you're a really good guy.
 I do have a tendency to use that word too much.
 You're really nice. I'm sorry I yelled at you before about it. God, I'm an idiot.
 I think about that.
 Oh.  Does that make you sad? Or anxious? I'm always anxious thinking I'm not living my life to the fullest, y'know? Taking advantage of every possibility? Just making sure that I'm not wasting one second of the little time I have.
 Sorry. My life isn't that interesting. I go to work. I go home. I don't know what to say.
 It's helpful to think there's some order to things. You're kind of closed mouthed, aren't you?
 But I think I am. I like to think I am.
 Yeah, I guess.
 Exactly. Exactly! That's exactly my feeling about it. It's hard to know. Like, okay, but how many times do I think something and it doesn't happen? That's what you're saying, right? You forget about those times. Right?
 Yeah, I don't know. It's hard to know.
 Me neither. But sometimes I have premonitions, so, I don't know. Maybe that's just coincidence. Right? Y'know, you think something and then it happens, or you think a word and then someone says it? Y'know?
 I don't know.
 Well, I go to a psychic and she's always telling me I'm psychic. She should know. Do you believe in that stuff?
 Yeah?
 Y'know, I'm sort of psychic.
 Drink up, young man. It'll make the whole seduction part less repugnant.
 Thanks.
 I know a man who needs a refill.
 No. I --
 No, stay. Just for a little while.  Refill?
 Well, I should probably get going.
 I don't know! I can't see them from here, Joel! Just pick something good.
 You just say. I'm not really --
 You pick it.
 What do you want to hear?
 No, I'm okay for now.
 Ready for another?
 Yeah? Well, have a seat, anyway.
 I'm fine.
 God, that feels so fucking good. Take yours off.
 Cheers.
 I miss grade school. I don't know why I'm calling it grade school all of a sudden. When I went we called it elementary school. But I like grade school better. Sounds like something someone from the forties would call it. I'd like to be from then. Everyone wore hats. Anyway, cheers!
 It's pretty.
 Yeah. I'm not, like, a Robert Frost lover by any stretch. His stuff seems strictly grade school to me. But this made me cry for some reason. Maybe because it is grade school. Y'know?
 Frost?
 Me neither. Oh, there's an inscription on the back.  The way a crow/Shook down on me/The dust of snow/From a hemlock tree/Has given my heart/A change of mood/And saved some part/Of a day I rued.
 I don't know.
 Do you believe in that stuff? Reincarnation?
 Thanks. That was good, that crow sound.
 This... someone gave that to me, just like, recently. I like it, too. I like crows. I think I used to be a crow.
 Very much.
 You like that?
 Never mind. Sorry, that was stupid. I'm embarrassed. Good night, Joel.
 Um --
 Hey, do you want to have a drink? I have lots of drinks. And I could --
 Take care.
 Oh, geez, I'm full of shit. I already told you that.  Anyway. See Ya.
 Well, I wouldn't want to be --
 Thanks very much. That was very nice of you.
 I'm just a bit of a wreck. "I sleep in your hat" makes me cry.  Me.
 What?
 Remember? "And you take on the dreams of the ones who have slept there/And I'm lost in the window/I hide on the stairway/I hang in the curtain/I sleep in your hat..."  Oh, shit. I'm so stupid. Sorry.
 Sort of, um...
 The song's 9th and Hennepin. I spent most of the train ride trying to remember. "Till you're full of rag water and bitters and blue ruin/And you spill out/Over the side to anyone who'll listen." Remember?
 Yeah? I can't remember that album very well. I remember liking it. But --
 Me too. It is Rain Dogs, by the way.
 I like to read.
 So you like bookstores, huh?
 It's okay. I didn't think you were.
 Look, I'm very sorry I came off sort of nutso. I'm not really.
 Wilmont. Near the high school.
 Yeah.
 You know Wilmont?
 I'm not a stalker.
 You can't be too careful. I've been stalked. I've been told I'm highly stalkable. I don't need that.
 Well, I probably wouldn't say if I were, but no.
 You're not a stalker or anything, right?
 Where do you live?
 Yeah?
 It's okay.
 I don't want to take you out of your way.
 You're sure? It's cold.
 No, that's okay. Thanks, though.
 Hi. I could give you a ride if you need.
 Unless I get that hair-color-naming job.
 Probably see you at the book store.
 Oh, okay. Well, sure, I'll just...  Take care, then.
 It's no problem. Anyway, I have some stuff I need to --
 My embarrassing admission is I really like that you're nice. Right now, anyway. I can't tell from one moment to the next what I'm going to like. But right now I'm glad you said, "that's okay" to me. That was nice of you.
 That's okay.
 I'm sorry I... yelled at you. Was it yelling? I can't really tell. Whatever, I'm a little out of sorts today.
 Yes?
 Joel? It's Joel, right?
 Shit. Shit. I know it's here. Hold on.
 Okay.
 I don't need nice. I don't need myself to be it and I don't need anyone else to be it at me.
 Well, anyway... Sorry.
 Now I'm nice? Don't you know any other adjectives? There's careless and snotty and overbearing and argumentative... mumpish.
 Oh. I don't know. I was just... I don't know. I was... You seemed nice, so --
 Why wouldn't you think that about me?
 See, I wouldn't think that about you.
 Yeah. Although it hardly fits. I'm a vindictive little bitch, truth be told.
 Sorry. It's a pretty name, though. It means "merciful", right?
 Oh my darlin', oh my darlin', oh my darlin' Clementine? No?
 I'm not nuts.
 Huckleberry Hound! What, are you nuts?
 I don't know what that means.
 Huckleberry Hound?
 I don't know any jokes about your name.
 No jokes about my name? Oh, you wouldn't do that; you're trying to be nice.
 I'm Joel.
 My name's Clementine, by the way.
 Yeah, I got it.
 Sorry. I was just trying to be nice.
 Well, you don't know me, so... you don't know, do you?
 Oh, I doubt that's the case.
 I think. Anyway, I've tried all their colors. More than once. I'm getting too old for this. But it keeps me from having to develop an actual personality. I apply my personality in a paste. You?
 You sure? That doesn't sound --
 My writing career! Your hair written by Clementine Kruczynski.  The Tom Waits album is Rain Dogs.
 I'm sure you would.
 Someone's got that job.  Agent Orange! I came up with that one. Anyway, there are endless color possibilities and I'd be great at it.
 You think that could possibly be a full time job? How many hair colors could there be?
 Purple Haze, Pink Eraser.
 I don't really know how --
 Anyway, this company makes a whole line of colors with equally snappy names. Red Menace, Yellow Fever, Green Revolution. That'd be a job, coming up with those names. How do you get a job like that? That's what I'll do. Fuck the dole.
 I can't remember.
 Exactly! Tom Waits. Which song?
 Yeah. Tom Waits says it in --
 Blue ruin is cheap gin in case you were wondering.
 I like it.
 Ah, the hair.  Blue, right? It's called Blue Ruin. The color. Snappy name, huh?
 I noticed your hair. I guess it made an impression on me, that's why I was pretty sure I recognized you.
 I'll go on the dole. Like my daddy before me.
 I don't have one.
 Well, I'm there. I hide in the back as much as is humanly possible. You have a cell phone? I need to quit right this minute. I'll call in dead.
 -- because I go there all the time. I don't think I ever saw you before.
 Jesus, is it five years? I gotta quit right now.
 Really? Because --
 Ucch, really? You're kidding. God. Bizarre small world, huh? Yeah, that's me: book slave there for, like, five years now.
 The weirder part is I think actually I recognize you. I thought that earlier in the diner. That's why I was looking at you. You work at Borders, right?
 Get out! Me too! What are the odds?
 Rockville Center.
 Just, you know, to chat a little, maybe. I have a long trip ahead of me.  How far are you going? On the train, I mean, of course.
 It's okay, really.
 No, I don't want to bug you if you're trying to --
 I mean, it's okay if you want to sit down here. I didn't mean to --
 Oh. So...
 No, I mean, I don't know. I can't really think of much to say probably.
 It's okay if I sit closer? So I don't have to scream. Not that I don't need to scream sometimes, believe me.  But I don't want to bug you if you're trying to write or something.
 Anyway. Sorry. Hi.
 Aw, c'mon, live dangerously. Take the leap and assume someone is talking to you in an otherwise empty car.
 Well, I didn't want to assume.
 Really?
 No, I didn't know if you were talking to me, so...
 Why are you sorry? I just said hi.
 Why what?
 Why?
 I'm sorry.
 Jesus.
 Your dried cum.
 I don't know. Panties and --
 Guess what I'm wearing.
 You must have been crazy.
 God, I can't believe I ever hated you.
 I'm just, y'know, passing the time best I can till I can see you.
 Hey, lover. Whatcha doing?
 Hi, it's Joel.
 Joel, we've fucked. We've made love. Like a million times. And we were so sweet and shy and inept with each other last night. Isn't that lovely?
 Look, I have to go. I have to think.
 I know. I spoke to my friend Magda.
 It's true.
 That's what you have to say? How could it be true? I never even heard of any procedure like this. It's a joke.
 Maybe it's true then. It's my voice on the tape.
 I mean, I haven't even told anyone I've met you. Who would even know to do this?
 I probably got the same thing as you.
 Did you send this? Is it a joke?
 Yeah?
 Tomorrow night... honeymoon on ice.
 I guess so.
 Ha Ha! You said, I do. I guess that means we're married.
 Oddly enough, I do.
 Hmmm. Do you miss me?
 I just walked in.
 What took you so long?
 There you are.  Naomi, it's just... I'm afraid if we fall back into this fast without considering the problems we had...
 That's me.
 Long day thinking.
 I just got in.
 Yeah, I tried you at home. Did you get my message?
 I know. I had to take the day to think.
 Good. I called you at work today. They said you were home sick.
 How's it going?
 Hi.
 Hi, Naomi, it's Joel.
 I didn't want to go. I was too nervous. I thought, maybe you were a nut. But you were exciting. You called from upstairs.
 I really should go. I really need to catch my ride.
 I couldn't believe you did that. I was paralyzed with fear.
 Clementine.
 Next thing I remember we were walking down near the surf.
 So you're still on the Zoloft?
 But I went back to my food. The next thing I remember, I felt someone sitting next to me and I saw the orange sleeve out of the corner of my eye.
 I remember being drawn to you even then. I thought, I love this woman because she's alone down there looking out at the black ocean.
 Your back to me. In that orange sweatshirt I would come to know so well and even hate eventually. At the time I thought, how cool, an orange sweatshirt.
 This is it. The night we met. My God, it's over.
 Okay. I wish you could come.
 On the couch. Dark. Quiet. I wondered if I had made a terrible mistake. I almost reached for the phone about a thousand times. I thought I could take it back, erase it, explain I had momentarily lost my mind. Then I told myself we weren't happy. That was the truth. That what we were was safe. It was unfair to you and to me to stay in a relationship for that reason. I thought about Clementine and the spark when I was with her, but then I thought what you and I had was real and adult and therefore significant even if it wasn't much fun. But I wanted fun. I saw other people having fun and I wanted it. Then I thought fun is a lie, that no one is really having fun; I'm being suckered by advertising and movie bullshit... then I thought maybe not, maybe not. And then I thought, as I always do at this point in my argument, about dying.
 Naomi.
 I didn't want to do this. But I had to or they would've called me a girl.
 I can't. I have to go home. I'll do it later.
 I loved you on this day. I love this memory. The rain. Us just hanging.
 She's so sexy.
 Is that like us? Are we just bored with each other?
 How's the chicken?
 And what are you like? A wino?
 Right! She called me an old lady here, too! And I remember, I said...
 Any messages, Carmen?
 I wasn't going to call her. Not after the way she was.
 So then she just stops calling.
 Oh, God. I miss her. I can't believe she's with that guy now! I'm never going to see her again. I love her so much. What a fucking monster she is!
 Gotta get home. How could she do this to me? How could she not care about what we meant to each other. What a fuck! What a fucking monster she is!
 That's your look for me.
 Clementine.
 Maybe if I just explain what happened, I wouldn't have to go through this and I could tell you everything and it would be like you knew and we could rebuild and we could be happy again and...
 I love you and if you knew that... if I told you what happened... I'll explain everything, what we meant to each other. I'll tell you everything about our time together. You'll know everything again and...
 Clementine. I should just maybe talk to her.
 I should maybe talk to you.
 It's too late.
 It's them.
 The pill was pink, I remember. It had some letters and numbers on it. What were they? AL 1718? AL something. Four digits. I don't like taking pills when I don't know what they are. I have no choice.
 Pink.  There was a number on it. I remember. AL 1718?  I have to follow through with this. I have no choice.
 Fuck you, Clementine.
 Maybe I'm making a mistake. Maybe I just need to learn to live with this. First of all, I'll get over it. Secondly, it happened. Those who do not remember history are condemned to repeat it. Who said that? Churchill? I'm not sure. But I don't care. She did it to me. I have to rid myself of this. Fuck her.
 I might be making a mistake.
 I'm like a joke to them.
 The driver waved. So casual, friendly.
 There are two of them. Couldn't make them out. The orange glow of a cigarette.
 It was snowing.
 Yes, but... I'm just something you're imagining. What can I do? I'm in your head, too.
 I'm trapped in my head and everything I love is being erased! Stop it now!
 What? What do you mean?
 You have to stop this!
 We can help you through this. Why don't you start now by telling me everything you can remember about --
 It was a mess. I don't know how it got this way...
 We can help you through this. Why don't you start now by telling me everything you can remember about your relationship with Clementine.
 Well... I did.
 I'm sorry you saw one of our notification cards. You never should have.
 Well, technically, the procedure itself is brain damage, but on a par with a night of heavy drinking. Nothing you'll miss.
 Is there any sort of risk of brain damage?
 We'll start with your most recent memories and go backwards -- There is an emotional core to each of our memories -- As we eradicate this core, it starts its degradation process -- By the time you wake up in the morning, all memories we've targeted will have withered and disappeared. Like a dream upon waking.
 'Night.
 We'll speak soon.
 So I'm going to get some sleep. I'm glad you're okay.
 I had a good time last night. I really did.
 Okay, Joel. I suppose you're right.
 I don't know. I'm not sure there's a big public demand for books on Calvinism and Misogyny.
 So you think the dissertation will get published?
 I'm glad you called.
 I'm sorry. I really shouldn't have --
 A religion instructor at Columbia. A good guy. He's a good guy.
 Oh! Great. That's great!
 Miss you, too.  I have been seeing someone for a little while.
 I miss you.
 Oh, sweetie. It really does cut both ways. We were taking each other for granted and --
 Well, it was my fault -- the break- up. I'm sorry.
 I'm sorry.
 It's been a pretty lonely couple of years.
 So... you haven't been involved with anyone in all this time?
 Yeah.
 I hope you get your work done.
 Say hi to Rob and Carrie. Have some fun!
 I've got to finish this chapter anyway.
 So you don't mind?
 In a minute.
 Yeah. Come to bed. I'm cold.
 Go back to sleep.
 Hi, Rob and Carrie.
 You didn't miss much. Rob and Carrie say hello.
 How was it?
 Hi.
 Hi.
 It's not somebody else.
 The thing is, Joel, whatever it is you think you have with this chick, once the thrill wears off, you're just going to be Joel with the same fucking problems.
 No. I just need some space, maybe.
 Bullshit. Who is it? You met someone.
 I think maybe, we're both so used to operating at this level that -- How can one person be unhappy? If one person is unhappy, both have to be... by definition.
 Don't say "we" when you mean "you."
 Y'know, we've been, I don't know, sort of, unhappy with each other and --
 What?
 I don't know, I've just been thinking, maybe we're not happy with each other.
 So what's going on, Joel?
 Don't do this to me now, Joel. Really.
 Naomi, I really value our relationship. I hope it's possible for us to stay in touch.
 You take it. I don't know.
 Yours?
 I think he'll be in Bartlett's one day.
 Definitely!
 I like to read what smart people say. So many beautiful, important things.
 Very cool. Trippy.
 "The quotations when engraved upon the memory give you good thoughts."
 Yeah. Cool.
 I love quotes. So did Winston Churchill. He actually has a quotation in Bartlett's about Bartlett's. Isn't that trippy?
 Nah, I don't know.
 Oh, Patrick, you didn't want any, did you?
 Hi, Mary. How's it going?
 Oh, hey, Patrick.
 Mary... please. This is hurting people.
 Remember the Alamo! Remember the Alamo!
 The office is filled with people who want their memories re-erased.
 I won't allow it. Those who cannot remember the past are condemned to repeat it. What do you think of that? That's from my quote book.
 Mary, people come to him voluntarily.
 They have a right to know. Howard is a thief. He steals the truth.  I can't remember my baby! I can't remember my baby. It existed and I can't even remember. Do you understand that?
 I don't know. I just -- there are a lot of really confused people showing up at the office.
 Then why did you ask me?
 I know what it is.
 Nothing.
 What's this?
 Can I... I brought some --
 What do you want, Stan?
 Hi.
 Oh.
 Thanks, Stan.
 You were in red. That red sweater with the little flowers, I think. You were leaning against his car.  He looked a little like a kid. Kind of goofy and wide-eyed. I'd never seen him look like that before. Happy. You looked beautiful. You looked in love.
 Do you remember anything else? What I was wearing? Was I standing close to him? Was I leaning against his car like I owned it? How did he look at me when I giggled? Tell me everything.
 I really like you, Mary. You know that.
 I never saw you together like that again. So I figured I was imagining things.
 And after that?
 Happy. Happy with a secret.
 How did I look?
 It was here. At his car. I was coming back from a job and spotted you together. You seemed caught. I waved. You giggled.
 Once, maybe.
 And you never even suspected? Never saw us behaving in any unusual way together?
 I swear.
 Do you swear you didn't know?
 Hey.
 Hell no.
 You better go.
 He's coming?
 This guy's only half cooked. There's no time to fuck around, Stan.
 No way. I can handle this.
 Shit!
 Sor-ry  We have to do something. He can't wake up half done.
 I don't know! I just said that!
 Well, what should we do?
 I don't know what to do! I don't know what to do! Crap. Crap...
 I don't know. He's not on the map.
 Where?
 It's not erasing. He's off the screen.
 Listen, it's not erasing.
 What?
 It's stopped.
 You love him, don't you?
 To let people begin again. It's beautiful. You look at a baby and it's so fresh, so clean, so free. And adults... they're like this messy tangle of anger and phobias and sadness... hopelessness. And Howard just makes it go away.
 Yeah.
 It's amazing, isn't it? Such a gift Howard gave the world.
 Go.
 Let him go, Stan. I can help.
 Yup.
 Don't you think Howard's like that? Smart? Important?
 Yup.
 It's a good one all right.
 Yeah, I can't wait to tell Howard! It seems really appropriate.
 That's a good one.
 Nietzsche. Beyond Good and Evil. Found it my Bartletts.
 Well, allow me to do the honors. It's fucking freezing and I need something.
 We haven't checked.
 Yeah.  Poor guy.  Have anything to drink?
 You found us okay?
 It's freezing out.
 I better do this, Stan.
 Hey, if you're ordering lunch for Mierzwiak, would you --
 'kay.
 See you later, alligator.
 Anyway, I've got to do my tap dance here.
 I know. Anyway --
 It's just... y'know... I mean...
 Sorry. I just --
 Stan... c'mon...
 Hi.
 Boo.
 I didn't make you. You thought it best.  But, look, I take full responsibility.
 You made me have you erased! I loved you. I love you! How could you --
 It was a mutual decision.
 You made me have an abortion.
 I have a family, Mary.
 Do you love me? Did you love me? Something. I listened to my tape. I can't believe I've been sitting right in front of it for a year. It's like listening to someone else's story. I mean, I hear myself talking about having sex with you and I can't even imagine you naked. I can't even say "naked" to you!
 I don't know what I'm supposed say, Mary. I want to do the right thing here.
 Thanks.  So... do we talk about this... or what?
 We... have a history. I'm sorry. You wanted the procedure. You wanted it done... to get past. I have to finish in there. It's almost morning. We'll talk later.
 What, Howard?
 No you're right. Once again. You're a decent man, Howard.
 We can't do this.
 I wish I was your wife. I wish I had your kids.
 I've got a wife, Mary. Kids. You know that.
 I've loved you for a very long time. I'm sorry! I shouldn't have said that.
 Okay. Good. Great. Thanks.  I like you, Howard... an awful lot. Is that terrible?
 It's fine, Mary. I'm happy to hear it.
 Really? I thought it was appropriate maybe. That's all.  I really admire the work that you do. I know it's not proper to be so familiar but I guess since we're outside the workplace I feel a certain liberty to --
 That's lovely.
 You are such a sweetheart.
 It's no big deal.
 Yes, shit. Oops, sorry!  Sorry. It's just I told myself I wasn't going to say Pope Alexander and sound like a dope and then I go ahead and do it. Like I psyched myself out.
 Alexander Pope?
 There's another one I like, I read. It's by Pope Alexander.
 It's a good quote, Mary. I'm glad we both know it.
 Yeah, yeah it is, Howard. And here I was thinking I could tell you something you didn't know.
 Is that Nietzsche?
 Okay, um, there's one that goes "Blessed are the forgetful, for they get the better even of their blunders."
 Oh. Well, I'd love to hear some.
 Oh, um, like famous quotes. I find reading them inspirational to me. And in my reading I've come across some I thought you might like, too.
 How do you mean?
 Do you like quotes, Howard?
 Well, thank you, Mary.
 That was beautiful to watch, Howard. Like a surgeon or a concert pianist.
 Okay, we're back in.
 Welcome, Howard.
 Thanks.
 Cole slaw, ice tea?
 Order me a pastrami for after?
 Yes?
 Mary...
 Thanks, Mary. You can bring her in.
 Howard, your one o'clock.
 1062 Sherman Drive. Apartment 1E, Rockville Center.
 Jesus. All right, what's the address.
 He went home sick.
 Well, where was Patrick?
 I was away from the monitor for a second. I had it on automatic. I had to go pee.
 Okay, what happened right before he disappeared?
 The guy we're doing? He's disappeared from the map. I can't find him anywhere.
 Stan? What's going on?
 Jesus.
 Mary has stolen our files and is sending them back to people.
 I don't know what you're talking about, Howard.
 She should not have done this, Stan. As mad as she was... as justifiably --
 Thanks, Stan. Thanks.
 So, I've got to drop the van off.
 That's fine, Stan.
 I'll go out for a smoke. If no one minds.
 Oh dear.
 Howard, they've disappeared again.
 Yeah, probably a good idea.
 You get some sleep, Howard. I'll take it from here.
 Yeah. Of course.
 Did you try going through C-Gate?
 I tried that already.
 She came to help, Howard.
 Mary. What are you doing here?
 December 15th, 2004. I met someone tonight. Oh, Christ: I don't know what to do. Her name is Clementine and she's amazing. So alive and spontaneous and passionate and sensitive. Things with Naomi and I have been stagnant for so long.
 Ah, your journal. This will be invaluable.
 Maybe after the holidays then.
 This book -- It's essential that people read it because --  -- It's the truth. And only I know it.
 Of course. Please have a seat.
 Would you just try him? You never know. As long as I'm here. You never know.
 I think he's in a conference. Unfortunately. I'm really sorry.
 Hi, I was in the neighborhood and thought I'd see --
 Oh, hi.
 Thanks, Stan. I owe you.
 I can handle it. He's pretty much on auto-pilot anyway.
 She's right in the neighborhood. She's upset.
 Patrick, we're in the middle of --
 Hold on. Let me ask my friend.  Stan, can I leave for a little while? My girlfriend is very --
 It's a quote book.
 What's your bartlett's?
 Okay, There's more, Stan --
 Maybe if you stopped stealing their panties.
 Mary hates me. I've never been popular with the ladies.
 Jesus, Patrick!
 She was beautiful. So sweet and funky and voluptuous. I kind of stole a pair of her panties, is what.
 She was unconscious, Patrick.
 I gotta tell you something. I kind of fell in love with her last night.
 Patrick, we need to focus.
 The thing is... my situation is a little weird. My girlfriend situation.
 This one's history. Moving on...
 Did I tell you I have a new girlfriend?
 You can if you want.
 I wonder if I should invite my girlfriend over, too. I have a girlfriend now.
 She likes you okay.
 I like Mary. I like when she comes to visit. I just don't think she likes me.
 Just wanted to let you know.
 Yeah?
 Yeah.
 Patrick, let's just get through this. We have a long night ahead of us.
 Not a dump, then, but kind of plain. Uninspired. And there's a stale smell. Sort of stuffy. I don't know. Stuffy.
 It's an apartment.
 Yeah, that looks better. Thanks.
 Does that help?
 Then check the connections.
 The voltage looks fine.
 That's your problem.
 How am I going to be the progenitor of a tribe when I'm living on an isolated ridgetop with Delores?
 Suppose that you bear five or six children with your characteristics. All in Siwash Cave. In a postcatastrophe world, your offspring would of necessity intermarry, forming in time a tribe. A tribe every member of which had giant thumbs. A tribe of Big Thumbs would relate to the environment in very special ways. It could not use weapons or produce sophisticated tools. It would have to rely on its wits and its senses. It would have to live with animals -- and plants! -- as virtual equals. It's extremely pleasant to me to think about a tribe of physical eccentrics living peacefully with animals and plants, learning their languages, perhaps, and paying them the respect they deserve.
 The world isn't going to end, you dummy; I hope you know that much.  But it is going to change. It's going to change drastically, and probably in your lifetime. The Clock People see calamitous earthquakes as the agent of change, and they may be right, since there are a hundred thousand earthquakes a year and major ones are long overdue. But there are far worse catastrophes coming... unless the human race can bring itself to abandon the goals and values of civilization, in other words, unless it can break the consumption habit -- and we are so conditioned to consuming as a way of life that for most of us life would have no meaning without the yearnings and rewards of progressive consumption. It isn't merely that our bad habits will cause global catastrophes, but that our operative political-economic philosophies have us in such a blind crab grip that they prevent us from preparing for the natural disasters that are not our fault. So the apocalyptic shit is going to hit the fan, all right, but there'll be some of us it'll miss. Little pockets of humanity. Like the Clock People. Like you two honeys, if you decide to accept my offer of a lease on Siwash Cave. There's almost no worldwide calamity -- famine, nuclear accident, plague, weather warfare or reduction of the ozone shield -- that you couldn't survive in that cave.
 Well, if the Clock People give you any inside information on the end of the world, drop us a postcard.
 Easy come, easy go.
 But that's an old story now...... I can't believe that you would leave the Butte.
 You mean she's dead?
 She had a one way-ticket to Kansas City.
 I want to go back to the Clock People. I kind of miss those fool redskins and wonder what they're up to. What's happened to Jelly?
 The Countess has come to our aid. The Rubber Rose Ranch is officially deeded to all the cowgirls. And I have been asked to oversee the ranch. For $300 a week. And as it turns out, the Countess is not going to be the vegetable the doctors thought he was... here's a picture!
 Yes, everything is getting worse. But everything is also getting better.
 Is everything getting worse?
 Ha ha ho ho and hee hee.
 What do you believe in then?
 The Clock People mistook me for Chinese. And the name stuck. In the same way that all Indian tribes came to be labeled "Indians" through the ignorance of an Italian sailor with a taste for oranges, it is only fitting that "Indians" misnamed me. The Clock People, however, are not a tribe, rather they are a gathering of Indians from various tribes. They have lived together since 1906.
 Then if you are Japanese, then why are you called the Chink?
 During the Second World War I busted out of Tule Lake detention camp; as a Japanese-American, I had been put there and watched over. I found refuge with the Clock People, who discovered me in a snow bank, near dead, I had been climbing across the Sierra Nevada mountains.
 The Clock People?
 But unlike the clockworks of the Clock People, my ticks more accurately echo the ticks of the universe....  ......ha ha ho ho and hee hee.
 He was a degenerated warlock who could turn urine into beer, and the honor that he extended me gave me rights of occupancy in this sacred cave on this far-away Siwash Ridge. I came to the Dakota hills to construct a clockworks of my own.
 Siwash, huh?
 The Clockworks is one reason that I am here on Siwash Ridge. I accepted the invitation to be initiated as a shaman by an aged Siwash chief who was the principle outside confederate of the Clock People.
 Clockworks?
 Clockworks.
 What was that?
 Neither do I... ha ha ho ho hee hee.
 But I don't know how to polka.
 Save your breath for the climb.
 Oh? Well, there's been some trouble on the ranch. I came up here to get out of the way. It's so dark now I doubt if I could find my way back down. If you could help...
 I know who you are.
 I'm a friend of Bonanza Jellybean's.
 Oh, Rupert and Carla had a little hassle and went home.
 Where are the others?
 You might say that, although I don't think of it as traveling.
 A traveler, eh?
 Well, no, I don't reside anywhere in particular. I just keep moving.
 You don't?
 I don't.
 I know, but where do you reside when you aren't visiting New York?
 I'm staying with the Countess.
 Where do you live, Miss Hankshaw?
 If I flinch when you say you love me, it's both our problems. My confusion becomes your confusion. Students confuse teachers, patients confuse psychiatrists, lovers with confused hearts confuse lovers with clear hearts....
 Every time I tell you that I love you, you flinch. But that's your problem.
 But the peyote is obviously affecting their brains. It's made them break a migratory pattern that goes back thousands of years.
 'Drugged' is a stupid word.
 No, I guess not.
 How did this business get started, anyhow? Why are the birds nesting here?
 Hell no, the cranes are wonderful, okay, but I'm not in this for whooping cranes. I'm in it for cowgirls. If we cowgirls give in to authority on this crane issue, then cowgirls become just another compromise. I want a finer fate than that -- for me and for every other cowgirl. Better no cowgirls at all than cowgirls compromised.
 So be it. It looks serious this time, though. All these guns... are you actually prepared to kill and die for whooping cranes?
 Looks like every time we get together things are in a mess.
 FROM MEN, THE WHOOPING CRANE HAS RECEIVED NEITHER LOVE NOR RESPECT. MEN HAVE DRAINED THE CRANE'S MARSHES, STOLEN ITS EGGS, INVADED ITS PRIVACY, POLLUTED ITS FOOD, FOULED ITS AIR, BLOWN IT APART WITH BUCKSHOT.
 That's Jellybean!
 I wouldn't say that. I expect she's right, ultimately. But I'm with Delores when it comes to fighting for what's mine. I can't understand why Delores is so uptight about the Chink; he could probably teach her a thing or two. Ee! That grass tickles, doesn't it? God knows I love women, but nothing can take the place of a man that fits. Still this is cowgirl territory and I'll stand with Delores and fight any bastards who might deny it. I guess I've always been a scrapper. Look. This scar. Only twelve years old and I was felled by a silver bullet.
 You don't agree with Debbie, then?